Security Breach and Spilled Secrets Have Shaken the N.S.A. to Its Core WASHINGTON — Jake Williams awoke last April in an Orlando, Fla., hotel where he was leading a training session. Checking Twitter, the cybersecurity expert was dismayed to discover that he had been thrust into the middle of one of the worst security debacles ever to befall American intelligence.Mr. Williams had written on his company blog about the Shadow Brokers, a mysterious group that had somehow obtained many of the hacking tools the United States used to spy on other countries. Now the group had replied in an angry screed on Twitter. It identified him — correctly — as a former member of the National Security Agency’s hacking group, Tailored Access Operations, or T.A.O., a job he had not publicly disclosed. Then the Shadow Brokers astonished him by dropping technical details that made clear they knew about highly classified hacking operations that he had conducted.America’s largest and most secretive intelligence agency had been deeply infiltrated.“They had operational insight that even most of my fellow operators at T.A.O. did not have,” said Mr. Williams, now with Rendition Infosec, a cybersecurity firm he founded. “I felt like I’d been kicked in the gut. Whoever wrote this either was a well-placed insider or had stolen a lot of operational data.”The jolt to Mr. Williams from the Shadow Brokers’ riposte was part of a much broader earthquake that has shaken the N.S.A. to its core. Current and former agency officials say the Shadow Brokers disclosures, which began in August 2016, have been catastrophic for the N.S.A., calling into question its ability to protect potent cyberweapons and its very value to national security. The agency regarded as the world’s leader in breaking into adversaries’ computer networks failed to protect its own.“These leaks have been incredibly damaging to our intelligence and cyber capabilities,” said Leon E. Panetta, the former defense secretary and director of the Central Intelligence Agency. “The fundamental purpose of intelligence is to be able to effectively penetrate our adversaries in order to gather vital intelligence. By its very nature, that only works if secrecy is maintained and our codes are protected.”With a leak of intelligence methods like the N.S.A. tools, Mr. Panetta said, “Every time it happens, you essentially have to start over.”Fifteen months into a wide-ranging investigation by the agency’s counterintelligence arm, known as Q Group, and the F.B.I., officials still do not know whether the N.S.A. is the victim of a brilliantly executed hack, with Russia as the most likely perpetrator, an insider’s leak, or both. Three employees have been arrested since 2015 for taking classified files, but there is fear that one or more leakers may still be in place. And there is broad agreement that the damage from the Shadow Brokers already far exceeds the harm to American intelligence done by Edward J. Snowden, the former N.S.A. contractor who fled with four laptops of classified material in 2013.Mr. Snowden’s cascade of disclosures to journalists and his defiant public stance drew far more media coverage than this new breach. But Mr. Snowden released code words, while the Shadow Brokers have released the actual code; if he shared what might be described as battle plans, they have loosed the weapons themselves. Created at huge expense to American taxpayers, those cyberweapons have now been picked up by hackers from North Korea to Russia and shot back at the United States and its allies.Millions of people saw their computers shut down by ransomware, with demands for payments in digital currency to have their access restored. Tens of thousands of employees at Mondelez International, the Oreo cookie maker, had their data completely wiped. FedEx reported that an attack on a European subsidiary had halted deliveries and cost $300 million. Hospitals in Pennsylvania, Britain and Indonesia had to turn away patients. The attacks disrupted production at a car plant in France, an oil company in Brazil and a chocolate factory in Tasmania, among thousands of enterprises affected worldwide.American officials had to explain to close allies — and to business leaders in the United States — how cyberweapons developed at Fort Meade in Maryland, came to be used against them. Experts believe more attacks using the stolen N.S.A. tools are all but certain.Inside the agency’s Maryland headquarters and its campuses around the country, N.S.A. employees have been subjected to polygraphs and suspended from their jobs in a hunt for turncoats allied with the Shadow Brokers. Much of the agency’s cyberarsenal is still being replaced, curtailing operations. Morale has plunged, and experienced cyberspecialists are leaving the agency for better-paying jobs — including with firms defending computer networks from intrusions that use the N.S.A.’s leaked tools.“It’s a disaster on multiple levels,” Mr. Williams said. “It’s embarrassing that the people responsible for this have not been brought to justice.”In response to detailed questions, an N.S.A. spokesman, Michael T. Halbig, said the agency “cannot comment on Shadow Brokers.” He denied that the episode had hurt morale. “N.S.A. continues to be viewed as a great place to work; we receive more than 140,000 applications each year for our hiring program,” he said.Compounding the pain for the N.S.A. is the attackers’ regular online public taunts, written in ersatz broken English. Their posts are a peculiar mash-up of immaturity and sophistication, laced with profane jokes but also savvy cultural and political references. They suggest that their author — if not an American — knows the United States well.“Is NSA chasing shadowses?” the Shadow Brokers asked in a post on Oct. 16, mocking the agency’s inability to understand the leaks and announcing a price cut for subscriptions to its “monthly dump service” of stolen N.S.A. tools. It was a typically wide-ranging screed, touching on George Orwell’s “1984”; the end of the federal government’s fiscal year on Sept. 30; Russia’s creation of bogus accounts on Facebook and Twitter; and the phenomenon of American intelligence officers going to work for contractors who pay higher salaries.One passage, possibly hinting at the Shadow Brokers’ identity, underscored the close relationship of Russian intelligence to criminal hackers. “Russian security peoples,” it said, “is becoming Russian hackeres at nights, but only full moons.”Russia is the prime suspect in a parallel hemorrhage of hacking tools and secret documents from the C.I.A.’s Center for Cyber Intelligence, posted week after week since March to the WikiLeaks website under the names Vault7 and Vault8. That breach, too, is unsolved. Together, the flood of digital secrets from agencies that invest huge resources in preventing such breaches is raising profound questions.Have hackers and leakers made secrecy obsolete? Has Russian intelligence simply outplayed the United States, penetrating the most closely guarded corners of its government? Can a work force of thousands of young, tech-savvy spies ever be immune to leaks?Some veteran intelligence officials believe a lopsided focus on offensive cyberweapons and hacking tools has, for years, left American cyberdefense dangerously porous.“We have had a train wreck coming,” said Mike McConnell, the former N.S.A. director and national intelligence director. “We should have ratcheted up the defense parts significantly.”At the heart of the N.S.A. crisis is Tailored Access Operations, the group where Mr. Williams worked, which was absorbed last year into the agency’s new Directorate of Operations.T.A.O. — the outdated name is still used informally — began years ago as a side project at the agency’s research and engineering building at Fort Meade. It was a cyber Skunk Works, akin to the special units that once built stealth aircraft and drones. As Washington’s need for hacking capabilities grew, T.A.O. expanded into a separate office park in Laurel, Md., with additional teams at facilities in Colorado, Georgia, Hawaii and Texas.The hacking unit attracts many of the agency’s young stars, who like the thrill of internet break-ins in the name of national security, according to a dozen former government officials who agreed to describe its work on the condition of anonymity. T.A.O. analysts start with a shopping list of desired information and likely sources — say, a Chinese official’s home computer or a Russian oil company’s network. Much of T.A.O.’s work is labeled E.C.I., for “exceptionally controlled information,” material so sensitive it was initially stored only in safes. When the cumulative weight of the safes threatened the integrity of N.S.A.’s engineering building a few years ago, one agency veteran said, the rules were changed to allow locked file cabinets.The more experienced T.A.O. operators devise ways to break into foreign networks; junior operators take over to extract information. Mr. Williams, 40, a former paramedic who served in military intelligence in the Army before joining the N.S.A., worked in T.A.O. from 2008 to 2013, which he described as an especially long tenure. He called the work “challenging and sometimes exciting.”T.A.O. operators must constantly renew their arsenal to stay abreast of changing software and hardware, examining every Windows update and new iPhone for vulnerabilities. “The nature of the business is to move with the technology,” a former T.A.O. hacker said.Long known mainly as an eavesdropping agency, the N.S.A. has embraced hacking as an especially productive way to spy on foreign targets. The intelligence collection is often automated, with malware implants — computer code designed to find material of interest — left sitting on the targeted system for months or even years, sending files back to the N.S.A.The same implant can be used for many purposes: to steal documents, tap into email, subtly change data or become the launching pad for an attack. T.A.O.’s most public success was an operation against Iran called Olympic Games, in which implants in the network of the Natanz nuclear plant caused centrifuges enriching uranium to self-destruct. The T.A.O. was also critical to attacks on the Islamic State and North Korea.It was this cyberarsenal that the Shadow Brokers got hold of, and then began to release.Like cops studying a burglar’s operating style and stash of stolen goods, N.S.A. analysts have tried to figure out what the Shadow Brokers took. None of the leaked files date from later than 2013 — a relief to agency officials assessing the damage. But they include a large share of T.A.O.’s collection, including three so-called ops disks — T.A.O.’s term for tool kits — containing the software to bypass computer firewalls, penetrate Windows and break into the Linux systems most commonly used on Android phones.Evidence shows that the Shadow Brokers obtained the entire tool kits intact, suggesting that an insider might have simply pocketed a thumb drive and walked out.But other files obtained by the Shadow Brokers bore no relation to the ops disks and seem to have been grabbed at different times. Some were designed for a compromise by the N.S.A. of Swift, a global financial messaging system, allowing the agency to track bank transfers. There was a manual for an old system code-named UNITEDRAKE, used to attack Windows. There were PowerPoint presentations and other files not used in hacking, making it unlikely that the Shadow Brokers had simply grabbed tools left on the internet by sloppy N.S.A. hackers.Some officials doubt that the Shadow Brokers got it all by hacking the most secure of American government agencies — hence the search for insiders. But some T.A.O. hackers think that skilled, persistent attackers might have been able to get through the N.S.A.’s defenses — because, as one put it, “I know we’ve done it to other countries.”The Shadow Brokers have verbally attacked certain cyberexperts, including Mr. Williams. When he concluded from their Twitter hints that they knew about some of his hacks while at the N.S.A., he canceled a business trip to Singapore. The United States had named and criminally charged hackers from the intelligence agencies of China, Iran and Russia. He feared he could be similarly charged by a country he had targeted and arrested on an international warrant.He has since resumed traveling abroad. But he says no one from the N.S.A. has contacted him about being singled out publicly by the Shadow Brokers.“That feels like a betrayal,” he said. “I was targeted by the Shadow Brokers because of that work. I do not feel the government has my back.”For decades after its creation in 1952, the N.S.A. — No Such Agency, in the old joke — was seen as all but leakproof. But since Mr. Snowden flew away with hundreds of thousands of documents in 2013, that notion has been shattered.The Snowden trauma led to the investment of millions of dollars in new technology and tougher rules to counter what the government calls the insider threat. But N.S.A. employees say that with thousands of employees pouring in and out of the gates, and the ability to store a library’s worth of data in a device that can fit on a key ring, it is impossible to prevent people from walking out with secrets.The agency has active investigations into at least three former N.S.A. employees or contractors. Two had worked for T.A.O.: a still publicly unidentified software developer secretly arrested after taking hacking tools home in 2015, only to have Russian hackers lift them from his home computer; and Harold T. Martin III, a contractor arrested last year when F.B.I. agents found his home, garden shed and car stuffed with sensitive agency documents and storage devices he had taken over many years when a work-at-home habit got out of control, his lawyers say. The third is Reality Winner, a young N.S.A. linguist arrested in June, who is charged with leaking to the news site The Intercept a single classified report on a Russian breach of an American election systems vendor.Mr. Martin’s gargantuan collection of stolen files included much of what the Shadow Brokers have, and he has been scrutinized by investigators as a possible source for them. Officials say they do not believe he deliberately supplied the material, though they have examined whether he might have been targeted by thieves or hackers.But according to former N.S.A. employees who are still in touch with active workers, investigators of the Shadow Brokers thefts are clearly worried that one or more leakers may still be inside the agency. Some T.A.O. employees have been asked to turn over their passports, take time off their jobs and submit to questioning. The small number of cyberspecialists who have worked both at T.A.O. and at the C.I.A. have come in for particular attention, out of concern that a single leaker might be responsible for both the Shadow Brokers and the C.I.A.’s Vault7 breaches.Then there are the Shadow Brokers’ writings, which betray a seeming immersion in American culture. Last April, about the time Mr. Williams was discovering their inside knowledge of T.A.O. operations, the Shadow Brokers posted an appeal to President Trump: “Don’t Forget Your Base.” With the ease of a seasoned pundit, they tossed around details about Stephen K. Bannon, the president’s now departed adviser; the Freedom Caucus in Congress; the “deep state”; the Alien and Sedition Acts; and white privilege.“TheShadowBrokers is wanting to see you succeed,” the post said, addressing Mr. Trump. “TheShadowBrokers is wanting America to be great again.”The mole hunt is inevitably creating an atmosphere of suspicion and anxiety, former employees say. While the attraction of the N.S.A. for skilled cyberoperators is unique — nowhere else can they hack without getting into legal trouble — the boom in cybersecurity hiring by private companies gives T.A.O. veterans lucrative exit options.Young T.A.O. hackers are lucky to make $80,000 a year, while those who leave routinely find jobs paying well over $100,000, cybersecurity specialists say. For many workers, the appeal of the N.S.A’s mission has been more than enough to make up the difference. But over the past year, former T.A.O. employees say an increasing number of former colleagues have called them looking for private-sector work, including “graybeards” they thought would be N.S.A. lifers.“Snowden killed morale,” another T.A.O. analyst said. “But at least we knew who he was. Now you have a situation where the agency is questioning people who have been 100 percent mission-oriented, telling them they’re liars.”Because the N.S.A. hacking unit has grown so rapidly over the past decade, the pool of potential leakers has expanded into the hundreds. Trust has eroded as anyone who had access to the leaked code is regarded as the potential culprit.Some agency veterans have seen projects they worked on for a decade shut down because implants they relied on were dumped online by the Shadow Brokers. The number of new operations has declined because the malware tools must be rebuilt. And no end is in sight.“How much longer are the releases going to come?” a former T.A.O. employee asked. “The agency doesn’t know how to stop it — or even what ‘it’ is.”One N.S.A. official who almost saw his career ended by the Shadow Brokers is at the very top of the organization: Adm. Michael S. Rogers, director of the N.S.A. and commander of its sister military organization, United States Cyber Command. President Barack Obama’s director of national intelligence, James R. Clapper Jr., and defense secretary, Ashton B. Carter, recommended removing Admiral Rogers from his post to create accountability for the breaches.But Mr. Obama did not act on the advice, in part because Admiral Rogers’ agency was at the center of the investigation into Russia’s interference in the 2016 election. Mr. Trump, who again on Saturday disputed his intelligence agencies’ findings on Russia and the election, extended the admiral’s time in office. Some former intelligence officials say they are flabbergasted that he has been able to hold on to his job.Lurking in the background of the Shadow Brokers investigation is American officials’ strong belief that it is a Russian operation. The pattern of dribbling out stolen documents over many months, they say, echoes the slow release of Democratic emails purloined by Russian hackers last year.But there is a more specific back story to the United States-Russia cyber rivalry.Starting in 2014, American cybersecurity researchers who had been tracking Russia’s state-sponsored hacking groups for years began to expose them in a series of research reports. American firms, including Symantec, CrowdStrike and FireEye, reported that Moscow was behind certain cyberattacks and identified government-sponsored Russian hacking groups.In the meantime, Russia’s most prominent cybersecurity firm, Kaspersky Lab, had started work on a report that would turn the tables on the United States. Kaspersky hunted for the spying malware planted by N.S.A. hackers, guided in part by the keywords and code names in the files taken by Mr. Snowden and published by journalists, officials said.Kaspersky was, in a sense, simply doing to the N.S.A. what the American companies had just done to Russian intelligence: Expose their operations. And American officials believe Russian intelligence was piggybacking on Kaspersky’s efforts to find and retrieve the N.S.A.’s secrets wherever they could be found. The T.A.O. hackers knew that when Kaspersky updated its popular antivirus software to find and block the N.S.A. malware, it could thwart spying operations around the world.So T.A.O. personnel rushed to replace implants in many countries with new malware they did not believe the Russian company could detect.In February 2015, Kaspersky published its report on the Equation Group — the company’s name for T.A.O. hackers — and updated its antivirus software to uproot the N.S.A. malware wherever it had not been replaced. The agency temporarily lost access to a considerable flow of intelligence. By some accounts, however, N.S.A. officials were relieved that the Kaspersky report did not include certain tools they feared the Russian company had found.As it would turn out, any celebration was premature.On Aug. 13 last year, a new Twitter account using the Shadow Brokers’ name announced with fanfare an online auction of stolen N.S.A. hacking tools.“We hack Equation Group,” the Shadow Brokers wrote. “We find many many Equation Group cyber weapons.”Inside the N.S.A., the declaration was like a bomb exploding. A zip file posted online contained the first free sample of the agency’s hacking tools. It was immediately evident that the Shadow Brokers were not hoaxsters, and that the agency was in trouble.The leaks have renewed a debate over whether the N.S.A. should be permitted to stockpile vulnerabilities it discovers in commercial software to use for spying — rather than immediately alert software makers so the holes can be plugged. The agency claims it has shared with the industry more than 90 percent of flaws it has found, reserving only the most valuable for its own hackers. But if it can’t keep those from leaking, as the last year has demonstrated, the resulting damage to businesses and ordinary computer users around the world can be colossal. The Trump administration says it will soon announce revisions to the system, making it more transparent.Mr. Williams said it may be years before the “full fallout” of the Shadow Brokers breach is understood. Even the arrest of whoever is responsible for the leaks may not end them, he said — because the sophisticated perpetrators may have built a “dead man’s switch” to release all remaining files automatically upon their arrest.“We’re obviously dealing with people who have operational security knowledge,” he said. “They have the whole law enforcement system and intelligence system after them. And they haven’t been caught.”
In ‘Watershed Moment,’ YouTube Blocks Extremist Cleric’s Message WASHINGTON — For eight years, the jihadist propaganda of Anwar al-Awlaki has helped shape a generation of American terrorists, including the Fort Hood gunman, the Boston Marathon bombers and the perpetrators of massacres in San Bernardino, Calif., and Orlando, Fla.And YouTube, the world’s most popular video site, has allowed hundreds of hours of Mr. Awlaki’s talks to be within easy reach of anyone with a phone or computer.Now, under growing pressure from governments and counterterrorism advocates, YouTube has drastically reduced its video archive of Mr. Awlaki, an American cleric who remains the leading English-language jihadist recruiter on the internet six years after he was killed by a United States drone strike. Using video fingerprinting technology, YouTube now flags his videos automatically and human reviewers block most of them before anyone sees them, company officials say.A search for “Anwar al-Awlaki” on YouTube this fall found more than 70,000 videos, including his life’s work, from his early years as a mainstream American imam to his later years with Al Qaeda in Yemen.Today the same search turns up just 18,600 videos, and the vast majority are news reports about his life and death, debates over the legality of his killing, refutations of his work by scholars or other material about him. A small number of clips of Mr. Awlaki speaking disappeared after The New York Times sent an inquiry about the change of policy last week.“It’s a watershed moment on the question of whether we’re going to allow the unchecked proliferation of cyberjihad,” said Mark D. Wallace, the chief executive of the Counter Extremism Project, a research organization that has long called for Mr. Awlaki’s recordings to be removed from the web. “You just don’t want to make it easy for people to listen to a guy who wants to harm us.”Mr. Wallace, a former diplomat, said the fact that much of Mr. Awlaki’s YouTube presence was mainstream lectures on Islamic history did not justify keeping it on the site. “It’s an insult to Islam to say the teaching of the religion can’t stand the loss of a preacher who was also the leading propagandist of jihad in English,” he said.The policy shift at YouTube comes in the face of a growing chorus of criticism for internet companies, including Facebook, Twitter and Google, which owns YouTube. They had long argued that they were merely neutral platforms with no responsibility for what users posted.But they were quick to remove copyrighted material, child pornography and beheading videos, for example, which posed an obvious threat to their business. They have slowly stepped up the removal of extremist content, spurred on after 2014 by the Islamic State’s use of Twitter to recruit fighters.Most recently, Facebook, Twitter and YouTube all admitted that the Russian government had used their platforms last year to pose as American voters and spread divisive propaganda. Under fire from Congress, all the companies pledged to police their sites more carefully in the future.The prolific presence on YouTube of Mr. Awlaki, who in his later years called for attacks on America and Americans, has been a subject of complaints since November 2009, when he wrote on his website that Army Maj. Nidal Malik Hasan was a “hero” for fatally shooting 13 people at Fort Hood, Tex.Born in New Mexico to Yemeni parents, Mr. Awlaki spent half his life in the United States and spoke excellent English. As a popular young imam in Denver, San Diego and a Washington, D.C., suburb, he recorded lecture series that were eventually best sellers among Western Muslims — notably his 53-CD boxed set on the life of the Prophet Muhammad.After leaving for London in 2002, however, he gradually embraced the view that the United States was at war with Muslims, who had a religious duty to fight back. After evidence emerged that he had recruited and coached the young Nigerian who tried to blow up an airliner over Detroit on Christmas Day in 2009, President Barack Obama ordered a legal review and then placed him on the terrorist kill list.Mr. Awlaki and three other members of Al Qaeda were killed in a drone strike in Yemen in September 2011. But his death on Mr. Obama’s orders made him a martyr in the eyes of many admirers, who posted more and more of his work on YouTube.Much of it was the early, mainstream material, which clearly did not violate YouTube’s “community guidelines.” But especially after Mr. Awlaki’s death, fans often labeled even his early material as the work of the martyr killed by America. The number of videos on YouTube presenting or celebrating his work more than doubled from 2014 to 2017, even as investigators found his decisive influence in most of the major terrorist attacks in the United States and some in Europe.The Counter Extremism Project, in a series of reports, documented his posthumous power and complained about YouTube’s recommendation tools, which often suggested Mr. Awlaki’s more sinister recordings to people who watched material on Islam or sampled his history talks.YouTube was slow to remove even his most explicit calls for violence. Though the company first promised publicly to take such material down in 2010, Mr. Awlaki’s “Call to Jihad,” a 12-minute talk calling on Western Muslims to join the jihad in the Middle East or carry out attacks at home, remained easily available on YouTube until last year.As pressure mounted, however, the company recently decided to treat Mr. Awlaki the way it treats terrorist organizations, with a near-total ban, according to company officials. The officials agreed to discuss the policy change but declined to be named, citing security concerns.YouTube said the initial decision to purge any particular video was made by human reviewers. But once the decision has been made, a “hash function,” a kind of digital fingerprint, is created to automatically rid the site of additional copies of the same video.The officials noted that YouTube, according to its published rules, “strictly prohibits content intended to recruit for terrorist organizations, incite violence, celebrate terrorist attacks or otherwise promote acts of terrorism.” But they decided that in the special case of Mr. Awlaki, all of his recordings should be removed.“I’ve seen a major drop-off of his work on YouTube,” said Alexander Meleagrou-Hitchens, the research director at George Washington University’s Program on Extremism and author of a forthcoming book on Mr. Awlaki. “They deserve credit for that.”Some civil libertarians cautioned about the dangers of censorship, even by a company rather than a government.“The motivations that lead any individual to commit an act of violence are very complex,” said Faiza Patel of the Brennan Center for Justice at New York University’s law school. “To pin it on one guy’s videos seems very simplistic.”Mr. Meleagrou-Hitchens noted that Mr. Awlaki’s work remains easy to find elsewhere on the web for those seeking it. A weekend search for Mr. Awlaki’s “Call to Jihad,” for instance, instantly brought up the video on a French site, Dailymotion; on the Internet Archive; and on a Pakistani’s Facebook page.Nonetheless, Mr. Meleagrou-Hitchens said, the popularity of YouTube and its automated recommendations have made it an especially pernicious platform for the cleric.“The fact is that if you really want Awlaki videos, you’ll find them,” he said. “But if he’s less available on YouTube, fewer people are coming across him who aren’t actually seeking him out.”
Trump Team Begins Drafting Middle East Peace Plan WASHINGTON — President Trump and his advisers have begun developing their own concrete blueprint to end the decades-old conflict between Israel and the Palestinians, a plan intended to go beyond previous frameworks offered by the American government in pursuit of what the president calls “the ultimate deal.”After 10 months of educating themselves on the complexities of the world’s most intractable dispute, White House officials said, Mr. Trump’s team of relative newcomers to Middle East peacemaking has moved into a new phase of its venture in hopes of transforming what it has learned into tangible steps to end a stalemate that has frustrated even presidents with more experience in the region.The prospects for peace are caught up in a web of other issues consuming the region, as demonstrated in recent days by Saudi Arabia’s growing confrontation with Iranian-backed Hezbollah in Lebanon. Israel is likewise worried about Hezbollah as well as efforts by Iran to establish a land corridor across southern Syria. If a war with Hezbollah broke out, it could scuttle any initiative with the Palestinians.Nonetheless, Mr. Trump’s team has collected “non-papers” exploring various issues related to the Israeli-Palestinian conflict, and officials said they expected to address such perennial dividing points as the status of Jerusalem and settlements in the occupied West Bank. Although Mr. Trump has not committed to a Palestinian state, analysts said they anticipated that the plan will have to be built around the so-called two-state solution that has been the core of peacemaking efforts for years.“We have spent a lot of time listening to and engaging with the Israelis, Palestinians and key regional leaders over the past few months to help reach an enduring peace deal,” said Jason D. Greenblatt, the president’s chief negotiator. “We are not going to put an artificial timeline on the development or presentation of any specific ideas and will also never impose a deal. Our goal is to facilitate, not dictate, a lasting peace agreement to improve the lives of Israelis and Palestinians and security across the region.”Mr. Trump, who considers himself a dealmaker, decided to adopt the challenge when he took office in January, intrigued at the idea of succeeding where other presidents failed, and he assigned the effort to Jared Kushner, his son-in-law and senior adviser. Neither had any background with the issue and the effort was greeted with scorn, but the fact that the president entrusted it to a close relative was taken as a sign of seriousness in the region.Mr. Trump’s team sees the convergence of factors that make the moment ripe, including an increased willingness by Arab states to finally solve the issue to refocus attention on Iran, which they consider the bigger threat. With that in mind, Egypt is brokering a reconciliation between Mahmoud Abbas, who presides in the West Bank, and Hamas, which controls Gaza, a deal that would cement the Palestinian Authority as the representative of the Palestinian people. Saudi Arabia has summoned Mr. Abbas to Riyadh to reinforce the importance of a deal.“The stars begin to align in a way that creates a moment,” said Nimrod Novik, a fellow at the Israel Policy Forum who served as foreign policy adviser to former Prime Minister Shimon Peres, who negotiated the Oslo Accords in the 1990s. “But obviously the two key questions are will Prime Minister Netanyahu decide to go for it” and “will President Trump, once he’s presented a plan by his team, decide it’s worth the political capital required.”Still, neither Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu of Israel nor President Abbas of the Palestinian Authority is in a strong position to negotiate. Mr. Netanyahu faces corruption investigations and pressure from the right in his narrow coalition not to make concessions, while Mr. Abbas is aging and endures strong opposition among his own constituents.Skepticism abounds, especially among those who spent years struggling to overcome the same challenges with the same set of tools. President Barack Obama and his advisers debated for months putting forth their own parameters for a deal, ultimately outlining a general set of principles at the end of last year in a speech by Secretary of State John Kerry as time ran out on the administration.“There’s nothing new under the sun when it comes to Middle East peace,” said Philip Gordon, a White House Middle East coordinator under Mr. Obama. “When you get into these details, that’s when you come up against the strong objections of the two sides. If they don’t want it to be dead on arrival, they may wind up with vague principles, but as we’ve seen, even vague principles are beyond what the parties are willing to embrace.”Tamara Cofman Wittes, a State Department official under Mr. Obama, said both Israeli and Palestinian leaders “are heavily constrained” not only by their own governing coalitions but by suspicious and risk-averse publics. “It’s hard even for willing political leaders to make major concessions under those circumstances,” she said.The core four-member team drafting the plan includes Mr. Kushner, Mr. Greenblatt, Dina H. Powell, a deputy national security adviser, and David M. Friedman, the ambassador to Israel. They are consulting with Donald Blome, the consul general in Jerusalem, and others from the State Department and National Security Council. Officials said the effort may take until early next year.Mr. Trump and his team make no bones about being pro-Israel. The president has boasted of being Israel’s “biggest friend” and Mr. Kushner, Mr. Greenblatt and Mr. Friedman are all Orthodox Jews with ties to Israel. But Ms. Powell is an Egyptian-born Coptic Christian and Mr. Kushner has developed strong ties with the Saudis and other Arabs and recently returned from a visit to Riyadh. Mr. Trump has met with Mr. Netanyahu and Mr. Abbas three times each.The team has drawn praise from across the spectrum. “We do believe this is a historic opportunity, and we will spare no effort to support President Trump’s investment in a better future,” Husam Zomlot, the Palestinian Authority’s envoy to Washington, said in an interview. During a trip to London this month, Mr. Netanyahu said, “They are trying to think out of the box.”Barak Ravid, an Israeli journalist who has broken stories on the American effort, wrote in the left-leaning Haaretz newspaper last spring that Mr. Trump had “succeeded in bringing peace, which in recent years had become a dirty word, back to the center of Israeli public and political discourse.”But privately, officials from both sides express concern that Mr. Trump and his team are still naïve about the Middle East and ineffective in accomplishing their objectives.Dennis Ross, the veteran Middle East peace negotiator, said Mr. Trump’s team has “done a very good job of presenting themselves as having listened” and is now “taken seriously” in the region.The decision to present a concrete plan makes sense if ground is prepared in advance. “If you simply resume negotiations and nothing accompanies it, nobody will take it seriously,” Mr. Ross said. “People will say we’ve seen this movie before. You have to show people — no, something is different this time.”Some analysts said they believed Mr. Trump’s plan may come with confidence-building provisions that each side will already have agreed to. For Israel, it could include limiting settlement construction to current blocs without taking new land, recommitting to a two-state solution and redesignating a small part of the West Bank to give Palestinians more control.For the Palestinians, it could include resuming full security cooperation with Israel, holding off seeking further international recognition and ending payments to families of Palestinians imprisoned for terrorist attacks. Arab states, particularly Saudi Arabia, Egypt, the United Arab Emirates and Jordan, could add their own commitments, like overflights by Israeli passenger planes, visas for business people and telecommunications links.A White House official dismissed that as mere speculation. But the challenges of getting even to that stage are formidable, much less tackling harder questions.Mr. Zomlot, the Palestinian envoy, said any plan must establish a sovereign Palestinian state along the borders from before the 1967 Arab-Israeli war with East Jerusalem as its capital. “This is not our maximum. This is our minimum,” he said. “What everybody needs to understand is the historic compromise has already been made.”Israel’s allies in Washington are pressing from the other side. The House Foreign Affairs Committee on Wednesday will consider a bill to cut aid to the Palestinian Authority unless it ends payments to families of Palestinian attackers.“If the Palestinians are going to be trustworthy partners in any kind of peace discussion, they have to show that they’re not inciting terrorism,” said Representative Doug Lamborn, a Republican from Colorado sponsoring the legislation. “And when you pay people — and, in fact, if you pay them more, the more Jews they kill — that’s pure incitement to terrorism.”Palestinian leaders say the payments are meant to help destitute families, not promote terrorism, and they accuse Israel of subsidizing violence by encouraging settlers in the West Bank. One compromise floated recently would have the Palestinian Authority help those families through a general welfare program that does not prioritize relatives of prisoners.Still, some analysts think Mr. Netanyahu and Mr. Abbas are simply playing along with the goal of ensuring the other is blamed when the process collapses.“The biggest impediment to the peace process is the two leaders,” said Grant Rumley, a scholar at the Foundation for Defense of Democracies. “Ultimately, both Netanyahu and Abbas just have this long, long history and they’ve played this game really well. And they don’t trust each other and I don’t think they will ever get to the point where they will trust each other.”
After a Disciplined Week in Asia, Trump Unloads on Critics HANOI, Vietnam — For the last week on the road, President Trump had been measured, disciplined and studiously scripted as he picked his way through the geopolitical minefields of Asia.Then came the weekend.In a stream of tweets on Sunday, the president said those who wanted to investigate his ties to Russia were “haters and fools,” ridiculed “crooked” Hillary Clinton’s ill-fated effort to reset relations with Russia and fired back at North Korea’s leader, Kim Jong-un, for calling him old, saying that he could call Mr. Kim “short and fat” — but had restrained himself.That followed a freewheeling session with reporters on Air Force One on Saturday, in which Mr. Trump dismissed the Russia investigation as a Democratic “hit job” and derided as “political hacks” three former chiefs of the nation’s intelligence agencies, all three of which concluded that Russia had meddled in the 2016 presidential election.It was hard to say what prompted the sudden change in the president’s demeanor, though the first lady, Melania Trump, who often plays a moderating influence on her husband, dropped off the trip in Beijing, after visiting the Great Wall of China and stroking the paw of a panda bear at the Beijing Zoo.Mr. Trump, 71, could also simply be tired, though his aides insist he is not, even if the people around him are.Pressed again on Sunday about whether he believed President Vladimir V. Putin’s denials that Russia had intervened, Mr. Trump seemed to walk back his earlier comments somewhat. He said he did not dispute the assessment of the intelligence agencies that Moscow had interfered.“As to whether I believe it or not, I’m with our agencies, especially as currently constituted, with their leadership,” Mr. Trump said at a news conference with Vietnam’s president, Tran Dai Quang. “I believe in our agencies. I’ve worked with them very strongly.”Still, Mr. Trump’s endorsement was grudging — he noted that the assessment reflected only four agencies, not 17 — and he repeated his assertion that Washington needed to move on from the Russia investigation to cooperate with the Russians on issues from North Korea to Syria.“What I believe is, we have to get to work,” he said. “It’s now time to get back to healing a world that is shattered and broken.”In the short run, Mr. Trump’s comments broke with a narrative that the White House had carefully constructed during this 12-day trip — that of a statesman marshaling a worldwide coalition to confront a nuclear North Korea, and a populist leader working to right trade imbalances.The president’s tweets and comments also complicated life for White House officials, who had been encouraged by his friendly meetings with the leaders of Japan, China and South Korea and by what they characterized as one of the most effective foreign-policy speeches of his presidency, on the need to confront a nuclear North Korea.Speaking to reporters here in Hanoi on Sunday, the White House chief of staff, John F. Kelly, insisted that he did not pay attention to Mr. Trump’s tweets or allow his staff to be distracted by them.“They are what they are,” Mr. Kelly said. “But like, you know in preparation for this trip, we did the staff work, got him ready to go and then at each place we brief him up on whatever the next event is and all that. The tweets don’t run my life; good staff work runs it.”Until Sunday, Mr. Trump had been careful not to make things personal with Mr. Kim. But after his speech in Seoul, in which he cataloged the brutality of the Kim government, North Korea described him as a “lunatic old man” and urged Americans to force him out of office or face an “abyss of doom.”That prompted an indignant response from Mr. Trump, who seemed more offended by the gibe about his age than about his mental condition. Shortly before leaving his hotel to meet the Vietnamese president, he tweeted, “Why would Kim Jong-un insult me by calling me ‘old’ when I would NEVER call him ‘short and fat?’ Oh well, I try so hard to be his friend.”Once at the Presidential Palace, however, Mr. Trump seemed to have gotten over it. Asked whether he could see himself becoming friends with Mr. Kim, he said: “Strange things happen in life. That might be a strange thing to happen, but it’s certainly a possibility.”“If that did happen,” he continued, “it would be a good thing for — I can tell you — for North Korea. But it would also be good for lots of other places, and it would be good for the world.”Mr. Trump’s comments were in keeping with his hot-and-cold approach to Mr. Kim. At times, he has floated the idea of a meeting with Mr. Kim and praised the North Korean leader for consolidating power in his country at a young age. But he has also ridiculed him as “Little Rocket Man” for his ballistic missile tests.With Mr. Putin, Mr. Trump has been more consistent.“I believe that President Putin really feels — and he feels strongly — that he did not meddle in our election,” Mr. Trump said Sunday, when he was asked to clarify his comments about Mr. Putin’s sincerity on that question the night before. “What he believes is what he believes.”Standing next to the Vietnamese president, Mr. Trump did not repeat the contempt he had shown the day before for three officials who served under President Barack Obama: John O. Brennan, the former director of the C.I.A.; James B. Comey, the former director of the F.B.I.; and James R. Clapper, the former director of national intelligence.But he was no less insistent that the Russia investigation was a distraction from more pressing global matters — Syria, Ukraine and North Korea — and that time for punishing Russia was over. The president discussed North Korea in his brief conversation with Mr. Putin, Mr. Kelly said.“People don’t realize Russia has been very, very heavily sanctioned,” Mr. Trump said. “And I feel that having Russia in a friendly posture, as opposed to always fighting with them, is an asset to the world and an asset to our country, not a liability.”When the news conference was over, Mr. Trump reverted to his script. Sitting before a bust of Ho Chi Minh with the general secretary of the Vietnamese Communist Party, Nguyen Phu Trong, he stressed the importance of fair trade relationships.“We are opening up and you are opening up and it’s going to even out,” Mr. Trump told the Communist leader.For those wondering if the president’s trip will pack any more surprises, he then boarded Air Force One and later landed in Manila, where he is to officially meet on Monday with the Philippine president, Rodrigo Duterte, one of the few world leaders who outdoes him in unpredictability.Mr. Trump is to meet with Mr. Duterte for bilateral talks Monday, the same day that leaders of the 10-nation Association of Southeast Asian Nations, or Asean, begin a summit that is expected to tackle regional issues ranging from antiterrorism cooperation to trade. The bloc is also expected to begin talks on a proposed code of conduct in the region, amid disputes by some members with China over islands in the South China Sea.In anticipation of Mr. Trump’s arrival, leftist activists, rights groups and students protested on Sunday in the streets of the Philippines.“His first Asian visit is turning out to be preposterous, cringe-worthy and a disaster waiting to happen for Southeast Asia people,” said a farmers’ group called Union of Agricultural Workers. It called Mr. Duterte the United States’ “main puppet in Asia.”Both Mr. Trump and Mr. Duterte previously met in Danang, Vietnam, and shook hands at a dinner hosted by the Philippine leader on Sunday night.The Philippine leader has made it quite clear he would not take it too kindly if the United States questioned his war on drugs, which has left thousands dead since last year.Nevertheless, the Philippine foreign secretary, Alan Peter Cayetano, said the two men “had a very good first meeting” in Danang. “It’s not an official meeting, but they saw each other,” he said. “We believe it will strengthen the relationship.”Mr. Cayetano added: “If you have two tough guys in a room, there is always fear that they will try to appear tougher than the other. But they understand the same language, they have the same goals. In this case, both just want a better life for their people.”“So sometimes, tough guys become close friends in real life, to put it that way,” Mr. Cayetano said.
Duterte Warms to Trump, but Keeps His Focus on China BANGKOK — The president of the Philippines, Rodrigo Duterte, seldom holds back.His antidrug crusade has led to the extrajudicial killings of thousands of people. He is fond of boasting about how he has personally killed criminals and even strangers. He unleashes profane diatribes about countries and world figures he dislikes, with the United States often on the receiving end.But more quietly, he seems to have warmed to the United States and President Trump, who also has a notably provocative style.As his country hosts a summit meeting of the Association of Southeast Asian Nations, or Asean, on Sunday, the more charming side of Mr. Duterte’s personality is likely to be on display, both in his meetings with Mr. Trump and in his foreign policy goal of  closer relations with China.One big reason for his shift in rhetoric when it comes to the United States is clear: President Trump is a marked improvement in Mr. Duterte’s eyes over Barack Obama, who urged the Philippines leader to follow the rule of law in tackling the illegal drug trade.On Saturday, Mr. Trump and Mr. Duterte met for the first time on the sidelines of an economic summit meeting in Vietnam. The two shook hands and spoke warmly about having a longer discussion over the next two days, Philippines officials said.“These two are talking as friends,” said Ramon Casiple, the executive director of the Institute for Political and Electoral Reform, a nonprofit promoting democracy in the Philippines. “I don’t see any reasons when they meet face-to-face that there will be any big problems.”But the longer-term game for Mr. Duterte has been his determination to court China. Since his election, he has backed down from contentious territorial disputes with Beijing — last week, he halted a construction project in the South China Sea that brought Chinese complaints — despite an international ruling early in his presidency that backed the Philippines.Harry Roque, a spokesman for Mr. Duterte, described his policy as a deliberate turn toward closer relationships with countries in Asia, and with China in particular.Mr. Duterte hopes his strategy will bring billions of dollars in investment from China, though the money has been slow in coming, said Richard Javad Heydarian, an assistant professor of political science at De La Salle University in Manila.Still, the United States and its former colony are treaty allies with a long history of cooperation. And it is clear that Mr. Duterte’s and Mr. Trump’s styles seem to mesh more than clash.Mr. Trump set the stage for improved relations when he called Mr. Duterte in April and congratulated him for doing an “unbelievable job on the drug problem.” The United States also provided valuable military assistance — including drones and intelligence — that proved instrumental in defeating Islamic extremists during a five-month siege of Marawi City, which ended last month.On Sunday, Mr. Trump offered to help mediate the disputes in the South China Sea, which have also pit China against Vietnam and other countries in the region. “I’m a very good mediator and arbitrator,” he said at the start of a meeting in Hanoi with Vietnam’s president, Tran Dai Quang.Last year, Mr. Duterte called for a “separation” from the United States, threatened to expel American troops and accused the Central Intelligence Agency of plotting to kill him. When asked how he would respond if the American president were to criticize his antidrug campaign, Mr. Duterte replied with a vulgar epithet to describe Mr. Obama, who was president at the time.Mr. Roque, the spokesman, said that Mr. Duterte changed his tune after seeing the value of United States help in Marawi.“He hasn’t been criticizing the United States lately,” Mr. Roque said in an interview. “He looks forward to closer ties with the United States.”Mr. Trump landed in the Philippines on Sunday to protests by leftist activists, rights groups and students, who marched in the streets. The two presidents were scheduled to hold bilateral talks in Manila, but the American leader appeared in the traditional Filipino dress-shirt called a barong at a dinner Sunday night, and shook hands with Mr. Duterte.Mr. Trump has been tied to the Philippines for years through his business dealings, and before this trip, his brand had arrived well ahead of him. Trump Tower at Century City, a $150 million, 57-story residential building, has been under construction since 2012 in metropolitan Manila. It is one of several international business deals that pose potential conflicts of interest for Mr. Trump.The tower is being built by Jose E.B. Antonio, a Manila developer. Days before Mr. Trump was elected, Mr. Duterte named Mr. Antonio an envoy to the United States for trade, investment and economic affairs.“I’ve always loved the Philippines. I think it’s just a special place, and Manila is one of Asia’s most spectacular cities,” Mr. Trump was quoted as saying on the Trump Tower website last year. The comment has since been removed.But no words could please Mr. Duterte more than Mr. Trump’s support of the Philippines’ antidrug campaign.Mr. Duterte won election on a promise to kill drug users and said that the fish in Manila Bay would grow fat feeding on their corpses. In the early months of the antidrug campaign, the police said that thousands of drug users had been killed. But as the extrajudicial killing has continued, they have refused to release the death toll.Mr. Duterte won election last year with 39 percent of the vote, but his popularity soared after the killings began. While his support rating has declined in recent months, it still stood at 67 percent in September, according to a survey by the nonprofit Social Weather Stations.While past American presidents have used meetings with foreign leaders to promote human rights, activists have little expectation that Mr. Trump will raise the extrajudicial killings with Mr. Duterte.“I strongly suspect we will see an alpha-male bromance between the two,” said Phelim Kine, the Human Rights Watch deputy director for Asia. “A lot of the issues that underpin the U.S.-Philippine relations will go unaddressed, and one of those will be rule of law.”Mr. Duterte has bristled at any criticism of his drug war. Speaking to Filipino workers in Danang, Vietnam, on Thursday, he lashed out at Agnes Callamard, the United Nations special rapporteur on extrajudicial, summary or arbitrary executions.“This rapporteur, I will slap her in front of you. Why? Because you are insulting me,” he said in a speech sprinkled with expletives.He also boasted of killing a man, as he often has in the past. Typically, there is little evidence to support his claims.“At the age of 16, I have already killed,” he said. “A human. I stabbed him because he stared at me.”Mr. Duterte also offered to host an international summit on human rights and compared himself to Satan. “I am the new toughie here in hell,” he said.But in the coming days, for a more international audience, Mr. Duterte is likely to talk about what he can do to take a bigger role in the region’s most important issues. As chairman of Asean, Mr. Duterte wants to be a regional power broker who can help negotiate with North Korea, said Mr. Heydarian, the political scientist.Within days of his April phone call with Mr. Trump, Mr. Duterte revealed that he had phoned President Xi Jinping of China at Mr. Trump’s request to discuss how to contain the North Korean nuclear threat.“He is trying to punch above his weight, but everyone should welcome that,” Mr. Heydarian said. “Asean is one of the last bridges North Korea has to the international community.”
Trump Is Rapidly Reshaping the Judiciary. Here’s How. WASHINGTON — In the weeks before Donald J. Trump took office, lawyers joining his administration gathered at a law firm near the Capitol, where Donald F. McGahn II, the soon-to-be White House counsel, filled a white board with a secret battle plan to fill the federal appeals courts with young and deeply conservative judges.Mr. McGahn, instructed by Mr. Trump to maximize the opportunity to reshape the judiciary, mapped out potential nominees and a strategy, according to two people familiar with the effort: Start by filling vacancies on appeals courts with multiple openings and where Democratic senators up for re-election next year in states won by Mr. Trump — like Indiana, Michigan and Pennsylvania — could be pressured not to block his nominees. And to speed them through confirmation, avoid clogging the Senate with too many nominees for the district courts, where legal philosophy is less crucial.Nearly a year later, that plan is coming to fruition. Mr. Trump has already appointed eight appellate judges, the most this early in a presidency since Richard M. Nixon, and on Thursday, the Senate Judiciary Committee voted along party lines to send a ninth appellate nominee — Mr. Trump’s deputy White House counsel, Gregory Katsas — to the floor.Republicans are systematically filling appellate seats they held open during President Barack Obama’s final two years in office with a particularly conservative group of judges with life tenure. Democrats — who in late 2013 abolished the ability of 41 lawmakers to block such nominees with a filibuster, then quickly lost control of the Senate — have scant power to stop them.Most have strong academic credentials and clerked for well-known conservative judges, like Justice Antonin Scalia. Confirmation votes for five of the eight new judges fell short of the former 60-vote threshold to clear filibusters, including John K. Bush, a chapter president of the Federalist Society, the conservative legal network, who wrote politically charged blog posts, such as comparing abortion to slavery; and Stephanos Bibas, a University of Pennsylvania law professor who once proposed using electric shocks to punish people convicted of certain crimes, although he later disavowed the idea. Of Mr. Trump’s 18 appellate nominees so far, 14 are men and 16 are white.While the two parties have been engaged in a tit-for-tat escalation of hardball politics over judicial nominations since the Reagan years, the Trump administration is completing a fundamental transformation of the enterprise. And the consequences may go beyond his chance to leave an outsize stamp on the judiciary. When Democrats regain power, if they follow the same playbook and systematically appoint outspoken liberal judges, the appeals courts will end up as ideologically split as Congress is today.“It’s such a depressing idea, that we don’t get appointments unless we have unified government, and that the appointments we ultimately get are as polarized as the rest of the country,” said Lee Epstein, a law professor and political scientist at Washington University in St. Louis. “What does that mean for the legitimacy of the courts in the United States? It’s not a pretty world.”For now, conservatives are reveling in their success. During the campaign, Mr. Trump shored up the support of skeptical right-wing voters by promising to select Supreme Court justices from a list Mr. McGahn put together with help from the Federalist Society and the conservative Heritage Foundation. Exit polls showed that court-focused voters helped deliver the president’s narrow victory. Now, he is rewarding them.“We will set records in terms of the number of judges,” Mr. Trump said at the White House recently, adding that many more nominees were in the pipeline. Standing beside the Senate majority leader, Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, he continued, “There has never been anything like what we’ve been able to do together with judges.”Appellate judges draw less attention than Supreme Court justices like Neil M. Gorsuch, whom Mr. Trump installed in the seat that Justice Scalia’s death left vacant and that Republicans, led by Mr. McConnell, refused to let Mr. Obama fill. But the 12 regional appeals courts wield profound influence over Americans’ lives, getting the final word on about 60,000 cases a year that are not among the roughly 80 the Supreme Court hears.Nan Aron, of the liberal Alliance for Justice, said that her group considered many of Mr. Trump’s nominees to be “extremists” — hostile to the rights of women, minority groups and workers, and unduly favorable to the wealthy. But conservatives, who have rallied around Mr. Trump’s nominees as a rare bright spot of unity for the fractious Republican Party, see them as legal rock stars who will interpret the Constitution according to its text and original meaning.And they see tremendous opportunity in the fact that Mr. Trump is the first Republican president whose nominees can be confirmed by simple-majority votes, especially since he is likely to fill an unusually large number of vacancies. Mr. Trump started with 21 open appellate seats because after Republicans gained control of the Senate in 2015, they essentially shut down the confirmation process. Six additional appellate judgeships have opened since his inauguration, and nearly half of the 150 active appeals court judges are eligible to take senior status — semiretirement that permits a successor’s appointment — or will soon reach that age, according to Russell Wheeler, a Brookings Institution scholar.As a result, Mr. Trump is poised to bring the conservative legal movement, which took shape in the 1980s in reaction to decades of liberal rulings on issues like the rights of criminal suspects and of women who want abortions, to a new peak of influence over American law and society.“What makes this a unique opportunity in modern history is the sheer number of vacancies, the number of potential vacancies because of the aging bench, and the existence of a president who really cares about this issue in his gut,” said Leonard A. Leo, an informal adviser to Mr. Trump on courts who is the executive vice president of the Federalist Society.Liberals have accused Mr. Trump of outsourcing his nominations process to the Federalist Society. But two administration officials argued that this claim misunderstands how the conservative legal movement has matured as the generation of Republican lawyers shaped by reading the originalist dissents of Justice Scalia and by the bitter 1987 fight over Judge Robert H. Bork’s failed Supreme Court nomination has come of age. Mr. McGahn and nearly all the lawyers working for him at the White House are longtime society participants, so relationships built on the network of like-minded conservatives saturate discussions of potential nominees from the inside, they said.Mr. Trump has also had help from the Senate Judiciary Committee chairman, Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa, in lowering impediments and keeping the confirmation assembly line moving.For example, confirmation hearings have usually featured just one appellate hopeful at a time (along with several district judge nominees). But Mr. Grassley has scheduled three hearings this year with two appellate nominees — as many as took place during all eight years of the Obama administration, according to congressional aides.The independent guardrail role of the American Bar Association, which has vetted potential judges since the Eisenhower administration — conducting confidential interviews with people who worked with them and rating their experience, integrity and temperament — is also weakening. Picks by presidents of both parties have sometimes run into trouble, but Republicans have accused the group of bias against conservatives.Traditionally, the group’s volunteers vet potential judges before the White House decides whether to send their names to the Senate, but Mr. Trump — like President George W. Bush — exiled it from that role, leaving it scrambling to evaluate nominees afterward. Already this year, Mr. Grassley has held hearings for four district judge nominees before the group finished its work — which happened with only seven during the eight Bush years.The bar group later deemed two of them unqualified to be trial judges, saying they lacked sufficient trial experience. On Thursday, the Judiciary Committee nevertheless advanced both to the Senate floor. One, Holly Teeter, a 38-year-old federal prosecutor who fell just shy of the bar group’s minimum standard of 12 years of experience, gained bipartisan approval. But the other, Brett Talley, a 36-year-old with virtually no trial experience and who wrote politically charged blog posts on topics like gun rights, had a party-line vote.Republicans may go further in ousting the group from its semiofficial gatekeeping role after it rated L. Steven Grasz, Mr. Trump’s nominee for the appeals court in St. Louis, as “not qualified” to be a judge, portraying him as “gratuitously rude” and unlikely “to separate his role as an advocate from that of a judge” on matters like abortion. The White House is weighing telling future nominees not to sign confidentiality waivers that give A.B.A. evaluators access to disciplinary action records and not to interview with the bar group, an official said.Conservatives are also pressuring Mr. Grassley to reduce one of the few remaining constraints on letting a president with an allied Senate majority appoint whomever he wants to a life-tenured judgeship: the Judiciary Committee’s “blue slip” practice, named for the color of the paper that senators use to sign off on nominees for judgeships in their states.While it has been handled differently in different eras, throughout the Obama years, Mr. Grassley and his Democratic predecessor, Senator Patrick J. Leahy of Vermont, refused to let the confirmation process proceed for nominees without two positive blue slips. That approach forces presidents to consult with senators and, when they are from opposite parties, incentivizes the compromise selection of relative moderates.Senator Al Franken, Democrat of Minnesota, has announced he will not return a blue slip for David R. Stras, an appeals court nominee who is a Minnesota Supreme Court justice and is on Mr. Trump’s short list for the United States Supreme Court, saying he was not meaningfully consulted and objected to him. (An administration official said the White House had primarily negotiated with Minnesota’s senior senator, Amy Klobuchar, a Democrat who did turn in a blue slip.) Conservatives want Mr. Grassley to hold a hearing anyway.Democratic senators in Oregon and Wisconsin have also not turned in blue slips for pending appellate nominees, but the question of how much control senators will retain over judicial appointments in their states is not limited to partisan politics.Senator John Kennedy, Republican of Louisiana, has not returned a blue slip for Kyle Duncan, an appeals court nominee who represented conservative clients in several culture-war cases, including whether corporations may  refuse to provide contraception coverage to employees based on owners’ religious beliefs, and whether transgender students may be barred from using the school bathrooms of their gender identities.The Judicial Crisis Network, an opaquely funded group that runs ads pressuring Democratic senators not to block Trump nominees, has begun airing ads in Louisiana supporting Mr. Duncan. Mr. Franken warned that if the blue-slip constraint eroded, Republican senators would lose, too — and not just when Democrats regained power.But many conservatives want to take full advantage of their window of opportunity. Mr. Leo, of the Federalist Society, said Mr. Trump had instructed his transition team to prioritize appointing conservative judges who would be “strong” and could resist “tremendous political and social pressure.”Mr. Trump “understood that the American people cared about judges, and he for his own purposes cared very deeply about it and recognized that he could be a president who could help restore the judiciary to its proper role,” he said.
Trump Nominee for Federal Judgeship Has Never Tried a Case A 36-year-old lawyer who has never tried a case and who was unanimously deemed “not qualified” by the American Bar Association has been approved for a lifetime federal district judgeship by the Senate Judiciary Committee.The lawyer, Brett Talley, is the fourth judicial nominee under President Trump to receive a “not qualified” rating from the bar association and the second to receive the rating unanimously. Since 1989, the association has unanimously rated only two other judicial nominees as not qualified.The Senate committee’s vote on Thursday to approve Mr. Talley, who graduated from Harvard Law School in 2007 and is a deputy assistant attorney general at the Justice Department, fell along party lines; Republican members outnumber Democrats on the committee 11 to nine. Mr. Talley will now face a full vote in the Senate. If confirmed, he would serve as a trial judge in his home state of Alabama.Mr. Talley’s nomination is just one of the latest examples of Mr. Trump’s efforts to reshape the nation’s courts, packing them with young, deeply conservative judges.Mr. Talley’s lack of experience drew searing questions from Democratic members of the committee. Senator Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, the minority whip, asked Mr. Talley in a written questionnaire, “Do you think it is advisable to put people with literally no trial experience on the federal district court bench?”Mr. Talley demurred. “It would be inappropriate for me as a nominee to comment on the advisability of any nomination,” he wrote.Senator Dianne Feinstein of California, the ranking member of the committee, asked if Mr. Talley had ever argued a motion in Federal District Court, given that he had never tried a case. He had not.Ms. Feinstein also pointed to Mr. Talley’s prolific social media presence before his nomination. He once referred to Hillary Clinton as “Hillary Rotten Clinton” on his public Twitter account, which is now private.In 2013, he wrote on his blog that armed revolution was an important defense against tyrannical government. Ms. Feinstein asked in her written questions when Mr. Talley believed it would become appropriate for American citizens to participate in an armed uprising against the government.He replied that he did not believe any situation in American history — with the “possible exception” of slavery — had called for armed rebellion.At the committee vote on Thursday, Ms. Feinstein took greatest issue with Mr. Talley’s professed views on gun control. In 2013, about a month after a gunman killed 20 children at an elementary school in Newtown, Conn., Mr. Talley on his blog pledged his total support to the National Rifle Association, “financially, politically and intellectually.”Ms. Feinstein said she had asked Mr. Talley whether, if confirmed, he would commit to recusing himself in cases involving weapons. He refused.“I find this unacceptable,” she said.Senator Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa and the chairman of the committee, defended Mr. Talley’s qualifications. “Mr. Talley has a wide breadth of various legal experience that has helped to expose him to different aspects of federal law and the issues that would come before him,” he said in a statement.Mr. Grassley also cast doubt on the importance of the bar association’s rating. “Senators can decide for themselves if the A.B.A.’s metric of what makes a nominee qualified is proper in these cases,” he said.Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, in 2012 had praised the bar association’s practice of evaluating judicial nominees as an important way to distinguish between people who merely had political connections and people who belonged on the bench.Mr. Grassley also noted that other judicial nominees rated “not qualified” had been approved by the Senate Judiciary Committee, at times unanimously.Other judicial nominees have faced scrutiny for their lack of trial experience. In 2010, Jeff Sessions, then a senator from Alabama, asked Nancy Freudenthal, who had been nominated to Wyoming District Court by President Barack Obama, about her having never tried a case before a jury. Ms. Freudenthal was eventually approved by the Senate, 96 to 1.Additionally, the comparative rarity of “not qualified” ratings for judicial nominees under previous administrations may have been due, at least in part, to a difference in procedure. Every president since Dwight D. Eisenhower, with the exception of George W. Bush, screened potential nominees with the American Bar Association before publicly announcing them — a tradition the Trump administration has decided to shun.But that change alone does not account for the number of unqualified nominees under Mr. Trump, said Kristine Lucius, executive vice president for policy of the Leadership Conference on Civil and Human Rights, a coalition of civil rights and labor groups.“It is unprecedented to have this many, this quickly, in this short a time,” she said. Of Mr. Talley, she added, “When you think of how much power a district court nominee has over life and death decisions every day, it’s really irresponsible to put someone on with that little experience.”The Senate committee on Thursday also approved four other nominees for federal judgeships, including Holly Lou Teeter, who also received a “not qualified” rating.
Appeal Offers Hope for Newtown Families in Suit Against Gun Companies NEWTOWN, Conn. — In the years since his 6-year-old son Benjamin was fatally shot at Sandy Hook Elementary School, David Wheeler has testified before state legislatures, lobbied members of Congress and sat beside his wife, Francine, as she delivered a speech during one of President Obama’s weekly addresses, pleading for changes to the nation’s gun laws.This week, the families of the victims plan to be in Hartford, listening as lawyers lay out in state Supreme Court their case that the companies that manufactured and sold the military-style assault rifle used by the gunman bear responsibility for the attack in which 26 people, including 20 children, were killed.They are deploying a novel strategy that the families and their lawyers say could pierce the sweeping shield created by federal law that protects gun companies from litigation and has thwarted countless lawsuits after their weapons were used to commit crimes.Supporters believe that if the court clears the way for a jury trial, the gun companies’ internal communications — which the companies have fought fiercely to keep private — would surface in discovery, a potentially revealing and damaging glimpse into the industry and how it operates. It could also chart a legal road map for the survivors and relatives of victims in other mass shootings as they pursue accountability.“It doesn’t make any sense at all that these products are free of liability,” Mr. Wheeler said in a recent interview. “It’s not a level playing field. It’s not American capitalistic business practice as we know it. It’s just not right.”The high stakes the case represents has drawn widespread interest and an intense response from both sides of the gun debate. The court has been inundated with amicus briefs — from gun control advocates and emergency room doctors who have treated patients wounded by assault rifle fire as well as from many gun-rights groups. In its brief, the National Rifle Association argued that allowing the case to move forward threatened to “eviscerate” the gun companies’ legal protections.The Supreme Court hearing, after years of back-and-forth in other courts, comes as the fifth anniversary of the Newtown massacre approaches next month, and falls in the shadow of recurring episodes of deadly mass violence that have reinvigorated the national debate over the sale of weapons like the AR-15 style Bushmaster rifle used in Newtown. A week ago, 26 people were fatally shot in a church in Sutherland Springs, Tex., and a month earlier, a gunman sprayed gunfire over a crowd attending an outdoor music festival in Las Vegas, killing 59 people.Some argue that the recent massacres, serving as a reminder of the toll weapons like the one used in Newtown can have, could lend credence to the lawsuit’s claims. “It’s like the world has thrown up Exhibit A for the plaintiffs’ argument,” said Heidi Li Feldman, a Georgetown University law professor and tort law expert who has followed the case.But those opposing the Newtown families argue that the lawsuit is specifically the kind of legal challenge the federal protections were designed to block and that the litigation is simply an effort to use the courts as a forum to regulate gun laws.The lawsuit, brought by the families of nine people who were killed and one teacher who was shot and survived, faces significant legal hurdles. It was elevated to the Connecticut Supreme Court after a lower court judge dismissed the lawsuit last year after she found that the claims it raised fell “squarely within the broad immunity” provided by federal law.Mass shootings across the country have been followed by a flurry of legal action, but lawsuits brought against gun companies have failed after running headfirst into the high bar established by federal law.In 2005, Congress passed the Protection of Lawful Commerce in Arms Act, which sharply restricted lawsuits against gun sellers and makers by granting industrywide immunity from blame when one of their products is used in a crime. Lawmakers behind the measure cited a need to foil what they described as predatory and politically driven litigation. But the law does allow exceptions for sale and marketing practices that violate state or federal laws and instances of so-called negligent entrustment, in which a gun is carelessly given or sold to a person posing a high risk of misusing it.Legal experts said negligent entrustment has been cited with some success in lawsuits against gun dealers, but the Newtown families are for the first time broadening the scope to include a weapon’s manufacturer, in this case, Remington, which, along with a wholesaler and a local retailer, are all named in the suit. The companies’ lawyers declined to comment.On Dec. 14, 2012, Adam Lanza, a troubled 20-year-old, stormed into Sandy Hook Elementary School armed with an AR-15 style Bushmaster rifle, firing 154 rounds in less than five minutes. The weapon had been legally purchased by his mother, Nancy Lanza, whom he also killed.The lawsuit argues that because the AR-15 was designed for the United States military as a battlefield weapon to maximize fatalities, gun companies should never have entrusted the rifle to an untrained civilian public. The suit also claims that the companies deliberately promoted the weapon with product placement in video games and macho militaristic marketing slogans that appealed to a population of mentally unstable young men — the same population that has used the gun to kill innocent people in theaters, malls, schools and churches.The families’ lawyers argue that the drumbeat of violence has only solidified their position. “That’s what happens when you market to a high-risk population,” said Joshua D. Koskoff, one of the lawyers representing the families.The case has already advanced beyond what many had initially expected. The lawsuit was originally filed in state court in 2014, then it was moved to federal court, where a judge ordered that the case be returned to the state level. The families saw a glimmer of hope, and were even surprised, after the State Superior Court judge, Barbara N. Bellis, allowed the case to move closer to trial before dismissing it.Lawyers for the families argue that, in a strictly legal sense, the outcome of the case would set little precedent outside of Connecticut. But a successful appeal could have symbolic influence, pointing out a weakness in the law that could represent a serious threat to gun companies, and as a result it has prompted a flood of legal fillings. “All the key players are getting in there,” Professor Feldman said.The state attorney general, gun violence prevention groups and a statewide association of school superintendents were among those writing in support of the families’ case, as well as a group of trauma surgeons and emergency room doctors who had treated patients after shootings in Newtown; San Bernardino, Calif.; and Aurora, Colo.In one of the briefs backing the gun companies, the National Shooting Sports Foundation, which happens to be headquartered in Newtown, acknowledged that the case centered on “a tragedy of unimaginable proportions,” but it also argued that the lawsuit sought to achieve “regulation through litigation.” The National Rifle Association said the “plaintiffs cannot shoehorn their claims” into the federal law’s narrow definition of negligent entrustment.Yet another group, Gun Owners of America, offered a much more forceful response. The group, deploying a mix of “Star Wars” and “Star Trek” references, challenged the way the lawsuit depicts the AR-15, saying, “the AR-15 rifle is not a Galactic Empire Death Star equipped with a Romulan Cloaking Device.”“Plaintiffs’ brief illustrates the views of those who may never have even laid eyes on the weapons they vilify,” the group wrote, “much less squeezed off a few rounds at the range, like millions of peaceful, law-abiding Americans regularly do.”In a case that has been drawn out over three years, the families involved are acutely aware of the consequences of what may be their last legal avenue. But Katie Mesner-Hage, a lawyer for the families, said they had taken a “long view,” realizing that they are “raising important, complicated issues — and important, complicated issues take time and there’s a longer trajectory to get to the end.”Mr. Wheeler said that he has been frustrated by his lobbying efforts, testifying about his personal experience and pushing for reforms. But he and his wife never hesitated to join the lawsuit. “It wasn’t a difficult decision at all,” he said. “The landscape that is described in this suit is a grievous wrong.”Mr. Koskoff added that, in many ways, his clients were more “battle-tested” than their lawyers.“They have to face hostility and derision and threats sometimes, simply because they want to make something sensible out of the senselessness and the loss they feel,” Mr. Koskoff said. “And that’s a very cruel thing.”
Welcoming Worshipers With Open Arms and Concealed Ones, Too Before the church massacre in Sutherland Springs, Tex., there was the church massacre in Charleston, S.C. It was enough to make the Rev. John Darsey think that his young Georgia church needed a security plan — one that involved defenders with firearms.So his church, Redeemer Church of Madison, hired three uniformed sheriff’s deputies for each Sunday service, one directing traffic, one in the parking lot, and one right by the door.This is the visible deterrent — the first line of defense.The second, more subtle layer is an in-house security team of church members with military or law enforcement backgrounds, all carrying concealed weapons. Inside the spare, spacious modern sanctuary — where some 500 people come every Sunday morning — the team members split the room into quadrants, with one always keeping a bird’s-eye view from the back of the room, on the riser with the sound and lighting equipment.The third layer of protection is one that Mr. Darsey knows is there, though he has trouble quantifying it. He estimated that about 20 to 25 of his flock were concealing a weapon on any given Sunday. “Now that’s just the ones I know about,” he said.And there were other weapons around. “Including here,” he said, opening a drawer of his big wooden desk.Around the country, a string of threats and attacks in recent years have led many houses of worship to take steps to secure their sanctuaries. And after 26 people were killed at First Baptist Church of Sutherland Springs, Tex., last Sunday, one of the worst mass shootings in American history and the deadliest ever at a church, many more have begun looking hard at whether God’s protection might need some armed backup.In Plano, Tex., the Prestonwood Baptist Church, a megachurch with more than 43,000 members and a model of modern-day vigilance — with off-duty police, private security, and cameras monitored 24 hours a day — offered to hold a seminar on church security after the shooting last Sunday.Within 48 hours, more than 250 ministers and lay leaders from more than 100 churches in four states had signed up.“This has caused every church in the country to think about the security of their people, and how that has to be of utmost importance,” said the Rev. Mike Buster, Prestonwood’s executive pastor.But securing a house of worship poses very different challenges from securing other public places like airports, schools or theaters.For one thing, most American congregations are relatively small, and lack the staff or the budget for extensive security. Two-thirds of the churches in the United States have fewer than 100 regular attendees, adults and children combined, according to data from the National Congregations Study, and in many cases, only part-time or volunteer ministers.Just as important, many clergy members say that the very mission of houses of worship leaves them conflicted over imposing security measures. A church, temple or mosque should be a welcoming place, they say, with doors kept wide open to strangers and those who are hurting.Many say they have ministered to people in all kinds of crises — homelessness, drug addiction, domestic abuse, or trouble with the law — without being sure whether they are intent on harm.“The safe thing to do is to isolate yourself from these people, but that’s the wrong thing to do for a church,” said the Rev. Bart Barber, pastor of the First Baptist Church of Farmersville, Tex., who wrote an essay for Christianity Today about the security dilemma for small rural churches.“We’re not going to cordon off the block, and make people show their I.D. and do a fingerprint background check to get into the worship service,” Mr. Barber said. “Because the very people we’re afraid of are also the people we are here to help.”But increasingly, clergy members have felt it necessary to have extra eyes, and sometimes weapons, watching their open doors.In the last five years alone, shootings have occurred at churches, mosques, a Sikh temple and a Jewish community center, forcing religious leaders nationwide to confront the issue of safety. Consultants have started businesses focused on church security, and the federal government has offered limited grants for houses of worship to install cameras and hire guards. It was a security camera image from Emanuel African Methodist Episcopal Church in Charleston that helped the authorities quickly identify Dylann S. Roof as the gunman.Church Executive magazine recently suggested that church leaders invite local police officers to stop by and use the restrooms or meeting rooms, in order to acquaint them with the church’s layout and leadership before an emergency arises.In areas of the country where many people own and carry guns, church security is complicated by the question of whether to allow or even encourage guns in church.Texas law allows houses of worship to bar firearms, and many do, posting signs saying that carrying guns onto the property is prohibited. The United Methodist Church adopted a resolution suggesting that churches post such signs in 2016, part of a larger statement on ending gun violence. Mormon Church policy says that carrying firearms is “inappropriate except as required by officers of the law.”All week, since the massacre in the pews in Sutherland Springs, the Rev. Brady Martin said that members of his church, Temple Baptist Church, in Gainesville, Tex., have been coming to his office to discuss how to protect the church while still being welcoming. One asked whether the sign posted out front announcing that the church doesn’t allow the open carrying of firearms — showing a gun with a slash through it — could actually be sending the message that the church is vulnerable.“That was something I hadn’t actually thought through,” he said, though he added that the church was not reconsidering its open-carry policy. (It does allow concealed firearms.) “We are not thinking that everybody should open carry. That would be a security nightmare.”He said that his church would send 12 people to the security seminar at Prestonwood. In the meantime, his volunteer security team is considering stationing members in the parking lot before Sunday services, not just inside.The Rev. Robert Jeffress, pastor of a Dallas megachurch, First Baptist Dallas, said in an interview on Fox News this week that he felt safer knowing that one-quarter to half of his congregation carries concealed weapons to services on Sunday.“If somebody tries that in our church,” he said of the attack in Sutherland Springs, “they might get one shot off, or two shots off, and that’s the last thing they’ll ever do in this life.”Mr. Darsey, the pastor at Redeemer in Georgia, acknowledged that some might find it odd that so many deadly weapons were being brought into a building dedicated to worshiping the man the book of Isaiah calls the Prince of Peace. But he cited Romans 13, which allows earthly authorities to serve as “agents of wrath to bring punishment on the wrongdoer.”There was always a chance, he said, that someone who meant to fire a weapon to protect innocents could end up harming the innocents themselves, which would be a “nightmare scenario” for his church.“I’m not so Southern and fundamentalist in my thinking that I don’t see the other side of that issue,” he said. “But it is what it is.”Jason Singleton, 36, is among the members who brings a handgun to Redeemer, in his case, strapped to his torso with a belly band. He said he would never pull the gun if there was merely a fight. There had to be an armed attacker, shooting innocents.“It would be a last resort,” he said. “If I took someone’s life it would be because mine was about to be took or someone else’s, and I think I’d be O.K. with answering for that, in the by and by.”
Roy Moore, Alabama Senate Candidate Under Siege, Tries to Discredit Accusers GADSDEN, Ala. — Roy S. Moore, the embattled Republican Senate nominee in Alabama, moved Saturday to discredit the women who accused him of sexual misconduct, and his party’s most powerful figures became increasingly desperate to end a campaign that they worried would undermine their candidates nationwide.Mr. Moore won at least one battle in his efforts to salvage his candidacy — Gov. Kay Ivey rebuffed calls that she postpone next month’s election, which could leave Republicans with a narrower majority in Washington — but his supporters and detractors alike believed that his campaign remained in jeopardy.“People have waited until four weeks prior to the general election to bring their complaints,” Mr. Moore, 70, said during a Veterans Day event in Vestavia Hills, Ala., near Birmingham. “That’s not a coincidence — it’s an intentional act to stop a campaign.”Mr. Moore has denied the allegations The Washington Post published on Thursday, including that he molested a 14-year-old girl, Leigh Corfman, when he was 32. “I have not been guilty of sexual misconduct with anyone,” said Mr. Moore, who added that he has “the highest regard for the protection of young children.”He won applause at the event on Saturday when he said it was “unbelievable” that a “grown woman would come forward” about 40 years after she said the overtures took place, and this close to the election to fill the seat Attorney General Jeff Sessions held until this year. And Mr. Moore, twice effectively removed as the state’s ranking jurist, noted that he had long been among the most scrutinized politicians in Alabama.“I’ve been investigated more than any other person in this country,” he said.Although many of Mr. Moore’s supporters in Alabama share his fury and have expressed it in far harsher tones, Republicans have been abandoning Mr. Moore since The Post published its article, which included allegations of sexual advances from three other women.Beyond their public condemnations of Mr. Moore, some Republicans have been searching for ways to short-circuit his candidacy. Some had favored pressing Ms. Ivey to move the Dec. 12 special election. But on Saturday, her office abruptly cut off discussion about the idea.“Governor Ivey is not considering and has no plans to move the special election for U.S. Senate,” a spokesman, Daniel Sparkman, said in an email. This week, Ms. Ivey said that the allegations were “deeply disturbing” and that “the people of Alabama deserve to know the truth and will make their own decisions.”Although Ms. Ivey’s decision was something of a relief for Mr. Moore, other Republicans criticized or cut ties with him on Twitter on Saturday. Senator Bob Corker of Tennessee was unsparing: “Look, I’m sorry, but even before these reports surfaced, Roy Moore’s nomination was a bridge too far.” Senator Bill Cassidy of Louisiana withdrew his support, he said, “based on the allegations against Roy Moore, his response, and what is known.”Mr. Moore is a popular figure among many Alabama Republicans, but party officials fear that if he is elected, he will be an albatross around the necks of their lawmakers and candidates nationwide for years to come. In Washington, Republicans pleaded for President Trump, who endorsed Mr. Moore’s opponent, Senator Luther Strange, in the primary, to intervene.But taking questions from reporters aboard Air Force One as he flew to Hanoi, Vietnam, Mr. Trump, who himself has been accused by multiple women of sexual harassment, signaled he was reluctant to reinsert himself in the same Alabama race where his endorsement was so thoroughly disregarded in September.“I have not seen very much about him, about it,” Mr. Trump said, noting that he had put out a statement through his press secretary on Friday saying that if the allegations were true, Mr. Moore would “do the right thing” and withdraw.Pressed about the allegations from the four women, Mr. Trump declined to say whether he believed the accounts.“Honestly, I’d have to look at it and I’d have to see,” Mr. Trump said. “I’m dealing with the folks over here, so I haven’t devoted — I haven’t been able to devote very much time to it.”Mr. Trump said he was sticking by his statement, which also said that “a mere allegation,” particularly from many years ago, should not be enough to ruin a person’s life. But he did not rule out abandoning Mr. Moore.“I have to get back into the country to see what’s happening,” he said.Ms. Corfman said on Saturday that a firestorm of criticism from Mr. Moore’s supporters — one of them, a state legislator, suggested that she be prosecuted “for lying” — had not deterred her.“I stand by my story,” she said.A lawyer for Gloria Thacker Deason, who said she had dated Mr. Moore when she was 18 and he was in his 30s, attacked Mr. Moore’s speech.“He knows full well why these women did not tell what he did to them before this week,” the lawyer, Paula Cobia, said in an email. “As young teenage girls in the late 1970s, they had no way of knowing their rights, especially against him, considering he was a district attorney at the time.”Ms. Cobia demanded that Mr. Moore “immediately retract his defamatory statements.”
Republicans Try to Block Moore’s Path as Candidate Denies Sexual Misconduct WASHINGTON — Senate Republicans scrambled on Friday to find a way to block Roy S. Moore’s path to the Senate, exploring extraordinary measures to rid themselves of their own nominee in Alabama after accusations emerged that he had made sexual advances on four teenage girls when he was in his 30s.Mr. Moore, meanwhile, remained defiant, insisting in a radio interview with Sean Hannity that he would stay in the race. He told Mr. Hannity, the Fox News host, who has endorsed Mr. Moore’s candidacy, that he “never had any contact” with Leigh Corfman, the woman who told The Washington Post that Mr. Moore touched her sexually when she was 14, though he did not deny dating some teenagers.“I have never known this woman, or anything,” said Mr. Moore, who described the accusations as “politically motivated.”Republican senators and their advisers, in a flurry of phone calls, emails and text messages, discussed fielding a write-in candidate, pushing Alabama’s governor to delay the Dec. 12 special election or even not seating Mr. Moore at all should he be elected. In an interview, Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the majority leader, declined to say whether he would agree to seat Mr. Moore should he win. Mr. McConnell deferred a question about a possible write-in campaign by Senator Luther Strange, the current occupant of the seat, to Mr. Strange.The Senate Republican campaign arm, which Mr. McConnell effectively oversees, withdrew Friday from a joint fund-raising agreement with Mr. Moore’s campaign. And Senators Mike Lee of Utah and Steve Daines of Montana rescinded their endorsements of the candidate.The frenzy reflected not just the worry over the Senate seat once held by Jeff Sessions, now the attorney general, but also the broader danger of the Republican Party’s being associated with Mr. Moore.If Doug Jones, the Democratic nominee, wins next month, Mr. McConnell’s majority will shrink to one, possibly imperiling the Republican push to overhaul the tax code and most everything else that lawmakers are aiming to do to reverse their spiral before the midterm elections. It could also raise at least the potential that Democrats could seize control of the Senate in 2018, by holding all of their endangered seats and winning Republican seats in Nevada and Arizona.But if Mr. Moore wins, the party faces a potentially more untenable prospect: welcoming a child-molesting suspect into their ranks, a move that every Republican candidate would have to answer for. That raised memories of Todd Akin, the Republican Senate candidate who in 2012 said victims of “legitimate rape” rarely got pregnant, an assertion that Democrats hung around every candidate that year.And Mr. Moore’s interview within the sympathetic confines of Mr. Hannity’s show, which was also an initial safe harbor for Mr. Akin in 2012, made Republicans in the capital only more determined that he had to step aside.“I don’t remember ever dating any girl without the permission of her mother,” Mr. Moore told Mr. Hannity. Asked by Mr. Hannity if he ever dated teenagers when he was in his 30s, Mr. Moore equivocated, replying, “Not generally, no.”Some Senate Republicans have encouraged Mr. Strange — who lost to Mr. Moore in a bitterly contested Republican runoff election in September — to run as a write-in candidate, an option Mr. Strange is considering, according to Republicans who have spoken with him. But some Republicans believe he would do little more than play spoiler, ensuring either that Mr. Moore is elected by taking votes Mr. Jones would otherwise get or that the Democrat wins by siphoning support from Mr. Moore among Republicans seeking a palatable third option.Mr. McConnell and Senator Cory Gardner of Colorado, the chairman of the National Republican Senatorial Committee, spoke with Mr. Strange about the prospect immediately after the Moore news broke on Thursday, according to Republicans familiar with the conversation. And Senator Lisa Murkowski of Alaska, who won re-election in 2010 as a write-in candidate, was planning to discuss logistics with Mr. Strange this weekend.Asked Friday if he thought Mr. Strange should run as a write-in candidate, Mr. McConnell said only that “you’d have to ask Luther what his intentions are, given this development.”Republicans in Washington and Alabama have also approached other potential candidates about a write-in effort, including Representative Robert B. Aderholt, a mainstream conservative from northern Alabama. But it is unclear that any prominent Republican will be willing to mount a wild-card campaign for the Senate unless Mr. Moore stands down first.Absent Mr. Moore’s cooperation, Republicans in Washington have conferred with election lawyers to explore other long-shot options for replacing or marginalizing him, several of which would probably lead to a clash in court with Mr. Moore and his supporters.One approach that Republicans are considering, according to people briefed on the deliberations, would involve asking Gov. Kay Ivey to order a new date for the election — sometime early next year — and giving the party time to ease Mr. Moore from the race.Alabama election law requires candidates to withdraw at least 76 days before an election in order to be replaced on the ballot, a deadline Mr. Moore has already missed.State law gives the governor broad authority to set the date of special elections, and Ms. Ivey, who is a Republican, already rescheduled the Senate election once, after inheriting the governor’s office in April when her predecessor, Robert Bentley, resigned in a sex and corruption scandal. Ms. Ivey’s advisers have not ruled out exercising that power again, according to Republicans in touch with her camp, but she has signaled that she would like reassurances of support from the White House before taking such an aggressive step.Scott Jennings, a Republican strategist close to Mr. McConnell, said presidential intervention was needed to bring any order to the situation in Alabama. He suggested that President Trump could personally nudge Mr. Moore out of the race and back a write-in campaign by Mr. Strange, or perhaps Mr. Sessions, a popular figure with Alabama Republicans.“You’ve got a wild-card politician, who may or may not support your agenda, who’s now got horrific allegations of molestation of a child,” Mr. Jennings said, referring to Mr. Moore. “It strikes me that the people of Alabama would listen to the president.”A spokesman for Ms. Ivey did not reply to an email asking about her intentions, but she has been in contact with Nick Ayers, Vice President Mike Pence’s chief of staff, according to Republican officials.But there is no apparent precedent for rescheduling an election so close to the planned vote, Republicans acknowledged. In addition to state election laws, such an extreme step could also run afoul of federal voting rights law.Then there is the possibility that if Mr. Moore stayed in the race and won, the members of the Senate would deny him a seat.While sidestepping a question about whether he would support such an extraordinary step, Mr. McConnell recalled how, as a relatively junior senator, he pushed to oust Senator Bob Packwood, Republican of Oregon, a long-serving and powerful figure, after a throng of women came forward to accuse Mr. Packwood of sexually harassing or abusing them.“I ended up making a motion to expel the chairman of the Finance Committee of my own party, which was approved unanimously, and he subsequently resigned,” Mr. McConnell said. “So character does count in America and in the United States Senate.”While maintaining his typically stoic public face, Mr. McConnell was said to be highly irritated that, after he had fended off problematic candidates in recent years, Mr. Moore had instantly revived the type of difficulties Republicans suffered with Mr. Akin and other hard-liners.But in Alabama, Republicans appeared far more willing to give Mr. Moore the benefit of the doubt.“Let’s let this thing work out,” said Trip Pittman, a state senator. “You’re innocent until proven otherwise.”Mr. Pittman urged Mr. Moore to aggressively rebut the claims. That, he said, would be “really helpful.”Alabama’s congressional Republicans remained silent on Friday, wanting to see how emphatically Mr. Moore responded to the charges, but there were conversations about eventually issuing a joint statement. Some of them were rattled — and not just because of the Moore story.As members of the state’s House delegation arrived Thursday in Birmingham, Ala., for a fund-raiser with Speaker Paul D. Ryan, there were hydraulic problems with the plane as it touched down. Shortly after enduring a bumpy landing, their phones lit up to reveal The Post’s report.For their part, Democrats appear to be ready to join the fray. The party had been holding back, in part out of fear that getting involved could nationalize the election and compromise Mr. Jones’s brand as an independent-minded local candidate.But on Friday, Democratic donors appeared increasingly interested in the race. Stephen J. Cloobeck, a Nevada hotel magnate who contributed $500,000 last year to a Senate-focused Democratic “super PAC,” described Mr. Moore as “despicable” and said he would gladly direct money to Mr. Jones.“If there’s an event, I will participate, because I have a 14-year-old little girl, and if anyone touched her, I’d kill them,” Mr. Cloobeck said. “I’d kill them.”
As U.S. Sheds Role as Climate Change Leader, Who Will Fill the Void? BONN, Germany — When President Trump announced in June that the United States would withdraw from the Paris agreement, America officially ceded its global leadership on climate change.The retreat had actually begun months earlier, when climate change disappeared from most government websites and vanished from America’s domestic and international agendas. No longer would the United States federal government address climate change at home or raise global warming with ministers and heads of state, as former President Barack Obama and his cabinet routinely did.It was a dramatic shift, and it was meant to be.“I was elected to represent the citizens of Pittsburgh, not Paris,” Mr. Trump said in repudiating the accord. “The Paris climate accord is simply the latest example of Washington entering into an agreement that disadvantages the United States to the exclusive benefit of other countries.”Since then, others have taken up the climate leadership role. In Europe, Chancellor Angela Merkel of Germany and President Emmanuel Macron of France have vowed that the Paris agreement will flourish without the United States. President Xi Jinping of China and the Canadian prime minister, Justin Trudeau, are promoting their countries as climate change champions. The United Nations secretary general, António Guterres, has pulled nations together to demand deeper emissions cuts. And American governors, mayors and business leaders have forged their own coalition, even taking over the United States pavilion at United Nations climate talks in Bonn, Germany, this week.Political analysts say it’s not clear whether any of them can replace the United States and the immense diplomatic machinery it commands when engaged on an issue. Here’s a look at some of the strengths those leaders bring and the challenges they face.President Xi Jinping didn’t mention Mr. Trump by name at the opening of the Communist Party Congress last month, but his meaning was clear when he declared that China had taken a “driving seat in international cooperation to respond to climate change.” He also criticized countries that “retreat into self-isolation.”Many political analysts say China has indeed moved dramatically on climate change, both to meet its own pledge under the Paris accord to cap carbon emissions by 2030, and to start the world’s largest carbon market and swiftly expand the use of electric cars. In recent months, China has hosted ministerial-level meetings on clean energy and joined Canada and the European Union to lead discussions on climate.Robert N. Stavins, the director of the environmental economics program at Harvard University who was in China recently to discuss climate change, said he had seen a dramatic shift in tenor among Chinese officials. “Having been engaged very, very closely on climate change with the Obama administration as a co-leader, China appears quite content to move from co-leadership to sole leadership,” he said.Yet skepticism abounds. While the country is ahead of its Paris target, China still burns more coal than any other country. It also remains to be seen how eager the country will be to allow greater transparency of its own carbon reduction efforts, and many fear it will revert to old demands that it and other developing countries be treated with softer rules.For many years Canada was considered a laggard on climate change, leaving the Kyoto Protocol and rarely making an impression at United Nations negotiations.That all changed with Prime Minister Justin Trudeau, who cozied up to panda bears and declared “Canada is back” at the Paris global warming talks in 2015. Mr. Trudeau said he was “deeply disappointed” in the United States’ decision to withdraw from the Paris deal, declaring “Canada is unwavering in our commitment to fight climate change.”Since then, he has made good on much of that goal — doubling his country’s contribution to the United Nations science body and sliding into America’s place in some international arenas. In September, for example, Canada hosted a meeting of the world’s largest economies to discuss climate change. American officials in the George W. Bush administration had created that gathering, originally known as the Major Economies Forum, and it continued under Mr. Obama. The Trump administration essentially abandoned it this year.“If the U.S. is going to step back, we’re going to step up,” Canada’s environment minister, Catherine McKenna, said.But the country is still struggling to deliver meaningful climate change policy at home, and Mr. Trudeau in recent months has approved bitumen pipelines and liquid natural gas projects. Activists in Canada say if Mr. Trudeau wants to be a true leader, he’ll have to reject new fossil fuel infrastructure — something that will be a steep and perhaps unmeetable challenge.Perhaps no group has made a bigger splash on the world stage this year than the coalition of United States governors, mayors and businesses who call themselves the We Are Still In coalition. Informally led by Gov. Jerry Brown of California; Michael Bloomberg, the former mayor of New York, and Gov. Jay Inslee of Washington, the group has vowed to uphold the Paris agreement and move ahead with policies to fight climate change.When the Trump administration opted not to have a United States pavilion at the Bonn climate talks to highlight American efforts on climate change, Mr. Bloomberg and others agreed to pay for it. Now the American pavilion is hosting a sort of shadow delegation of local leaders who say they are representing a different face of government. “I feel very strongly America should be represented there,” Mr. Bloomberg said.Yet without participation from more states, particularly those that are fossil-fuel heavy, the United States as a whole will still fall short of the Paris pledge, several analyses have found.The Obama administration gets a lot of credit for helping to forge the Paris Agreement, but in reality it was Europe that insisted on the accord in the first place. Since Mr. Trump’s withdrawal announcement, European leaders have lost no chance to reassert themselves as the guardians of global climate change ambition.Mr. Macron in particular has continued to champion the agreement hammered out in his nation’s capital. He has invited American scientists who work on climate change to move to France, and pressed Mr. Trump several times to remain in the deal. In December, France will host a celebration of the Paris Agreement, to which the United States has not yet been invited. Ms. Merkel put climate change at the center of a Group of 20 summit of the world’s largest economies in Hamburg, Germany, this year.It’s not clear how much those leaders’ efforts will shift United States policy. As Frank V. Maisano, a partner at the law firm Bracewell who represents energy clients, said recently, “Trump’s supporters don’t care that Macron is yelling at him. They like that.”Mr. Gutteres stepped into his new role in January, and those who work with him say the former prime minister of Portugal jumped in with both feet. Mr. Guterres made sure climate change was highlighted during the United Nations General Assembly, meeting with former Vice President Al Gore and Governor Brown of California to discuss ways the United Nations can promote solutions. He also opened a special session to discuss climate change and its impact on small islands after several devastating hurricanes battered the Caribbean.Robert C. Orr, the dean of the University of Maryland’s School of Public Policy and a special adviser to Mr. Guterres on climate change, said the United Nations leader was “putting his own stamp” on climate change by hosting a major summit at United Nations headquarters in New York in 2018.
Bannon Put a Target on His Back. McConnell’s Answer: ‘Ha-Ha.’ WASHINGTON — Senator Mitch McConnell, the taciturn Republican leader, watched stoically from across the Capitol two years ago as Speaker John A. Boehner resigned rather than contend with mounting troubles, restive conservatives and a band of renegade Republicans looking to oust him.Now it is Mr. McConnell who has a target on his back.His party is smarting from losses at the ballot box last week in Virginia, New Jersey and off-year races across the country. A trio of Senate Republicans who are not running for re-election have gone rogue and feel no compunction to fall in line behind him. The Republican nominee for Senate, Roy S. Moore, has just been accused of improper sexual and romantic conduct with teenagers.And Stephen K. Bannon, President Trump’s former chief strategist, is vowing to depose him, telling The New York Times that “I have an objective that Mitch McConnell will not be majority leader, and I believe will be done before this time next year.” Mr. McConnell, he added, “has to go.”[How to listen: If you don’t see an audio player on this page, or if you would like to subscribe to “The New Washington” at no charge, follow the instructions at the end of this article.]To that, Mr. McConnell laughed. “You can write that down,” he said in an interview on Friday. “I laughed. Ha-ha. That’s a perfect response.”Villainized by the president’s populist wing, Mr. McConnell nonetheless is pressing forward with a conservative agenda that he hopes will give Mr. Trump some big wins — and perhaps a legacy. He knows he must pass a tax overhaul in the coming weeks if his party is to have any hope of holding on to a united Congress next year — and if he is to remain majority leader. Meantime, he is trying to remake the nation’s judiciary, stocking the bench with Mr. Trump’s judicial nominees.At 75, Mr. McConnell is a man of few words but many sayings. Among his favorites: “Losers go into another line of work and winners come to Washington to make policy.” And: “When you’re hit with a pebble, respond with a boulder.”The target of that boulder would appear to be Mr. Bannon, a man whose name he refuses to utter, favoring “this particular individual” or “that particular element of our party,” or simply “they.”“Their specialty is nominating people who lose in November,” Mr. McConnell said acidly, adding, “When they prevail, and they haven’t done that in recent years, we lose, and our intention in 2018 is they will not prevail anywhere.”Mr. Bannon has been urging Senate candidates to pledge to vote against Mr. McConnell for majority leader, and he is making his campaign strikingly personal, “because the Senate and Mitch McConnell have been the most outrageous in their lack of support of President Trump’s agenda,” he said.“Why Mitch McConnell?” Mr. Bannon asked. “Because the institution of the majority leader has so much power, and he has used that power to, quite frankly, thwart President Trump’s agenda.”Mr. McConnell shot back: “Virtually everyone he has criticized, including myself, supports the president over 90 percent of the time.” He added: “The only way the president’s agenda doesn’t get enacted is if this particular element were to defeat enough senators in the general election to hand the Senate over to Democrats. That’s the only possible outcome if this kind of mentality were allowed to prevail. But I assure you it will not. It will not.”The battle with Mr. Bannon puts the leader in a precarious position. On the one hand, he is trying to improve his tenuous relationship with Mr. Trump. On the other, he finds himself fending off attacks from one of the president’s closest allies.“Mitch will be very calm, he’ll be very strategic, he’ll be very surgical and he will eventually eviscerate Mr. Bannon, and Bannon won’t even know what happened to him,” said Bill Stone, a former chairman of the Republican Party in Louisville who is close to Mr. McConnell. “Bannon is dealing with a man of intellect and a man of experience and a man of patience and resolve like he’s never met in his life.”Senator Lamar Alexander, Republican of Tennessee and one of Mr. McConnell’s closest friends in the Senate, said the leader is paying scant attention.“Mitch is experienced, he’s tough, he’s purposeful,” Mr. Alexander said. “He’s not deflected by irrelevant attacks.”But the denizens of “McConnell World,” as the leader’s allies like to call themselves, are not so indifferent. They plan a campaign that will attack Mr. Bannon personally and seek to undermine his credibility by spotlighting his controversial comments and linking him with white nationalist groups.The first hints of that strategy have surfaced in the press and on social media. Mr. McConnell’s former chief of staff, Josh Holmes, referred to Mr. Bannon as a “white supremacist” in a recent interview with The Hill newspaper. And the Senate Leadership Fund, a political action committee closely aligned with Mr. McConnell, recently took to Twitter to circulate a newspaper headline that called Mr. Bannon an anti-Semite.For his part, Mr. Bannon called the charges “a hundred percent media fabrication” and the refuge of opponents that have nothing else. “They think the only way they can run is by smearing you to be a nativist, a misogynist, a racist, a homophobe,” he said. “Just go down the line.”(A recent article in BuzzFeed News used leaked documents and emails to directly link Mr. Bannon and his publication, Breitbart News, to the right-wing provocateur Milo Yiannopoulos and some of the most extreme elements of the rising white supremacist movement.)Billy Piper, a lobbyist and former chief of staff to Mr. McConnell, sees trouble in the brewing fight.“The worst fights are often the inside-the-family fights,” Mr. Piper said. “If we don’t navigate these waters the right way, I think the inevitable result is losing seats, and that’s not in any Republicans’ interest and certainly not in the president’s interest. It’s challenging, and McConnell is at the center of that.”Mr. McConnell has long been celebrated as a brilliant tactician, but he is struggling to govern with just a two-vote majority, and his record of legislative accomplishments this year is thin. He is still grappling with the fallout from the Senate’s failure to repeal the Affordable Care Act.“There’s no way you can put lipstick on that pig and make it look good,” said Trent Lott, a former Senate Republican leader.Mr. McConnell has also had a difficult relationship with Mr. Trump. They spent months feuding with one another, a conflict that reached a nadir in August, when Mr. McConnell privately told allies he feared Mr. Trump could not salvage his presidency.“He has to use considerable diplomacy working with the White House and elements of the administration,” said Richard G. Lugar, a former Republican senator who lost a re-election primary  to a Tea Party challenger in 2012, who then lost the Indiana seat to a Democrat. “He understands human nature and the differing ambitions of people. But also he understands his responsibility. He’s the leader. He has to produce.”The two worked to patch things up during a White House lunch last month, followed by a 45-minute impromptu news conference in the Rose Garden that left the leader feeling buoyed — and fellow Republicans feeling relieved.“They are both focused on the tax agenda, and I think the president realizes that he needs Mitch in order to accomplish his agenda,” said Senator Susan Collins, Republican of Maine.And after a string of legislative losses, Mr. McConnell can at least point to one win: The Senate recently confirmed four circuit court judges, bringing to eight the number of federal appeals court judges the chamber has confirmed during Mr. Trump’s presidency. Afterward, Mr. Trump rewarded him with enthusiastic Twitter praise: “Our courts are rapidly changing for the better!”Mr. McConnell makes the case that Mr. Trump’s most lasting legacy will come from remaking the federal judiciary by putting conservative jurists on the bench — including Justice Neil M. Gorsuch of the Supreme Court, who was seated after Mr. McConnell refused to allow hearings on Merrick Garland, former President Barack Obama’s nominee.Mr. McConnell said that “transforming the judiciary” is his No. 1 priority, even higher than the tax overhaul. “The most important decision I’ve made in my political career,” he said, “was the decision not to do something; it was the decision not to fill the Supreme Court vacancy created by the death of Justice Scalia.”____________On your iPhone or iPad:Open the preloaded app called Podcasts; it has a purple icon. If you’re reading this from your phone, tap this link, which will take you straight there. (You can also use the magnifying glass icon to search; type “The New Washington.”)Once you’re on the series page, you can tap on the episode title to play it, and tap the “subscribe” button to have new episodes sent to your phone free.Or if you prefer another podcast player, you can find “The New Washington” there. (Here’s the RSS feed.)On your Android phone or tablet:You can listen and subscribe using the free app RadioPublic, which is available worldwide. If you’re reading this from your phone, tap this link to play the latest episode and learn more about the app.Or if you prefer another podcast player, you can find “The New Washington” there. (Here’s the RSS feed.)From a desktop or laptop:Click the “play” button above to start the show. Make sure to keep that window open on your browser if you’re doing other things, or the audio will stop.
North Korea, Saudi Arabia, Manila: Your Monday Briefing Good morning. Here’s what you need to know:• President Rodrigo Duterte of the Philippines is playing the cordial host as President Trump nears the end of his marathon Asia tour.Their provocative styles may mesh over two days of meetings in Manila with regional leaders, but the Philippine leader’s longer-term game is to court Beijing for billions of dollars of investment.On Sunday, Mr. Trump abandoned his trip’s scripted messaging, unloading on Twitter against the “haters and fools” pressing the investigation into his campaign’s Russian ties. And he lashed back after North Korea described him as a “lunatic old man,” calling its leader “short and fat.”_____• An American proposal for resolving the decades-old Israeli-Palestinian conflict is being drawn up by President Trump and a group of advisers led by Jared Kushner, his son-in-law.The prospects for peace are caught up in a web of other regional issues — notably Saudi Arabia’s growing confrontation with Iran and the Lebanese militia it backs, Hezbollah, which has raised fears of a military conflict._____• Our reporters took the temperature at the largest and most secretive U.S. intelligence branch, the National Security Agency, gauging the effect of the catastrophic security breach by a group calling itself Shadow Brokers that first emerged in 2016.Current and former officials said the group’s repeated release of U.S. secrets, including hacking tools it used to spy on other countries, had ruined morale and called into question the agency’s ability to protect potent cyberweapons.“They have the whole law enforcement system and intelligence system after them,” one said of the mysterious hackers. “And they haven’t been caught.”_____• China? Canada? The U.N.? When President Trump pulled the U.S. out of the Paris agreement, America officially ceded its leadership on climate change. Here’s a look at some of the leaders and organizations, above, trying to fill the void.And at climate talks now underway in Bonn, Germany, a shadow U.S. delegation, including Al Gore, Jerry Brown and Michael Bloomberg, is trying to convince other nations that the U.S. has not “gone dark” on climate change._____• Singles Day — China’s annual version of Black Friday — entered staggering new territory.Sales blazed past $1 billion within two minutes of the midnight start on Saturday. By the end of the day, Alibaba reported that its sales had hit a record $25.3 billion, more than 40 percent higher than 2016.JD.com, Alibaba’s e-commerce rival, said that sales for Singles Day and its run-up reached more than $19 billion, up 50 percent._____• And Queen Elizabeth II watched from a balcony on Sunday as Prince Charles placed a wreath at the Cenotaph, Britain’s memorial to its war dead, to mark Armistice Day.Often praised for being rigorous about her royal obligations, the queen, 91, delegated the duty to Charles, 68, in a move seen by observers as a major step in the shift to the monarchy’s next generation._____• Driverless vehicles may soon cease to be science fiction. The Times Magazine’s Tech & Design issue ponders: What happens then?• Japan, Canada, Mexico and eight other countries that together account for about a sixth of global trade said over the weekend they were resurrecting the Trans-Pacific Partnership, without the U.S. The new deal could be announced as soon as early next year.• LinkedIn will no longer accept job ads from individuals in China, after it ran afoul of new government regulations requiring it to verify identities.•  Here’s a snapshot of global markets.• Thousands of far-right nationalists marched through Poland’s capital, Warsaw, over the weekend. Since 2009, the annual Independence Day march has become a magnet for white supremacists and far-right groups. [The New York Times]• A senior U.N. official vowed to raise the persecution of Myanmar’s Rohingya minority, especially sexual violence and torture, with the International Criminal Court. [Reuters]• New Zealand’s prime minister, Jacinda Ardern, called Australia’s handling of the refugee crisis on Manus Island “not acceptable” and said she would again bring it up with Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull at the Asean summit meeting in Manila. [ABC]• Spain’s prime minister, Mariano Rajoy, visited Catalonia a day after a massive pro-independence march. He urged a huge turnout in next month’s elections to return the region to “normality.” [The New York Times]• Police in Japan said that six of the nine victims whose mutilated bodies were found in a man’s apartment had signaled that they were interested in suicide. [The Asahi Shimbun]• In a rare collaboration, China and Taiwan are working together to predict earthquakes from space. [South China Morning Post] Tips, both new and old, for a more fulfilling life.• Social media, carefully used, can help advance your career.• There’s no magic formula for getting into a selective college, but here are some tips from a U.S.-based writer who covers admissions.• Recipe of the day: Making your own maple breakfast sausage is easier than you think.• Sizzling meat, crispy chicken, lots of beer. Our reviewer went deep into Melbourne to find Joomak, a hidden gem that offers the “wicked brilliance” of Korean food with touches of both Los Angeles and Australia.• The growing list of Hollywood players accused of sexual misconduct — which now includes the comedian Louis C.K. — raises a question: Should we do away with the idea of “separating the art from the artist”?• And our fashion critic discusses Melania 2.0. The first lady unveiled a softer, more subtle look during her Grand Tour of Asia — yet most missed it. (And no one complained that she wore not one Asian designer.)An engineering marvel of its time, New York City’s Holland Tunnel opened on this day 90 years ago.The designer, Clifford Holland, oversaw many innovative developments for the pair of 1.6-mile tubes, including meeting the extraordinary challenge of guaranteeing sufficient ventilation. Highly stressed, he died of a heart attack at 41.That was several years before the tunnel opened, so he missed the debate over whether to ban horse-drawn vehicles. Above, the tunnel under construction in 1922.Perhaps we’re more used to taking note of the competition for the world’s tallest building (currently the Burj Khalifa in Dubai, with a Saudi contender, the Jeddah Tower, hoping to complete construction in 2019).But there’s a global race on for tunnels, too. Europe currently claims the longest traffic tunnels: a 35-mile Swiss achievement; the 31-mile “Chunnel” under the English Channel; and Norway’s singular Laerdal Tunnel, which has even hosted weddings.Then there’s Tokyo’s Aqua-Line, 8.7 miles of underwater channel with a few miles of bridge riding atop.China, ever competitive as it seeks to meet the needs of upward of a billion people, aims to build the world’s longest water tunnel: a 600-mile conduit from Tibet to a desert in Xinjiang.Andrea Kannapell contributed reporting. _____Your Morning Briefing is published weekday mornings and updated online. Browse past briefings here. We have briefings timed for the Australian, Asian, European and American mornings. And our Australia bureau chief offers a weekly letter adding analysis and conversations with readers. You can sign up for these and other Times newsletters here.What would you like to see here? Contact us at asiabriefing@nytimes.com.
Roy Moore, Donald Trump, Saudi Arabia: Your Weekend Briefing Here are the week’s top stories, and a look ahead.1. We’re keeping a close eye on the baffling, fast-moving developments in the Middle East that are fueling anxieties about a possible military conflict in Lebanon. Above, a poster of a key player — Lebanon’s prime minister, who is missing — being put up in Beirut.The full rundown is here. In short form: The impulsive young Saudi crown prince had more than 200 royal relatives and businessmen arrested, consolidating power and then sharply escalating a proxy war with Iran that threatens millions of people in Yemen with starvation.As speculation built that the kingdom could be holding the Lebanese prime minister hostage, the leader of the Shiite militia Hezbollah, an Iranian ally, said the Saudis had asked Israel to attack Lebanon. At least four countries have urged their citizens to leave Lebanon. And the Saudis would play a major role in “the ultimate deal” President Trump’s advisers are working on for peace between the Israelis and the Palestinians.____2. In Asia, President Trump is nearing the end of his lengthy trip with less discipline than he started it. Notably, he sought to woo the Chinese president, Xi Jinping, with flattery, but came away with no significant concessions on North Korea or looming trade disputes. Above, the Trumps at the Forbidden City in Beijing.Mr. Trump pressed his case for “America first” trade policies at a regional forum in Vietnam, striking a jarring note before leaders who had supported the Obama administration’s efforts to close the Trans-Pacific Partnership trade deal. His comments also sharply contrasted with Mr. Xi’s projection of cooperation and engagement minutes later on the same stage.Our photographer has been traveling with Mr. Trump, documenting each stop on the 12-day trip. The president returns to the U.S. from Manila on Tuesday.____3. Upon his return, President Trump will find a Republican Party in disarray. A year after his election, anger against him helped fuel strong Democratic turnout in the suburbs and a rising coalition of women, minorities, and gay and transgender people that gave Democrats groundbreaking wins across the country.And Republican senators are exploring ways to stymie the candidacy of Roy Moore for a Senate seat in Alabama after the emergence of allegations that he made sexual advances on teenagers when he was in his 30s. Mr. Moore has denied any sexual misconduct and is moving to discredit the women who came forward.The accusations are distracting from Senate Republicans’ newly unveiled tax plan, which diverges from the evolving House bill in key ways. Both, however, would raise taxes for millions of middle-class families.____4. “These stories are true.” The comedian Louis C.K. confirmed the accounts of five women in his field accusing him of asking them to watch him masturbate.He is one of  least 20 men to have been accused of sexual misconduct since we reported on allegations of harassment and worse against Harvey Weinstein last month. As with Kevin Spacey and others, Louis C. K.’s media partners are severing ties.Our writer Amanda Hess argues that it’s time to do away with the notion that artists and their work must be considered independently.____5. Funerals have begun for victims of the shooting at the First Baptist Church in Sutherland Springs, Tex. The small town’s cemetery is struggling to figure out how to manage burials for the more than two dozen victims of Devin Kelley’s killing spree.The former airman’s court-martial and conviction on charges of assaulting his first wife and his toddler stepson should have prevented him from legally buying weapons. Air Force authorities are investigating why the information wasn’t entered into the federal database for firearms background checks. “He was just problem after problem after problem,” said a former Air Force staff sergeant who said that years ago, she feared he would “shoot up the place.”One of our most-read articles this week was an Interpreter column that examined mass shootings around the world and found an explanation for the extraordinary prevalence of mass shootings in America. (It’s not likely to surprise you.)____6. “He said he didn’t meddle — I asked him again.” President Trump told reporters that he believed Vladimir Putin was sincere in his repeated denials of involvement in the U.S. election last year.The Russian president’s account is squarely at odds with the U.S. intelligence agencies, whose assessments Mr. Trump did not dispute on Sunday. The comments came as new information has emerged about a 2016 meeting at which Joseph Mifsud, above left, a Maltese professor, told the Trump campaign adviser George Papadopoulos of “thousands of emails” that could be used against Hillary Clinton.____7. Writing for the Vows column, our arms and conflict reporter C.J. Chivers revisits the story of a former Marine rifleman with post-traumatic stress disorder and the woman who has loved him since childhood, above. Mr. Chivers’s profile of the Marine, Sam Siatta, earned a Pulitzer Prize this spring.And our Modern Love column began 13 years ago. We’re celebrating the milestone by following up on a few of the most resonant essays and sharing 13-word love stories from readers (“I thought I was straight. She thought she was straight. We were wrong.”).____8. Our reporters dived deep into the Paradise Papers, a 13.4-million-document leak that illuminates how trillions of dollars move through offshore tax shelters.Much of the information focuses on a law firm in Bermuda, whose offices are pictured above, that has helped wealthy clients including Madonna, Bono and Queen Elizabeth II invest, and that has helped major U.S. colleges skirt taxes on their endowments.____9. We checked in on hurricane recovery.In Houston, pictured above in mid-October, much of the devastation was a direct result of a quintessentially American defiance of nature’s boundaries. The latest installment in our immersive Changing Climate, Changing Cities series focuses on what rebuilding in that coastal city says about diverging attitudes toward, among other things, race, liberty and science.In Puerto Rico, figures show that 472 more people died in September compared with the same month last year, a sharp contrast with the official storm death toll of 55. And in parts of the U.S. Virgin Islands, day-to-day survival continues to be a struggle.The governors of Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands will testify before a Senate committee on hurricane recovery on Tuesday.____10. On “Saturday Night Live,” there was no shortage of targets amid the growing number of accusations of sexual misconduct by prominent men, including Louis C.K. and Roy Moore (played by Mikey Day, above left).But on the episode, hosted by the “Girls Trip” star Tiffany Haddish and featuring the musical guest Taylor Swift, some of the accused got rougher treatment than others.____11. Finally, it’s time to talk turkey.Thanksgiving is less than two weeks away. If you haven’t started planning, don’t panic.Our Food section walks you through a “400-Degree Thanksgiving” (one oven, four burners and a single day of work) with vivid video guidance. And we have four rules for Thanksgiving wines, an argument for a beer-and-bird pairing, a rundown of essential kitchen equipment, and a suggestion for a casserole for everyone at your table.Have a great week._____Your Weekend Briefing is published Sundays at 6 a.m. Eastern.And don’t miss Your Morning Briefing, weekdays at 6 a.m. Eastern, and Your Evening Briefing, weeknights at 6 p.m. Eastern.Want to look back? You can browse past Morning and Evening Briefings.If photographs appear out of order, please download the updated New York Times app from iTunes or Google Play.What did you like? What do you want to see here? Let us know at briefing@nytimes.com.
Cancer Doctors Cite Risks of Drinking Alcohol The American Society of Clinical Oncology, which represents many of the nation’s top cancer doctors, is calling attention to the ties between alcohol and cancer. In a statement published Tuesday in the Journal of Clinical Oncology, the group cites evidence that even light drinking can slightly raise a woman’s risk of breast cancer and increase a common type of esophageal cancer.Heavy drinkers face much higher risks of mouth and throat cancer, cancer of the voice box, liver cancer and, to a lesser extent, colorectal cancers, the group cautions.“The message is not, ‘Don’t drink.’ It’s, ‘If you want to reduce your cancer risk, drink less. And if you don’t drink, don’t start,’” said Dr. Noelle LoConte, an associate professor at the University of Wisconsin-Madison and the lead author of the ASCO statement. “It’s different than tobacco where we say, ‘Never smoke. Don’t start.’ This is a little more subtle.”Other medical groups have cited the risks of alcohol as a possible cause of cancer. But this is the first time that ASCO has taken a stand.Drinking over all, as well as heavy drinking and problem drinking, are on the rise in the United States and affect all segments of society, including women, older adults, racial and ethnic minorities and the poor, several surveys have shown.Yet few adults, when asked, identify alcohol consumption as a risk factor for cancer, even though the vast majority were familiar with other cancer risk factors, like smoking and sun exposure, a recent ASCO survey of 4,016 adults found. Fewer than one in three adults identified alcohol as a risk factor for cancer. (Most also failed to mention obesity as a risk factor.)The doctors’ group is also calling for new public health initiatives to curb alcohol use, from taxes to restrictions on ads targeting minors, like the new ban on alcohol advertising on New York City’s subways and buses slated to go into effect in January. The group likewise opposes “pink washing,” in which alcohol companies drape their products in pink ribbon to enhance sales, a practice it opposes “given the consistent evidence that shows the link between alcohol consumption and an increased risk of breast cancer.”For the statement, ASCO researchers reviewed earlier published studies and concluded that 5.5 percent of all new cancers and 5.8 percent of all cancer deaths worldwide could be attributed to alcohol. The paper stated clearly that alcohol plays a causal role in cancers of the throat and neck, voice box, liver and colon, as well as esophageal squamous cell carcinoma and, in women, breast cancer.For women, just one alcoholic drink a day can increase breast cancer risk, according to a report released in May from the American Institute for Cancer Research and the World Cancer Research Fund that was cited by ASCO. That report analyzed 119 studies, including data on 12 million women and over a quarter of a million breast cancer cases, and concluded there was strong evidence that alcohol consumption increases the risk of both pre- and postmenopausal cancer, and that drinking a small glass of wine or beer every day — about 10 grams of alcohol — increases premenopausal breast cancer risk by 5 percent and postmenopausal risk by 9 percent.“The more you drink, the higher the risk,” said Dr. Clifford A. Hudis, the chief executive of ASCO. “It’s a pretty linear dose-response.”Even those who drink moderately, defined by the Centers for Disease Control as one daily drink for women and two for men, face nearly a doubling of the risk for mouth and throat cancer and more than double the risk of squamous cell carcinoma of the esophagus, compared to nondrinkers. Moderate drinkers also face elevated risks for cancers of the voice box, female breast cancer and colorectal cancers.The risk for heavy drinkers — defined as eight or more drinks a week for women and 15 or more a week for men, including binge drinkers — are multiples higher. Heavy drinkers face roughly five times the risk of mouth and throat cancers and squamous cell esophageal cancers than nondrinkers, nearly three times the risk of cancers of the voice box or larynx, double the risk of liver cancer, as well as increased risks for female breast cancer and colorectal cancer.“If you look at these figures, you see alcohol is a contributing factor; certainly it has a causal role,” Dr. Hudis said.The International Agency for Research on Cancer, which is part of the World Health Organization, first classified the consumption of alcoholic beverages as carcinogenic to humans in 1987, tying consumption to cancers of the mouth, throat, voice box, esophagus and liver, said Susan Gapstur, vice president for epidemiology at the American Cancer Society.Since then, she said, more and more evidence has accumulated tying alcohol to a broader group of cancers, including colorectal cancer and, in women, breast cancer. A more recent I.A.R.C. report concluded that alcohol “is a cause of cancers of the oral cavity, pharynx, larynx, esophagus, colorectum, liver and female breast.” (The esophageal cancer is largely specific to squamous cell carcinoma.)“The story of alcohol has been quite consistent and has been peeled away like an onion over time, and we’re continuing to learn more about the mechanisms involved,” Dr. Gapstur said. “We don’t have randomized trials, but sometimes when you start looking at the coherence of all the evidence, including the observational epidemiology, the lab studies, the mechanistic studies, you begin to see a picture and get more clarity.”One way alcohol may lead to cancer is because the body metabolizes it into acetaldehyde, which causes changes and mutations in DNA, Dr. Gapstur said. The formation of acetaldehyde starts when alcohol comes in contact with bacteria in the mouth, which may explain the link between alcohol and cancers of the throat, voice box and esophagus, she suggested.Dr. Anne McTiernan, a scientist at the Fred Hutchinson Cancer Research Center who was an author of one of the earlier reports on alcohol and breast cancer, said she was pleased that oncologists were focusing on alcohol.“That puts some weight behind this,” she said. It “shows they’re serious about it and willing to put their name on the line for changes in policy, and willing to say that even small amounts of alcohol can increase the risks of some cancers to a small degree.”
Trump Administration Guiding Health Shoppers to Agents Paid by Insurers WASHINGTON — After cutting funds for nonprofit groups that help people obtain health insurance under the Affordable Care Act, the Trump administration is encouraging the use of insurance agents and brokers who are often paid by insurers when they help people sign up.The administration said in a recent bulletin that it was “increasing partnerships” with insurance agents and viewed them as “important stakeholders” in the federal marketplace, where consumers are now shopping for insurance. But some health policy experts warned that a shift from nonprofit groups, which are supposed to provide impartial information, to brokers and agents, who may receive commissions for the plans they recommend, carries risks for consumers.“Insurance agents can educate consumers about the marketplace, and that is a good thing,” said Sabrina Corlette, a research professor at Georgetown University’s Health Policy Institute. “But I worry that they work on a commission and therefore have a financial incentive to steer consumers to particular products, which may or may not be in the consumer’s best interest.”In its bulletin, the administration said agents and brokers who are registered with the federal marketplace can “get sales leads” and new clients. And it offered them tips for “making the most of your marketplace participation during this open enrollment period,” which runs through Dec. 15.Consumers can get contact information for agents and brokers, as well as nonprofit groups known as navigators, by clicking on “Find Local Help” on HealthCare.gov.From there, consumers can connect with a service the administration added this year specifically to connect them with licensed agents and brokers who can provide immediate assistance.“Get help now!” says a federal website describing the new service, called Help on Demand. “A marketplace-registered agent or broker will contact you in 30 minutes or less to help you enroll. Agents’ and brokers’ services are generally free to you. They’re usually paid for by insurance companies.”More than 43,000 agents and brokers have received training and been certified to sell health plans through the federal marketplace. Their advocates said they could provide a lifeline for consumers in a confusing and troubled marketplace.Michael Lujan, a former president of the California Association of Health Underwriters, called agents “the unsung heroes of health care and the marketplace.”“The Trump administration set out to sabotage the Affordable Care Act by defunding many of the nonprofit navigator groups,” Mr. Lujan said. “Agents can help fill the gap.”Agents and brokers can recommend specific health insurance plans and typically receive commissions paid by the insurers whose plans they sell. By contrast, nonprofit navigators and other “assisters” cannot recommend specific plans. In fact, the Trump administration recently warned navigators that they could not accept payment from an insurer and could not be paid even by their own organizations on a per-application or per-enrollee basis.The website for the Help on Demand service is operated by BigWave Systems, a privately held technology company in Colorado, “in partnership with HealthCare.gov,” the federal marketplace.Personal and financial information provided by consumers is confidential. But an assessment prepared by the Department of Health and Human Services says, “BigWave Systems makes no warranties or representations regarding the security of the data submitted to the Help On Demand application, and use of the Help On Demand website is at the consumer’s own risk.”Marcia Benshoof, a spokeswoman for BigWave Systems, said that personal information was encrypted and stored behind a firewall and that there had not been any unauthorized disclosures.The administration has reduced funds for the navigator program by 41 percent, to $36.9 million, from $62.9 million last year. Among the states hit the hardest, according to data provided to Congress by the administration, are Georgia, down 61 percent; Michigan, down 72 percent; New Jersey, down 62 percent; and Ohio, down 71 percent.A survey by the Kaiser Family Foundation found that insurance agents and nonprofit navigator groups differed in some ways. People using agents last year were less likely to be uninsured and less likely to have income low enough to qualify for Medicaid, it said.California has had one of the most successful health insurance marketplaces in the country, and has studied the lessons to be learned from its experience.“Agents are funded by health plan commissions and do not have an incentive or the resources to promote the overall marketplace,” said Peter V. Lee, the executive director of the state’s exchange. But he added, “Many of them are small-business owners who are trusted voices in their communities,” and they have enrolled hundreds of thousands of people in California.Agents enrolled 47 percent of the people who had coverage this year through the state-run insurance marketplace known as Covered California. By contrast, nonprofit navigator groups generated about 3 percent of enrollment, according to the agency that runs the state marketplace. Many customers said they had bought insurance on their own without receiving assistance.Patricia R. Martin of Chardon, Ohio, said she had always had health insurance through a large company for which her husband worked. When he died suddenly at 54, she said, she had to find other coverage, and a local agent provided invaluable assistance.“Health insurance just boggles my mind,” Ms. Martin said. “It’s fine to go online, but I’d much rather deal with a person. I have complete faith in my agent.”The open enrollment period for the federal marketplace lasts 45 days. But Nicholas A. Moriello, an insurance agent in Delaware, said agents “do marketing and outreach to customers” throughout the year and typically receive a commission or fee for each month that a consumer remains enrolled in a health plan.“Agents and brokers are able to provide our recommendations to consumers, and that’s something they’ve really needed in trying to evaluate their choices,” Mr. Moriello said. “But in the same way that federal funding has been reduced for navigators, insurance companies all around the country have reduced the compensation that they pay to agents and brokers, and in some states they have eliminated it altogether. So I fear that in this year’s open enrollment, there may be a reduction in the number of agents and brokers for consumers to turn to.”But with rising premiums, shrinking options and much confusion, consumers need more help.Kelly L. Rector, an insurance broker in O’Fallon, Mo., near St. Louis, said many of her clients were “being required to give up their physicians” because Anthem Blue Cross and Blue Shield was pulling out of the local market and a company entering the market, Centene, had “a slimmer network with fewer doctors to choose from.”Besides an increase in premiums for 2018, Ms. Rector said, “the biggest issue for some of my clients is that they will be unable to continue to see any of their current doctors.”
No Excuses, People: Get the New Shingles Vaccine Medical researchers and government health policymakers, a cautious lot, normally take pains to keep expectations modest when they’re discussing some new finding or treatment.They warn about studies’ limitations. They point out what isn’t known. They emphasize that correlation doesn’t mean causation.So it’s startling to hear prominent experts sound positively excited about a new shingles vaccine that an advisory committee to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention approved last month.“This really is a sea change,” said Dr. Rafael Harpaz, a veteran shingles researcher at the C.D.C.Dr. William Schaffner, preventive disease specialist at the Vanderbilt University School of Medicine, said, “This vaccine has spectacular initial protection rates in every age group. The immune system of a 70- or 80-year-old responds as if the person were only 25 or 30.”“This really looks to be a breakthrough in vaccinating older adults,” agreed Dr. Jeffrey Cohen, a physician and researcher at the National Institutes of Health.What’s causing the enthusiasm: Shingrix, which the pharmaceutical firm GlaxoSmithKline intends to begin shipping this month. Large international trials have shown that the vaccine prevents more than 90 percent of shingles cases, even at older ages.The currently available shingles vaccine, called Zostavax, only prevents about half of shingles cases in those over age 60 and has demonstrated far less effectiveness among elderly patients.Yet those are the people most at risk for this blistering disease, with its often intense pain, its threat to vision and the associated nerve pain that sometimes last months, even years, after the initial rash fades.Almost all older Americans harbor the varicella zoster virus that causes shingles; they acquired it with childhood chickenpox, whether they knew they had the disease or not.The virus stays dormant until, for unknown reasons, it erupts decades later. The risk rises sharply after age 50.Shingles is hardly a minor menace. “A million cases occur in the United States each and every year,” Dr. Schaffner said. “If you’re fortunate enough to reach your 80th birthday, you stand a one-in-three to one-in-two chance of shingles.”Preventing the great majority of these cases — along with the risk of lingering and debilitating nerve pain, called postherpetic neuralgia — would represent a major advance in public health.So while the old vaccine will remain on the market, the C.D.C. committee voted to make Shingrix the preferred vaccine and recommended it for all adults over age 50 — a group younger by a decade than those earlier encouraged to get Zostavax.The committee also recommended Shingrix for adults who’ve previously gotten Zostavax, since a smaller study in people over age 65 demonstrated effectiveness and safety in those already vaccinated. The Food and Drug Administration approved Shingrix last month.Once the C.D.C.’s director endorses the committee’s recommendations, and the agency publishes them, insurers — including Medicare and Medicaid — will start covering the vaccine.“By early 2018, it should be broadly available to consumers in the U.S.,” said Dr. Thomas Breuer, chief medical officer of GSK Vaccines. (Canada has also approved Shingrix; it awaits approval in Australia, Japan and Europe.)What makes the new vaccine so promising, especially for older adults?* It provides better protection against shingles from the start. Though Zostavax, introduced in 2006, can reduce shingles cases by about half (and postherpetic neuralgia by two-thirds), that overall rate conceals big differences by age.That vaccine’s effectiveness drops from 64 percent for people in their 60s to 38 percent among those over age 70, and falls still lower for people in their 80s.But the new vaccine protects nearly as well in older groups as in the middle-aged. Shingrix racked up a 97 percent effectiveness rate in adults over age 50 and, in a separate study of people over age 70, prevented 90 percent of shingles in those 70 to well past age 80.“In groups such as the elderly, who often don’t maintain vigorous responses to vaccines, this represents extremely strong disease protection,” said Dr. Kathleen Dooling, an epidemiologist at the C.D.C.* Shingrix’s protection appears to last longer. Among seniors, the effectiveness of Zostavax wanes with disappointing speed. “After 11 years, the protection was close to zero,” Dr. Harpaz said.Regulators don’t yet have 11 years of data on Shingrix, but in some samples, it remained effective for six years or longer, according to GSK. That should greatly reduce the incidence of postherpetic neuralgia, too, assuming the 42 million people in their 50s start getting vaccinated.* The new vaccine may protect people with compromised immune systems.A substantial number of older Americans have suppressed immunity because they’re undergoing chemotherapy or transplants, have H.I.V. or take steroids. For them, the previous vaccine was off-limits because it was made with a weakened live virus.Yet immune suppression itself leaves the people vulnerable to shingles. Shingrix, a recombinant vaccine made from a glycoprotein and a combination of immunity boosters called adjuvants, doesn’t pose the same danger.The C.D.C. committee held off on recommending Shingrix for the immunocompromised, because GSK is still running trials with these patients. But since the F.D.A. did not declare Shingrix contraindicated for them when approving it, they can get the vaccine once it’s available.Public health advocates do foresee a couple of potential problems.First, Shingrix requires two doses, administered at least two months apart. Prodding the older population to get a single shot has proved tough: barely 31 percent of those over age 60 have been vaccinated against shingles. How much harder will it be to persuade people to get two Shingrix injections?Further, “it tends to be a bit of an ouch-y vaccine,” Dr. Schaffner cautioned.In studies, most older recipients said they’d experienced pain, redness or swelling in their upper arms for a day or two after the shot, and 8.5 percent of those over age 70 deemed those symptoms uncomfortable enough to interfere with normal activities.About half of those over age 70 reported more systemic side effects like fatigue, fever or aching joints, lasting one to two days. Physicians and pharmacists should prepare people for such reactions, Dr. Schaffner said.“If people anticipate it, they’ll cope with it better. They’ll take a couple of Tylenol” — and not worry that something is seriously wrong.They may feel pocketbook pain, too. Zostavax is the most expensive adult vaccine, and at $140 for each dose (plus the cost of administering the injection), Shingrix will be pricier still.The 50- to 65-year-old cohort, many of whom have coverage under employee health plans, may not find that much of a barrier. At older ages, cost matters more.Medicare will cover Shingrix under Part D (like its predecessor), not under Part B like the flu vaccine. That complicates reimbursement for those seeking vaccination in doctors’ offices, so Medicare patients will probably find it simpler to head for a pharmacy.But not all Medicare recipients have Part D, and those that do could face co-payments.Still, it’s no contest: The hazards of shingles and its complications dwarf any problems yet reported with Shingrix.“Compared to shingles, a little arm pain for a day or so is a small price to pay,” Dr. Schaffner said. “If you know people who’ve had this illness, you’ll be first in line for this vaccine.”
When the War to End All Wars Doesn’t Do the Trick Q. It seems as though city parks have more monuments for World War I   than for World War II. Why?A. You’re not imagining things. There are more than 120 World War I memorials in city parks. That’s almost twice the number of World War II monuments, despite the resounding American triumph and general popularity of the latter conflict, not to mention the much higher toll it took on soldiers from the United States.There are a few reasons for this. Chief among them was a shift from the optimism after the “war to end all wars” to the sobriety of a looming standoff with the Soviet Union. And as with most city topics in the mid-20th century, the planning czar Robert Moses played a role, too.World War I was the first conflict in which a large number of American soldiers went overseas to fight. Over 400,000 from New York State fought, or about 10 percent of all American troops. When the war ended, it seemed like every organization in the city wanted to honor local veterans.There are monuments to local residents, like the Pleasant Plains Memorial, honoring the veterans of Staten Island’s Fifth Ward, and to military units, like Central Park’s 305th Infantry Memorial Grove.Thousands of smaller remembrances also dotted the urban landscape: a tree planted here, a plaque on a church there.This variety, not to mention the sheer quantity, did not sit well with Moses, the parks commissioner between 1934 and 1960. He considered many of the First World War monuments to be eyesores, and sought to restrict the number of World War II memorials to one per borough.Although Moses eventually softened his opinion, his initial stance probably dampened enthusiasm for building a plethora of monuments.Moses is not entirely to blame; the nation’s attitudes toward war had changed considerably. World War II had destroyed the notion of a “lasting peace.” And no classical statue of an angel or a soldier could properly reflect the horrors of the concentration camps. Many felt it was prudent to wait until enough time had passed to put the war in proper perspective.
DealBook Briefing: Senators Want Answers on AT&T Negotiations Good afternoon. Is the Justice Department under President Trump more willing to block mergers than previously thought? It may depend on the kind of transactions we’re talking about. A group of senators sent a letter to the D.O.J. demanding answers as to whether President Trump is influencing the department’s negotiations with AT&T. The latest developments in the tax overhaul remain on our minds, especially since the Senate is proposing delaying a cut to the corporate rate until 2019. More on all that in a moment.Breaking: Senator Amy Klobuchar, ranking member of the Antitrust Subcommittee, and a group of seven senators sent a letter to the Department of Justice demanding answers to questions they posed months ago about whether President Trump had pressured the D.O.J. to force the sale of CNN as part of AT&T’s acquisition of Time Warner:The senators continued:— Andrew Ross SorkinMany, many deal makers believed that a Trump presidency would be good for mergers within the media and telecom industries. Companies felt the need to get bigger, thanks to ever-increasing competition — and much of the inspiration came from AT&T’s planned $85.4 billion takeover of Time Warner. That was before this week.Think about how many deals are in the works, or that analysts say should be in the works. Sinclair is in the process of buying Tribune. Disney briefly held talks about buying most of 21st Century Fox. Sprint and T-Mobile are both single and potentially ready to mingle. And so on.Is the Justice Department under President Trump more willing to block mergers than previously thought? It may depend on the kind of transactions we’re talking about. Federal Communications Commission chairman Ajit Pai wrote an NYT op-ed defending his plans to ease restrictions on owning newspapers and a television station in the same market. But in the case of AT&T, the Justice Department is arguing that owning a wireless service provider, HBO, the Turner Broadcasting’s cable channels and DirecTV is too much control for one company to have.Seeing conspiracies: Rich Greenfield of BTIG does pose a provocative question in his latest research report:Gabe Sherman at Vanity Fair also writes about that theory: “We’ve heard musings about this from our own reporting, but can’t tell how seriously executives believe them.”Trouble in the world’s biggest oil exporter — arrests of royals, saber-rattling toward Lebanon — is making many in the energy industry nervous. Analysts at Goldman Sachs, Commerzbank and Julius Baer all think that oil prices could rise because of it, according to Bloomberg.What’s driving the shocks: Crown Prince Mohammed says that he’s modernizing the Saudi economy and cracking down on corruption. But Madawi al-Rasheed of the London School of Economics questions that in an NYT op-ed:Don’t count on staying at the Ritz-Carlton anytime soonPer Andy Critchlow of S.&P. Global Platts:And Bloomberg reports that a second hotel in Riyadh — the far less swanky Courtyard by Marriott — is off limits because of bookings by “local higher authorities.”In more Saudi news• Wealthy Saudis are already moving assets out of the region to avoid getting caught up in the recent crackdown. (Bloomberg)• McKinsey & Company hired at least eight relatives of high-ranking Saudi officials, while it has been paid millions to advise the kingdom on its Vision 2030 economic plan. (The consultancy says that it hired on merit.) (WSJ)• The British government is poised to provide a $2 billion loan guarantee to Aramco, but denies that the move is linked to lobbying for a London listing for the oil company. (FT)Corporate America initially reacted about as well as could have been expected when Senate Republicans proposed changing the corporate rate in 2019. (The WSJ editorial board argues that the delay is acceptable, because the Senate bill includes full expensing of business expenses.)That’s not the only issue, of course. Republicans will have to reconcile differences in the Senate and House tax plans.Carl Hulse of the NYT notes that Republicans appear willing to risk a lot for a tax overhaul:From the conference: Howard Schultz of Starbucks attacked the plan, saying, “This is not tax reform. This is a tax cut. This is fool’s gold.”More tax notes• The House proposal squeaked in under Senate limits on additions to the national debt, helping efforts to reconcile the two bills. (Axios)• Jim Stewart says that the House plan to tweak — but not eliminate — the so-called carried interest loophole favors the investor class. (NYT)• David Leonhardt wants to rename the House bill “Paul Ryan’s 2017 Tax Increase on Middle-Class Families.” (NYT)____________________________Today’s DealBook briefing was written by Andrew Ross Sorkin in New York, and Michael J. de la Merced and Amie Tsang in London.____________________________Is Gary Cohn going to regret saying that in his interview with CNBC? He was trying to explain corporate America’s enthusiasm for a tax overhaul, but it isn’t quite the messaging that the White House has in mind. (Dealbreaker’s headline: “Gary Cohn Tacitly Reveals That He Slept Through Years Of Goldman Sachs Media Training.”)Mr. Cohn also committed to staying in the administration, even though he was passed over for Federal Reserve chairman.He also said this: Mr. Cohn told CNBC that he thought that Mr. Trump and Lloyd Blankfein, his former boss, have many similarities. Mr. Blankfein, a Democrat who has publicly criticized the president, later told CNBC, “I don’t mind the comparison.”Thirteen newsmakers joined us at the DealBook conference on Thursday, and many made news. Here’s what they said:• AT&T’s C.E.O., Randall L. Stephenson, said that selling CNN to push through his company’s acquisition of Time Warner hasn’t been on the table — and never will be.• “The culture went wrong, the governance went wrong, the board went in a very bad direction. I think winning gives some excuses for bad behavior,” Dara Khosrowshahi said in his first public interview since becoming Uber’s chief.Uber suffered a blow on Friday when an employment tribunal in London ruled that the company would not be able to treat its drivers as self-employed contractors, calling its operating model into question.• Mellody Hobson, the president of Ariel Investments, asked, “Where is the corporate Kaepernick?”• Mark Cuban said that he was “considering” a presidential run.Catch up on Andrew’s conversations  here.Mr. Stephenson made that clear. But also emerging is an apparent attempt to depoliticize an increasingly heated dispute with the Justice Department: The A&T chief told Andrew that the Trump administration had never asked him to sell CNN, and that he didn’t believe there was a “Trump factor” in the talks.(To be clear: We’ve reported that AT&T was asked to sell either Turner Broadcasting, the Time Warner division that includes CNN, or DirecTV. Mr. Stephenson didn’t comment on those specific requests.)That raises questions about what the Justice Department is really seeking. Is it, as some Trump critics suggest, an attack on a news outlet that the president has openly criticized? Or is it an attempt to break up a deal that has become a lightning rod for concerns about a rapidly consolidating media industry, perhaps rooted in the administration’s populist tendencies?Where we go from here: “If we feel like litigation is a better outcome, then we will litigate,” Mr. Stephenson told Andrew. But the two sides are still negotiating — including in public — and a settlement could still happen.More food for thought• Meet Makan Delrahim, the head of the Justice Department’s Antitrust Division and the administration’s point person on the Time Warner deal, as profiled by Cecilia Kang of the NYT.• “Should we so quickly conclude that the Justice Department is doing something wrong? Maybe not,” Tim Wu of Columbia Law School writes in an NYT op-ed.• President Trump’s public criticisms of CNN could hurt legitimate legal arguments that the Justice Department would bring if it sued to block the Time Warner deal, according to David Shepardson and Jan Wolfe of Reuters.• The F.C.C.’s chairman, Ajit Pai, defended a forthcoming move to relax media ownership rules in an NYT op-ed.HBO severed its ties to the comedian after the NYT reported allegations of abuse from five women. FX, which hosts his critically acclaimed show “Louie,” said that it was “very troubled” by the report and was conducting a review.More accusations emerged yesterday• Roy Moore’s candidacy for the Alabama Senate seat took a serious blow yesterday after the WaPo reported on accusations of sexual overtures to four women, including one who was 14 at the time. That could endanger Republicans’ hold on the legislative body. (WaPo)• The hotelier André Balazs has been accused of groping women. (NYT)• Kater Gordon, a former writer for “Mad Men,” accused the show’s creator, Matthew Weiner, of sexual harassment. (The Information)A government move to lift foreign ownership limits on banks and insurers in China is music to Western firms’ ears. Tied to Mr. Trump’s visit, the initiative will let finally let them gain more than a tiny foothold there. A UBS executive told Reuters, “China is a key market for UBS and, as indicated previously, we continue to work towards increasing our stake in UBS Securities Co Ltd.”Not everyone is convinced that Wall Street firms will take over China, however, since state-run banks will remain powerful.Goldman makes a move: The firm announced a $5 billion investment vehicle with China’s sovereign wealth fund to help it invest in American manufacturers — and to help those companies gain access to the Chinese market.— Sean Parker, the former Facebook executive, in an interview with Axios on the social network’s effects on humans and society.• Bytedance, which owns the news personalization app Toutaio, bought Musical.ly, an app for sharing videos of people singing or dancing along to music, for as much as $1 billion, according to people familiar with the matter. (WSJ)• A settlement with Apple could preserve Qualcomm’s independence from Broadcom — but that depends on which chip maker Apple considers the more malleable counterpart. (Breakingviews)• Before Snap went public, bankers, investors, analysts and employees had concerns about its growth prospects. But in the fever for a big listing, they allowed the company to set the terms. (WSJ)• Equifax has incurred $87.5 million of expenses related to its giant data breach this year and faces dozens of government investigations as a result. (NYT)• New York’s attorney general has subpoenaed TIAA, the insurance and investment company, seeking documents and information relating to its sales practices, according to people briefed on the inquiry. (NYT)• Carlyle is exploring a sale or initial public offering of Ortho-Clinical Diagnostics that could value the company at more than $7 billion including debt, according to people familiar with the matter. (Reuters)Each weekday, DealBook reporters in New York and London offer commentary and analysis on the day’s most important business news. Want this in your own email inbox? Here’s the sign-up.You can find live updates of DealBook coverage throughout the day at nytimes.com/dealbook.Follow Andrew Ross Sorkin @andrewrsorkin, Michael J. de la Merced @m_delamerced and Amie Tsang @amietsang on Twitter.We’d love your feedback as we experiment with the writing, format and design of this briefing. Please email thoughts and suggestions to bizday@nytimes.com.
Up Late and Well-Versed in Korean Food: Joomak in Melbourne MELBOURNE, Australia — It is hard to argue with barbecue and fried chicken. Those two foods have snaked their way into the Australian restaurant zeitgeist like no other in recent years, as edible Americana has become ubiquitous here. But these two giants of Southern cookery are also culinary emissaries of Korean culture. And as ambassadors go, you can’t get much more charming and irresistible than sizzling meats and crispy chicken served with plenty of beer.There is so much more to Korean food, however, than these greasy darlings, and there are very few places in Melbourne to explore that vast deliciousness. You can get a decent bibimbap here and there, and kimchi shows up on cafe menus almost as often as dukkah these days. Much harder to find are bubbling caldrons of jjigae, turned blazing scarlet from kimchi and chiles, dotted with pork and bulbous clouds of soon tofu.In my book, these stews are some of life’s most elemental and necessary dishes. And sure, barbecue and fried chicken make fantastic companions for beer or rice-based liquors, but all Korean cuisine has a wicked brilliance when it comes to drunk-food that I had not seen in Melbourne. Not until I found Joomak.It was no easy feat: Joomak, opened in 2010, is in the basement of a personality-less Swanston Street office building in Melbourne’s Central Business District, with no street signage indicating that you are in the right location. You enter the building feeling wholly unsure of yourself before descending a flight of stairs that lead to a heavy wooden door. Though the name of the restaurant is above the staircase, and a note on the basement door explains that the business is cash-only, it is not until you step into the room that you are entirely sure you have found the place. It does not help that both map apps on my phone put Joomak down a nearby alley, where I encountered other bewildered would-be customers searching for an entrance between Dumpsters. Use the street address, not the name of the restaurant.Who is cramming into the long, low room, with its booths tucked into nooks along its sides? Mainly young people speaking Korean. They are here for blended sochu and fruit slushies (the pineapple version is best) in pitchers, and unfiltered rice wine on tap, served in metal teakettles and drunk from shallow metal bowls. And they are here for the food that goes with drinking: corn kernels heaped in a pile and smothered in melted cheese; egg rolls stuffed with cheese and fish roe; and yes, spicy pan-fried chicken.I came for the jjigae, listed in English on Joomak’s menu as “kimchi and pork soup with tofu,” presumably because the word “jjigae” has yet to make it into the lexicon of the non-Korean-speaking Australian. It came bubbling in a black caldron, and satiated my lust for piquant, porky comfort. I have certainly had better versions. But Joomak’s kimchi pancake could hang with the best of them, its perfectly greasy crisped crust giving way to a slightly creamy interior, as proficient at soaking up booze as any street pizza. (The seafood pancake is pretty fine, too.) Spicy chicken gizzards, sizzling on a platter, lose their bouncy magic as they cool into rubbery nubs. But those first few bites are fantastic.There is a common theory that Los Angeles’s giant Korean population and Koreatown neighborhood have a strong influence on Korean food culture worldwide. Because America has high-quality beef, one result is more beef-based dishes. You can see that at Joomak in the “L.A.-style short ribs,” cut thin and cooked crispy, the flesh sweet with soy and garlic.Australia has its subtle influences, too. “School prawns,” the common bar snack of fried shrimp, are not much different at Joomak than they are at any number of Melbourne pubs, eaten head-on and served with aioli. A dish of kabana sausage stir-fried with vegetables is the ultimate multicultural mash-up — a Korean take on an Australian version of a Polish sausage.A helpful hint: Call ahead and make a booking. Joomak has one of Melbourne’s rare extremely-late-night licenses, and it is likely you will be taking advantage of those very late hours if you decide to wander in without warning. The efficient, harried staff will take your name and quote a two-to-three-hour wait for a table. There is nowhere in the restaurant to wait. Go drink somewhere else and check back by phone intermittently. Persistence pays off.In Seoul, as in Los Angeles, youth culture and food culture are inextricably intertwined, much like fashion in Tokyo or hip-hop in Atlanta. Ancient methods and ingredients are still respected, but the force that drives the creativity and excitement and revenue for the restaurant industry is food-obsessed millennials. At midnight on Friday nights, Swanston Street is packed with young people of Korean, Vietnamese and Chinese descent, and their energy foretells a Melbourne that is bound to become increasingly influenced by Asian youth culture.Through a door and down some stairs, Joomak is a window into that culture in all its late-night, sochu-soaked vibrancy.Do you have a suggestion for Besha Rodell? The New York Times’s Australia bureau would love to hear from you: nytaustralia@nytimes.com or join the discussion in the NYT Australia Facebook group. Read about the Australia Fare column here.Follow NYT Food on Facebook, Instagram, Twitter and Pinterest. Get regular updates from NYT Cooking, with recipe suggestions, cooking tips and shopping advice.
Australian Rightists in Pub Slur Iranian-Born Senator as a ‘Terrorist’ SYDNEY, Australia — Senator Sam Dastyari was trying to order a drink in Melbourne on Wednesday night when he was interrupted at the bar by some unfriendly patrons.A group of three men, identifying themselves as members of Patriot Blue, a far-right group, walked up to him and began hurling racial slurs at the lawmaker, who is a member of the Australian Labor Party.“You terrorist,” one man is heard saying in a video they uploaded to Facebook. “You little monkey.” Then, following Mr. Dastyari around the pub, they continue to throw insults his way. “Why don’t you go back to Iran, you terrorist?”The lawmaker initially tried to brush the insults aside but then called them out.“Honestly, I think you guys are a bunch of racists. I don’t have time for you,” said Mr. Dastyari, who is of Iranian heritage and a nonpracticing Muslim.In a radio interview Thursday morning, Mr. Dastyari said the rise of white nationalism needed to be confronted.“We are heading to this horrible place in our politics where you can’t have civil disagreement, you can’t have civil debate,” he said on ABC Melbourne.After the video spread around the internet, politicians from both major parties in Australia condemned the slurs aimed at Mr. Dastyari.“There is no room for racial vilification in Australia,” Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull told the “Sunrise” program on Channel Seven on Thursday. He added that the country should have “zero tolerance of racism.”Bill Shorten, leader of the opposition Labor Party, called the men “disgusting” on Channel Seven.“What is this country coming to, when you can’t go out and have a meal without being abused by idiots, and by racist idiots?” he added.But one of the men in the video, Neil Erikson, told a Melbourne radio show Thursday that it was Mr. Dastyari who was being racist — by calling him a “redneck.”“It is a racial slur against white people,” he said. “I turned around and called him a terrorist — I think it’s fair.”Patriot Blue was also involved in a protest in September against a Melbourne council’s support for changing the date of Australia Day. Some Indigenous Australians are critical of the holiday, which is celebrated on a day that marks the arrival of the first British settlers in 1788.Tim Soutphommasane, Australia’s race discrimination commissioner, said the harassment of the senator raised alarms about the prevalence of such thinking in Australia.“There is a risk of racial abuse and harassment being normalized in our public life,” he said. “This cannot become the new normal in our society.”
How a Sydney ‘War Zone’ Became a Center of Vietnamese Resolve SYDNEY, Australia — A generation ago, people arriving by train in Cabramatta, in western Sydney, would exit the station only to find themselves in a bustling open-air heroin market where gangs had gunfights over turf.“Honest to God, it was a war zone,” said Detective Superintendent Scott Cook, commander of the New South Wales Organized Crime Squad, who began his policing career in Cabramatta in 1989. “We’d walk up the street to get lunch and arrest two people.”Now, lunch is still a draw, though arrests are on the wane. Through a mix of aggressive policing, government intervention and the hard work of residents, Cabramatta has undergone a stark transformation into a lively area renowned as a destination for some of Sydney’s best Vietnamese food.The area’s reputation for crime arose in the 1970s, when a surging drug trade coincided with the arrival of thousands of Vietnamese migrants and refugees. Among the first nonwhite migrants in Australia after the complete abolition of the White Australia Policy in 1973, many of the newcomers risked their lives in harrowing boat trips before settling here after the Vietnam War.As Australia’s offshore detention policy is again being condemned by human rights groups, Cabramatta shows not just the challenges that refugee communities face, but also how they can evolve.Today there are few signs of the old Cabramatta. On the busiest thoroughfare, John Street, a recently opened canary-yellow bubble tea shop sits near a cellphone store, joining a hip burger joint and an array of sugar-cane juice stalls, fabric markets and ethnic grocery stores.“Cabramatta has always been a good place for me,” said the bubble tea shop’s owner, Quynh Nguyen, 31, who came to Sydney as a teenager from Ho Chi Minh City. “I feel very homey here.”A mix of fresh ambition and the familiar has come to define this diverse neighborhood, where less than 10 percent of the population traces its ancestry to Australia or England. It is visible at places like the Usual Cafe, a modern coffee shop near John Street where baristas in denim pull shots against a background of lush plants and white tiles.Corey Nguyen, 28, who grew up in Australia and owns the Usual with his partner, Jenny Ngo, said they wanted to introduce Cabramatta, which is dominated by traditional cafes selling Vietnamese-style coffee, to a more artisanal cafe culture.“For us it’s never been a competition,” he said. “They do their thing, we do ours. I wish them all the best.”It’s a good thing, said Andrew Nguyen, 24, who waited with a friend for his coffee after a traditional Vietnamese lunch. “All your Asian fixes are here,” he said. “It’s home to us.”For many of Cabramatta’s first Vietnamese residents, it felt like anything but.Before their arrival, the population was mostly working-class Australians and European migrants. A German-Austrian society center near the train station is one of a few remaining signs of that past.During the ’70s, primarily American servicemen brought heroin to Sydney from Southeast Asia, said Andrew Jakubowicz, a professor of sociology at the University of Technology Sydney. Cabramatta, with its links to Italian criminal groups and a new connection to Southeast Asia, would soon become a distribution point for the rest of the city.For the Vietnamese, harboring the lingering trauma of war, the lack of an established Asian community in Cabramatta made it “a fairly desperate time,” Professor Jakubowicz said. “There was no history and structure available to respond to, and Australia was still very racist.”One of those former refugees, Hue Kim, 75, now spends her weekends selling Kaffir lime leaves, rosemary and other herbs on the sidewalk just a few feet from Ms. Nguyen’s bubble tea shop.She remembers attending her first English class shortly after arriving, pregnant, in Sydney 37 years ago. Her teachers, she said, noticed that her shirt was stained with milk. “They told me to nurse my newborn before coming back,” she said in Vietnamese. “So I didn’t go back.”Many of the Vietnamese children who came during this time were unaccompanied. Others were left to their own devices while their parents worked long hours. Isolated culturally and economically, some of the young Vietnamese arrivals banded together, tapping into the drug trade and preying on the members of their own community.Tony Hoang, 35, a pastor who spent his teenage years dealing heroin as part of a gang, recalled the time as marked with instability, anger and a need to belong. “It was attractive to be a part of a group that loved each other,” he said.The violence took a shocking turn in 1994 with the assassination of John Newman, who represented Cabramatta in the State Parliament. A rival local politician who had immigrated from Vietnam was later convicted of the crime.It was Australia’s first political assassination, and one that would further feed notions of a wave of ethnic migrant violence in Cabramatta.Frustration over the area’s lawless reputation eventually prompted a parliamentary inquiry. The 2001 report led to the creation of drug treatment and intervention programs and the hiring of more police officers with wider powers to tackle drug crimes. Today, crime levels compare with those in other parts of metropolitan Sydney.Not all of Cabramatta’s problems have been solved. Housing prices, like elsewhere in Sydney, have risen into the millions of dollars.And a new wave of migrants, including refugees from Syria and the Middle East, are raising the same kinds of tensions that confronted Vietnamese migrants in the 1970s.According to the 2016 census, Vietnamese is still the predominant ethnic group in Cabramatta, making up 33 percent of its roughly 22,000 residents. Chinese make up 24 percent, and Cambodians account for 8 percent. At least 40 other ethnic groups are also represented.Frank Carbone, the mayor of Fairfield City, the western Sydney district surrounding Cabramatta, said that while 7,000 new refugees had been resettled in the region since January 2016, the federal government had not provided any financial support.Today, though, the children of the initial wave of Vietnamese migrants are seeing a return on their parents’ persistence and creating their own legacy.On a quieter stretch of John Street, patrons lined up outside Pho Tau Bay, a popular restaurant. Inside, Chi Giang, 36, a placid man in glasses, worked the register as waiters ferried bowls of steaming broth.Born in an Indonesian refugee camp to Vietnamese parents waiting for Australian visas, Mr. Giang manages the restaurant, which his mother began in the kitchen of their home in 1980. Her closely guarded beef noodle soup recipe often tops critics’ lists of the best Vietnamese food in Sydney, and the profits from the restaurant are enough to sustain Mr. Giang’s entire extended family.“Over the years, I’ve seen kids coming in as babies,” Mr. Giang said, gesturing to a young family at a nearby table. “And then years later, they’re taller than me, and they’re still coming for beef noodle soup.”
On ‘The Good Doctor,’ the Anti-Antihero Is In The title of ABC’s “The Good Doctor” is simple and complicated. Mostly, the show is exactly what it sounds like: a hospital melodrama, with whiz-bang medical science, a dash of intra-staff romance and shameless sentimentality. It’s more competent than good, but it’s well-versed in the workings of the human tear duct.What makes it distinctive — and possibly what has made it, in its debut season, one of the most-watched shows on television — is the way it interrogates the word “good.” Is there more to it, the show asks, than simply being effective?“The Good Doctor” does that, counterintuitively, with a protagonist whose inability to connect emotionally is one of his defining features. Dr. Shaun Murphy (Freddie Highmore), a new surgeon at a prestigious hospital in San Jose, Calif., has autism and savant syndrome.Earnest but distant, Shaun often needs to have simple responses explained to him, like why parents would be sad to hear that their son is going to lose his leg when the amputation will save his life.He’s also a brilliant surgeon, able to make intuitive leaps that elude others. (In the mold of difficult-genius dramas like “Sherlock,” “The Good Doctor” visualizes his insights with 3-D graphics, like a diagram of a liver that explodes into segments to explain the function of a key vein.) Still, his skeptical co-workers, like Dr. Neil Melendez (Nicholas Gonzalez), see him as a liability.“The Good Doctor” is sharp enough to leave open the possibility that they might sometimes have a point. Shaun’s inability to read cues can alienate patients. When he’s cogitating on a diagnosis, he goes blank, like a computer app in spinning-wheel mode, and the show suspends the tension long enough that you, like his colleagues, wonder if something’s gone wrong.The conceit of “The Good Doctor” is that the condition that limits Shaun’s human interactions is inseparable from his gift. I can’t speak to the accuracy of its representation of autism — I am neither a doctor, nor do I play one on TV — but Shaun’s emotional challenge is the show’s emotional engine.Shaun may not understand human relations well enough to know that, say, he shouldn’t wake his apartment superintendent after midnight. But Mr. Highmore (“Bates Motel”) makes him appealing and eager, with an unintentionally comic candor. (His version of a reassuring diagnosis: “It’s definitely not flesh-eating bacteria!”) You root for him and for his advocate, Dr. Aaron Glassman (Richard Schiff).“The Good Doctor” was adapted from a South Korean series by David Shore, the creator of “House,” which had a different sort of difficult protagonist. Dr. Gregory House (Hugh Laurie) was a crusty, arrogant physician in the sharp-elbowed spirit of the post-9/11 aughts, when figures from Jack Bauer of “24” to Simon Cowell of “American Idol” popularized the idea that nice guys don’t get the job done.On “House,” the doctor’s misanthropy was as much a strength as a liability — his suspicion (“Everybody lies”) and lack of sentiment led him to ingenious diagnoses.In the “Good Doctor” pilot, Shaun asks something of a dismissive superior that could have been aimed at his TV predecessor. “You’re very arrogant,” he says. “Do you think that helps you be a good surgeon? Does it hurt you as a person? Is it worth it?”On the page, that sounds sanctimonious and angry, but Shaun asks it out of curiosity. That’s his way. He’s not cuddly or warm, but he’s guileless and well intentioned — the anti-antihero version of Gregory House. Not just Shaun but his fellow young doctors are learning the art of dealing with frightened patients, getting a feel for the proper dosage of tact, honesty, sympathy and willingness to bend rules.While there may be different ways to be good and to express caring, “The Good Doctor” suggests, it is something worth aspiring to — an idea that may especially appeal to viewers who have experienced health care as scary, impersonal and alienating.Elsewhere, “The Good Doctor” creates emotional investment the old-fashioned way: by stabbing a hypodermic needle of it straight into your heart.The manipulative incidental music is abundant, as are the heart-wrenching scenarios. A bus carrying a wedding party crashes in one episode; in another, we meet a young boy with cancer who is so charming and wise that, if you have watched more than one medical drama in your life, you know he’s not long for this world.We also get a series of bludgeoningly woeful flashbacks to Shaun’s childhood — his father beats him, his brother dies, his pet rabbit dies — which the show has thankfully dialed back on lately. Even Mr. Schiff, known for playing acerbic characters like Toby Ziegler on “The West Wing,” is cast here as an avuncular guardian teddy bear.But Mr. Schiff is convincing in the role, and Mr. Highmore is striking in his. “The Good Doctor” has hardly reinvented the syrupy, tear-jerking medical drama. But it has found a new way to complicate that genre’s oldest idea: that human connection is the best medicine.
Kenneth MacMillan’s School of Ballet Sex, Neurosis and Grit LONDON — It has been 25 years since the choreographer Kenneth MacMillan had a fatal heart attack backstage at the Royal Opera House here during a performance of “Mayerling,” his ballet about sex, drugs, madness and death. Not long before that night, he told his wife there “might be another 10 to 15 years” of life in his most successful ballets — “Romeo and Juliet,” “Manon,” “Mayerling.” Chronically anxious and self-doubting, MacMillan was far too modest in his hopes.Today, those ballets are Britain’s best-known dance exports, plentiful in major ballet company repertories worldwide (25 companies currently perform “Manon”), and still probably the most successful 20th-century examples of the story ballet genre.In adaptations from literature and history, he perpetuated ballet’s tradition of lavish spectacle set in a past age. But he also effectively reinvented the 19th-century narrative ballet for an audience ready for tales of passion, drama and violence rather than those involving myths, swans and chivalry. He was — like Jerome Robbins and Antony Tudor in the United States — a bringer of neurosis, psychological drama and real-life grit to the rarefied world of ballet.“Kenneth MacMillan: A National Celebration,” which took place from Oct. 16 to Nov. 1 at the Royal Opera House, commemorated the 25th anniversary of the choreographer’s death at 62. Refreshingly, it did not feature the blockbuster ballets. Instead it offered eight one-acts — many seldom staged — and a chance to think about MacMillan’s reputation and legacy away from the omnipresent long narrative works.The pieces — ranging from “Baiser de la Fée” (1960) to “The Judas Tree,” created a few months before his death — were performed by Britain’s five major ballet companies: the Royal Ballet, English National Ballet, Scottish Ballet, Birmingham Royal Ballet and Northern Ballet. (The small Yorke Dance Project also came to the party, with an intriguing revival of an almost unknown 1988 chamber piece, “Sea of Troubles,” inspired by Shakespeare’s “Hamlet.”) This collaboration, the idea of Kevin O’Hare, the director of the Royal Ballet, was in itself unusual. Several of these companies seldom come to London, and they almost never share a stage or an audience.MacMillan, in his desire to rend the decorous veil of ballet, is often seen as the polar opposite of the other major 20th-century British choreographer, Frederick Ashton, whose refined, lyrical and witty pieces (“La Fille Mal Gardée,” “Symphonic Variations,” “Sylvia”) came to define the pre-MacMillan era of British classical dance.“Kenneth MacMillan was the dark genius of British ballet — its destroyer, if you listen to some,” the critic Ismene Brown wrote in an article about the celebration in The Spectator magazine.But it wasn’t just MacMillan’s subject matter, which could include rape (“The Invitation”), incest (“My Brother, My Sisters”) and sexual sadism (“Mayerling”), that bothered critics. It was also his use of ballet technique to suggest states of extreme emotion and erotic desire. In 1981, in a piece about the Royal Ballet’s 50th-birthday season at the Metropolitan Opera House in New York, Arlene Croce wrote that the danger to the “pearly classicism” of the Ashtonian style “is from this new religiose preoccupation with the human body and its contortions which is now so pronounced in MacMillan’s ballets.”Looking at his ballets now, their physical demands look tame compared to the athletic requirements of many current ballet choreographers. And if his subject matter is sometimes brutal, the choreographic content is mostly firmly classical, though often extended into new expressive terrain.In MacMillan’s 1965 masterwork, “Song of the Earth,” beautifully danced at the celebration by English National Ballet, the gestures and imagery are idiosyncratic and strange, sometimes alluding to the Chinese T’ang poems used (in German translation) by Mahler in the score. Women delicately mime picking flowers, or are turned upside down when the text, sung onstage by a tenor and mezzo-soprano, alludes to a pavilion reflected in water. But these details and vignettes are part of an austere classicism, rather than a new choreographic language, slowly building to evoke a poetic and specific world.More surprising, because less well-known, was “Concerto,” the first work that MacMillan made when he took up a new job as the artistic director of Deutsche Oper Ballet in Berlin in 1966. (He returned to England in 1969 to take up the directorship of the Royal Ballet.)“Concerto,” danced in the celebration by the Birmingham Royal Ballet, is a bright, pure exercise in ballet classicism, set to Shostakovich’s Piano Concerto No. 2, and, among other things, it’s a brilliant demonstration of MacMillan’s musicality, not an aspect of his work I had previously considered. The music’s jazziness is echoed in the hip-tilted inflections of the first and third sections, and its marching rhythms are reflected, without emphasis, in the phalanxes of moving bodies that might refer to armies or to the militaristic drill of the corps de ballet.But it’s the second movement, an Adagio, that is most affecting. Here, a woman holds on to a man, executing a smooth, flowing sequence of arcing bends and languorous stretches. (MacMillan said he was inspired by watching Lynn Seymour, a longtime muse, warm up at the barre.) It’s particularly interesting in the light of current thoughts on the conventionality of male-female partnering in ballet; here is a moment in which the man is cast as nothing more than a support — and yet MacMillan creates something poetic and ambiguous in the matter-of-fact relationship: What are they thinking when their eyes meet at the end?Other MacMillan pieces feel less important or interesting; the 1974 “Elite Syncopations” (performed by a mix of principals from different companies) is set to music by Scott Joplin and other ragtime composers, and its insistent perkiness and slightly hammy jokes pall, even though it is choreographically challenging and smoothly constructed. “Gloria” (well danced by Northern Ballet), created in 1980 and set to Poulenc, is both moving and slightly dated in feel (this is partly a costume problem), with a ballet vocabulary that makes much of the physical tension between soaring uplift and grounded, earthbound despair.And then there is perhaps the most difficult ballet in the MacMillan oeuvre, “The Judas Tree.” Set on a construction site in the London Docklands, it features a single woman and 12 male laborers. The woman, both seductress and victim, is raped by the men, before one of them is murdered and another commits suicide. There are biblical allusions to Jesus, Mary, Judas and perhaps another disciple, but the story line is muddled and hard to interpret. (Who is Judas, I kept wondering.) The choreography, however, is excellent: inventive, expressionistic, surprising, emotionally compelling. You can’t look; you can’t look away.It’s an impossible ballet to like, though, and in light of the Harvey Weinstein revelations and their repercussions, hard questions become even harder. Does the aesthetic beauty of ballet tame and make palatable the violence we see onstage? Or does it show us aspects of human behavior we shy away from, especially in an opera house? Do we judge the subject matter or the art, and are they different things?These are questions that have in some ways haunted MacMillan’s work from early on. This 25th anniversary celebration made a strong case for his position as a major 20th-century artist without providing neat answers.
For ‘Saturday Night Live,’ No Shortage of Targets, Including Louis C.K. and Roy Moore The growing number of accounts of sexual misconduct by prominent men gave “Saturday Night Live” plenty of topical grist this week. But some of the accused came in for tougher treatment than others.In this episode, hosted by the “Girls Trip” star Tiffany Haddish and featuring the musical guest Taylor Swift, there were plenty of haymakers thrown at Roy S. Moore, the embattled Republican Senate nominee in Alabama, who is accused of improper sexual and romantic conduct with teenagers.But the show took only a couple of shots at the comedian Louis C.K., who has hosted “S.N.L.” several times as recently as last April, and who this week admitted to masturbating in front of several women.A scattershot cold-opening sketch on the theme of sexual misconduct at least had no awkward appearances from Alec Baldwin as President Trump. It instead featured the “S.N.L.” cast members Mikey Day as Mr. Moore and Beck Bennett as Vice President Mike Pence, who is trying to convince him to drop out of the Alabama Senate race.“I don’t have to tell you that the Senate hangs in the balance,” Mr. Bennett told Mr. Day. “We’re trying to pass a tax-reform plan this year to bring Mr. Trump’s list of big legislative accomplishments to one. We can’t lose your seat this December. I know you’re Bannon’s guy but this latest news about you is concerning. Voters in Alabama will never elect someone who’s had relations with a minor.”Mr. Day asked, “You sure about that?”Mr. Bennett answered, “No. Alabama is quite a place. But we can’t take chances.”Mr. Day protested, “The left-wing media loves to repeat these sexual harassment stories. There’s a new one every day, Mike.”Mr. Bennett replied. “I know. Even I heard about Louis C.K. and I’m not allowed to watch TV, I’m only allowed to listen to it.”Kate McKinnon emerged from a cabinet in the role of Attorney General Jeff Sessions, who ran through some of Mr. Moore’s other recent behavior: waving a gun onstage, and proclaiming that Muslims shouldn’t be allowed to hold office in Congress and that 9-11 was God’s punishment for sodomy.“I love it,” Ms. McKinnon said. “You check a lot of boxes for me, Roy, but this is really bad. I’m usually the creepiest one in the room, but I look at you and I’m like, oh my God.”The sketch ended with Ms. McKinnon delivering a soliloquy to a stuffed possum she called Papa.She said, “There’s so many men out there, acting like monsters. Mr. Weinstein, Kevin Spacey, the president. Daddy, has this been happening forever? Have I both fostered and benefited from a culture of systemic oppression? No? Well, that’s a relief.”Ms. Haddish, who is the first black female comedian to host “Saturday Night Live,” talked in her monologue about how she’d grown up in foster care and considered “S.N.L.” to be her favorite show. “You have no idea how difficult it is to get a group of black and Hispanic kids to watch ‘S.N.L.’ over ‘In Living Color,’” she said.Taking on the topic of sexual harassment, Ms. Haddish offered some advice to male viewers.“Fellas, I got a tip for y’all,” she said. “I like to call it Tiffany’s tip. It’s a Tiff tip. Listen, fellas, listen, O.K.? If you got your thing-thing out, and she got all her clothes on, you’re wrong. You’re in the wrong. Wait till she takes her own clothes off, then pull your thing-thing out, O.K.?”The topic of sexual misconduct resurfaced in a pair of riffs by the “Weekend Update” co-anchors Colin Jost and Michael Che.Mr. Jost began by saying, “Well, it’s a good weekend to stay inside, since it’s 20 degrees out, and everyone you’ve ever heard of is a sex monster.” (At this moment, the screen showed pictures of Louis C.K., Mr. Spacey, Harvey Weinstein and Mr. Moore.)Mr. Jost continued:(Here the screen showed another picture of Louis C.K.)In his own run of jokes, Mr. Che said, “Alabama state auditor Jim Zeigler defended Roy Moore using Mary and Joseph as examples, saying, ‘Mary was a teenager and Joseph was an adult carpenter. They became parents of Jesus.’ Oh, word? So that’s what you’re going with? Roy Moore was trying to make a Jesus? Oh, O.K. So I guess R. Kelly was just trying to make it rain for 40 days and 40 nights.”In a desk-side character piece on “Weekend Update,” Cecily Strong played Claire, an especially harried member of NBC’s human resources department, as she attempted to educate Mr. Jost on the company’s sexual harassment policy.Administering a quiz to Mr. Jost, Ms. Strong asked, “What is the appropriate way to handle a workplace relationship: A) inform someone at H.R.; B) lock her in a room and make her look at it; or C) bully her out of the entire industry?”When Mr. Jost correctly answered A, Ms. Strong replied, “You’d be surprised how many people get that wrong. It could make you lose your damn mind,” then cackled for good measure.She also held up a doll dressed in a suit and asked Mr. Jost, “When talking to a co-worker in the office, where should you keep your penis?” (“Just point on the doll where your penis should be,” she explained. “No wrong answers here, just super wrong answers.”)Ms. Strong told Mr. Jost he had passed but warned, “I’m sure I’ll be back next week and the week after that, forever and ever,” she said. “Because all of this isn’t just a scandal. It didn’t just start last week. It’s just actual reality for half of the population.” She then took a swig of hand sanitizer, glanced at her phone and exclaimed, “George Takei, no!”A sketch in the guise of an advertisement for the Democratic National Committee featured several “S.N.L.” cast members and a couple of beloved alumni playing prominent Democrats celebrating the party’s electoral successes this week. The tone was set by Alex Moffat, playing Senator Charles Schumer of New York, who declared, “We haven’t felt this confident since the day before Trump won.”The sketch also featured Ms. Strong as Senator Dianne Feinstein of California and Ms. McKinnon as Representative Nancy Pelosi, the House minority leader. “Together, we’re going to end the spirit of divisiveness in this country by focusing on how we won the governor’s races in two of the 10 states we care about,” Ms. Strong said.Ms. McKinnon said, “And we learned our lesson from the last election: We can’t just appeal to coastal elites. We need mouth-breathers from Wisconsin.” Ms. Strong added, “And window-lickers from Ohio as well.”Larry David, who hosted “Saturday Night Live” last weekend, reprised his recurring role as Senator Bernie Sanders while making reference to his own controversial “S.N.L.” monologue. “We’re really going to lace into people if they don’t say what’s politically correct,” Mr. David said. “Like these comics out there who think it’s O.K. to make jokes about concentration camps. That guy should rot in hell.”Ms. McKinnon played a second character in the sketch, returning as Hillary Clinton. “Another chance for me, Hillary Rodham Clinton,” she said. “Just one more chance. And maybe one more chance after that.”Playing the role of Donna Brazile, the longtime Democratic Party official, Leslie Jones responded, “I thought she was dead.”
Why Christians Must Support Gun Control SUTHERLAND SPRINGS, Tex. — Here in rural Texas, the hay, baled and rolled, waits for winter. The corn is shorn and the stiff yucca stands guard in the dusk. I know this country; it is a short drive from my home, past places like the Devil’s Backbone and Purgatory to skinny Cibolo Creek, choked by mesquite and live oak. In Sutherland Springs, a family of five trudges in front of me in the headlights, past the police cordon, shuffling, heads down, apparently headed home. They call it God’s country, partly for its beauty, partly because it sometimes feels like God is the only thing out here.As in many small Texas towns, the center of Sutherland Springs is the church. And if anything stands out about the worst mass murder in the history of Texas, which took place here last Sunday, killing 26 and wounding at least 20, it is this: a simple, white wooden sanctuary with the peaked roof, next to an unkempt field by a lonesome two-lane road.Now they are going to tear it down, bulldozing it from the South Texas plain, as if doing so could remove the sacrilege of killing defenseless people during a Sunday sermon. This is what America’s response to mass homicide has come to. We don’t remove the killing machines that have put tens of thousands of Americans in their graves or hospital beds in this century, but we do demolish the First Baptist Church that has stood at this lonely crossroad for nearly a century. It is this doomed site, rooted in the black soil, that cries out for people of faith to act.The killer, Devin Patrick Kelley, used his Ruger AR-556, with 15 30-round magazines, to shoot nearly 50 helpless, trapped people. The weapon is a variant of the AR-15, itself barely distinguishable from the M-16, the American military’s standard-issue infantry weapon. These, along with handguns, are the weapons of choice for today’s mass killers.I won’t pretend to be more religious than the next person, nor am I afraid to call myself a Christian. Like a lot of Americans, I have a complicated relationship with my faith. But that shouldn’t lessen our sense of moral obligation in the face of what some blithely call the new normal. Nor should we fall for the siren call of more guns, the unproven good-guy-with-a-gun myth, something many of my fellow Texans have indulged in over the past few days. Instead, we have a duty to confront these machines and the profiteering behind them.It is easy to feel numb, powerless and hopeless. For the dead, one can only grimace at that last moment of fear. For the survivors and their beloved, a harsh sentence awaits. First, there is the trauma, like an amputation, something C. S. Lewis wrote about after the death of his wife, Joy Davidman, in 1960. “No one ever told me that grief felt so like fear. I am not afraid, but the sensation is like being afraid,” Lewis, a Catholic, wrote in the slender and tortured memoir “A Grief Observed.” “The same fluttering in the stomach, the same restlessness, the yawning. I keep on swallowing.”When traumatic death strikes, the most common question is, “Why?” The second most common question is invariably, “Where was God?” But the last and most troubling of all is, “What does God want?” It is the same cry that Jesus let out from the cross as darkness spread across the land: “My God, my God, why have you forsaken me?”I won’t pretend to know the mind of God, so all I can offer is a simple guess at what he would say: Stop the killing. Of course killing will never end, completely; we are imperfect creatures of free will, prone to sin — the absence of good — as well as beauty. But that is categorically different from allowing the proliferation of machines solely designed to kill large numbers of people quickly, machines that bear no more semblance to a rifle than a nuclear weapon does to a firework. And the sin of omission — doing nothing — is nearly as bad as the murder itself.In recent years, time after time, the AR-15 or one of its close cousins has played the starring role in an American mass shooting. In Las Vegas it shared a macabre double-billing with the semiautomatic version of the Russian AK-47. Chattanooga. Orlando. San Bernardino. Aurora. These two and the like are nearly always there.And there is a reason. Because of the weapons’ quasi-military design, even an unskilled hand can pull the trigger 40 times in a minute. A typical hunting rifle will hold several rounds. A typical AR-15 magazine holds 30. There are at least five million AR-15-type weapons in this nation alone. Sturm, Ruger & Company, the Connecticut company that made the weapon used here, reported $664 million in net sales last year.Here in Texas, the politicians have come and gone, visiting Sutherland Springs on a raw, rainy Wednesday night, making empty calls for prayers and excuses for inaction, as when Vice President Mike Pence awkwardly intoned, “Words fail when saints and heroes fall.” Indeed, they do. The words, bereft of real meaning, just blow away into the cold north wind. He appears to forget his purportedly deep religiosity.Christianity demands action. It insists on the protection of the innocent. In the 13th century, St. Thomas Aquinas justified war in self-defense, but he also opposed the killing of innocent civilians. “Aquinas holds that causing the death of innocents in a foreseeable manner, whether intentionally or indirectly,” according to the Cambridge divinity scholar Daniel H. Weiss, “is never justified.”And yet Christian evangelicals, particularly white Southern Baptists, have generally parted ways with Catholics on gun laws. Some are simply politically opposed to gun control because they are Republicans; others understandably distrust a society that does not seem to embrace God. But that opposition is crumbling. While six in 10 evangelical leaders report living in a household with a gun, nearly as many, 55 percent, favor stricter gun laws, according to an August survey by the National Association of Evangelicals.“They accept the Second Amendment,” said Leith Anderson, president of the National Association of Evangelicals when the survey results were released. But they “also deeply grieve when weapons are used to take innocent lives.”The same is true in Texas. Though some 37.5 percent of Texans own guns, according to an estimate by the Pew Research Center, tiny fissures have opened up in the state’s conservative political culture since the massacre here. Jason Villalba of Dallas, a prominent Republican state legislator, has called on the state’s political leadership to appoint a bipartisan commission to “focus on all possible causes of gun violence in Texas.”At first, this might sound like a political dodge, but Mr. Villalba wants new gun restrictions on the table: “There needs to be common-sense gun control reform in Texas.” The Dallas Morning News, the state’s largest newspaper, quickly endorsed the plan: “Our goals ought to be simple. The most deadly kind of weapons should be harder to get.”All the people of the Abrahamic faiths share the same duty — to protect the innocent. The Jewish bystander is to rescue a person in peril. Islam requires the protection of all innocent lives. I fear that if we fail in this, bulldoze our churches and let the machines of war and profit win over faith, then God will never forgive us. For that would be the worst sin of all.
Can My Children Be Friends With White People? My oldest son, wrestling with a 4-year-old’s happy struggles, is trying to clarify how many people can be his best friend. “My best friends are you and Mama and my brother and …” But even a child’s joy is not immune to this ominous political period. This summer’s images of violence in Charlottesville, Va., prompted an array of questions. “Some people hate others because they are different,” I offer, lamely. A childish but distinct panic enters his voice. “But I’m not different.”It is impossible to convey the mixture of heartbreak and fear I feel for him. Donald Trump’s election has made it clear that I will teach my boys the lesson generations old, one that I for the most part nearly escaped. I will teach them to be cautious, I will teach them suspicion, and I will teach them distrust. Much sooner than I thought I would, I will have to discuss with my boys whether they can truly be friends with white people.Meaningful friendship is not just a feeling. It is not simply being able to share a beer. Real friendship is impossible without the ability to trust others, without knowing that your well-being is important to them. The desire to create, maintain or wield power over others destroys the possibility of friendship. The Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.’s famous dream of black and white children holding hands was a dream precisely because he realized that in Alabama, conditions of dominance made real friendship between white and black people impossible.History has provided little reason for people of color to trust white people in this way, and these recent months have put in the starkest relief the contempt with which the country measures the value of racial minorities. America is transfixed on the opioid epidemic among white Americans (who often get hooked after being overprescribed painkillers — while studies show that doctors underprescribe pain medication for African-Americans). But when black lives were struck by addiction, we cordoned off minority communities with the police and threw away an entire generation of black and Hispanic men.Likewise, despite centuries of exclusion and robust evidence of continuing racism, minority underemployment is often couched in the language of bad choices and personal responsibility. When systemic joblessness strikes swaths of white America, we get an entire presidential campaign centered on globalization’s impact on the white working class. Even the nerve of some rich or visible African-Americans to protest that America, in its laws and in its police, has rarely been just to all has been met with the howls of a president who cannot tolerate that the lucky and the uppity do not stay in their place.As against our gauzy national hopes, I will teach my boys to have profound doubts that friendship with white people is possible. When they ask, I will teach my sons that their beautiful hue is a fault line. Spare me platitudes of how we are all the same on the inside. I first have to keep my boys safe, and so I will teach them before the world shows them this particular brand of rending, violent, often fatal betrayal.Let me assure you that my heartbreak dwarfs my anger. I grew up in a classic Midwestern college town. With all its American faults, it was a diverse and happy-childhood kind of place, slightly dull in the way that parents wish for their children. If race showed in class lines, school cliques and being pulled over more often, our little Americana lacked the deep racial tension and mistrust that seem so hard to escape now.What’s surprising is that I am heartbroken at all. It is only for African-Americans who grew up in such a place that watching Mr. Trump is so disorienting. For many weary minorities, the ridiculous thing was thinking friendship was possible in the first place. It hurts only if you believed friendship could bridge the racial gorge.Of course, the rise of this president has broken bonds on all sides. But for people of color the stakes are different. Imagining we can now be friends across this political line is asking us to ignore our safety and that of our children, to abandon personal regard and self-worth. Only white people can cordon off Mr. Trump’s political meaning, ignore the “unpleasantness” from a position of safety. His election and the year that has followed have fixed the awful thought in my mind too familiar to black Americans: “You can’t trust these people.”It is not Mr. Trump himself who has done this. Were it not for our reverence for money, Mr. Trump would be easily recognized as the simple-minded, vulgar, bigoted blowhard he is. It is certainly not the neo-Nazis marching on Charlottesville; we have seen their type before. Rather, what has truly broken my heart are the ranks of Mr. Trump’s many allies and apologists.Mr. Trump’s supporters are practiced at purposeful blindness. That his political life started with denying, without evidence, that Barack Obama is American — that this black man could truly be the legitimate president — is simply ignored. So, too, is his history of housing discrimination, his casual conflation of Muslims with terrorists, his reducing Mexican-Americans to murderers and rapists. All along, his allies have watched racial pornography, describing black America as pathological. Yet they deny that there is any malice whatsoever in his words and actions. And they dismiss any attempt to recognize the danger of his wide-ranging animus as political correctness.But the deepest rift is with the apologists, the “good” Trump voters, the white people who understand that Mr. Trump says “unfortunate” things but support him because they like what he says on jobs and taxes. They bristle at the accusation that they supported racism, insisting they had to ignore Mr. Trump’s ugliness. Relying on everyday decency as a shield, they are befuddled at the chill that now separates them from black people in their offices and social circles. They protest: Have they ever said anything racist? Don’t they shovel the sidewalk of the new black neighbors? Surely, they say, politics — a single vote — does not mean we can’t be friends.I do not write this with liberal condescension or glee. My heart is unbearably heavy when I assure you we cannot be friends.The same is true, unfortunately, of those who hold no quarter for Mr. Trump but insist that black people need to do the reaching out, the moderating, the accommodating. Imagine the white friend during the civil rights era who disliked blacks’ being beaten to death but wished the whole thing would just settle down. However likable, you could not properly describe her as a friend. Sometimes politics makes demands on the soul.Don’t misunderstand: White Trump supporters and people of color can like one another. But real friendship? Mr. Trump’s bruised ego invents outrageous claims of voter fraud, not caring that this rhetoric was built upon dogs and water hoses set on black children and even today the relentless effort to silence black voices. His macho talk about “law and order” does not keep communities safe and threatens the very bodies of the little boys I love. No amount of shoveled snow makes it all right, and too many imagine they can have it both ways. It is this desperation to reap the rewards of white power without being so much as indicted that James Baldwin recognized as America’s criminal innocence.For African-Americans, race has become a proxy not just for politics but also for decency. White faces are swept together, ominous anxiety behind every chance encounter at the airport or smiling white cashier. If they are not clearly allies, they will seem unsafe to me.Barack Obama’s farewell address encouraged us to reach across partisan lines. But there is a difference between disagreeing over taxes and negotiating one’s place in America, the bodies of your children, your humanity. Our racial wound has undone love and families, and ignoring the depths of the gash will not cause it to heal.We can still all pretend we are friends. If meaningful civic friendship is impossible, we can make do with mere civility — sharing drinks and watching the game. Indeed, even in Donald Trump’s America, I have not given up on being friends with all white people. My bi-ethnic wife, my most trusted friend, understands she is seen as a white woman, even though her brother and father are not. Among my dearest friends, the wedding party and children’s godparents variety, many are white. But these are the friends who have marched in protest, rushed to airports to protest the president’s travel ban, people who have shared the risks required by strength and decency.There is hope, though. Implicitly, without meaning to, Mr. Trump asks us if this is the best we can do. It falls to us to do better. We cannot agree on our politics, but we can declare that we stand beside one another against cheap attack and devaluation; that we live together and not simply beside one another. In the coming years, when my boys ask again their questions about who can be their best friend, I pray for a more hopeful answer.
Jesus’ Parents and Roy Moore’s Gall Few books have been subject to wider interpretation than the Bible, but still I was illuminated by a moral that Jim Zeigler, the state auditor of Alabama, drew from the story of those two weary travelers who found no room at the inn. It’s apparently a plug for child molestation.When Zeigler was asked by The Washington Examiner about an allegation that the Senate candidate Roy Moore initiated sexual contact with a 14-year-old girl when he was 32, Zeigler cited the biblical couple to say, essentially: No biggie! This is as old as Christianity.“Take Joseph and Mary,” he explained. “Mary was a teenager and Joseph was an adult carpenter. They became parents of Jesus. There’s just nothing immoral or illegal here. Maybe just a little bit unusual.” He made it sound as if Moore were some religiously inclined analogue to those military-history enthusiasts who dress in the uniforms of yesteryear to travel back to the Revolutionary War. Moore was merely re-enacting the New Testament in the name of lust.It’s worth pointing out that there is something illegal here: A 14-year-old girl is below the age of consent in Alabama, and that was true as well four decades ago, when the incident is alleged to have occurred. It’s also worth pointing out that Jesus supposedly arrived via virgin birth, so Joseph’s interactions with Mary up until that point may have been considerably more G-rated and gallant than in Zeigler’s version.It’s further worth pointing out that millenniums ago, girls were treated as chattel and sold off as child brides, a practice that no one in his or her right mind would regard as inspirational and cite as an exonerating precedent.But such fine points tend to elude people insisting on the most convenient, self-serving narrative available, and Zeigler was rationalizing his sustained support for Moore. Besides, logic and moral consistency aren’t prevalent among Bible-thumping scolds.Moore has vehemently denied the allegation, which was detailed in a Washington Post article on Thursday that was reported and written meticulously. Part of what made it so persuasive was that the girl — now woman — spoke on the record and has repeatedly voted for Republicans, including Donald Trump. She’s putting her name to her accusation and risking the harassment that could come with that, and she’s not easily cast as a pawn of Democrats trying to buoy Moore’s opponent, Doug Jones.Also persuasive: She’s not alone. Three other women — all of them also named — told The Post that when Moore was in his 30s and they were between the ages of 16 and 18, he dated or tried to date them. One claimed that he plied her with alcohol before she was old enough to drink legally. None of these three accused him of unwanted sexual contact, but their accounts support the idea that Moore was untroubled by age gaps that would trouble a better man considerably.Are you really surprised? If so, you might want to see a doctor about your amnesia, because my memory is pretty spotty and still I can recall Jimmy Swaggart and Jim Bakker and Larry Craig and David Vitter, and with just a few minutes of Googling, I could fill the rest of this column with more names of more pastors and politicians who presented themselves as steadfast moral conservatives and were revealed to be agents of precisely the kind of behavior they so exuberantly condemned. These frauds and hypocrites are as legion now as lepers were in the days of Jesus.If I sound bitter, I am, because they have long been among the principal purveyors of hatred for gay people like me. They’re a big reason that so many of us grew up terrified that we’d be ostracized, wondering if there was something twisted in us and confronted with laws that treated us as second-class citizens. We were supposedly in moral error, and thus deserved a lesser lot.Second class is actually a much higher category than the one into which Moore would corral us. In 2002 he called sexual relations between people of the same gender “an act so heinous that it defies one’s ability to describe it.” Trust me on this: It’s not so terribly difficult to describe. I’ll walk him through it over a chicken salad sandwich in the Times cafeteria. My treat.In 2005 he said that having sex with somebody of the same gender was akin to having sex with a cow, a horse or a dog, and that not having sex with a cow, a horse, a dog or a person of the same gender was “a moral precept upon which this country was founded.” I do not recall the bestiality clause of the Constitution, but, as mentioned, my memory is spotty.In 2016 Moore was expelled as chief justice of the Alabama Supreme Court because he instructed the state’s judges to defy the United States Supreme Court ruling that legalized same-sex marriage. This was the second time that Moore was yanked from that job; he’d previously ignored a federal court’s ruling that a Ten Commandments monument should be removed from the Alabama Judicial Building. Some patriot he is. His particular take on his chosen religion overrides the law of the land and permits him to act as he sees fit. Imagine if all Americans adopted that attitude.And it is most decidedly a personal take, in which he picks and chooses what to be outraged by. Although Christianity as I understand it doesn’t smile on the florid lying, womanizing, hypersexual vocabulary and assorted cruelties that have been prominent threads in Donald Trump’s life, Moore and many other evangelical Christians spared Trump their censure. I understand their motivation to vote for him: abortion. But that didn’t compel them to remain so mum about his misdeeds or summon the adoration that some of them did. (I’m looking at you, Jerry Falwell Jr.)On Thursday, Moore tweeted that “the forces of evil will lie, cheat, steal — even inflict physical harm — if they believe it will silence and shut up Christian conservatives like you and me.” So this is a war waged on him and his kind? What about the war that his breed of conservatives has been waging on the rest of us? It is arrogant and without empathy, and some of its generals use their cause as camouflage.They also read the Bible selectively, as Zeigler demonstrated to the point of parody. Joseph and Mary as evangelists of transgenerational love? If you buy that, then allow me an invention of my own about the three wise men.
The Swine of Conservatism Lately we have been given an extended education in the different varieties of liberal pigs. There’s the industrial-scale predator who buys indulgences from Planned Parenthood. And the male feminist who respects women so very much — especially when they’re too drunk to resist him. And the Great Man of Letters creeping on his co-workers. And the let-it-all-hang-out artist who thinks it can’t be assault if the only person you’re touching is yourself.But this week our era of exposure has reminded us that cultural conservatism has its own distinctive swine.So while we wait to see what becomes of Alabama Senate candidate and professional Christian Roy Moore, who is credibly alleged to have spent his thirties pursuing high school girls with the “I get older, they stay the same age” gusto of Matthew McConaughey’s character in “Dazed and Confused,” it’s worth doing a quick typology of the predators that flourish among the godly and moralistic and traditional.One type is what you might call the rotten patriarch. This is the man who depends on the trappings of spiritual or familial authority to exploit the young and weak, shame them into silence, and pre-emptively discredit them.The rotten patriarch might be anyone from a handsy pastor or a lecherous pillar of the community to the leader of a sect or religious order. And in the defenses of Moore from various Alabama Republicans you can see the way conservative impulses protect this kind of figure — both in the suggestion that a man of his religious reputation should be trusted over his accusers, and in the risible invocation of Biblical examples to defend an older man’s lust for a 14-year-old girl.But there are other styles of predation that flourish within conservative communities. For instance, there is the burrower, the networker, the institutionalist — the predator who embeds himself within a hierarchical system that protects him because it wants to protect itself.Many Catholic priest-abusers fit this pattern. Their clerical authority didn’t always keep them from getting chased out of parishes. But they were networked with other predators who helped them skate through to the next assignment, and the larger ecclesiastical entity saw its own self-protection as more important than their punishment.Then finally there is the serial repenter — the creep who relies on the promise of forgiveness to keep his place and his powers and his opportunities to prey again.Here, too, Biblical precedents are often invoked in the predator’s defense. Didn’t King David sleep around? Doesn’t every saint have a past, every sinner a future? All good Christian wisdom — except that some sinners only want a future where they can return to the same old awful sins.All these predatory categories overlap, of course, and they also overlap with the way predators operate in liberal circles. Harvey Weinstein ran Miramax the same way an abusive religious leader rules his cult. Bill Clinton was both a liberal pig backing feminist causes to buy immunity and a serial repenter in the style of his Baptist youth. A liberal academic eminence grooming disciples to be victims has a lot in common with a man of God who does the same.But still there is enough that’s unique about conservative styles of predation to draw some lessons for tradition-oriented cultures and communities.One lesson is that any social order that vests particular forms of power in men needs to do more, not less, to hold the male of the species accountable.Some cultural conservatives, in evangelical Christianity especially, combine a belief in male headship in churches and families with a “boys will be boys and girls shouldn’t tempt them” attitude toward sex. It’s a combination that’s self-contradictory and deeply toxic, handing men not just power but a permission slip to abuse it — which, predictably, they do.Another lesson is that the impulse to hide or dismiss scandal because it hurts the short-term cause, which is common to all institutions but particularly strong for conservative ones, is a path to self-destruction in the long run.Again, the Catholic Church’s sex abuse experience is a case study. And we may be watching something similar happen with evangelicals, who decided with Donald Trump and may decide with Roy Moore that in the war against secular liberalism, they simply can’t afford to police the morals of their leaders.It’s a theory that makes sense if you think only of today’s elections, but in the long term it’s cultural suicide — because it tells your neighbors and your children that your religious convictions are always secondary to your partisanship.“For nothing is hidden that will not be made manifest, nor is anything secret that will not be known and come to light.” These words apply everywhere now, to Hollywood pagans and Alabama Christians alike.But the Christians have particular reasons to meditate upon them — and to consider that they don’t just apply to sexual predations, but to the worldly impulses that make otherwise decent people into defenders of the indefensible.
God Should Sue Roy Moore For decades, one of the most sanctimonious moralizers in American politics has been Roy Moore, the longtime Bible-thumper in Alabama who crusaded against gays, transgender people, Islam and “sexual perversion.”Moore suggested just this year that the 9/11 terror attacks were God’s punishment because “we legitimize sodomy.” He has said that homosexuality is “the same thing” as sex with a cow and should be criminalized, and argued that Representative Keith Ellison should not be allowed to serve in Congress because he is a Muslim.All the while, Moore seems to have been the king of hypocrisy. The Washington Post published a devastating account of how he initiated a sexual encounter with a 14-year-old schoolgirl.The victim said that Moore, then a 32-year-old assistant district attorney, drove the girl to his house, removed her clothes and touched her sexually. Under Alabama law, that apparently constitutes sexual abuse in the second degree. If you want an example of a politician who lost support and was arrested for less egregious behavior, consider Anthony Weiner, the former Democratic member of Congress, who is now in prison for sexting a 15-year-old girl.The Post found three other women who said that Moore pursued them when he was in his 30s and they were teenagers. The women did not contact the Post and were initially reluctant to speak.Moore denies the accusations as “completely false” — and promptly tried to use them for fund-raising. My reaction was that Moore should have spent less time thundering about the Ten Commandments and more time reading them.This is of course a larger pattern in American life. As one reader put it on my Facebook page: “Those who moralize most, sin most.”That’s not always true, and sanctimonious hypocrites inhabit the left as well as the right: Harvey Weinstein participated in a “women’s march.” But we’re at a watershed moment in the aftermath of the Weinstein case, trying to end impunity for sexual assault, and allegations against our leaders are even more serious than those against our entertainers. And, frankly, it’s just staggering to see “family values” conservatives making excuses for child molestation.The Alabama state auditor, a Republican named Jim Ziegler, defended Moore as “clean as a hound’s tooth” and offered a bizarre defense of child abuse: He asserted that the Virgin Mary was a teenager when Joseph married her (in fact, the Bible does not indicate her age), adding: “They became parents of Jesus.”Sigh. When Christians cite the Bible to defend child molestation, Jesus should sue for defamation.Meanwhile, an Alabama Republican legislator, Ed Henry, went even further: He said that the women accusing Moore should be prosecuted for waiting to make their allegations.Looking back, some of the grossest immorality of the late 20th century had nothing to do with gay bath houses, as preachers sometimes suggested, but rather with the blowhard televangelists who suggested that AIDS was God’s punishment of gay men. This smirking moralizing slowed the response to AIDS and arguably resulted in millions dying unnecessarily all over the world.In my columns, I’ve repeatedly defended evangelical Christians, and protested that they are one of the few groups that it’s socially acceptable for liberals to mock, stereotype and discriminate against. Some liberals still haven’t forgiven me for my “Hug an Evangelical” column 13 years ago. But I find it infuriating to see some evangelicals now downplaying child molestation or our president’s boasts of sexual assault.We all make compromises — I supported Bill Clinton in 1992 over George H.W. Bush, whom I thought was personally more moral — but that doesn’t require downplaying the inexcusable. I used to complain that conservatives believe that morality is about only personal behavior, while liberals believe it is only about policy positions, while actually it’s about both. Sadly, some of the “family values” conservatives now don’t seem to care about either private or public morality.If evangelical Christians want to engage in activism, they needn’t support hypocrites and bigots; they can support lifesaving organizations like World Vision or African Mission Healthcare Foundation, or fight human trafficking by supporting International Justice Mission, or reduce abortions by backing the National Campaign to Prevent Teen and Unplanned Pregnancy.As it happened, just before the revelations about Moore became public, I visited leaders of an inspiring tri-faith project in Omaha, where a church, a synagogue and a mosque are partnering on a shared site to build empathy and understanding. I asked the pastor involved, Rev. Eric Elnes, for his reaction to Moore.“Blazing with self-righteous indignation toward others is often what people use to hide their own sins in the shadows,” Elnes said. “This is probably why Jesus’ biggest problem — by far — was with the self-righteous. When it came to those whom society cast away as ‘sinners,’ Jesus was repeatedly gentle, gracious, encouraging, and forgiving, but he continually castigated the self-righteous.”Elnes added: “I’ve never understood why certain Christians are so eager to turn the United States into a Christian country when their time would be so much better spent turning their churches into Christian churches.”Roy Moore today is a challenge for those who see themselves as good and decent people of faith: If you find yourself excusing child molestation, then you are driven not by morality or faith, but simply by the emptiest kind of tribalism.
The Worrisome Future of Abortion Rights Sheriff Joe Arpaio used to require pregnant inmates in the Arizona jails he controlled to get a court order before being allowed out of their cells to obtain a desired abortion. Needless to say, he was sued, and needless to say, he lost. (The sheriff appealed to the Supreme Court, which refused to hear the case.) So he switched tactics to require any inmate who wanted an abortion to prepay the transportation and security costs, something not required for any other off-site medical procedure. The American Civil Liberties Union took the sheriff back to court and won again.That seemed to be that. Following President Trump’s pardon of Mr. Arpaio three months ago for an unrelated contempt of court conviction, the 85-year-old former sheriff, a right-wing hero for his years of abusing immigrants, seemed finally about to fade from the scene.But guess what? It turns out that we’re all living in Sheriff Joe country now.I’m referring to the deeply disturbing events of the past few weeks as the Trump administration pulled out all the stops to keep a pregnant 17-year-old, an “unaccompanied minor” in federal custody as an undocumented immigrant, from exercising her constitutional right to an abortion. The administration persisted even after a Texas judge ruled in September that the girl was sufficiently mature to make her own decision about her pregnancy. Known in court papers only as Jane Doe, she finally got her abortion on Oct. 25, thanks to a 6-to-3 ruling by the federal appeals court in Washington, D.C. The abortion came after weeks of delay, after Jane Doe was forced to attend a counseling session at an anti-abortion “crisis pregnancy center” and as the pregnancy was approaching the 20-week limit for a legal abortion in Texas. The teenager is being held in Texas in a shelter run by a private contractor for the Department of Health and Human Services.Refusing to give up even after Jane Doe’s abortion, Solicitor General Noel J. Francisco now wants to make sure the Trump administration can deter other pregnant teenagers in federal custody from terminating their pregnancies. Last week, he filed a wildly improbable Supreme Court appeal, asking the justices to vacate as moot the appeals court’s decision and, while they’re at it, to impose sanctions on Jane Doe’s A.C.L.U. attorneys for getting their client her abortion before the Trump administration could run to the Supreme Court with an emergency appeal. That’s a bizarre complaint; even the three dissenting appeals court judges, in an opinion by Judge Brett Kavanaugh, wrote that “the majority’s order today necessarily means that the government must allow an immediate abortion while Jane Doe remains in government custody.” (The mootness claim itself is shaky: Jane Doe filed her lawsuit as a class action, and she also has claims for damages still pending against the officials who blocked her path.)I gather that the decision to go to the Supreme Court was extremely controversial within the solicitor general’s office, staffed almost entirely by lawyers who are career civil servants and who serve from one administration to the next, sometimes for decades. Not a single career lawyer signed the solicitor general’s Supreme Court petition, a sure indication that something isn’t right in the office. If the recent trickle of resignations becomes a flood, we can assume that the talented lawyers who left their prestigious positions hadn’t signed up to work in what is becoming a Justice Department outpost of the National Right to Life Committee.Even if the Supreme Court ignores the administration’s appeal, no one who cares about the rule of law should assume that this story has had a happy ending. Far from it. What we see here is not an ending, but a beginning. We see the future of abortion in America.What I mean is this: The briefs and motions that Solicitor General Francisco has filed in the case now known as Hargan v. Garza (Eric D. Hargan is the acting secretary of Health and Human Services, and Rochelle Garza is Jane Doe’s court-appointed representative for purposes of the case) are breathtakingly audacious. The political appointees who wrote these documents describe the law of abortion not as it is today (although that’s what they purport to be describing) but as they wish it to be tomorrow — or whenever it is that Justice Anthony M. Kennedy decides to retire and thus creates a crucial vacancy for President Trump to fill.For example, the appeal filed last week contains these sentences:“Under this court’s case law, the government may adopt policies favoring life over abortion; it is not obligated to facilitate abortion; and the government acts permissibly when it does not place an undue burden in a woman’s path. Here, the government imposed no undue burden: Ms. Doe contended that the government’s actions as her custodian were obstructing her access to an abortion in violation of the Fifth Amendment, but she could have left government custody by seeking a voluntary departure, or by working with the government to identify a suitable sponsor who could take custody of her in the United States. Given those options, the government was under no obligation to facilitate Ms. Doe’s abortion.”Several aspects of this passage stand out. There is no citation pointing a reader to what part of the Supreme Court’s case law validates the administration’s position. That’s not surprising, because the account is partial to the point of being misleading. Presumably, the reference is to the Supreme Court’s 1992 decision Planned Parenthood v. Casey, which adopted the “undue burden” standard for evaluating the constitutionality of restrictions on abortion. The court said that a “substantial obstacle” placed in the path of a woman seeking to terminate a pregnancy before fetal viability creates an “undue burden” on the constitutional right.The Casey decision did indeed say that the government has an interest in unborn life from the beginning of pregnancy and that it can adopt policies that allow it to express that interest, including seeking to persuade a woman to change her mind and carry the pregnancy to term. But crucially, the Casey decision held that while the government can endeavor to persuade a woman to choose childbirth over abortion, at the end of the day it may not prevent her from choosing otherwise. The distinction between persuade and prevent is central to understanding current abortion law, as Reva Siegel and I argued at length in a law review article published last year.The Casey decision remains the law of the land, as the Supreme Court made clear last year when it struck down, as an undue burden, medically unnecessary regulations that would have closed most of the abortion clinics in Texas. Justice Kennedy joined Justice Stephen G. Breyer’s majority opinion in that case, Whole Woman’s Health v. Hellerstedt.The solicitor general now argues that the administration is not preventing Jane Doe from getting an abortion, because she can choose to go back where she came from. That’s ridiculous. First, abortion is not legal in Jane Doe’s unspecified home country. Second, she claims to have fled an abusive home. For all we know, her pregnancy is the result of incest; in any event, she asked officials not to tell her parents that she was pregnant, but they ignored her pleas and told them anyway. And finally, as Judge Patricia Millett wrote in dissent from the appeals court’s earlier 2-to-1 decision that temporarily blocked the abortion, “the government cannot condition the exercise of a constitutional right by women and girls on their surrender of other legal rights. The fact that J.D. entered the United States without proper documentation does not mean that she has no legal right to stay here to be safe from abuse or persecution.”It’s been known for months that President Trump — or, more likely, Vice President Mike Pence — has filled top positions at the Department of Health and Human Services with individuals who have devoted their adult lifetimes to the anti-abortion cause. Scott Lloyd, the man who was in charge of Jane Doe’s fate before the federal courts stepped in, was not on many people’s screens in his low-profile position as head of the department’s Office of Refugee Resettlement, the agency with jurisdiction over unaccompanied minors caught entering the country illegally.Mr. Lloyd, like so many others now on the public payroll, is a longtime anti-abortion crusader. It is he who now asserts the power to review any abortion decision by a detained minor. Jane Doe’s lawyers submitted as a court exhibit an email from Mr. Lloyd regarding the obligations of the contractors (“grantees”) who house the minors. It was headed: “Grantees Should Not Be Supporting Abortion Services Pre or Post-Release; Only Pregnancy Services and Life-Affirming Options Counseling.”Mr. Lloyd bases his role, a completely new one for a director of his office, on a policy adopted by the Office of Refugee Resettlement in March that prohibits “any action that facilitates” abortion without “direction and approval from the director.” The prohibited actions include not only giving the minor access to the abortion itself, but also taking her to preliminary doctors’ appointments and to court to get judicial permission in lieu of permission from faraway parents.The choice of the word “facilitates” in this document is not casual. It appears throughout the administration’s briefs in this case. “This Court has repeatedly made clear that the government generally need not facilitate abortions,” the solicitor general writes in his Supreme Court appeal. Among the precedents cited for the “need not facilitate” rule are those holding that the government need not pay for abortions for women who can’t afford one. But that is a far cry from Jane Doe’s situation. There was never a question of the government paying; the cost of the abortion was borne by a private fund.The administration put forward its broad view of what it means by “need not facilitate” when it sought a stay of the first judicial order in this case, a decision by Judge Tanya Chutkan of the Federal District Court in Washington, that the administration had to permit the abortion. Seeking immediate review of that order, the administration claimed that “the government’s refusal to facilitate Ms. Doe in obtaining an abortion places no obstacle in her path, much less a significant one, as is required to constitute an undue burden. The government is merely refusing to exercise its custodial responsibilities over unaccompanied minors by taking affirmative steps to proactively assist or enable her in such an endeavor, consistent with its legitimate interest in promoting fetal life and childbirth over abortion.”That just about says it all. The administration can’t stop adult women from having abortions. It can’t even stop teenagers, who often have their parents’ permission or, failing that, the required permission from a judge. So the administration unleashes its anti-abortion fury on the most vulnerable among us, unaccompanied minors, pregnant and alone, who are here only because they had the gumption or desperation to flee something even worse. Suppose Jane Doe had not been able to get her abortion in time. She would soon be giving birth to a United States citizen. Then what? The administration doesn’t say.What does it mean to “facilitate” an abortion? It seems to boil down to paperwork: According to one of the administration’s briefs, the government “would have to evaluate and sign approval documents for the procedure; arrange for transportation to the procedure or for transfer of custody to someone who would be authorized to take her; and monitor her health and care after the procedure.” Presumably, the government would make these arrangements joyously if the “procedure” at issue was childbirth. But when it comes to abortion, signing the forms is not only onerous; it also would make the government complicit, in its own eyes, with something it believes to be a grave wrong.There was another recent case where signing a form was said to create complicity. That was the 2016 case in which religious employers challenged the Affordable Care Act’s requirement of free contraception as part of an employer’s health plan. Noel J. Francisco, now the solicitor general, argued in that case, Zubik v. Burwell, against the requirement on behalf of several clients, including the Roman Catholic archbishop of Washington and an organization called Priests for Life. (The best-known plaintiff in that case, Little Sisters of the Poor, a religious order that runs a network of nursing homes, was represented by another lawyer.) The religiously affiliated organizations sought the total exemption from the mandate that the Obama administration gave to actual churches. The question in the case became whether there was any accommodation that would satisfy the religious groups’ demand and still permit their female employees to obtain birth control on the same terms as other American women. In the end, the groups’ answer was no; even signing a form to opt out of the entire program was a step too far. (The Trump administration has ended the litigation by offering exemptions to employers with religious or just plain “moral” objections to birth control.)Claims by private parties for not following laws that they believe would make them complicit with evil can be bold, as they were in the contraception case, though are hardly unprecedented. But the argument that the government itself is now making is something novel, a symptom of a world turned upside down. It is the government claiming a right not to “facilitate” a lawful procedure, not to be made complicit in what some politicians and federal bureaucrats regard as evil. It is the government itself claiming a right not to follow the law. The concept is head-spinning.But who are we to throw stones? Aren’t we all complicit after a fashion? Where were the people in the streets to protest the treatment of Rosa Maria Hernandez, the 10-year-old with cerebral palsy who was stopped at a checkpoint by immigration agents on her way to emergency surgery. Having learned her undocumented status, the agents followed the ambulance and waited outside her hospital room so that she couldn’t somehow escape their clutches. If this had happened in another country, we would have politicians up on soapboxes talking about human dignity. Maybe, since last November, it has become another country: Sheriff Joe Arpaio territory, under rules designed to satisfy the Little Sisters of the Poor.When Senator Jeff Flake, the Arizona Republican, gave his retirement speech on the Senate floor last month, declaring that “I will not be complicit” in what he described as the country’s loss of moral authority, he posed this question: “When the next generation asks us, why didn’t you do something? Why didn’t you speak up? What are we going to say?” The question lingered in the air. It still does.
Being a Female Comic in Louis C.K.’s World I saw Louis C.K. this spring, when I was performing at the Upright Citizens Brigade theater in New York City. He was working out his “Saturday Night Live” monologue and he was funny. We exchanged cordial hellos backstage and I remember thinking, “I hope it’s a misunderstanding, I hope you’re not that guy people say you are.”Standup comedy is hard on its women. I started in 1987 in San Francisco. Since then, I’ve worked mostly with male comics, for male club owners. I’ve wiggled out of thousands of uncomfortable hugs and let my cheek catch a kiss meant for my lips. I don’t have a story about misconduct by Louis C.K. like the ones that five women recently told reporters (which he admitted are true), and no one has masturbated in front of me, at least not without my consent. But I’d say almost every female comic could name a comedy club she can’t walk into, a booker she can’t email or an agent she can’t pursue because of the presence of a problematic guy. We are all avoiding someone who could help us make money.Female comics do a lot of calculating, finding alternate routes to a career.“I just won’t try to get a spot at that club tonight — he’s there.”“I just won’t perform at that club ever — he runs it.”“I just won’t get on that TV show — he books it.”For me, all of those “I just won’ts” now look like a lifetime of “I didn’ts.” So many missed opportunities. The truth is, if you are a woman in most professions, there are a bunch of extra rungs on your ladder to success.My workplace, a comedy club, is unlike any other. A group of strangers is brought to me. They sit at my feet and listen as I talk. All the things I say were made up, by me. If you are skeptical that I can make you laugh, I will find you, and I will get you.If I am interrupted at my workplace (almost always by a man), I am encouraged to insult him, on the spot. I can mock his clothing and speculate on his abilities in the bedroom. I can tell his girlfriend that she can do better. I can smack him down, like an insect. Instead of losing my job, like the woman who flipped off President Trump, I get applauded. Cheered. Even better, if this man persists in interrupting me, I can signal to a bouncer and have him kicked out.Yes. I can have a rude man removed from my workplace. I wonder if Hope Hicks, the White House communications director, might want to have that power. Wouldn’t any woman?But the moment a female comic steps offstage, her power dissipates. She is a woman, again. A famous comic can masturbate in front of her and his powerful manager can tell her to stop complaining about it. In standup comedy, the contrast between those two states is so depressingly clear. We get to be the person onstage who we wish were offstage.There’s a Hulu documentary called “Too Funny to Fail,” about Dana Carvey’s sketch show on ABC. Louis C.K. was the head writer, the guy who presumably did the hiring. When I started watching it, of course I noticed that all the writers on the show were men. And they are all great — not a dud in the bunch. But were there a couple of great female writers who didn’t even try to get a job on that show because they’d heard weird stuff about the guy who did the hiring? Are those women still in the business?I wonder if there’s a parallel universe where I was born male and became a comic. Am I rich in that universe? Do I headline stadiums? Is my wife taking care of my son so that I can focus exclusively on my career? Am I better at networking with men because I’m not worried about sending the wrong message? Do I hang out after my show and have drinks because I know that will help me get work?All new comics need the same thing: huge amounts of stage time. There are no shortcuts in standup comedy. The quest to become a good comedian is brutal. It takes at least 10 years of performing, almost every night. You get that performing time in at open mics, where you have to line up during the day for a spot that night, at open mics that run until 1 or 2 a.m., at shows where you have to talk two, or 10, friends into coming just so that you can have a chance to perform.Both male and female comics have to do these things. But if you also have to maneuver around a problematic guy, you’ll miss some opportunities. If you perform 10 times a week and your male counterpart performs 12 times a week, he will get better faster. And because you won’t get paid work until you’re good, your quest will take longer.Often when I am part of a predominantly male lineup, I will watch the women in the crowd. After the third or fourth man in a row, some of them look tired. I see them thinking, “Another one?”When a female comic takes the stage on such a night, there is often palpable joy from the women in the audience. For a few minutes, they don’t have to look at the world through male eyes. It’s a relief, an end to dude fatigue. I have never understood why male comics put up with all-male or mostly male lineups, why they aren’t demanding to follow a female comic. The audience will be so much more excited about you if you’re not the sixth man in a row.After the allegations about Louis C.K. were made public on the record, a friend texted me the names of two more famous male standup comics who she heard are “next.” It is so strange to see sexual harassment being taken seriously, at long last. It has made me examine my own life, 30 years of swimming under, over and around sharks. What could I have accomplished if I’d been able to put that energy elsewhere?I don’t know how men are going to change themselves. I do know that putting more women onstage, on writing staffs and on camera is a great way to change comedy.
The Last Time President Xi Took a Question From an American Correspondent? 2014, and Yup, It Was Me BEIJING — When President Trump and President Xi Jinping turned away from their flower-draped lecterns here on Thursday without taking questions from reporters, the sense of a missed opportunity spread through the cavernous room in the Great Hall of the People.American presidents typically use such visits to persuade inaccessible, often autocratic, foreign leaders to face the news media. I was a beneficiary of that custom in 2014, when Mr. Xi stood next to President Barack Obama in the same building, having grudgingly agreed to take two questions — one from a Chinese and one from an American correspondent.Mr. Obama’s aides had haggled for weeks with Chinese officials to extract that agreement. They were so driven, in part, because Mr. Obama had come under sharp criticism in 2009, during his first visit, when the Chinese did not allow questions during his appearance with Mr. Xi’s predecessor, Hu Jintao. (Journalists had been able to ask questions during visits by Presidents Bill Clinton and George W. Bush.)And so, on Nov. 12, 2014, as I was preparing to join my colleagues for the bus ride from our hotel to the Great Hall of the People, I was pulled aside by Eric H. Schultz, then Mr. Obama’s deputy press secretary, who told me to expect to be called on at the news conference.The White House’s choice of The New York Times was laden with symbolism. At the time, the Chinese government had declined to renew the visas of several Times correspondents in China as a reprisal for its coverage of the financial dealings of Chinese leaders and their families.Asking questions of a president is nerve-racking under any circumstances. But when I heard my name called by the press secretary, Josh Earnest, in the Great Hall, it felt like stepping to the plate at Yankee Stadium.I stood up and, with camera bulbs flashing, asked Mr. Xi two questions: Did he view Mr. Obama’s Asia pivot as a threat to China? And would China ease its refusal to give visas to correspondents in light of a broader visa agreement it had just signed with the United States?I also asked Mr. Obama a somewhat long-winded question about the rise of anti-American sentiment in China, which prompted him to say, “Come on, Mark,” and joke, after I was finished, that he had forgotten my question (I assumed that was for the benefit of his host).At first, President Xi looked as if he was going to simply ignore the impudent foreigner. He instructed the moderator to move on, taking a scripted question from a Chinese state-owned paper. Mr. Obama, who was clearly eager to hear Mr. Xi’s answer, shot me a glance and a theatrical shrug, the presidential equivalent of “nice try, buddy.”It turned out that Mr. Xi was merely biding his time. After he answered the Chinese journalist, he circled back to me and delivered a curt lecture. No, he said, the pivot was not about containment. And the visa problems of The Times were of our own making.China protected freedom of expression, he said, but “media outlets need to obey China’s laws and regulations. When a car breaks down on the road, perhaps we need to get off the car to see where the problem lies. And when a certain issue is raised as a problem, there must be a reason.”“In Chinese, we have a saying,” he concluded. “The party which has created a problem should be the one to help resolve it.”As the White House press corps filed out of the room, one of my colleagues joked that he hoped the Chinese would allow me to leave the country. The Chinese media reported that I had violated the ground rules by directing a question to Mr. Xi, rather than only to Mr. Obama. (The White House did not instruct me to address only the American president.)The whole negotiation was somewhat opaque, Mr. Earnest recalled this week. Even as he stood next to the leaders in the Great Hall that day, he said he was not sure the Chinese would follow through on the agreement.The episode apparently did not sit well with the Chinese. On Thursday, Mr. Trump’s press secretary, Sarah Huckabee Sanders, said, “It was at the Chinese insistence there were no questions.”Former aides to Mr. Obama and Mr. Bush criticized the Trump White House for not trying harder.“They always insist, Sarah,” Susan E. Rice, who served as Mr. Obama’s national security adviser, said in a tweet. “The trick is to use diplomacy to extract that concession as a matter of principle, despite their resistence.”Brad Dayspring, deputy director of press advance for Mr. Bush, tweeted, “Never got everything we pushed for, but always expanded access from Chinese demands & ensured questions were taken alongside Chinese President. It’s an important demonstration of American press freedoms.”In Tokyo and Seoul, Mr. Trump took questions with the leaders of Japan and South Korea. But striking a blow for press freedom did not seem high on his list of priorities in Beijing. He did not say whether he had pressed Mr. Xi behind closed doors on human rights issues.Mr. Obama, by contrast, got mileage out of the episode. Two days later, he was standing next to Aung San Suu Kyi, the Burmese pro-democracy leader, in the garden of her lakeside house in Yangon, and brought up the tense Q. and A. in the Great Hall of the People.“When I am traveling, it is important as the president of the United States to not just talk about our interests, but also to talk about our values,” Mr. Obama said. “Sometimes it has an impact; sometimes it doesn’t.”“Although I was impressed that Mark Landler got an answer to his question from President Xi,” he added. “It might not have been the one he was expecting, but he did end up taking the question. So you just keep on chipping away and seeing if we can make progress.”
I Interviewed Joe Biden. A Sob Took Me by Surprise. You know that terrifying moment when you hear your voice crack, and it’s crystal clear that, no matter how hard you fight it, the next syllable out of your mouth will be wrapped in a sob?Well, that’s how my meeting with former Vice President Joe Biden began.After 18 months of pestering his office for an interview for my “Table for Three” series at The Times — to talk about the death of his elder son, Beau, in 2015, and how we somehow manage to go on after monumental losses — he finally said yes. Except the piece would now be for the Book Review, because in the time I’d spent asking, Mr. Biden had written a book on the subject. His new memoir, “Promise Me, Dad,” will be published on Tuesday.For me, the secret pleasure of interviewing people like Mr. Biden is preparing to interview them: diving into their press coverage and writing, hunting for clues about the men and women behind their public images, so that in my limited time with them, I can bring a fresh picture to life. That meant reading everything I could find about Mr. Biden, of course. But I also waded into the world of grief memoirs, books about personal tragedy and loss. I read an elegant pair by Joan Didion, “The Year of Magical Thinking” (about the death of her husband) and “Blue Nights” (on the death of her daughter). And I revisited a poetic heartbreaker, “The Light of the World,” by Elizabeth Alexander, whom I interviewed with Sheryl Sandberg six months ago about the deaths of their husbands and parenting through grief.With these books and Mr. Biden’s life story in my head, I created a mission for my interview: Why would anyone put himself through the misery of reliving the most painful moments of his life? And as a literary matter, how do you pull off a book like that so it’s not too depressing for readers to bear?Thus armed, I traveled last month to Mr. Biden’s home in a leafy neighborhood of Wilmington, Del. His wife, Jill, met us at the door and showed me and the photographer, Ryan Pfluger, to a wood-paneled, book-lined study, where Ryan would shoot Mr. Biden’s portrait and I would conduct the interview. At the far end of the room, two doors opened onto a raised patio, overlooking green lawns that rolled down to a picturesque lake.A few minutes later, Mr. Biden’s sister and longtime campaign manager, Valerie Biden Owens, joined us. She offered me a snack while Ryan prepared. Not one to refuse a pastry, I followed her into the kitchen. That’s where I first met Mr. Biden. He was sitting with an aide at his long kitchen table, looking like any husband and father in America.Maybe that was it: He was just an ordinary man in this domestic setting. Or maybe it was because I’d only recently finished his account of terrible loss. Who knows how our hearts work?In any event, when he rose to shake my hand — friendly, cheerful even — something cracked open inside me. “Congratulations on the book,” I said. “It’s …” And that’s when a sob strangled the simple word I’d meant to say: “beautiful.”“You can’t do that,” Mr. Biden said. He sounded strict. “If you cry, then I’ll cry,” he said. “We have to help each other.”I nodded in agreement, not quite ready to speak, and he went back to his aide. I picked up an éclair and returned to the study. I felt like an idiot. After all my persistence and preparation, I would go down as the one who bawled. I have long observed that the deeper the affinity I create with subjects — whether in our vulnerability, our humor or our strength — the better the interview. But now I had gone too far.Ms. Owens followed me back to the study. “You can’t do that to him,” she said, echoing her brother.“It won’t happen again,” I promised, but I wasn’t so sure about that. I had officially entered the “self-doubt” phase of the interview. “Can I pull this off?” I wondered. It happens every time.Then Mr. Biden joined us, sitting for photographs for 15 or 20 minutes. We chatted about his forthcoming book tour and exercise regimen. Ryan directed him to look to his left, then off to the right. And I found my sea legs. When we began the interview, Mr. Biden sat on a sofa across from me, and I knew I hadn’t lied to his sister: It wouldn’t happen again. And it didn’t. We were dry-eyed as Mr. Biden walked me through the emotional and literary thicket that brought me to him. By the time we finished, I felt certain that I’d been forgiven for my rough start.
Her Secret to a Long Life? ‘It’s Good to Work a Lot’ Hard work is the key to longevity, says Bella Pevzner, 89.“I worked hard all my life,” she said. “That’s why I stay here so long. So it’s good to work a lot.”A heart operation in 2002 halted a once irrepressible work ethic. “I retired at the age of 74,” Mrs. Pevzner said recently. “If not for the operation, maybe I’d work more. I was a workaholic. What can I tell you?”That dogged determination to keep going is rooted in her formative years. As a teenager, she fled her home country of Belarus in 1941 after the Nazis invaded it.Her parents and a sister escaped, but many other relatives, among them Mrs. Pevzner’s grandparents and a younger sister, were slaughtered.After a harrowing 300-mile journey, the family found sanctuary in Kazakhstan. Food and resources were scarce for years. She recalled walking barefoot through snow. Her father, a tailor, fashioned clothing out of flour sacks for the family.“We stayed here and there,” Mrs. Pevzner said. “It was a hard life.”After the war, the family settled in Ukraine, where they lived in a small basement apartment. They slept on iron beds, using rags as mattress padding. For years, Mrs. Pevzner had just one set of garments: underwear, slippers and a cherry-colored dress with white dots.“I washed every day, and I went to work every day in the same clothes,” she said.Mrs. Pevzner worked as a bookkeeper to help support the household. In 1953, a matchmaker introduced her to the man she would marry. A year later, their son was born.Shortly after her mother died, Mrs. Pevzner, then 50, immigrated to the United States with her husband and her son. She did not know a word of English, but wasted no time learning it.“It was hard for me to learn from the dictionary, so I learned from speaking,” Mrs. Pevzner said. “In Brooklyn, when I walked down the streets, and Jewish people met me and talked to me in Yiddish, I told them: ‘No, this is my own language. I will never forget. I need to speak English. Speak to me in English!’ I was very insistent.”Mrs. Pevzner continued to work into her 70s for various employers, as a bookkeeper and an accountant, which she credits for exercising her mind and keeping her sharp. She recalled one job at a bakery where a boss threatened to fire her if she did not use a calculator to compute the discounts offered to regular customers.“I figured everything out in my head,” Mrs. Pevzner said. “My head was good. It’s still not bad.”Today, Mrs. Pevzner says she feels lucky that her 63-year-old son lives in an apartment across the street from her home in Bensonhurst, Brooklyn.Her husband died of liver cancer in 2011, and age has taken a toll on her health. She has diabetes, sleep apnea, hypertension, gout, respiratory illness, thyroid problems and retinal disease.“I have a lot of sickness, better to tell you want I don’t have,” Mrs. Pevzner said. “It’s hard, very hard, but I manage it. I try my best.”In 2014, the Jewish Association Serving the Aging, a beneficiary agency of UJA-Federation of New York, began delivering Mrs. Pevzner kosher meals. UJA-Federation of New York is one of the eight organizations supported by The New York Times Neediest Cases Fund.Mrs. Pevzner receives $1,232 a month in Social Security Income. In April, the association used $75 from the fund so Mrs. Pevzner could buy fruit to bake dishes for a Passover meal. The money also went toward buying special eye drops to treat her retinal disease. An additional $46 was used in August to provide Mrs. Pevzner with a shower bench.Retirement has allowed her to discover new interests. She took up painting at age 80 during a visit to a center for older adults. Much of her art features animals and landscapes, and many of her creations hang in frames on her walls. Other paintings remain unfinished; her failing eyesight has delayed their completion.Mrs. Pevzner says she expects to continue thriving despite her many maladies. Her father lived to be 97, and she is determined to live until at least 100. There is still much to be done, she explained.“I don’t lose hope,” Mrs. Pevzner said. “I have pictures not finished, so I need to finish.”
Rap Disrupted Music First. Now It’s TV and Film. For decades, hip-hop made it to the screen — big and small — only intermittently. But recently, there’s been something of a boom: a slew of rap-infused shows, movies and documentaries that look back to both the old-school era and the mid-1990s, revisiting the periods when hip-hop was becoming the driving force of pop culture. These projects underscore the music’s role as a social and political bellwether, and some even demand a dive into its hidden histories, like the involvement of women and the ways in which violence has shaped the music.In the spring, Netflix wrapped up “The Get Down,” Baz Luhrmann’s big-budget look at the birth of hip-hop in the South Bronx. In June, “All Eyez on Me,” the long-troubled Tupac Shakur biopic, finally saw the light of day. In July, Dr. Dre and his musical partner Jimmy Iovine were the subjects of HBO’s “The Defiant Ones,” a four-part documentary. And early next year USA is premiering “Unsolved,” a scripted true-crime series based on the investigations into the murders of Shakur and the Notorious B.I.G.Meanwhile, a new generation of creators have arrived with hip-hop embedded into their creative frameworks, like Donald Glover, a rapper himself, with FX’s “Atlanta,” and Issa Rae with HBO’s “Insecure.” The new ABC sitcom “The Mayor,” is about a young rapper who runs for office to promote his music but ends up in city hall. Daveed Diggs, the rapper and former “Hamilton” star, is an executive producer.Recently Questlove, the drummer of the Roots, who contributed the song “It Ain’t Fair” to the “Detroit” soundtrack; Salamishah Tillet, a writer and professor of English and Africana studies at the University of Pennsylvania; and Jon Caramanica, a pop critic at The Times, got together to discuss how hip-hop dominates, innovates and yet still remains niche in television’s current “golden age.” These are edited excerpts from the conversation.JON CARAMANICA From “Empire” to ”Atlanta” to “The Get Down,” hip-hop has been the subject of some of the most inventive television of the last few years. Documentaries have been preserving the music through a historical lens, but it’s also being celebrated — and reimagined — through an artistic one.SALAMISHAH TILLET Yes, I thought about that trend in June when BET premiered “Tales,” Irv (Gotti) Lorenzo’s series of “song stories.” Each episode is inspired by lyrics from hip-hop songs, like Notorious B.I.G.’s “I Got a Story to Tell.” After the first episode, I realized that hip-hop has been so influential in American culture that it made sense for it to shape the actual format of a television show too. Especially now, as TV networks are trying to appeal to a younger, more diverse audience.QUESTLOVE I’m so jealous of “Tales,” at least in the concept. Back on “Chappelle’s Show,” one of the ideas we had that never quite panned out was similar in conception. Dave [Chappelle] wanted to make narrative stories out of hip-hop lyrics that, on their face, are just ridiculous. We developed one, based on Nas’s “If I Ruled the World,” where we took the line “I’d open every cell in Attica, send ‘em to Africa,” and built off that. The idea was that 2,000 prisoners in orange jumpsuits were getting off an airplane, and Nelson Mandela was standing there, saying, “What the hell?”CARAMANICA Not surprising that Chappelle was a decade before anyone else on that — I would have loved to see that through his lens. This conversation is reminding me of an annotation of Biggie Smalls lyrics that ran in Vibe magazine back in 1998. Michael Eric Dyson [now a professor at Georgetown University] likened them to “The Epic of Gilgamesh” and “The Godfather,” worthy of consideration alongside those great works of art. Back then, those were still newish, bold contentions.TILLET Sometimes it’s easy to forget that the early creators of hip-hop had to prove over and over again that they were creating “music” and not so-called “noise.” But the recent crop of films, like “Straight Outta Compton” and “All Eyez on Me,” nostalgically remind us of those hard-fought battles and prove once again that hip-hop’s original naysayers and censors were dead wrong.QUESTLOVE For me, I look at music within a 25-year cycle, a way of giving people in their thirties a last go-round of traveling through their childhood memories before they are required to be wise older statesmen and stateswomen. Hip-hop has reached that moment in the life cycle.TILLET So, does this mean hip-hop is now in middle age? It is clearly the music of grown folks on television — the Roots are the house band on “The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon,” Biggie’s “Hypnotize” is selling Oreo Thins of all things, and “Empire” is a hit show. But what are the conditions that make hip-hop’s rising profile on TV possible? There are nearly 500 scripted shows a year now. One way of catering to niche audiences is to hire the kind of showrunners who haven’t been tapped before. In many cases, this means that those of us who grew up loving hip-hop are now both the creators and the consumers of these stories.QUESTLOVE And the most interesting projects are the ones that have a sense of the history, and sometimes actually dramatize those links. The BET mini-series about New Edition was successful because it understood that history — it staged New Edition’s inspirations and influences as part of the story. All of these kids watching it and hearing “Holding On” came to see, for instance, that Jeffrey Osborne isn’t just the “On the Wings of Love” guy, but that he was in L.T.D., a funk and soul band whose work was one of the main inspirations for New Edition.CARAMANICA The history of popular music in this country is in lock step with the rest of the country’s history, from the slavery era until now. That’s why it’s so crucial to tell these stories faithfully and from these perspectives. “Straight Outta Compton” is a biopic, but also functions as cultural and political history. “The Get Down” is magical realism, but doubles as a lens onto how the government-abetted devastation of New York City created the space for raw cultural innovation. These aren’t just stories about sounds — they’re documents, biographical or fictional, of our struggles as a nation.TILLET That recent trio of films about West Coast hip-hop remind us of the underbelly of American history, showing us how police brutality against African Americans in the ’80s and early ’90s — like Rodney King’s beating by the L.A.P.D. — birthed N.W.A’s rage and enabled Tupac’s reign. In a way, the recent back-to-back appearance of these films validates these stories and underscores that their version of racial violence, despite the conservative backlash at the time (and today!), was the truth. These movies carry a political urgency that speaks volumes in our era of Black Lives Matter and of NFL players kneeling during the national anthem.QUESTLOVE Now that I think about it, though, it’s also important to note that there’s an element that’s generally missing from this latest crop of films. That’s the drug and violence culture. Crack and guns were central to those movies of the ’90s, like “Juice” and “Menace II Society.” Now, hip-hop movies don’t depict them as much, maybe because the drugs of choice in our moment, like weed, are either accepted as recreational or are legal pharmaceuticals like opioids that are affecting white kids as much as black kids. That’s content rather than style, but it’s another example of how the idea of hip-hop culture has shifted over the years.CARAMANICA After the 90s — when we had “In Living Color,” “New Jack City,” “The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air,” “Boyz N the Hood” and more — Hollywood’s appetite for black film and TV seemed to dry up. It spoke of a lack of imagination about the sorts of hip-hop-informed films and shows that might be made. “Dope,” which came out a couple of years ago, felt like a sibling to the films you’re talking about, but in a vastly different framework.QUESTLOVE I really like “Dope,” which is an interesting movie to me, a bridge between the hard-core hip-hop movies of the ’90s and the more aware and inclusive millennial attitude that we have now. There’s more of an openness to sexual orientation, to educational possibilities and to different kinds of diversity.Anyway, when you look back at all those events from the early 90s, whether the Los Angeles riots or the heyday of “Yo! MTV Raps,” you see a period where hip-hop became the vehicle for rebellion. Back then hip-hop wasn’t just selling like crazy, it was starting to represent the challenge to the established order that rock ‘n’ roll had represented for decades. When Nirvana topped the charts with “Nevermind,” it marked a sea change in American pop music. But, just before Nirvana, you have N.W.A’s “Efil4zaggin,” which was the first so-called hard-core hip-hop album to top the charts. Then you get Ice Cube’s “The Predator.” You have Cypress Hill’s “Black Sunday.” You have Snoop Dogg’s “Doggystyle.” So partly that’s why the nostalgia is coming in hot and heavy in the TV and film world now. That period of hip-hop is still so connected to ideas of challenging power and speaking out. It’s an alternative history.TILLET “History gets told by the winners,” laments the R&B singer Michel’le in her Lifetime biopic “Surviving Compton,” which came out last year. As the film’s narrator, she is talking about her erasure from the rise of N.W.A in “Straight Outta Compton,” and by extension the absence of other black women from these stories. The movie depicts domestic abuse that the singer has alleged she experienced living with Dr. Dre and also focuses on the importance of her R&B vocal contributions to Dre’s early sound and success. (Dr. Dre has denied abusing Michel’le.) In many ways, the biopic is a corrective to “Straight Outta Compton” and “The Defiant Ones”; both link hip-hop’s maturity as a cultural phenomenon to the story of Dr. Dre coming into his manhood. “Surviving Compton” highlights the sexist challenges that African-American women endured as early producers, singers, rappers, D.J.s or just plain old fans of hip-hop.QUESTLOVE Here, I want to make a case for “The Breaks,” which started as a TV movie and became a series on VH1 before moving to BET. “The Breaks” is about early ’90s hip-hop, and it’s well-crafted. The writing is great, and the minor details are correct. They get the drum machines right. They get the microphones right. It also helps that it was inspired by “The Big Payback,” a book written by one of the founding fathers of hip-hop journalism, Dan Charnas, who was writing long-form essays about the hip-hop world back before anyone wanted anything to do with it. He’s already part of the culture, and the show respects and extends that.TILLET What I like about “The Breaks” is that its central character, Nikki, is a woman who is not a rapper or a D.J., but is the real genius behind the vision, hustle, sound and style of early ’90s hip-hop . (Like Cookie, who finally gets to be the C.E.O. on “Empire”!) She is a descendant of those pioneering female entrepreneurs and executives, like Sylvia Robinson of Sugar Hill Records, who ensured that hip-hop would live far into the future.CARAMANICA I’m excited by the promise of what happens when the genre’s influence is even more diffuse — when hip-hop is more than just subject matter, or even a soundtrack, but rather serves as a knowledge base, aesthetic framework and value set that shapes all kinds of creative output. Look at Viceland’s slate of shows: You have a talk show, “Desus & Mero,” that’s high-end hip-hop public-access television; “Huang’s World,” in which the chef Eddie Huang reckons with global culture with a politics informed by hip-hop; and loose-format food programming starring the rapper-gourmand Action Bronson. None of these shows are about hip-hop in any real way, but they carry its values out into the world. Also I don’t want to gloss over how integral hip-hop has been in the late-reality-TV era, thanks to the Mona Scott-Young “Love & Hip Hop” empire and its many imitators.TILLET And of course, reality shows like “Love & Hip Hop” or “Growing Up Hip Hop” have little to do with the music, but are all about interpersonal drama fueled by hip-hop culture. I’m more drawn to the shows and films that revel in hip-hop’s innovation rather than the ones steeped in nostalgia or melodrama.QUESTLOVE To me, FX’s “Atlanta” is what would happen if Woody Allen directed Master P’s “I’m Bout It.” It’s one of the first black surrealist hip-hop comedies.TILLET Set in the here and now, “Atlanta” and “Insecure” have the privilege of not fighting those early culture wars. They simply assume the reign of hip-hop today and are more experimental with how they incorporate a hip-hop aesthetic into their shows. “Atlanta” is the best analogue to hip-hop I’ve ever seen on TV — the storytelling is playful, defiant, dissonant, magical, tragic, decadent and triumphant, all at once. And what’s so fun about Issa Rae’s protagonist Issa Dee on “Insecure,” is that she isn’t a wannabe M.C., but, rather, rap is the art form she turns to on the fly, when she is talking to herself or her friends.CARAMANICA To me it’s further confirmation of what we’ve known for years already: Hip-hop is lingua franca. On “The Mayor,” the new ABC sitcom, a rapper runs for mayor — and wins — and I don’t find it even slightly fanciful. Mostly I’m just trying to figure out which real-life rapper is going to make this fictional narrative real.TILLET “The Mayor” feels like a bit of a throwback to me. Like if the “Fresh Prince” ran for public office. But I love the idea that his mayor’s political obligations are now competing with his artistic ambitions. That is the dilemma actual hip-hop artists, like Jay-Z, are trying to reconcile for themselves.CARAMANICA I found it striking that Courtney Rose, the titular mayor [played by Brandon Micheal Hall], says right off the bat that he wants to perform with Taylor Swift, a gesture seemingly aiming to please people both red and blue. (Though to be honest, it probably would have the opposite effect.) There’s a genteel political toothlessness that you’d expect from an ABC family sitcom, but maybe there’s something quietly radical about hip-hop inserting itself even into that prosaic format.TILLET On the flip side of family-friendly TV, I’m assuming USA’s “Unsolved: The Murders of Tupac and The Notorious B.I.G.” is a culmination of the network’s move beyond blue skies to a grayer, more serious television lineup. Most important, here’s hoping that the slate of programs coming two decades after Biggie’s murder in 1997, including the Johnny Depp movie “LAbyrinth,” pressure the Los Angeles police to finally solve these murders, give the rappers’ families some closure and get all of us who grew up with their deaths as our generational tragedy closer to the truth than ever before.
History, Totally Destroyed Like many top intellectuals the world over, I’ve been thinking about the shape of history itself. Spurred on by the emergence of unexpected events and personalities onto the world stage, I have been cogitating deeply on the questions of where we’ve been and where we’re heading.The world-historical confrontation between Donald Trump and Kim Jong-un, which may well proceed from verbal to actual Armageddon, demands a new understanding of history: It has all, undeniably and inexorably, been leading up to this. North Korea demands that we oust the “lunatic” who governs us or face “the abyss of doom,” while our own dear leader characterizes Chairman Kim in historically significant tweets as a “madman” on a suicide mission whom we will “totally destroy.”As all top intellectuals know, Hegel argued that history, in its essence, is the coming-to-self-consciousness of the Absolute; Marx said that it is the dialectical unfolding of the material conditions of production; Michel Foucault pointed out that it is a succession of “epistemes” (roughly, a body of common shared beliefs), each inscribing its own regime of power; Francis Fukuyama claimed it was over; and Jean Baudrillard said it never actually happened in the first place.Before these rival theories emerged, it was the Great Man view of history that dominated the field. “The history of the world is nothing but a biography of great men,” wrote Thomas Carlyle. Or as Ralph Waldo Emerson had it: “It is natural to believe in great men. We call our children and our lands by their names. Their names are wrought into the verbs of language, their works and effigies are in our houses.”On this view, the drivers of history are not races or classes or nations, but particular military geniuses, religious messiahs, kings, dictators, inventors, captains of industry, artists and saints. The Great Men swaggered onto the stage one after another, each capturing and conquering the Spirit of the Age. You will notice, of course, that the Great Man theory involved no women. This made perfect sense to the men writing the theory of history.But the true test of philosophies of history is history itself. I suggest that the Great Man Theory, though already battered by Marxism and feminism, isn’t likely to survive the historical dialectic between Donald Trump and Kim Jong-un. These phenomena suggest the need for a completely fresh account of history itself, a new theory that is almost certainly my ticket to a long-anticipated MacArthur “genius” grant. Or it would be, if I could settle on a name for it.According to your mood, it might be termed the Jackass Theory of History, the Howling Mediocrity Account, the Colossal Bungler Hypothesis or the Blockhead Conjecture. Rex Tillerson writes in to suggest the Moron Theory, but this is insensitive toward those with intellectual disabilities.We must now reckon with this fact: Human history is the bumbling-about of self-deluded and incompetent doinks. Surely you are not going to deny that. It is nothing so much as a series of pratfalls by inept leaders and the suckers who follow them toward doom. Their incompetence is a historical force in the lives of each and all of us.It is now painfully clear that we’ve overestimated intelligence as a world-changing force; it is idiocy that holds sway. In a bad decade, a leader might spend you into a $20 trillion deficit or execute all the sparrows in China. Above all, no matter how many times they watch “The Princess Bride,” prospective world conquerors still get involved in land wars in Asia. As Napoleon blundered his way through Europe on his way east, creating disaster for himself and millions of others, Hegel greeted him as “world history on horseback.” Perhaps Hegel had this Great Man thing wrong end up.The traditional culmination of a philosophy of history is to identify the goal, end or destination of the whole human saga. I speculate that the Trump-Kim dialectic is the final stage, in which history simultaneously realizes and annihilates itself, and us with it. On the other hand, we might keep floundering about for a while longer, as new pseudo-divine Bozos arise and the old ones go down like jetliners.This is a lot to process. But as you gaze stupefied upon the continuing disaster, you can comfort yourself in the knowledge that you now understand the driving forces that are making it happen, thanks to the Big Chump Theory of history. You can thank me later. Or maybe you better thank me now.
Making Space for a Home Office Setting up a home office can be as simple as placing a desk in a spare room or opening up a laptop on a kitchen table. But if you work from home on a regular basis, you deserve more than a makeshift workspace — or a replica of the claustrophobic cubicle you left behind.“Make your home office fit your personality and interests,” said Lisa Kanarek, the author of “Organize Your Home Office for Success” and the founder of a work-from-home blog called Working Naked. “Without the confines of a corporate setting, you can create a space that inspires you to be productive and creative. The goal is to design a place you look forward to working in each day, even though your commute may be only seconds.”Below, 10 tips to help jump-start your home office makeover.TAKE INVENTORY “I recommend making a list of the supplies you’ll need for work on a regular basis, as well as any files or records you need to keep,” said Melissa Michaels, an author and decorating blogger in Seattle. “Consider the number of hours a day you’ll be spending on a computer or if you need to have a place to meet clients in your home.”Add to your list any health considerations or preferences, including if you would do better at a standing desk than at the kitchen island. “Assessing your own situation and needs will give you a starting point for what your priorities should be as you are selecting appropriate office furniture.” (For tips on establishing good work-from-home habits or finding inexpensive gear that can improve your workspace, consult the New York Times Smarter Living section.)And beyond practical matters, consider what will make you want to be there, whether that’s natural light from a nearby window or an inspiring piece of art.BLEND IT IN “To carve out a home office in a main living area, look for aesthetically pleasing ways to create a visually distinct but cohesive room,” said Ms. Michaels, noting that tall plants work well as organic dividers between a desk and a living space.“The struggle is always to address the function of the space while not sacrificing beauty,” said Donna Mondi, an interior designer in Chicago. “Assuming the home office is connected to the main living space, it needs to flow aesthetically and complement the overall design scheme.”Ms. Mondi, for example, made space in a client’s living room for an office nook by placing a stylish writing desk with metallic legs and a black faux-crocodile top in a corner near the window. “This particular spot had lots of natural light, calm and peaceful colors,” she said. “And rich textures made this the perfect place to escape to.”When your home office is “in a more formal part of the home,” she added, “the furnishings need to reflect that level of formality, so everything blends in seamlessly.”MAKE FURNITURE DO DOUBLE-DUTY Look at the furniture you already have and consider whether you could use it for storage in your home office, suggested Ms. Kanarek, the author and work-from-home blogger. She uses an antique dresser in a spare bedroom to store her printer and office supplies, she said, and a coffee table with shelves below or storage inside could be used to store files or supplies while you work on the sofa.“One of my clients uses her dining room as a home office during the day and stores all of her equipment and supplies in a large sideboard,” she said. “When she entertains, no one knows that along one wall is a fully functioning home office.”DON’T SIT WITH YOUR BACK TO THE DOOR “You want your desk to feel like it has a commanding view of the room,” said Anita Rosenberg, a space consultant and practitioner of feng shui in Los Angeles. “People do the built-ins because they don’t have the space, and then they are staring up against the wall. That’s not a great place to be for 12 hours a day.”What you want to aim for is the “command position,” which enables you to see the front door without being in direct line with it, said Judith Wendell, a Manhattan-based feng shui consultant, and confers a feeling of empowerment. If the only option is to have your back to the front door, she added, place a mirror on the wall in front of you so you can see the front door in the mirror.KEEP YOUR OFFICE OUT OF THE BEDROOM “Obviously, you don’t want to take your work to bed with you,” Ms. Wendell said. “Perhaps less obvious is that we don’t want our work to have sleepy or lazy chi.”Another reason for separating the two, Ms. Rosenberg said: “You don’t want to go to sleep thinking about the work you have to do or be stressed out by the electronics in your bedroom.”PUT IT IN THE CLOSET If the only space available is in your bedroom, a bureau with doors that hide your computer, books, papers and printer at night is a good workaround. “Many times we can steal a small closet and create an office nook that’s perfectly appointed,” said Ms. Mondi, the interior designer. “Built-in cabinets will make the most efficient use of space and are the best way to incorporate as much function as possible.”Just keep in mind that you’ll need extra lighting and power for computers, printers, and chargers. And “for an unexpected touch add wall covering” to the inside of the cabinet or bureau, she said, “to give your office its own personality and make it feel less like a closet.”HIDE IT BEHIND CABINETRY If you don’t have a spare closet, you can still conceal your workspace. “With some of our new home projects, we’re incorporating hidden offices into the kitchen,” Ms. Mondi said. “They are concealed by cabinet fronts, so it disappears into the kitchen when not in use.”Another design trick, she said, is to add paneling and create a hidden wall of storage that essentially disappears: “It’s a great way to camouflage necessary evils.”ACCESSORIZE Ms. Mondi also uses art, light fixtures and other decorative elements to ensure that any home office she designs isn’t “all business,” she said.“The best office spaces tell a story of the person” they belong to, she added. “Be creative when choosing colors, materials, lighting, accessories, and you can easily turn it into your favorite room in the house.”UPGRADE YOUR DESK “I’m a big fan of the writing desk, rather than the clunky, functional desks of the past,” Ms. Mondi said. “If you’re even the least bit tech-savvy, you won’t need much in the way of file storage. A small drawer or two gives you enough space for small accessories. What you gain is a lighter piece of furniture that is typically far more beautiful.”OR DO AWAY WITH IT ALTOGETHER “The idea that you have to have a desk, file cabinet, bookcase and storage cabinets to work from home no longer applies, especially if your main piece of home-office equipment is a laptop,” Ms. Kanarek said. “I use a closet in a spare bedroom to store supplies and files, but most of the time I work on my porch, on the family room sofa, at a nearby coffee shop or wherever I feel inspired to work that day. All I need is my laptop and Wi-Fi.”
A Gay Husband, a Dire Diagnosis and the Best-Laid Plans As the old Yiddish proverb goes: Man plans and God laughs.And man, did I plan. There are few careers that require as much planning as a career in medicine. The process is enough to encompass the life of one person; add another to the mix, and the planning becomes all-consuming.Jarrett and I met as pre-med freshmen in chemistry lab and became fast friends, laughing over the flame of a Bunsen burner as we set up experiments. We were soon inseparable, playing endless games of Dr. Mario on my Nintendo between study sessions. Sometimes, after a night of fraternity hazing, he would come to my dorm room and profess his love for me. I initially laughed it off, reminding him that he was my best friend. But by the spring of freshman year, our relationship had changed. We felt that we were beshert — meant to be. Driven by love and mutual goals, we started planning.We managed to get into residency programs in the same city and moved from New York to Chicago, two newly crowned M.D.’s flush with excitement from the perfectly executed wedding that had sent us off.But working a combined 160 hours per week was tough on our marriage. My once cheerful, thoughtful husband was becoming increasingly moody and distant. I confronted him: Was he having an affair? No! Did he not love me anymore? No. Was he gay? Silence.“I think I might be,” he said.With those words, everything changed. We stayed up for nights on end, talking in circles. We withdrew into our own world, me retreating into the closet along with him. “We love each other, we can fix this,” we told ourselves. But it eventually became clear that this was not a “fixable” problem. I gradually confided in my family and friends, putting aside my own reluctance to “out” him; Jarrett came to do the same, finally accepting this long-hidden part of himself. He moved out and we finished the latter half of our residencies newly single, plunging into the world of online dating, both in the market for thirtysomething men.I learned to live without him. I “matched” again, and planned to move on in Philadelphia — a new start.The next hiccup in my plans was a cough. At first, it was mostly after my near-daily four-mile run, but soon it was constant. At the time, I was reading “When Breath Becomes Air” by Dr. Paul Kalanithi, a neurosurgery resident who learned he had stage IV lung cancer at age 36. I had a fleeting moment of panic, and I shared my fear with a co-resident who was reading the same book. She confessed similar thoughts, and we reassured each other — of course neither of us had lung cancer. It was winter; we worked in a hospital; everyone was coughing.I was still wearing hospital scrubs when I went to get a chest X-ray.Maybe that’s why the technician spoke to me in an unusually direct way: “I’m no radiologist, but there is definitely something there.”Despite our best plans to “start over” after our divorce, Jarrett and I had both ended up in Philadelphia for our fellowships. I had seen him only once since the move, when our eyes had met across the sweaty room of a spin studio. I had resolutely decided not to interact with him any more than was necessary.It now seemed necessary. I knew very few people in my new city. It suddenly seemed beshert that my ex lived and worked right next door. Jarrett was the first person I called from the doctor’s office and there he was, immediately by my side to resume his abandoned duties as my best friend.I spent the following days in the hospital, my family now beside me, balancing on a wobbly tightrope that separated me as a doctor from me as a patient. My medical team would come in and relay information in the complicated jargon that is often more familiar to me than lay English. I found myself translating everything back to my terrified parents, as if they were my patients and I was trying to soften the blow of bad news.“Right inferior mediastinal mass encasing and occluding the right inferior pulmonary vein” became “I have something that looks like a tumor in the middle of my chest.” “Favored to represent lymphoma” became, “I probably have a type of blood cancer, but I can get through that.” “Other unusual primary lung malignancies can occur in a patient of this age, but are considered much less likely” became “don’t worry, I don’t have lung cancer.”The morning the oncologist came in to my hospital room and told me that I had lung cancer, I had just been laughing with my parents. It’s not that I was expecting good news, I wasn’t. But I was just as unprepared to hear “lung cancer” as I had been to hear Jarrett say “I’m gay.”I felt myself begin to tip from my tightrope and tried to grab back on, terrified to begin the long descent toward the “patient” side. As I wavered, I could hear my mother in the background trying to assure me that “we’d get through it.” The oncologist, her voice cracking, explained to my parents in plain English that some cancers are not curable. Mine is stage IV.I still tried to translate, but this time I could barely get the words out. “That means that I am not going to live a long life.”As a physician, I have been trained to be observant, to pick up on subtle clues. I sometimes think that I was so determined to stick to my plan that I neglected to see what was right in front of me. But then I consider that many men like flowers and it does not mean that they are gay, and many 32-year-olds get a cough in the winter and they do not have lung cancer.I have now been living with cancer for a year. Treatment has, at times, left me feeling sicker than I could have ever imagined. I have felt deeply angry, profoundly sad and all-around terrified.But for the first time, I am also learning to enjoy the here and now instead of focusing on the later. I might never see the finish line of fellowship graduation, but I am still a doctor; I am lucky enough to be learning every day and can still make my own patients’ lives better. My years of education and training have allowed me to build a supportive community of friends and colleagues throughout the country. I have a family who has stayed by me through all of it.And, for better or worse, I have a gay ex-husband who is here for me, always.
In Catalonia, a Church Becomes a Place of Artistic Pilgrimage As a child, the Barcelona-born painter Santi Moix often made weekend trips with his father to Saurí, a remote Catalan village of 16 people perched high in the Pyrenees. Now, at 57, Moix is perhaps the closest thing Saurí has to a local celebrity, having built a career exhibiting work at the Brooklyn Museum and Milan’s M77 Gallery, and at Prada’s SoHo store (a 2013 commission) featuring his abstract, hypersaturated flora and fauna murals.Five years ago, the local government and bishop asked if the artist might come and paint the interior of St. Victor, the village’s 1,100-year-old Romanesque church, whose plain stone walls had become dull and decrepit over time. Moix, who isn’t religious, was reluctant. Finally, after many months of negotiations, he agreed — but only if he’d be granted full artistic license, free from conceptual obligations to church or state. “I was clear that I would not paint saints or martyrs,” he says.What he ended up producing is his largest piece to date, some 1,200 square feet of frescoes that cover most of the church, which he describes as a “huge garden full of fantasy.” This new Eden — painstakingly mapped out in his Brooklyn studio — abounds with psychedelic daisies, spotted salamanders, beasts with tentacles and copulating sheep, all rendered in cloudlike swaths of grass green, cornflower yellow and strawberry pink. After assistants sanded and plastered St. Victor’s walls (and covered up some mediocre art), Moix spent three years in Saurí, off and on, painting these scenes directly onto the building’s surfaces for up to 15 hours a day using handmade boar-bristle brushes and organic pigments diluted with water. “Like human skin and tattoos,” he says, “the colors will continue to absorb for months to come.”The motifs that appear in this Fauvist natural world are central to Moix’s work, though he says that what he found more inspiring was the opportunity to strip a place of worship of its religious iconography. (St. Victor, which has welcomed parishioners continuously since its founding in the ninth century, closed during the transformation, but will open again this month.) “Churches used to strike fear with images of demons and fire,” Moix says. “I loved the idea of overwhelming with colors instead.” The Catalan government and the diocese that hired him agree; its members conceived of this residency — which will expand to pair other regional artists with neglected Catholic properties — as a way of replacing the once-vibrant biblical paintings that had filled hundreds of churches in the region before they were sold or stolen.In painting St. Victor, Moix was joining a storied tradition: The Catholic Church is, of course, responsible for much of the Christian world’s greatest artistic endeavors. But he is also part of a more recent movement, one that sees contemporary artists remaking religious spaces. Earlier this year, the American painter Julie Mehretu converted an out-of-use Harlem church into a soaring studio where she made giant, 32-foot-wide paintings (now on display at the San Francisco Museum of Modern Art) and occasionally hosted visitors. The U.K.-based sculptor Gareth Neal and the designer Chris Eckersley recently reskinned one London church, and Neal will hold a solo show in another this March. And this winter, a space inspired by Romanesque chapels that was designed by the late Ellsworth Kelly will be unveiled at the Blanton Museum of Art in Austin, Tex.It’s easy to dismiss these projects as opportunistic, a way of claiming magnificent buildings that have been left behind in increasingly godless times in service of the art world’s love of larger-than-life spectacle. But Moix sees the commission as a way to revive a region — one currently fraught with conflict — that he once called home. “I want to give something to the locals that they can be proud of,” he says. Occasionally, as he’s been painting, Saurí residents have popped in, offering approving nods, or even prayers. In those moments, Moix just lets them be.
Women Cracked Wartime Codes. They Can Fix Tech Today, Too. Before she died in 2016 at age 94, Ann Caracristi, the first female deputy director of the National Security Agency, liked to reminisce about the absurd stereotypes that women had to contend with back when she entered public service during World War II. Chief among these — she found it somewhat amusing — was the notion that women are not as intellectually gifted as men.Genius is a male trait, it was widely believed in the 1940s. The thinking went that men are the brilliant sex, while women are better suited for tedious tasks requiring humble virtues like patience and focus. Typing, for example. Or filing. Or — in the case of Caracristi, whom I interviewed for a book on female code breakers — sorting and categorizing. In 1942, newly graduated from Russell Sage College, Caracristi was recruited to work in the stuffy attic of a former girls’ school in the Washington area that had been converted to a secret military code-breaking office. The staff, many of them young women like her, sorted reams of intercepted Japanese messages and pioneered new techniques.Caracristi’s own brilliance soon announced itself: She and her female boss, a schoolteacher from West Virginia, broke a code that enabled the American military to pinpoint the location of Japanese troops. Caracristi would rise to become one of the most storied women in the National Security Agency.More than 70 years after that war ended, it is astonishing to see doubts re-emerge about women’s ability to do high-level intellectual work. Far from being put to rest, old prejudice has found new expression in naysayers like James Damore, the Google engineer, now fired, who suggested in an infamous memo that women are shut out of top jobs in Silicon Valley because they are not “biologically” suited to the brain work of tech.When most Americans think about our veterans on Veterans Day — and all too infrequently in between — they often think of acts of valor as fixed in an earlier era. But the story of our country’s female veterans, pressed into service at a trying time, can tell us a lot about challenges we face today, as can the contributions of those civilian women, like Caracristi, who played a critical role in the wartime military effort.In certain important ways, the early 1940s were a progressive, experimental era in which the military recruited from many quarters. That era can give us clues to performing better in all sectors today. During the worst, costliest, bloodiest war in American history, it was an inclusive mind-set that helped the Allies defeat the Nazis.Women were key to any number of wartime advances, but their presence was crucial in intelligence and communications, as well as in the arena that combines both: signals intelligence, or code breaking. World War II was a war of encrypted signals. As armies and navies fought in distant corners of the globe, combatants developed myriad code and cipher systems to cloak their radio and telegraph communications, and code breaking came into its own as a way to eavesdrop on enemy plans.More than half of the American code-breaking force was female — roughly 10,000 women. Many were college graduates who had been shut out of graduate schools and excluded from fields such as math and engineering, and who now had a place for their talents.Even before America’s formal entry into war, women formed an important part of the civilian staff in clandestine offices that were attempting to break Japanese and European systems. One such was Genevieve Grotjan, a mathematician who aspired to teach college-level math but was unable to find any university math department willing to hire her. She joined a team trying to break “Purple,” a cipher-generating machine used by Japanese diplomats.The team labored for more than a year; in September 1940, Grotjan spotted the coincidence that broke the cipher. The breakthrough provided key intelligence for the entire war and those officials privy to the contents called it “Magic.”Once the attack on Pearl Harbor brought America into the war, the country’s code-breaking offices were enlarged. As men were shipped overseas as fast as ships could get them there, military leaders — and Congress — realized that the United States could not staff a multi-ocean war using only men, and so women’s military groups were created.Women went to work in air traffic control towers and, despite fears they would become hysterical in a crisis, kept their wits. In addition to the millions of female factory workers, women ran radios and radar, worked as chemists, bacteriologists and gunnery instructors — and calculated weapon trajectories.Those who tested high for aptitude were routed into two top-secret code-breaking centers in the Washington area, one for the Army and one for the Navy.Other women joined the Office of Strategic Services, forerunner of the C.I.A. A Vassar math professor, Grace Hopper, helped develop the Navy’s Mark I computer. A team of women programmed the Army’s first large-scale, general-purpose digital computer. (Programming at the time was considered somewhat secretarial, which is why women were employed to do it.)It’s not too much of a stretch to say that inclusion — the willingness to welcome genius — is one reason the right side won the war. The country also benefited from the contributions of other marginalized groups, including Navajo code talkers, Tuskegee airmen and other black troops (including women) serving in a segregated military.There is a lesson here for the tech bros. Economists have long been mystified by the impulse to discriminate, given that shutting out any group deprives society of advances. Studies show that diverse teams get better results. Inclusion never entails “lowering the bar.” It enlarges the pool of talent and brings the best people in.To be sure, even during the war, inclusion was seen as a temporary emergency measure, and the spectacle of tens of thousands of young women boarding trains to the nation’s capital unnerved many. Ads and posters featured plaintive children asking, “Mother, when will you stay home again?” After the war, backlash set in. The female code breakers got very little public credit for their achievements, and credit would be a long time coming for towering figures like Grace Hopper. And so here we are: The notion that genius is a male trait has once again raised its head.In today’s rhetorical climate, it’s not just a handful of entitled engineers who feel empowered to impugn certain groups. The same animus lies behind the Trump administration’s eagerness to exclude refugees, and behind the proposed ban on transgender people serving in the military. In gratuitously acting to exclude willing citizens from military service, the president has declined to avail himself of the array of ingenuity and courage this nation has to offer.World War II is a reminder that, when freedom hung in the balance, inclusion kept us safe. It’s also a reminder that our military once took the lead on social change at a time when more families felt connected to military service. Now we are greatly divided. We’re losing a key military edge and could lose a technical one, if we give in to the notion that some groups are more gifted than others. History has shown that exclusion tends to be the approach of, as Donald Trump might put it, the losers.
A Lesson From the Biggest Losers: Exercise Keeps Off the Weight It is a question that plagues all who struggle with weight: Why do some of us manage to keep off lost pounds, while others regain them?Now, a study of 14 participants from the “Biggest Loser” television show provides an answer: physical activity — and much more of it than public health guidelines suggest.On average, those who managed to maintain a significant weight loss had 80 minutes a day of moderate activity, like walking, or 35 minutes a day of vigorous exercise, like running.The researchers conducting the new study did not distinguish between purposeful exercise, like going to the gym and working out, and exercise done over the course of the day, like walking to work or taking the stairs.Guidelines from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, by comparison, call for at least 150 minutes a week of moderate exercise, or 75 minutes a week of vigorous exercise for healthy adults.The study was published on Tuesday in the journal Obesity. The lead author, Kevin Hall, chief of the Integrative Physiology Section at the National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and Kidney Diseases, and his colleagues also presented their work at the Obesity Society’s annual meeting.Although the study is very small and must be replicated, Dr. Hall said, it is the first to assess obese people years after they lost weight with state-of-the-art methods to measure the calories they had consumed and the amount of exercise they had done.The researchers did their measurements when the contestants were chosen, and again at six weeks, 30 weeks and six years after the contest began.“The findings here are important,” said Rena Wing, a psychiatry professor at Brown University and a founder of the National Weight Control Registry, which includes more than 10,000 people.The food eaten “is the key determinant of initial weight loss. And physical activity is the key to maintenance,” she said.The study also helps explain why that might be. One consequence of weight loss among the “Biggest Loser” participants was a greatly slowed metabolism.The subjects were burning an average of 500 fewer calories a day than would be expected, Dr. Hall and his colleagues found. In essence, their bodies were fighting against weight loss.Those who kept the weight off “are countering the drop in metabolism with physical activity,” Dr. Hall said.During the initial weight loss, the equation was different. Then, the difference between how much weight “Biggest Loser” contestants lost could be explained by the number of calories they cut from their diets. The amount of exercise did not distinguish those who lost more from those who lost less.The contestants competed for six months to see who could lose the most weight. Participants followed a grueling diet and an exhausting exercise program.Contestants’ average weight at the start of the show was 329 pounds. At the end, it was 200 pounds, a 129-pound loss. But six years after the study ended, their average weight rebounded to 290 pounds, just 38 pounds less than when they started.That average, though, hid wide variations.To learn more, Dr. Hall and his colleagues divided the group of 14 into two. There were the “regainers,” the seven participants who ended up after six years weighing five pounds more on average than they had at the start.And there were the “maintainers,” the seven who maintained an average weight loss of 81 pounds.To measure the number of calories the contestants burned, the researchers asked the subjects to drink “doubly labeled water,” in which hydrogen and oxygen atoms are at least partially replaced by stable isotopes, which have a different atomic mass.The oxygen isotopes appear in carbon dioxide exhaled by subjects, which allowed the researchers to estimate the average amount exhaled each day. The more calories burned, the more carbon dioxide exhaled.Some “Biggest Loser” contestants — including the first author, Dr. Jennifer Kerns, now an obesity specialist at the Veterans Affairs Medical Center in Washington — said the conclusions of the new study confirmed their own experiences.Dr. Kerns, a contestant in Season 3 of the show, says she has managed to keep off 100 pounds only by tracking everything she eats and by exercising on an elliptical cross-trainer for 35 to 40 minutes a day. In addition, her job requires her to walk around the hospital seeing patients.She has learned that she cannot relax this regimen if she wants to maintain her weight. “My natural tendency is to regain,” she said.Erinn Egbert was a candidate for Season 8 of the “Biggest Loser” but ultimately did not make the cut. So she went home “to figure it out on my own.”She hired two trainers and followed a diet and exercise program while she finished her senior year at Ohio State University. She weighed 237 pounds when the show began and lost about 120 pounds.She has maintained a weight that is just eight pounds more. She does it with rigid portion control and regular, intense exercise — 45 minutes to an hour a day, Monday through Saturday, doing the Beachbody programs, a challenging combination of strength training and cardiovascular exercise.Ms. Egbert, who is 30 and lives in Lexington, Ky., says she learned the importance of working consistently to stay thin, even with a slowed metabolism.“You have got to keep at it every single day,” she said.It’s a difficult task for virtually anyone, Dr. Kerns said: “The amount of time and dedication it takes to manage one’s food intake and prioritize exercise every day can be an untenable burden for many people.”“It’s totally unfair to judge those who can’t do it,” she added.Dr. Hall agreed. “The idea that people who regain lost weight are necessarily slothful and gluttonous is an unfortunate stigmatization that is not based in fact,” he said.Danny Cahill, who is 47 and lives in Tulsa, Okla., is among those who found it increasingly difficult to keep up the sort of regimen he needed to avoid gaining weight.He won the “Biggest Loser” competition in Season 8. He weighed 430 pounds when the show began, and lost 239 of them.For the four years after the show, he exercised more than two and a half hours a day and gained back just 40 pounds.Then the injuries began, forcing him to cut back his workouts to one and a half hours a day. His weight crept up to 235 pounds.The next year, “my body just started breaking down,” he said. “I had a foot injury, a wrist injury. I couldn’t keep it up.” And he was exhausted.His weight went up to 300 pounds. For the last two years, his weight has remained stable at about 340 to 350 pounds, “but only because I am eating as very little as I can,” he said.“That’s the disheartening part,” Mr. Cahill said. Losing the pounds is one thing. Keeping them off?“I am still struggling with it,” he said.
Finally, You Can Have Breakfast at Tiffany There are certain movie scenes that are so iconic that they still retain their importance in the pop-culture lexicon, even decades later. When Holly Golightly, played by Audrey Hepburn, stepped out of a yellow cab and sauntered to the window of Tiffany & Co. in the 1961 film “Breakfast at Tiffany’s,” with Henry Mancini and Johnny Mercer’s “Moon River” playing in the background, such a scene was created.As Holly ate a croissant and carried a cup of coffee, she was still, unfortunately, on the outside of the building. Since 1837, Tiffany’s has been a preeminent luxury jeweler and not a place where you could actually have breakfast. However, that changed on Friday, with the opening of the Blue Box Café, at the company’s venerable flagship store at Fifth Avenue and West 57th Street in New York City. Menu items will be seasonal and reflect a sophisticated take on a variety of New York dishes.Located on the fourth floor of the building, which houses a recently renovated home and accessories section, the café is a bright, airy space, with the “Breakfast at Tiffany” breakfast starting at $29. The offering comes with coffee or tea, followed by a croissant and seasonal fruit and rounded out with your choice of a buttermilk waffle, smoked salmon and bagel stack, truffle eggs, or avocado toast.The prix fixe lunch, which includes a starter and main courses like the Fifth Avenue salad, with Maine lobster, grapefruit and poppyseed dressing, and an olive-oil poached salmon, with caviar and smashed potatoes, costs $39.With a nod to the long-heralded regality of the location, there is also a “Tiffany Tea” menu offering ($49), featuring teas by Bellocq, as well as a selection of finger sandwiches and bakery items. Individual sweets and warm beverages are also available, from an espresso ($5) to a slice of chocolate mousse cake ($12).The café, outfitted with tables that can accommodate many different group sizes, is accentuated by heavy usage of the company’s classic robin’s-egg blue motif on everything from the walls to the plates. Only two blocks from the southern boundary of Central Park, the café has an excellent window view of the popular destination.With many traditional retailers losing customers at their brick and mortar locations to online competitors, there has been an increased focus on cultivating experiences for shoppers. Tiffany’s recently opened a temporary concept store in Manhattan’s Rockefeller Center, with another location set to open in nearby Grand Central Terminal. Both stores will feature a selection of jewelry, home items and accessories.According to Reed Krakoff, the chief artistic officer of Tiffany & Co., who led the redesign of the café and the adjoining home and accessories section, there was an emphasis on showcasing modern luxury. “The space is experimental and experiential – a window into the new Tiffany,” Mr. Krakoff said in a statement.For generations of Hepburn fans, the outsized presence of the flagship store has allowed them to retrace her steps from the movie, but now they can truly have breakfast at Tiffany’s, 56 years after the film’s release.
What Explains U.S. Mass Shootings? International Comparisons Suggest an Answer When the world looks at the United States, it sees a land of exceptions: a time-tested if noisy democracy, a crusader in foreign policy, an exporter of beloved music and film.But there is one quirk that consistently puzzles America’s fans and critics alike. Why, they ask, does it experience so many mass shootings?Perhaps, some speculate, it is because American society is unusually violent. Or its racial divisions have frayed the bonds of society. Or its citizens lack proper mental care under a health care system that draws frequent derision abroad.These explanations share one thing in common: Though seemingly sensible, all have been debunked by research on shootings elsewhere in the world. Instead, an ever-growing body of research consistently reaches the same conclusion.The only variable that can explain the high rate of mass shootings in America is its astronomical number of guns.The top-line numbers suggest a correlation that, on further investigation, grows only clearer.Americans make up about 4.4 percent of the global population but own 42 percent of the world’s guns. From 1966 to 2012, 31 percent of the gunmen in mass shootings worldwide were American, according to a 2015 study by Adam Lankford, a professor at the University of Alabama.Adjusted for population, only Yemen has a higher rate of mass shootings among countries with more than 10 million people — a distinction Mr. Lankford urged to avoid outliers. Yemen has the world’s second-highest rate of gun ownership after the United States.Worldwide, Mr. Lankford found, a country’s rate of gun ownership correlated with the odds it would experience a mass shooting. This relationship held even when he excluded the United States, indicating that it could not be explained by some other factor particular to his home country. And it held when he controlled for homicide rates, suggesting that mass shootings were better explained by a society’s access to guns than by its baseline level of violence.If mental health made the difference, then data would show that Americans have more mental health problems than do people in other countries with fewer mass shootings. But the mental health care spending rate in the United States, the number of mental health professionals per capita and the rate of severe mental disorders are all in line with those of other wealthy countries.A 2015 study estimated that only 4 percent of American gun deaths could be attributed to mental health issues. And Mr. Lankford, in an email, said countries with high suicide rates tended to have low rates of mass shootings — the opposite of what you would expect if mental health problems correlated with mass shootings.Whether a population plays more or fewer video games also appears to have no impact. Americans are no more likely to play video games than people in any other developed country.Racial diversity or other factors associated with social cohesion also show little correlation with gun deaths. Among European countries, there is little association between immigration or other diversity metrics and the rates of gun murders or mass shootings.America’s gun homicide rate was 33 per million people in 2009, far exceeding the average among developed countries. In Canada and Britain, it was 5 per million and 0.7 per million, respectively, which also corresponds with differences in gun ownership.Americans sometimes see this as an expression of deeper problems with crime, a notion ingrained, in part, by a series of films portraying urban gang violence in the early 1990s. But the United States is not actually more prone to crime than other developed countries, according to a landmark 1999 study by Franklin E. Zimring and Gordon Hawkins of the University of California, Berkeley.Rather, they found, in data that has since been repeatedly confirmed, that American crime is simply more lethal. A New Yorker is just as likely to be robbed as a Londoner, for instance, but the New Yorker is 54 times more likely to be killed in the process.They concluded that the discrepancy, like so many other anomalies of American violence, came down to guns.More gun ownership corresponds with more gun murders across virtually every axis: among developed countries, among American states, among American towns and cities and when controlling for crime rates. And gun control legislation tends to reduce gun murders, according to a recent analysis of 130 studies from 10 countries.This suggests that the guns themselves cause the violence.Skeptics of gun control sometimes point to a 2016 study. From 2000 and 2014, it found, the United States death rate by mass shooting was 1.5 per one million people. The rate was 1.7 in Switzerland and 3.4 in Finland, suggesting American mass shootings were not actually so common.But the same study found that the United States had 133 mass shootings. Finland had only two, which killed 18 people, and Switzerland had one, which killed 14. In short, isolated incidents. So while mass shootings can happen anywhere, they are only a matter of routine in the United States.As with any crime, the underlying risk is impossible to fully erase. Any individual can snap or become entranced by a violent ideology. What is different is the likelihood that this will lead to mass murder.In China, about a dozen seemingly random attacks on schoolchildren killed 25 people between 2010 and 2012. Most used knives; none used a gun.By contrast, in this same window, the United States experienced five of its deadliest mass shootings, which killed 78 people. Scaled by population, the American attacks were 12 times as deadly.In 2013, American gun-related deaths included 21,175 suicides, 11,208 homicides and 505 deaths caused by an accidental discharge. That same year in Japan, a country with one-third America’s population, guns were involved in only 13 deaths.This means an American is about 300 times more likely to die by gun homicide or accident than a Japanese person. America’s gun ownership rate is 150 times as high as Japan’s. That gap between 150 and 300 shows that gun ownership statistics alone do not explain what makes America different.The United States also has some of the weakest controls over who may buy a gun and what sorts of guns may be owned.Switzerland has the second-highest gun ownership rate of any developed country, about half that of the United States. Its gun homicide rate in 2004 was 7.7 per million people — unusually high, in keeping with the relationship between gun ownership and murders, but still a fraction of the rate in the United States.Swiss gun laws are more stringent, setting a higher bar for securing and keeping a license, for selling guns and for the types of guns that can be owned. Such laws reflect more than just tighter restrictions. They imply a different way of thinking about guns, as something that citizens must affirmatively earn the right to own.The United States is one of only three countries, along with Mexico and Guatemala, that begin with the opposite assumption: that people have an inherent right to own guns.The main reason American regulation of gun ownership is so weak may be the fact that the trade-offs are simply given a different weight in the United States than they are anywhere else.After Britain had a mass shooting in 1987, the country instituted strict gun control laws. So did Australia after a 1996 shooting. But the United States has repeatedly faced the same calculus and determined that relatively unregulated gun ownership is worth the cost to society.That choice, more than any statistic or regulation, is what most sets the United States apart.“In retrospect Sandy Hook marked the end of the US gun control debate,” Dan Hodges, a British journalist, wrote in a post on Twitter two years ago, referring to the 2012 attack that killed 20 young students at an elementary school in Connecticut. “Once America decided killing children was bearable, it was over.”
Vast Indigenous Land Claims in Canada Encompass Parliament Hill PIKWAKANAGAN FIRST NATION, Ontario — Whenever Prime Minister Justin Trudeau or his cabinet ministers speak in certain parts of Ontario or Quebec, they begin by acknowledging they are on “unceded Algonquin territory.”That recognition is just one of the ways Mr. Trudeau’s government has been trying to signal a top priority: righting the wrongs Canada has done to indigenous people, especially over land that aboriginals say was taken from them unjustly.But finding common ground on this issue has proved to be one of Mr. Trudeau’s most difficult policy initiatives, and critics say efforts to resolve the land disputes have bogged down. But both sides agree on the importance of sorting out the claims.“The process of negotiating land claims should be an absolute pillar of reconciliation,” said Ken Coates, a historian at the University of Saskatchewan who studies treaties and is a consultant to indigenous groups. “This is our chance to get it right and if we don’t — boy, when will we get the chance again?”Of the many issues dividing Canada’s federal and provincial governments from its indigenous people, land claims are among the most symbolically important and economically consequential, often involving vast amounts of land.Some claims involve hundreds of millions of dollars, and tribes are often interested in controlling the land at issue, by, for example, having a say over logging, oil exploration and mining.One claim by various Algonquin groups involves the 8.9 million acres of the Ottawa watershed — which includes Canada’s Parliament buildings and Supreme Court. The government thought it had settled that claim in principle a year ago, but it has ended up in litigation anyway.The claims are legally thorny, often requiring historians, archaeologists, geographers and geologists to give evidence sometimes stretching back before recorded history to support, or challenge, them.In some regions, land may have been occupied by different indigenous groups at different times, even changing hands after battles that were unrecorded. These groups may all assert rights, and claims can overlap.Then there is the problem of treaties. Some indigenous groups, like the Algonquins, never signed treaties giving up their land. The government says it is talking with about 140 indigenous groups in that situation.Others did sign treaties, and a government tribunal that deals with treaty disputes has 72 cases and is so overwhelmed that it cannot estimate how long it will take to resolve them.The result is that settlement negotiations occur at a frustratingly slow pace.“Because there’s so many cases that haven’t been dealt with over the years, there’s been such a big backlog, it’s going to take years,” said Regional Chief Craig Makinaw of the Assembly of First Nations, the country’s largest indigenous organization. “Nothing’s really moved.”But a few claims have been resolved.After 20 years of talks, Parliament in 2014 approved a deal  with the Tla’amin First Nation, involving land along the coast north of Vancouver. It gave the members of this indigenous group ownership of about 21,000 acres, upfront payments of 42 million Canadian dollars and then annual compensation of more than 700,000 Canadian dollars for resources, like lumber, harvested from the land.The Supreme Court of Canada ruled last year that the Métis, people of indigenous and European ancestry, could also assert land claims in areas where they have traditionally lived. About a month later, Carolyn Bennett, the minister in charge of negotiations with indigenous groups, formally committed the government to settle with the Métis of Manitoba, who were promised about 2,150 square miles of land 147 years ago.That claim includes the city of Winnipeg, although the Manitoba Métis leadership has said that it does not intend to take land now owned by others. Ultimately, government land outside of the city will likely be transferred.Sabrina Williams, the spokeswoman for Ms. Bennett, said the government is trying its best to find a way to sort out the claims. “We believe that we need to do more to be able to construct a relationship that has never before been achieved with success,” she said.But Chief Makinaw, a Cree from Alberta, says the government’s figures for outstanding claims are understated and its processes fossilized. And other indigenous leaders are critical that the government has not set aside money indigenous groups say they need to assume control over their land after claims are settled.“This government is good at talking a lot but not very strong on action,” said Chief Jean Guy Whiteduck of Kitigan Zibi, an Algonquin reserve in Quebec about 70 miles north of Ottawa.Of all the outstanding land issues, the Algonquin claims involving the Ottawa watershed, a huge swath of territory in eastern Ontario and western Quebec, are perhaps the most complex in the country.The land conflict there started for the Algonquins in 1800, when a group of settlers established a town near the Chaudière Falls, just upstream from where Canada’s Parliament now sits. Over the years, the land the Algonquins controlled shrank to just a few reserves. Some groups of Algonquins were left with no land at all.About 25 years ago, Algonquin groups started formal talks with the federal government, and later the province of Ontario, about resolving their claims. Last October, the Algonquins of Ontario, and the provincial and federal governments, reached a land agreement in principle.About 4,000 Algonquins would get 117,000 acres of government-owned land and about 300 million Canadian dollars. They would also have a say over the management and planning of even larger area of government owned land. .But the Algonquins in Quebec declined to take part in the talks and rejected the deal. They are now in court in Ontario to try to rip up the agreement, and to get more money and an increased role in any future use of the land.“We want to be partners in Canada and not just stay on the reserve,” said Mr. Whiteduck, a former bush plane pilot.An Algonquin leader on the Ottawa side said he regrets the rift and wants to bring Quebec into the agreement. But Kirby Whiteduck (many unrelated Algonquins in the area share surnames), chief of the Pikwakanagan First Nation, west of Ottawa, said he was not prepared to spend years trying to heal the divide.“We don’t want to be sitting here 50, 100 years later when there’s five million people in the territory and just 50 acres of crown land left,” he said.Jean Guy Whiteduck said that even as the Quebec Algonquin push for a different deal, they recognize the reality of European settlement and are not interested in seizing or taxing homes on private property — or displacing politicians on Parliament Hill. But they still appreciate the symbolic importance of the claims in Ottawa.“Our action also includes Parliament and the Supreme Court land because we want to stir it up good to try and get some action from them,” he said.Some of the disputed land ended up in the hands of an Ottawa company, the Windmill Development Group, which is now, along with a financial partner, spending 1.4 billion Canadian dollars on a development project, known as Zibi, that includes condos, offices, restaurants and stores. The property encompasses parts of the banks of the Ottawa River in both Ottawa and Gatineau, Quebec.As a private company building on privately owned land, Windmill has no legal obligation to compensate indigenous groups or negotiate with them. But Jeff Westeinde, a principal at Windmill, believes that even as a private property owner, he has an obligation to reconcile with indigenous communities for past wrongs.“As private citizens I think we should do something,” Mr. Westeinde said. “We committed apartheid, there’s no if ands or buts about it. Success for us will be a community where my Algonquin friends can come down here and say: ‘Yes, that’s my community too.’”
Chinese Village Keeps Alive a Tradition of Indigo Dyeing DALI VILLAGE, China — The young woman sat at the foot of the wooden loom and began to weave. As her fingers passed the orange shuttle back and forth through the delicate cotton threads, the creaky contraption sprang to life.Yang Xiuying — a plucky woman no taller than the loom — peered over her granddaughter’s shoulder, inspecting the newly emerging fabric for flaws. Ever since she was a young girl, Ms. Yang, 74, has been weaving and dyeing indigo textiles using techniques that the ethnic Dong in the southern Chinese province of Guizhou have passed down from mother to daughter over generations.“You can’t buy this type of handmade cloth at the market,” Ms. Yang said, patting a bolt of gleaming indigo-colored cloth with her wrinkled, navy-stained hands.Here in Dali, an ancient village nestled in verdant hills, making indigo cloth has long been a part of life, no less important to the Dong than farming rice or fermenting fish.Even in this era of fast fashion, many Dong women still devote countless hours to making the dark, glossy cloth. The fabric must be woven, wrung, scrubbed and pounded before it can be used to create traditional Dong cotton garments — dark navy costumes with colorful flower trim for the women and plain indigo for the men.“For a Dong family, having a loom is just as important as having a cow,” said Lai Lei, the founder of a weaving and dyeing co-op in a nearby village. “As children, we grow up listening to the sound of the loom.”Dyeing is so woven into Dali’s culture that the practice even survived the Cultural Revolution, when many other Dong traditions, such as shamanism, were stamped out by communist fanatics trying to destroy what they saw as a feudal past.But the traditions have come under a different threat since China’s market economy took off in recent decades. As the lure of work and education has drawn youth to China’s growing cities, few young Dong women are left in villages like this one.Of those who remain, even fewer show interest in learning the labor-intensive techniques of indigo dyeing.“I want to teach my daughters, but they don’t want to learn,” said Zhang Yuyuan, 75, as she stepped back from plunging fabric into a navy-blue bath. “They say, ‘We’ll just mess it up, so you should just do it.’”Hoping to save Dali’s folk traditions, provincial officials in 2011 invited in the Global Heritage Fund, a preservation organization based in California.The Global Heritage Fund has begun working with Atlas Studio, a Beijing-based design studio, to set up a weaving and dyeing co-op in Dali. The aim is twofold: to create opportunities to work closer to home and to persuade young Dong women to learn their traditions.“For a long time, Guizhou has known that one of its strongest cultural resources is the ethnic minority villages,” said Kuanghan Li, the China program director of the Global Heritage Fund. “Now rural villages are a hot topic in China.”Tourism has yet to take off in Dali, though it may only be a matter of time. Unlike many villages in China where preservation has been undertaken with a heavy hand, the village has the feel of an untouched oasis, due in part to its remote location.Even today, it is accessible only by a narrow mountain road that winds through lush bamboo forests before descending down into a valley where sloping gray-tiled rooftops huddle closely together.A recent visit to the village found the few hundred or so residents hard at work. Nearly every family grows its own rice and indigo, and both were ready for harvest.In the busy autumn mornings, it is the Dong women who wake first. The roosters were still asleep and the sky dark when Yang Xiukui stepped outside to start her day’s work. She folded a long length of indigo cloth and lay it onto a flat stone surface.Using a heavy wooden mallet, Ms. Yang, 55, began to pound the fabric. With each thump, the cloth grew brighter, acquiring a shiny gloss. That luster — achieved through the application of cowhide extract and, at times, egg whites — is prized by Dong women. When they wear their handmade indigo clothes for holidays and festivals, the women will inspect the sheen of one another’s handiwork in the spirit of friendly competition.As Ms. Yang worked, a chorus of roosters joined the plinking of mallets to awaken the village. Sleepy children stumbled to school along stone-paved paths while older people kibitzed on doorsteps of traditional wooden homes.Ms. Yang brought the now-gleaming indigo cloth to a covered plastic tub in the corner of her still dark kitchen. She removed the lid, releasing a pungent, fermented odor. Inside was a dark blue, frothy liquid.Almost every Dong woman over 40 has a plastic tub to hold indigo dye bath. By tradition, the placement of the tub within the house is crucial, and must be made according to principles of feng shui, the ancient practice of arranging objects to improve one’s luck.One year, Ms. Yang said, she placed the tub in another part of the house, not realizing it had bad feng shui. The dye — which is made from a mixture of indigo leaves, rice alcohol, wild plants and lye — was ruined, she said.Dong women believe that other factors can spoil the dye. Women who are pregnant or menstruating, for example, are expected to stay away. Ms. Li of the Global Heritage Fund recounted one time when it became apparent that a dye bath had been ruined because the cloth wasn’t turning color.“All the women looked around at each other and just said, ‘O.K., who here is pregnant?’” she said.Ms. Yang plunged the fabric into the dye bath, making sure to soak each section thoroughly. Several rounds of soaking and drip-drying later, she hung the heavy cloth on a wooden pole to dry. After a quick meal of chili fermented fish, sautéed vegetables and rice, she hopped onto the back of her husband’s motorbike and headed out for a full day of harvesting rice in the fields. It was only 9 a.m.The next morning, Ms. Yang repeated the entire process. In total, it takes Dong women about two weeks to color a single bolt of cloth into the desired rich shade of indigo.“They say whoever has the darkest stains on her hands makes the best cloth,” Ms. Yang said proudly, as she held out her purple-streaked hands.
Where Self-Driving Cars Go to Learn PHOENIX — Three weeks into his new job as Arizona’s governor, Doug Ducey made a move that won over Silicon Valley and paved the way for his state to become a driverless car utopia.It was January 2015 and the Phoenix area was about to host the Super Bowl. Mr. Ducey learned that a local regulator was planning a sting on Lyft and Uber drivers to shut down the ride-hailing services for operating illegally. Mr. Ducey, a Republican who was the former chief executive of the ice cream chain Cold Stone Creamery, was furious.“It was the exact opposite message we should have been sending,” Mr. Ducey said in an interview. “We needed our message to Uber, Lyft and other entrepreneurs in Silicon Valley to be that Arizona was open to new ideas.” If the state had a slogan, he added, it would include the words “open for business.”Mr. Ducey fired the regulator who hatched the idea of going after ride-hailing drivers and shut down the entire agency, the Department of Weights and Measures. By April 2015, Arizona had legalized ride-sharing.Arizona has since built upon the governor’s action to become a favored partner for the tech industry, turning itself into a live laboratory for self-driving vehicles. Over the past two years, Arizona deliberately cultivated a rules-free environment for driverless cars, unlike dozens of other states that have enacted autonomous vehicle regulations over safety, taxes and insurance.Arizona took its anything-goes approach while federal regulators delayed formulating an overarching set of self-driving car standards, leaving a gap for states. The federal government is only now poised to create its first law for autonomous vehicles; the law, which echoes Arizona’s stance, would let hundreds of thousands of them be deployed within a few years and would restrict states from putting up hurdles for the industry.“We are in the Wild West phase of autonomous vehicles, where companies are looking for the state with the least amount of sheriffing going on,” said Henry Jasny, senior vice president at Advocates for Highway and Auto Safety, a nonprofit based in Washington.The payoff for Arizona has been a tech boom, with dozens of autonomous vehicle companies flocking here to set up operations. Every day, Waymo, the driverless car business owned by Google’s corporate parent Alphabet, as well as Uber, Lyft, General Motors and Intel now deploy hundreds of cars that drive themselves on the streets of Phoenix, a sprawling metropolis of 1.4 million people.Some companies have pushed boundaries by conducting first-of-its-kind experiments in the state. Waymo announced this past week that it had begun testing self-driving cars in the Phoenix suburb of Chandler without an employee at the wheel to take over in an emergency. Until then, all driverless car trials had a human driver in the front seat, just in case. Uber said it was also exploring similar tests, with employees moving to the back seat.But Arizona’s permissiveness has drawn criticism from safety advocates who said the companies have too much freedom to conduct their trials on public roads. They said car companies and state officials have not solved questions about the privacy of passengers, the prevention of cyberattacks on autonomous cars, and how to insure vehicles that don’t have a driver.“It’s open season on other Arizona drivers and pedestrians,” said Rosemary Shahan, president of Consumers for Auto Reliability and Safety, a nonprofit that has pushed for stronger state and federal rules. “There is a complete and utter vacuum on safety.”Arizona officials said the public is essentially protected by basic rules that require a licensed driver somewhere in the driverless car. They added that they planned to take a back seat to the experts when it comes to rule-making. The state insurance regulator, for example, said he would wait for the insurance industry to guide regulators on liability policies for driverless cars, amid questions about who is responsible in a crash if the car isn’t driven by a human.“We shouldn’t be getting in the way by prescribing regulations when we really don’t know how the equipment will perform,” said John Halikowski, director of the Arizona Department of Transportation.The state’s hands-off approach has already been tested. In March, Arizona experienced its first crash involving a driverless car, when a human-driven vehicle collided with a self-driving Uber in the Phoenix suburb of Tempe. The case was quickly resolved because police said Uber’s car was not at fault, but some Arizona officials acknowledged they have not thought through all the legal scenarios with autonomous car accidents.“We embrace innovation,” said Mark Mitchell, the mayor of Tempe. “But there are some things we’ll have to look at moving forward.”Mr. Ducey, a native of Ohio who came to Arizona for college and then stayed, was elected governor in 2014 on a pro-business and innovation platform. He quickly lifted restrictions on medical testing for companies like Theranos, a Silicon Valley company that later faced scrutiny for its business practices. He also touted Apple’s decision to build a $2 billion data center in the state.“We can beat California in every metric; lower taxes, less regulations, cost of living, quality of life,” he said several months after he became governor.In early 2015, Mr. Ducey’s shutdown of the sting operation that would have hit Uber and Lyft had an immediate effect. Days after his decision, which the companies were made aware of by his staff, Lyft and Uber executives called the governor to thank him.At the time, Uber already had a small operation in Arizona for mapping roads. Two months later, the company announced it would open a center in Phoenix for customer and driver support with 300 employees.By August 2015, Mr. Ducey was taking his first steps into driverless vehicles. That month, he signed an executive order supporting autonomous cars. Under that order, any driverless car could be on Arizona roads as long as a passenger had a license and the car had a basic liability insurance plan.Mr. Ducey also set up a “Self-Driving Vehicle Oversight Committee” comprised of transportation, public safety, insurance and other regulators to advise “how best to advance the testing and operation of self-driving vehicles on public roads.” The group was not intended to create any new rules.And Mr. Ducey became a pitchman.Early last year at a global economic forum on the Georgia coast, Mr. Ducey said he approached Eric Schmidt, the chairman of Alphabet, with a business card and talking points on the state’s embrace of self-driving automakers. Shortly thereafter, Waymo scoped out Chandler to begin autonomous car tests.Chandler’s officials sealed the deal with further promises to stay out of the way. “We don’t think it’s our role to be engaged in regulation,” said Micah Miranda, Chandler’s director of economic development.Waymo opened operations in Chandler in August 2016, hiring dozens of local test drivers. The company hosted a grand opening with Mr. Ducey and Chandler’s mayor, and held several community events to win over the public.“The enthusiasm for new tech from the public and Governor Ducey makes Arizona a place where innovation can thrive and companies like ours can set up roots,” said Waymo.Mr. Ducey also traveled to Silicon Valley to visit driverless car companies and investors. In late 2016, he stopped by Andreessen Horowitz, a venture capital firm in Menlo Park, Calif., that has invested in companies including Lyft, which is working on self-driving technology. There, Mr. Ducey found an inquisitive audience about the state’s regulation-free policy for self-driving cars.“Although Washington gets much of the attention, a lot of the real action on tech policy is taking place at the state and local level,” said Ted Ullyot, an Andreessen Horowitz partner who attended the meeting. “Governor Ducey is a key pro-innovation leader, making Arizona a highly welcoming environment for autonomous vehicles and other emerging technologies.”Arizona particularly stood out against other states. In the absence of federal rules, 33 states have created their own laws and regulations around the new technology. Many are taking a more legislation-heavy approach.In California, Google, Uber, GM, and Ford have fought lawmakers on self-driving rules. One rule required carmakers to report on the number of times a driverless car switched from autonomous mode to human-driven mode, which irked automakers who said those statistics give a misleading impression of safety.Last December, Uber clashed with California regulators when it tested its self-driving cars in San Francisco without permission from the California Department of Motor Vehicles. The company was quickly ordered to shut down its trials.Uber’s executives called Mr. Ducey.“We responded by saying we weren’t going to hassle them,” Mr. Ducey said of Uber. “I’d be remiss if I didn’t thank my partner in growing the Arizona economy, Jerry Brown,” the Democratic governor of California.Days later, Uber loaded a fleet of driverless sport utility vehicles onto semi trucks headed for Tempe. The company now has several dozen driverless cars in a garage there that is the size of two football fields, with plans to add more cars.“Governor Ducey’s prioritization of the sharing economy has made the Grand Canyon State an ideal environment for our self-driving pilot,” Uber said.Under Mr. Ducey, driverless car experiments in Arizona have multiplied over the last year.Uber’s self-driving Volvo SUVs now pick up customers around Tempe on a daily basis. Waymo has dispatched more than 100 Chrysler self-driving minivans to chauffeur select families and other residents as part of a closely guarded trial; the company plans to expand to 600 vehicles by the end of the year, with the majority in Chandler. And dozens of vehicles for GM, Ford, Intel, and Lyft are also covering thousands of miles a day on the flat and sun-drenched roads around Phoenix.Some residents are ambivalent. Groups representing the blind are enthusiastic supporters of driverless cars, which could give their members more independence. Others like the idea of tech-related jobs coming to the state. But some are cautious.“I’m on the fence,” said Jake Guadarrama, 22, a Phoenix area resident. “What if the battery died on the car and it goes out of control? And will it take way from the work force?”Those questions are not just academic. Already, the incorporation of driverless cars into human-driven traffic has run into problems.Around dusk on March 24, for example, Alexandra Cole, a Tempe resident, inched her 2008 Honda CRV into a busy suburban intersection in the city. With five seconds left on the pedestrian crossing signal and no cars coming toward her in the two closest lanes, she began a left turn.She did not see Uber’s self-driving Volvo SUV darting through the yellow light in the furthest lane toward her. The cars collided. Uber’s vehicle flipped onto its side and crashed into two more cars waiting in traffic.The crash — Arizona’s first with a driverless vehicle — was soon resolved. There were no injuries and police said Ms. Cole, and not Uber’s car, was to blame for failing to yield on a left turn.But what happened after the accident revealed a system that was unprepared for computer-operated vehicles. Mr. Ducey, Tempe officials and state transportation regulators did not get briefed on the collision. The self-driving task force set up by the governor, which has met twice in two years, also did not review the incident.Uber sent its wrecked vehicle to its Pittsburgh-based autonomous vehicle center, which the National Highway Transportation Safety Administration officials visited to investigate. N.H.T.S.A. said it could not comment because its investigation is still in progress. Ms. Cole and her insurance company declined to comment.If the crash had turned into a criminal case, police would likely have asked for data from the self-driving cars. If the carmakers refused, they might have sought warrants for the data — a practice that put the Federal Bureau of Investigation and Apple into a fierce battle last year related to unlocking an iPhone used by a suspect in a mass shooting. Waymo and Uber said their policies are to comply with local laws wherever they operate.Insurance would also have been a question, with debate over who takes responsibility in a driverless car crash — the company or the third-party software or parts makers or the passenger with a license — since there is no driver.“The insurance companies need to figure out how they will insure this,” said Stephen Briggs, a spokesman for Arizona’s Department of Insurance. Arizona hasn’t changed its minimum insurance liability rules for self-driving car trials. “The government doesn’t have the resources to do this.”Angel Carbajal, Tempe’s assistant chief of police, acknowledged there are many unknowns. “This is new, so there isn’t a lot of legislation yet that explains how to respond to motor vehicle collisions involving autonomous vehicles,” he said.For Mr. Ducey, none of this is a problem. He said the crash was handled properly and that even if driverless technology is not fully ready, the state’s bet on autonomous vehicles will continue.“These are cultural opportunities for Arizona to be seen as a place to live, work and play,” he said.
Plugging Into the Gig Economy, From Home With a Headset DURHAM, N.C. — The gathering in a private dining room at a Mexican restaurant had the fervent energy of a megachurch service, or maybe an above-average “Oprah” episode — a mix of revival-style confession and extravagant empathy. There were souls to be won.“By the end of the day, Kelly’s going to be an agent,” the group’s square-jawed leader said. “Kelly went through the process a while ago, then life happens, now she’s back. Her commitment to me that she made earlier, she looked me right in the eyes and told me she’s going to be an agent.”Paradise, for these pilgrims, lies at one end of a phone line.The company behind this spectacle, Liveops, had invited several dozen freelance call-center agents to a so-called road show. Some of them may have answered your customer-service calls to Home Depot or AAA. All were among the more than 100,000 agents who work as independent contractors through on-demand platforms like the one Liveops operates, which uses big data, algorithms and gamelike techniques to match its agents to clients. What Uber is to cars, Liveops is to call centers.The agents are part of a tectonic shift in how jobs are structured. More companies are pushing work onto freelancers, temps, contractors and franchisees in the quest for an ever more nimble profit-making machine. It is one reason a job category seemingly headed offshore forever — customer service representatives — has been thriving in call centers and home offices across the United States, supporting roughly three million workers.While critics of the arrangement cite rising insecurity, some of Liveops’ star agents — like Emmett Jones in Chicago, who knows of his rivals primarily as numbers on a leader board — say the opportunity has been transformative.The earnest gratitude of the agents assembled here, not far from the Raleigh-Durham Airport, affirmed that. To them, Liveops is a sustaining force, a way to earn a living while being present at home. A few had driven hours to attend. Many brought friends and family members who were considering joining “Liveops Nation,” too.There were icebreakers (“Liveops Nation Bingo”). Gift-card raffles (“$150?” the chief executive quipped. “Who approved these things?”). Free enchiladas. Everyone was invited to schmooze.“John, I heard your story about how you got to us is pretty great,” said the master of ceremonies, an impossibly sunny woman named Tara. “Would you mind telling all these people?”When the mic came to John, a former insurance claims adjuster with a gray beard and several earrings, there was a sense of imminent revelation.“I was working in another glass box over near here for six years,” he began. “I reached the point where it was either jump off the roof or walk out the front door.” The other agents laughed knowingly.He continued: “My commute now is I walk down the hall, close the bedroom door behind me.” More laughter.Then John’s voice softened: “This is good, this is good. I get paid for when I’m working, instead of souring when you get paid for 40 hours and work some more. So, I’m here.”“Awesome,” Tara said, applause drowning her out. “I feel like John’s story mimics a lot of what we hear from people.”According to Greg Hanover, a longtime Liveops official who became chief executive this summer, the company’s goal is to make agents feel as if they’re part of a movement, not just earning a wage.“Where we want to be with this is what Mary Kay has done, multilevel marketing companies,” Mr. Hanover said, referring to the cosmetics distributor and its independent sales force. “The direction we need to head in for the community within Liveops Nation is that the agents are so happy, so satisfied with the purpose and meaning there, that they’re telling their story.”It’s an ambition that feels almost radical compared with Uber, whose best-known exercise in worker outreach is a video of its former chief executive berating a driver. It was heartening to discover that on-demand work could be both financially viable and emotionally fulfilling.That is, until I began to speak with Mr. Jones and some of his Liveops competitors. The more you talk with them, the more you detect a kind of Darwinian struggle behind the facade of community and self-actualization. You start to wonder: Is there really such a thing as a righteous gig-economy job, even if the company is as apparently well intentioned as Liveops? Or is there something about the nature of gig work that’s inescapably dehumanizing?Mr. Jones, who lives in Chicago, was the top rated Liveops agent for an insurer called TruStage for much of this year.An AT&T technician for decades, he decided that he needed to be at home not long after his wife was diagnosed with vertigo in 2008. “I can’t work and be worried about how she’s doing,” he said.A few years later, when his daughter told him of a friend who worked with Liveops, he was eager to sign up — but refused to send in his required voice test until it was close to perfect. “I must have did the voice test four or five times,” he said. “I wanted to make sure I gave the right tone that they were looking for.”As a Liveops agent, Mr. Jones sells life policies to callers, often those who have just seen a television commercial for TruStage insurance. He estimates that he works roughly 40 hours each week, beginning around 8 most mornings, and that he makes about $20 an hour. He is such a valued worker that TruStage invited him to its headquarters earlier this year for a two-day visit by an elite group of agents, in which executives pumped them for insights about how to increase sales.Roughly two decades ago, Liveops and its competitors typically connected callers to psychic hotlines, and in some cases less reputable services. Such businesses had frequent spikes in call volume, making it helpful to have an on-demand work force that could be abruptly ramped up.“The only thing people were interested in was the abandonment rate” — that is, the number of people who would hang up in frustration from being kept on hold — said Kim Houlne, the chief executive of a Liveops rival called Working Solutions, which she founded in 1996.The call center industry took a hit during the 2001 recession, when cost consciousness unleashed a wave of outsourcing to India. But within 10 years, many companies decided that the practice, known as offshoring, had been oversold. The savings on wages were often wiped out by lost business from enraged customers, who preferred to communicate with native English speakers.“People don’t feel comfortable,” Ms. Houlne said, alluding to the overseas agents.By the early part of this decade, quality was in fashion. The enormous amounts of data that companies like Liveops and Working Solutions collect allowed them to connect callers to the best possible agent with remarkable precision, while allowing big clients to avoid the overhead of a physical call center and full-time workers.Today, in addition to sales calls, Liveops agents handle calls from people trying to file insurance claims, those in need of roadside assistance, even those with medical or financial issues relating to prescription drugs. The agents must obtain a certification before they can handle such calls, which sometimes takes weeks of online coursework.Liveops goes to great lengths to attend to their needs, addressing technical-support issues, even answering agents’ emails to the chief executive within 24 hours.Mr. Jones, like many of his fellow agents, thinks of himself as helping others in need. He said that many families will gather around a table after a loved one has died to discuss the burial. If the deceased relative had no insurance, he said, “A lot of times that table is going to clear.” If, on the other hand, he had even $2,000 in life insurance — the minimum that TruStage sells — “the family members are more inclined to say, ‘He did what he could, let me see what I could do to help out.’ You end up with $5,000 to $6,000. You can do a decent burial rather than none at all.”Still, there is undeniably a brass-tacks quality to the work. Shortly after we hung up, I turned my attention to an assignment due that afternoon, only to receive more calls from Mr. Jones’s number. When I finally answered, he apologized for interrupting me, then came to the point. “I have a question for you,” he said. “Do you have life insurance?”Like Uber, Liveops expends considerable effort calculating demand for its agents. For example, if an auto insurance company is running a commercial on ESPN, Liveops will ask the company’s media buyer — that is, the intermediary that placed the ad — to predict how many calls such an ad is likely to generate. Liveops will adjust that prediction, using its own data showing how many calls similar ads have produced from similar audiences during a comparable time of year.And like Uber, the Liveops focuses on “utilization” — in the Liveops case, the percentage of working agents actually on a call. Depending on the client, Liveops strives for rates of 65 percent to 75 percent. Lower than that and the agents, who make money only when they’re on a call, will complain that they’re not busy enough. Significantly higher and the system is vulnerable to a sudden increase in demand that could tie up the phone lines and keep callers waiting.Liveops asks agents to schedule themselves in half-hour blocks, known as “commits,” for the upcoming week. If the company expects demand to be higher than the number of commits, it sends agents a message urging them to sign up. (Uber does something similar, except without formal scheduling.) Sometimes it will even offer financial incentives, like a bump in the rate earned for each minute they’re on a call, or a raffle-type scheme in which people accumulate tickets for the giveaway of an iPad or a cruise.Again like Uber, Liveops relentlessly tests the effectiveness of these tools. Referring to financial incentives, Jon Brown, the Liveops senior director of client services, said, “We’ve zeroed in on exactly what we need for an agent to go from 10 to 15 commits, from 15 commits to 20 commits. We know where the price point is, what drives behavior.”And then there are the performance metrics. Liveops agents are rated according to what are called key performance indicators, which, depending on the customer, can include the number of sales they make, their success at upselling customers, and whether a caller would recommend the service based on their interaction.Liveops makes clear that its agents’ ability to earn more money is closely tied to performance. “You’ve heard the term meritocracy?” said a Liveops official named Aimee Matolka at the North Carolina event. “When a call comes in, it routes in to that best agent. Yes, our router is that smart. You guys want to be that agent, I know you do. Otherwise you wouldn’t be here.”It allows the agents to track their rankings obsessively through internal leader boards. (Liveops officials say that while the pressures of the job can preoccupy agents, it is up to them how much time to invest.)“I lost the No. 1 spot, now I’m No. 2,” Mr. Jones said in early August, acknowledging that he checks his ranking frequently. “I thought about researching to find out who it is — you always want to know who’s the competition — but I said leave it.”He added: “I’m a competitive person. We just toggle back and forth. If they see me jump back in, they work harder. They want that spot back.”My flight to Bangor, Me., was due after 9 p.m., and apparently sensing my unease with the North Country, the firefighter seated next to me asked if I had to far to drive when we landed. “About three hours north,” I confessed. “Watch out for moose,” he said. I assured him I’d driven around deer before. He stopped me short: If you hit a deer, you’ll kill them, he said. If you hit a moose, they’ll kill you.I found Troy Carter, the agent who had recently surpassed Emmett Jones, at his home in Fort Fairfield the next day, wearing jeans, a button-down short-sleeve shirt, and a New England Patriots hat. There were no shoes on his feet, only white socks.Like Mr. Jones, Mr. Carter said Liveops had been a blessing, allowing him to earn a living in a part of Maine so remote that my cellphone carrier welcomed me to Canada shortly after I pulled into his driveway.When I told Mr. Carter that I had been in touch with his top competitor, he quickly pulled up the latest monthly rankings of Liveops agents selling TruStage insurance. He pointed out that while Mr. Jones, whom he recognized only by his identification number, 141806, had more sales — 87 to his 82 — he had far fewer paid sales, charged at the time of purchase rather than by invoice.“The real thing is the paid application rate — they want it around 95 percent,” Mr. Carter said. “He has 87 sales, but only 65 percent paid, compared to my 94 percent.” This, he explained, was why he enjoyed the right to call himself the top agent for the month.Mr. Carter is what you might call a serial entrepreneur. He once started an art supply website that folded within a few months, and a penny auction site called Bid Tree that foundered for lack of a marketing budget.He sees Liveops, on which he spends 40 to 50 hours per week, as of a piece with these entrepreneurial efforts. In fact, it is something of a family business. His wife, Lori, handles incoming calls while he’s busy with customers. “I’m a housewife/secretary/receptionist,” she said. Even Mr. Carter’s 9-year-old son, Logan, plays a role. “At nighttime, he says the last part of his prayer based on how many sales I did today,” Mr. Carter said. “If it was a lot of sales, he’ll pray, ‘Dear Lord, help my dad get the same amount of sales tomorrow.’”Though Liveops agents work from a script, Mr. Carter, like Mr. Jones, adds his own flourishes. Before asking a caller’s gender, as he is required to do, he will say, “Now I already know the answer to this question, but please confirm if you’re male or female.” Upon receiving the answer, he will pause momentarily before saying, “I told you I already knew the answer,” and break into a laugh.He might make this identical joke, with identical timing, dozens of times in a workday. “It’s like a comedian has a little pause before a joke,” he told me. “It relaxes them right off.”Even with these touches, results can vary widely. Two days earlier, Mr. Carter had made seven sales, only a few shy of his record. The day I turned up, he managed only one. He said some callers had the impression they could receive $25,000 of insurance for $9.95 per month — the commercial mentions both figures — and begged off when Mr. Carter told them that their premiums would be substantially higher.Mr. Carter has done research on how to comport himself, including watching an instructional YouTube video by the former stockbroker who was the subject of the movie “The Wolf of Wall Street.” He believes the key is to come off as the alpha presence. “The one that asks the most questions is the one in control,” he said. “If they ask me questions — ‘How are you doing?’ — I’ll come back, ‘The question is how are you doing?’ This is my phone call, as much as I can make it.”But on this day he repeatedly ran up against the limits of his powers. Even those who remained interested after 10 or 15 minutes of painstaking back-and-forth often demurred when Mr. Carter asked them for payment information. “This one guy was outside in a wheelchair,” Mr. Carter said of a caller who couldn’t produce his credit card. “He didn’t want to go in and get it. I said, ‘I’m fine waiting,’ but I can’t push him.”These setbacks only seem to make Mr. Carter focus more. At one point, he made a swiping motion between his face and his headset with his index finger and middle finger. “They recommend that you keep the microphone two fingers away,” he said. “I’m always doing that — checking that it’s two fingers. I’ll do that for the rest of my life.”It seemed, all in all, like a grueling way to make the slightly more than $30,000 that Mr. Carter estimates he takes in before taxes. “The good thing is he can take hours off,” Lori told me. “But then he can lose his spot. It’s always a fight for the top.”I was reminded of the Alec Baldwin monologue from the movie “Glengarry Glen Ross,” except that the prize for having the most sales wouldn’t be a Cadillac, it would be a set of steak knives, because the Liveops analytics team had calculated that agents would give nearly as much effort for a prize worth a small fraction of the cost.Of course, unlike the salesmen in that movie, the Liveops agents can’t really be fired — the third prize — because they weren’t employees to begin with.A while later, Mr. Carter described a recent initiative in which agents were promised a bonus if 95 percent of their collective sales were paid up front. “I knew it wasn’t going to work as soon as they said it,” he told me, because a handful of agents with low paid rates could ruin everyone else’s chances.“They did do a pullover sweatshirt for the top two,” he added, brightening. “I was second, so that’s coming.”
Trans-Pacific Trade Partners Are Moving On, Without the U.S. HONG KONG — President Trump shook up the world economic order this year by pulling the United States out of a major international trade pact and raising fundamental questions about its global role.Today, the world is moving on without it.A group of 11 countries announced on Saturday that they had committed to resurrecting a sweeping multinational trade agreement, the Trans-Pacific Partnership, without the United States. A new deal, which would have to be signed and ratified by each country, would include major United States allies like Japan, Canada and Mexico. Collectively, they account for about a sixth of global trade.The agreement will “serve as a foundation for building a broader free-trade area” across Asia, Taro Kono, Japan’s foreign minister, said in a statement.Pointedly, the potential members of what is now called the Comprehensive and Progressive Agreement for Trans-Pacific Partnership came to an early agreement on the broad outline of a deal while many of their leaders were meeting with Mr. Trump in Vietnam — itself a potential member of the new trading group.Some details of a new deal, including when rules would be phased in, still need to be determined, and prospective member states like Canada raised last-minute concerns. But a new deal could be announced as soon as early next year.Other countries are slowly but surely making progress on their own sweeping trade deals, without any participation from the United States. China is negotiating a potential deal with 16 Asia-Pacific countries, including Japan, India and South Korea. The European Union and Japan hope to strike separate trade pacts with a group of South American countries, Brazil and Argentina among them.From tough talk on China (“they took our jobs”) to casting doubt on the decades-old North American Free Trade Agreement (“the worst trade deal ever made”), Mr. Trump has threatened to lob a grenade at an increasingly integrated global economic system.His administration has questioned years of efforts to lower global trade barriers, arguing that they hurt American workers and led to big trade deficits. It also means dealing with nations one-on-one, rejecting the regional and global pacts his predecessors pursued.But other factors are pushing the rest of the world to fill the void left by the United States. China’s rise as a regional and economic power is driving other nations either to join with it or to join together to counter it. Fast development in places like Southeast Asia means potential new markets for all kinds of products. The absence of the United States means potential opportunities for others.“At some point, the administration may begin to see that this was a strategic mistake and that dropping out of trade is not in the interest of American workers,” said Rufus Yerxa, president of the National Foreign Trade Council, a lobbying group that represents companies like Walmart, Ford and Microsoft.“We’ve got to compete and be a winner in global markets — and the danger is, the strategy is divisive,” he added.More worrying for some is the possibility that the Trump administration is ceding its position as global leader to China, a rising economic and political influence in the region.“The U.S. has lost its leadership role,” said Jayant Menon, an economist at the Asian Development Bank. “And China is quickly replacing it.”Under the new Trans-Pacific trade deal, members would enjoy tariff-free trade with one another. That would allow companies in the member countries to have faster and better access to other markets than their American rivals.But there are still challenges ahead of the group, and not all the prospective member states meeting in Danang, Vietnam, were in complete accord over the finer details of a new deal.“We are pleased that progress is being made towards a possible agreement, but there is still some work to be done,” François-Philippe Champagne, Canada’s minister of international trade, said in a statement. He added that Canada would sign a deal only once its interests had been addressed.Even without the United States, the deal would be the largest trade agreement in history. It is intended to increase protections for intellectual property in some countries, while opening more markets to free trade in agricultural products and digital services around the region. It also has provisions on improving working conditions, although there is debate about the likely results.In a statement posted online, the Australian government said that the agreement in principle demonstrated the 11 countries’ “commitment to open markets, to combat protectionism and to advance regional economic integration.”The 11 countries working toward the new agreement are Japan, Australia, Canada, Mexico, Singapore, Malaysia, Vietnam, Chile, Peru, New Zealand and Brunei.Mr. Trump has expressed support for the nation’s regional allies even as he rejects or criticizes trade deals with them. He reiterated American support for cooperation on security during his stops in Japan and South Korea.In China, he went out of his way to woo President Xi Jinping, going so far as to suggest that the trade deficit with the United States was the fault of past American administrations rather than of China itself.“I don’t blame China,” Mr. Trump said in a tweet on Friday morning shortly before leaving for Vietnam.“The U.S. has been the driving force, not just behind the global economic order, but also pursuing higher standards on free trade and securing provisions that go way above the World Trade Organization obligations,” said Stephen Olson, a former United States trade negotiator who worked on Nafta. “If the U.S. abdicates that role, it puts us in uncharted territory,” he added.In the absence of American leadership, Japan has driven the new round of talks. Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has spoken of the countries working on an agreement as Ocean’s Eleven, after the movie.Japan’s long-term hope is that the United States will eventually return to the fold.“We will just go ahead and make it and we will welcome the United States back if they decide to do so,” said Ichiro Fujisaki, a former Japanese ambassador to Washington. Completing a deal now, he said, “makes the possibility of the U.S. coming back more likely.”The new agreement has been crafted with the hope that the United States will one day participate. Some of the provisions — among them ones that the United States lobbied for — could ultimately be suspended, including some on copyright protection.Given the intensity with which Mr. Trump excoriated the original deal, it seems unlikely that this administration will come back to the table.“It will be difficult for the administration to backtrack,” said Wendy Cutler, a former United States trade negotiator who worked on the Trans-Pacific deal and is now managing director of the Washington office of the Asia Society Policy Institute.But other countries like Korea, the Philippines and Thailand are expected to join once the deal is ratified, said Ms. Cutler.For members, the pact could offer a sense of security in a time when a number of politicians around the world are questioning the impact of trade and globalization.Speaking last week, Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull of Australia said the deal promised “greater transparency and a stronger rule of law, in a world which is dangerously short of both,” referring to the “siren songs of populists, advocating protectionism.”“The T.P.P. creates rules of the road to match the new economic world we are living in,” Mr. Turnbull said.Notably, the Trans-Pacific pact includes Mexico and Canada, which are at loggerheads with the Trump administration over Nafta. Mr. Trump has raised the prospect of the demise of that agreement, citing the movement of industrial jobs from the United States to those countries.“There is a genuine risk that the U.S. is going to further disengage from regional economic interaction,” said Christopher Nelson, editor of the Nelson Report, a foreign policy and trade newsletter. “And from the corporate standpoint, American companies are disadvantaged competitively if we’re not out there with both feet playing the game.”
When Your Uber Driver Brings a Time Machine The name next to the tiny photo of my Uber driver looked familiar, and so did the face. If it was him, I was in for one awkward (or interesting) ride with the ex-husband of the woman now married to my ex-husband.Wrapping up a business trip, I was standing outside a hotel in Silicon Valley. My meeting had ended sooner than expected so I was headed to the airport to try to catch an earlier flight to New York. Since I wasn’t in a rush, I had chosen the shared ride feature.I had two minutes to decide whether to cancel, as the car icon was closing in.I kept the reservation. I knew it was him.What are we to each other, two people whose ex-spouses are now married? The word must exist in some language, maybe French or Italian. Twelve years ago our marriages ended, and several months later our exes moved in together. His wife had been my husband’s assistant, then associate. Their work involved investing in start-up companies in Latin America, so they traveled often, and we spouses often tagged along.Back in the New York City area, we regularly had dinner at each other’s houses. I knew their children. Over time, they moved to the Connecticut town where my husband and I had a weekend house, which meant we saw them even more. I didn’t think much of it, though friends told me they thought it was creepy.The divorce shattered me. My husband and I had met near the end of college and shared a huge circle of friends. I was attracted to his fancy suburban background, a step up from my scrappier family where I was the first to graduate from college. We lived in Hong Kong, saw Angkor Wat and Easter Island.At first, our opposite natures felt complementary — my curiosity, his need for the familiar. The biggest difference, or so we thought, was that I wanted children and he didn’t. And if we weren’t going to have them, I wanted more of everything else: spontaneity and adventure. Yet he was ready to settle down. In suburbia, no less.We started unraveling. If we’d had children, we would have had a reason to fight for the marriage. At the time, I said the child issue was our undoing, but we knew it was more than that. We couldn’t make it past 10 years, when initial attraction often starts sliding into other kinds of marital love. And we both had turned to others for emotional support.Time really is the only thing that heals a wound like divorce. I can’t remember when I stopped thinking about my ex every day, but I realized — as my Uber driver wound his way through traffic toward me — that it had been ages since that whole mess had ruled my life. I can conjure up my ex’s face but not his smell or his voice. I don’t recall what it felt like to wake up next to his body.Over the past 12 years, I had barely thought of the guy whose face was now on my phone. He had emailed me after we each separated, looking for commiseration or help in his divorce case. I was too consumed by my own pain to reply.When his car pulled up, I saw a big, familiar smile through the windshield. He sprang out and said, “I had a feeling it was you!”After a long embrace, we got into the car, with me in the passenger seat instead of the back. It was oddly comfortable sitting next to him. He canceled the ride share passenger and we went to a cafe, where we sat for nearly two hours, chattering.We whipped out our phones to share photos. Weddings. Homes. Trips. A new wife and gaggle of stepchildren for him. A new husband and French bulldog for me. Full, happy lives. Or at least that’s what the photos suggested.It made me wonder what photos from our previous marriages would have suggested about those lives. Did we feel as contented then as we both appeared to feel now? Would others have been able to see something shattering behind the smiles?And that’s when we turned to a subject that once cut deeply for us both, though I can’t remember who asked first: Had our exes been physically involved before our splits? He didn’t know, and neither did I, though we didn’t think they had, at least not “technically.”Most startling, though, was how it no longer mattered — to either of us. That once-scalding question had lost its potency. But it took seeing him and talking about it to make me realize that.We quickly moved on. He knew my mother and best friend and wanted updates. I was thrilled to hear that his children were now promising young adults, details I could have gotten through my ex had I ever thought to ask in the occasional emails we trade. Boys who would remember me as their stepfather’s ex-wife.“He’s been a standup guy as a stepfather,” my Uber driver said.I assumed he was, even though it caused me terrible pain that he hadn’t wanted children in our marriage.“They were meant for each other,” we said nearly in unison, before rattling off the quirks that made them compatible and agreeing that we are all better off in our new couplings.I have been with my new love for 12 years, almost exactly as long as I had been with my ex. Two years ago we traveled to Italy. As we packed, I couldn’t help remembering another trip to Italy in my previous life, a trip for a 10th anniversary that marked the beginning of the end. On our first night in Positano, I lost my footing on the cobblestone streets and knew I had broken something.A local doctor confirmed it and gave me a shot of something alcoholic. The next day we flew home, cutting our trip short. The marriage never felt the same. That foot never felt the same either. Until recently, when I noticed my toes don’t feel numb anymore.When I met the man who is now my husband, I was 39 and he was 46; our window for having children was nearly closed. I knew he didn’t want them, yet I couldn’t pull away. I started to admit that maybe there was a reason I chose men who were skittish about fatherhood. It was easy to assign the decision to someone else.I still mourn that loss, but increasingly I’m at peace with it. Rather than going deep into a few key relationships, I have an ever-expanding collection of people in my life — extended family, younger friends, mentors of all ages. I have gratifying work, volunteering and time to read, travel, learn. None of this came out in the wave of photos, but looking at them made me see it.My Uber driver, whose tie to me still yearns for a name — perhaps my ex-once-removed? — wanted to make sure I didn’t miss my flight. So we returned to the car and headed to the airport, where we hugged again and promised to keep in touch.I immediately called my husband. We rarely talk when I travel, preferring to text and email. I come home to flowers and some little surprise near the mail. If I have taken a red-eye, I jump into bed with the man and pooch I have gotten a real chance to miss.This time I couldn’t hold it in. “You’ll never believe who my Uber driver was!” I said. And then I spilled the whole story. We were on so long, I nearly missed my flight.My husband was rapt, wanting every detail, even though he would see me in a few hours. And I was glad because, for years, he hadn’t wanted to hear about my first marriage, studiously avoiding the subject. But this had changed for him too, now that it was so far away.“That could have been a scene in a movie,” he said.In the movie version, though, I would have had a fling with the ex-once-removed. In real life, I got closure from the most unexpected source. I realized that connections at a distance, along with the passage of time, can offer telling reflections and a reminder that marriages can unravel in an instant. How could I ensure this new life wouldn’t break apart the way my last one had?Months later, to protest Uber’s business practices, I deleted the app, but with a twinge of regret. In a strange way, Uber had helped me sort out my feelings about the most significant men in my life and moved my current relationship into a more honest place. Who knew there was an app for that?
How the Myth of the Artistic Genius Excuses the Abuse of Women Can we now do away with the idea of “separating the art from the artist”?Whenever a creative type (usually a man) is accused of mistreating people (usually women), a call arises to prevent those pesky biographical details from sneaking into our assessments of the artist’s work. But the Hollywood players accused of sexual harassment or worse — Harvey Weinstein, James Toback, Kevin Spacey and Louis C.K., to name a few from the ever-expanding list — have never seemed too interested in separating their art from their misdeeds. We’re learning more every day about how the entertainment industry has been shaped by their abuses of power. It’s time to consider how their art has been, too.These men stand accused of using their creative positions to offend — turning film sets into hunting grounds; grooming young victims in acting classes; and luring female colleagues close on the pretext of networking, only to trap them in uninvited sexual situations. The performances we watch onscreen have been shaped by those actions. And their offenses have affected the paths of other artists, determining which rise to prominence and which are harassed or shamed out of work. In turn, the critical acclaim and economic clout afforded their projects have worked to insulate them from the consequences of their behavior.This idea of assessing an artist’s work in light of his biography is, to some critics, blasphemous. Roman Polanski’s 2009 arrest inspired a New York Times round table on whether we ought to “separate the work of artists from the artists themselves, despite evidence of reprehensible or even criminal behavior.” It stands as a useful artifact of the prevailing attitude on the question in the early 21st century. The screenwriter and critic Jay Parini wrote, “Being an artist has absolutely nothing — nothing — to do with one’s personal behavior.” Mark Anthony Neal, an African-American studies scholar at Duke University, put it this way: “Let the art stand for itself, and these men stand in judgment, and never the twain shall meet.”But Mr. Polanski stood charged of inviting a 13-year-old girl into Jack Nicholson’s hot tub on the pretext of photographing her as a model, and then drugging and raping her. The twain have met.A proclivity for reprehensible acts is built right into the mythos of the artistic genius — a designation rarely extended to women. This is what the historian Martin Jay calls “the aesthetic alibi”: The art excuses the crime. Mr. Jay writes that in the 19th century, artistic genius “was often construed as unbound by nonaesthetic considerations — cognitive, ethical, or whatever.” And often the ethical lapses afforded to artists have concerned the mistreatment of women.That tradition lives on today. Recently, the New Yorker film critic Richard Brody responded to sexual assault accusations against Mr. Weinstein by suggesting that while outside information about filmmakers “can be illuminating,” the “better a film is, the likelier that the biography only fills in details regarding what should already have been apparent to a cleareyed viewing.” That’s a bizarre calculation that dismisses discussions of bad deeds based on the talent of the person performing them. The journalist Gay Talese was blunter in his dismissal of Anthony Rapp, the “Rent” star who accused Kevin Spacey of preying on him when he was 14. “I hate that actor that ruined that guy’s career,” he said.Directors, meanwhile, have justified the mistreatment or plain resentment of women as a gritty artistic choice. Bernardo Bertolucci, the director of “Last Tango in Paris,”  boasted that he chose not to fully inform his lead actress, Maria Schneider, of all the details of the film’s infamous butter scene because he “wanted her reaction as a girl, not as an actress.” (“I felt humiliated and to be honest, I felt a little raped,” she said of the experience.) The director Lars von Trier has whipped misogyny into a persona, delighting in riling actresses and selling the stories to magazines as kicky evidence of his transgressive brilliance. The auteur, celebrated for tightly controlling all aspects of the filmmaking, seems only to enhance his reputation by flaunting his control of women.Meanwhile, the entertainment industry seems quite interested in conflating the art and the artist as long as it helps sell movie tickets. (If Hollywood weren’t invested in selling the people behind the art, the Oscars wouldn’t be televised.) Stars and power brokers are reflexively praised for their societal contributions. Even as they’ve been accused of harassment, Hollywood men have attempted to fend off the charges by trotting out such good deeds. Mr. Spacey cynically chose this moment to announce that he is gay in a bid to spin a harrowing assault tale into a heartwarming coming-out one. Mr. Weinstein countered accusations by dozens of women by mentioning his generous contributions to a scholarship fund for female directors. And Bill Cosby was more than happy to confuse his art with his personal life when he bellowed his old Fat Albert catchphrase — “Hey, hey hey!” — as he exited a courtroom this past summer during his trial for sexual assault.Louis C.K., one of the most respected and celebrated comedians today, has built a public persona that simultaneously capitalizes on the praise afforded to the provocative auteur and to the Hollywood do-gooder. He’s been hailed as a thoughtful feminist figure, a comic capable of landing unexpected jokes while navigating politically correct positions on the issues of the day. In a memorable bit in his 2013 HBO comedy special, “Oh My God,” he asks: “How do women still go out with guys when you consider the fact that there is no greater threat to women than men? We’re the No. 1 threat to women!” His stand-up routine is obsessed with masturbation but also infused with insights into power and consent, situating him as a kind of ethical pervert, the schlubby male-ally version of the fashionable sex-positive feminist.At the same time, he’s built alternative-world versions of himself — as in the FX show “Louie” — where he’s tried on the identities of aging creep, attempted rapist and exhibitionist masturbator. He’s also made his character the victim of similar crimes: Louie has been forced to perform oral sex on a date and been anally penetrated by his friend Pamela as he screams in protest. In each case, he recovers easily from the violation — just as Pamela shrugs it off after Louie tries to drag her, kicking and screaming, to bed with him. These episodes garnered acclaim as canny twists on gender politics, and their critical reception was clearly vaulted by their engagement with current debates around consent.These scenes now play differently. What once looked like creative provocations now read like justifications of a moral universe where women are as complicit in sexual violation as men are, and where sex that begins with force easily gives way to mutual desire.Men like Louis C.K. may be creators of art, but they are also destroyers of it. They have crushed the ambition of women and, in some cases, young men — boys — in the industry, robbing them of their own opportunities. The comedians Dana Min Goodman and Julia Wolov said that after Louis C.K. cornered them and masturbated in front of them at the U.S. Comedy Arts Festival in 2002, they feared that speaking out about the incident could risk their careers. While Louis C.K. felt free to flaunt the behavior throughout his comedy — in one scene of “Louie,” Pamela begs him not to start masturbating in front of her — the women were silenced. He took advantage of them, then took ownership of the experience.Another performer, Abby Schachner, said her own inappropriate run-in with Louis C.K. discouraged her from pursuing comedy altogether. (As he himself put it in an apology released on Friday: “The power I had over these women is that they admired me. And I wielded that power irresponsibly.”) Our assessments of men’s contributions to an art form ought to be informed by the avenues they have closed off for other artists.Perhaps, instead of considering the possibility of separating the art from the artist, it’s instructive to think of the impossibility of separating the artist from his industry. Louis C.K. is not just a comedian and director but also a gatekeeper and tastemaker, whose reach has stretched far beyond his idiosyncratic projects. Film is an art and also a business, though one that can lack the human-resources infrastructure of corporate America. No one makes that clearer than Mr. Weinstein, who stands accused of corrupting the artistic process to take advantage of women even as he has strong-armed his films to Oscar gold.Those offended by the opportunities artists have lost in recent weeks should know that casting choices that feel like artistic decisions have almost always been economic ones. After Ridley Scott chose to cut Mr. Spacey from his already completed film “All the Money in the World” and reshoot his scenes with Christopher Plummer, The Associated Press reported that Mr. Plummer was actually Mr. Scott’s first choice for the role. The studio, however, had demanded a bigger name — until that big name became a big liability.The habit of treating artists as transcendent creators rather than as players in an economic system serves to protect them from typical workplace expectations. And in the same way that a sneaker or technology company tries to distract the consumer from vile production processes by churning out covetable products, Hollywood serves up spectacles that seek to conceal the conditions under which they’re made.Many of these works make the consumer complicit in the perspective of the abuser. Even the casual objectification of, say, Brett Ratner’s “Rush Hour” series — so often written off as harmless fantasy — is constructed to elevate men’s desires over women’s lives. And some such scenes are leveraged by directors and producers looking for opportunities to place actresses in vulnerable positions, as when James Toback — director of such psychosexual films as “Two Guys and a Girl” — instructed Selma Blair to undress alone in his hotel room on the pretext that she was auditioning for a role.What do we do with these people? It seems uncontroversial that offenders who remain in positions of power ought to be unseated to prevent further abuses. As for the art, we can begin to consider how the work is made in our assessment of it.This conversation is often framed, unhelpfully, as an either-or: Whose work do we support, and whose do we discard forever? HBO cut ties with Louis C.K. on Thursday, dropping him from a coming benefit show and removing his comedy specials from its on-demand service. The first move seems wise, but the second feels perhaps counterproductive. Louis C.K.’s comedy specials are artifacts of both his comedic artistry and his self-justifying persona. Some viewers may not want to see Louis C.K.’s face again, but others could find illumination in watching his work with a new eye.None of this is to say that it’s never valuable to consider a piece of art on its own terms, or that biographical details necessarily make for illuminating connections. Many personal lives are simply boring, and works with well-meaning politics can be very bad. (See: Keith Urban’s new male-ally anthem, “Female.”) But the insistence that the two always be separated feels suspect. Some who advocate this worry that too much biography can spoil our appreciation of the art. But women and other marginalized audiences are already accustomed to managing the cognitive dissonance of finding meaning in art that ignores us, or worse.Drawing connections between art and abuse can actually help us see the works more clearly, to understand them in all of their complexity, and to connect them to our real lives and experiences — even if those experiences are negative. In this light, some aspects of the work can seem more impressive. The knowledge that Ms. Blair or Lupita Nyong’o weathered harassment in their careers only makes their performances even more extraordinary. If a piece of art is truly spoiled by an understanding of the conditions under which it is made, then perhaps the artist was not quite as exceptional as we had thought.
President Trump Finds His TV Niche in Softball Interviews “You came into this job fighting like hell,” Lou Dobbs said to President Trump, one of many compliments he offered in their recent Fox Business interview. “And you are fighting like hell every day.”Fact check: It depends. Sure, Mr. Trump plays the pugilist on Twitter, with N.F.L. players, legislators or whatever news show he happens to be watching at the time. But when it comes to TV sit-downs, the battler in chief now prefers pillow fights.After all, why grapple with a network news anchor when he can chat with Mike Huckabee, the father of his press secretary? On the Oct. 7 premiere of his show on the Christian-oriented Trinity Broadcasting Network, Mr. Huckabee hit the president with such humdinger questions as “Does it sometimes bother you that [the first lady] has such fantastic approval ratings?”Why go out of his way for aggravation when Sean Hannity will sit with him in front of a crowd at a Pennsylvania rally as the warm-up act? “Is he going to win Pennsylvania in 2020, too?” Mr. Hannity asked the cheering crowd, the political-interview equivalent of “Hello, Cleveland!”Previous presidents including Barack Obama and George W. Bush have had media strategies, focusing on local television or seeking out friendly patty-cake sessions with sympathetic questioners, along with submitting to more challenging interviews. And Mr. Trump has taken questions from various outlets in his impromptu press availabilities. But when it comes to scheduled TV sitdowns, for nearly half a year Mr. Trump has given interviews almost exclusively to friendly opinion hosts and conservative media outlets.The result has been such lovefests as the courtier-like session with Mr. Dobbs, who didn’t so much ask questions as open his mouth and let rose petals fall out. “President Trump,” he introduced the segment, “intends to restore and revive the fate and fortunes of not only our middle class but all Americans who aspire to it.”Even within Fox News, which fills Mr. Trump’s DVR with hours of daily pep talks, he chooses cozier digs. He dropped by the first week of Fox’s “The Ingraham Angle,” with Laura Ingraham, who spoke at his nominating convention. But he’s been scarce on the more straight-news-oriented shows of Bret Baier and Chris Wallace.The last time Mr. Trump sat for a TV interview outside his comfort zone was in May, with NBC’s Lester Holt. That was when he volunteered his mind-set in deciding to fire the F.B.I. director, James B. Comey, who was then leading the probe into Russian election interference. The president said to himself, he recounted, “‘You know, this Russia thing with Trump and Russia was a made-up story.’”There is no such danger in Mr. Trump’s safe space. But it also means he’s not reaching anyone beyond his base — a strategy that, the Republican drubbing in the off-year elections suggests, has its limits.For his die-hard fans, Mr. Trump sticks to his greatest hits: the media is “fake” (“one of the greatest terms of all I’ve come up with,” he told Mr. Huckabee); we’re going to build the wall; they said we couldn’t get to 270 electoral votes, but we got 306. (Ultimately 304.) He’s speaking to an audience that isn’t watching to see news made or questions answered but to hear, again: We won.Indeed, Mr. Trump’s interviews with his boosters hardly make news except by accident, as when he defended a lag in diplomatic hiring to Ms. Ingraham by saying, “I’m the only one that matters.”To understand Mr. Trump as a president, you have to remember that he was a celebrity first, and he still uses the media like a celebrity does. His first remark to Ms. Ingraham about the Republican tax bill was “We’ve gotten really great reviews,” as if he were plugging a new movie on “The Tonight Show.” He repeatedly gave Mr. Hannity his highest honor: praising his Nielsen ratings.In Mr. Trump’s first celebrity phase, as a brass-plated capitalist cartoon in the ’80s and ’90s, he was a media gadfly. He chased the cameras, planted his name in the tabloids and exchanged locker-room talk with Howard Stern. The point, then, was to be outrageous, to stir the pot. There was no such thing as bad attention.This was the approach that the candidate Trump used, keeping CNN and “Morning Joe” on speed dial, taking advantage of billions of dollars of free media to ensure that he was the protagonist of the election. For a while, in 2015 and 2016, he was freely available on TV, proving that he could shoot off his mouth in a Fifth Avenue studio and still not lose his voters.Mr. Trump’s second celebrity era was as the host, star and grand prize of “The Apprentice.” There, editors imposed a linear arc on his vagabond sentences, gave coherence to his impulsive decisions. “The Apprentice” had a vested interest in plumping him up — to be the best show, it needed to make him into the best businessman. It styled him to appear successful, decisive, wise, desired and obeyed.Now, as president, Mr. Trump has delegated the job of reality producer to friendly media outlets. Where other interviewers would challenge or press for details, his chosen hosts do the clarifying for him and offer him talking points couched as questions. “Are you getting the credit for this economic revival?” Ms. Ingraham asked.Above all, they offer affirmation, and Mr. Trump basks in it like the first warming light of creation. At the Pennsylvania interview on Oct. 11, Mr. Hannity engaged the home-team crowd as if hosting a live “Apprentice” finale. What did they think of Mr. Trump, he asked? (Yay!) What about Congress? (Boo!) And what about the media? (Booooo!)It’s that cheering crowd, one suspects, that is really driving the dynamic here. The point of all the delicate meringue questions is not simply to avoid challenging the president. It’s to avoid challenging the audience.These interviews are a reciprocal exchange for a closed circle. The base gets to cheer its leader and boo the haters. The interviewers get to prove their loyalty, presenting themselves as official Trump-endorsed products.And the president gets to end the exchange nodding and smiling, like someone who knows he has gotten the better part of the deal.
Louis C.K. Responds to Accusations: ‘These Stories Are True’ Louis C.K. on Friday released a statement in response to  a report published Thursday in The New York Times about  several women who stepped forward to discuss  experiences with him in which he committed acts of sexual misconduct. In his statement, Louis C.K. said, “These stories are true.”[Louis C.K. Admits to Misconduct as Media Companies Cut Ties]The complete statement from Louis C.K. appears below:I want to address the stories told to The New York Times by five women named Abby, Rebecca, Dana, Julia who felt able to name themselves and one who did not.These stories are true. At the time, I said to myself that what I did was O.K. because I never showed a woman my dick without asking first, which is also true. But what I learned later in life, too late, is that when you have power over another person, asking them to look at your dick isn’t a question. It’s a predicament for them. The power I had over these women is that they admired me. And I wielded that power irresponsibly. I have been remorseful of my actions. And I’ve tried to learn from them. And run from them. Now I’m aware of the extent of the impact of my actions. I learned yesterday the extent to which I left these women who admired me feeling badly about themselves and cautious around other men who would never have put them in that position. I also took advantage of the fact that I was widely admired in my and their community, which disabled them from sharing their story and brought hardship to them when they tried because people who look up to me didn’t want to hear it. I didn’t think that I was doing any of that because my position allowed me not to think about it. There is nothing about this that I forgive myself for. And I have to reconcile it with who I am. Which is nothing compared to the task I left them with. I wish I had reacted to their admiration of me by being a good example to them as a man and given them some guidance as a comedian, including because I admired their work.The hardest regret to live with is what you’ve done to hurt someone else. And I can hardly wrap my head around the scope of hurt I brought on them. I’d be remiss to exclude the hurt that I’ve brought on people who I work with and have worked with who’s professional and personal lives have been impacted by all of this, including projects currently in production: the cast and crew of Better Things, Baskets, The Cops, One Mississippi, and I Love You, Daddy. I deeply regret that this has brought negative attention to my manager Dave Becky who only tried to mediate a situation that I caused. I’ve brought anguish and hardship to the people at FX who have given me so much The Orchard who took a chance on my movie. and every other entity that has bet on me through the years. I’ve brought pain to my family, my friends, my children and their mother.I have spent my long and lucky career talking and saying anything I want. I will now step back and take a long time to listen. Thank you for reading.
It’s Melania 2.0, as Mrs. Trump Iterates in Asia The clues were in the coats.Melania Trump emerged from Air Force One for the Japan leg of her husband’s Grand Tour of Asia in a nubby Fendi knit coat that looked like nothing so much as an oversize grandpa cardigan, albeit one with quasi-carnations on the pockets. It was such a contrast from the coat dresses and suits she had worn during her first international trip — and even the tailored, constrained purple Pucci coat she wore to leave the White House a few days ago — that it was practically a banner held over her head announcing “things will be different this time.”And indeed, they were. As the trip itself ended on Friday, and Mrs. Trump arrived in Alaska in a three-quarter-length beige Prince of Wales Ralph Lauren puffer — let’s just say that again, “puffer” — coat over an orange turtleneck, leaving her husband to continue to Vietnam and the Philippines on his own, there had been a notable shift in her visual messaging. From a defensive posture, where much of her wardrobe seemed to function as armor, it had palpably softened up.Weird as it sounds, the look was what might be termed “calculated cuddly.” And not just when she was visiting children and cozying up to pandas — though the photo ops and the outfits were probably not unrelated. These were six days where every look was preplanned in advance, down to the shoes. All the choices were conspicuously conscious. This was not a case of standing in front of one’s closet, scratching one’s head, and thinking, “what do I feel like wearing today?”Yet almost everyone missed the change. Which is in itself worth noting.All the posturing that took place among designers a year ago about not dressing Mrs. Trump seems to have gone the way of Sean Spicer. (What can you do? She buys her clothes.) There were no complaints about the fact she wore not a single Asian designer while in Asia. Nor did people complain that she also wore very few American brands. There was no upset over the cost of her wardrobe, which ran well into the tens of thousands of dollars, and the elitism that implies.In part this may be because there is so much else going on that it can seem pointlessly distracting to pay any attention at all to what the first lady wears. But given the limited exposure of Mrs. Trump, and her carefully chosen and calibrated public appearances, the foreign trip provided a rare concentrated opportunity for understanding the strategic thinking in the East Wing, which has something to do with the West Wing.She may also have received less scrutiny because of … Hope Hicks, White House communications czar, and her tuxedo.Or, to be fair, her tuxedo worn with a floppy, dandified bow tie to the state dinner in Japan, accessorized with a Breck Girl blow out and fuchsia lipstick. The menswear-inspired suit was such an unexpected choice in an administration that constantly sends the message that girls should be girls even if they are in power positions (see Ivanka’s pink flounces, as well as Ms. Hicks’ usual chirpy dresses), that the internet started flapping and it didn’t stop even when Ms. Hicks appeared in what was generally deemed a “baggy” (in the words of the Daily Mail) fuchsia dress and black blazer at the China state dinner — and then another “baggy” shirt on the way to Vietnam.Though Ms. Hicks’ rise through the ranks has been marked by a clear propensity for remaining in the background, this time she became the story.Perhaps she was simply gearing up for what will clearly be a moment in public, when she is interviewed on her return to the United States by special counsel Robert Mueller as part of the Russia investigation. Perhaps it was a deliberate statement that she is in charge, after the so brief Anthony Scaramucci moment (remember that?).Either way, it took the spotlight completely off Sarah Huckabee Sanders and her eye-opening appearance in pearls and a camo jacket on the tarmac in South Korea during President Trump’s aborted attempt to make a “surprise” visit to the DMZ. This combination, inadvertent as it was (apparently Ms. Sanders borrowed the jacket from a helicopter pilot because she was cold), seemed almost the perfect expression of the Trump carrot and stick in sartorial form.It’s too bad Ms. Hicks and Ms. Sanders got so much of the attention, because there are lessons to be learned about how the first lady is managing her own issues of perception and her approach to her job, from the choices she made while abroad.The list of designers worn was long, and the price tags were high: Fendi, Alexander McQueen, Gucci, Pucci, Delpozo, Dior, Dolce & Gabbana, Christian Louboutin, J. Mendel, Manolo Blahnik, Valentino, the Row, Alaia (to name most of them). She made a nod, in China, to local aesthetics — at least as interpreted by Western eyes — with her Gucci quasi-cheongsam with its faux-pink-fur finish on the sleeves, mandarin collar and heavy stylized floral embroidery. But it was a rare concession to sartorial symbolism (and not a very good one, though it did perhaps inadvertently reveal the myopic way the administration sees that country). Mostly, she has stuck to speaking with silhouette. She’s not going to be an advocate for the industry in any overt way, but she’s still using clothing to her own ends.And there the overall imagery added up to something new.Hemlines were longer, and necklines higher. There were flats. There were a lot of dresses. Though Mrs. Trump wore two tailored black coats (Dolce & Gabbana and McQueen), and a tuxedo coat dress from Hervé Pierre, they were the exception, rather than the rule. The skirts were generally full, rather than straight; sleeves fluted or curved or caped or cap; cuts of the sort often labeled “generous” as opposed to “strict” or “knife-edge.”The effect was a line no longer harsh and rigorously drawn, but fluid.Metaphor? Subversion? Maybe. But given the carefully choreographed costume pageantry of such official trips, one year after the election first propelled her out of the gilded security of Trump Tower and onto the public stage, it was probably not a coincidence.
A New Fashion Hub? Eastern Europe In 2014, Magda Butrym, a young Warsaw-based stylist-turned-fashion designer, debuted a 35-piece collection of floral print dresses and blouses, finished with cutaway detailing and hints of leather and hand crochet.“I had always wanted to launch a label that was distinctly and proudly Polish,” said the 32-year-old designer, who is largely self-taught. “I wanted to create clothes inspired by Polish craftsmanship, manufactured here in Poland, and to have my design studio here, too. But I also knew that was not going to be easy.”She had worked in a number of small design businesses in Warsaw before starting the brand that bears her name. “There are no buyers here, there is no fashion week. No one is here to tell you how to do things, or where you need to get your foot in the door. I was taking a big risk.”Historically, Poland, and other Eastern European countries like Hungary and Romania, have never been considered high fashion destinations. Behind the scenes, however, close ties with the industry have existed for decades, with factories across the region quietly producing garments and accessories for Western European luxury houses from Louis Vuitton to Hugo Boss.Over the last decade, some of that business has moved elsewhere as companies hunt for cheaper labor and lower production costs, leaving many skilled workers without jobs. Now, a new generation of homegrown luxury entrepreneurs is building businesses that take advantage of that craftsmanship.In Hungary, the contemporary women’s wear brand Aeron was founded in 2012 by Eszter Aron, its head designer, and three friends, with Vivien Laszloffy joining the business as chief executive in 2015. The label’s philosophy, Ms. Laszloffy said, is to be a brand “that people will recognize and know is from Budapest, in the same way people look at Acne and know it’s from Sweden.”“People say it is against the odds to build a brand from here, rather than move to Paris or Milan, but actually we see it as an advantage,” she said. “Everyone has a vision in their minds of what a French or Italian brand looks like. But no one can imagine a brand from Budapest yet. And so we can seize that space and make it our own.”As a privately owned company, sales figures are not released. But the two women said sales doubled annually in each of the last three years, with the majority of growth coming from an unexpected region: Asia.After struggling to gain traction in the West, the pair looked eastward, where the brand’s minimalist aesthetic and techno-fabrics gained appreciation. More than 60 percent of its sales now come from the region: In Japan, Áeron is stocked in the major department store Isetan and in the fashion chain Tomorrowland, as well as in a string of boutiques across South Korea, mainland China and Hong Kong.Signing with Itochu, one of Japan’s largest trading companies, “catapulted us into a different league,” Ms. Laszloffy said. And the success abroad has boosted morale at home in four factories where the brand makes its leather, knitwear and ready-to-wear styles.“The workers have always worked for foreign companies; now they are part of a Hungarian success story,” she said. “Furthermore, being able to drive an hour or two and see collections as they are produced and who produces them, rather than being a plane ride away, is a huge advantage to us as a small business. We wouldn’t have it any other way.”Proximity to workshops and factories was what prompted Alexandru Adam, a Romanian footwear designer, to move to Bucharest after studying in London at Central St. Martins and the Royal College of Art and designing shoes for Vivienne Westwood. After introducing his own accessories and quality casual label, called Metis, in 2016, Mr. Adam initially intended to divide his time between the two cities. But after Britain’s vote to leave the European Union, he was prompted to think again.“The environment in the U.K. is becoming increasingly unstable and makes it hard to plan for the future,” Mr. Adam said from his atelier in Bucharest, where he is hiring craftsmen and women who once worked in factories that produced leather goods for Western luxury brands. He intends to adopt a see-now, buy-now approach to sales, taking orders that can be made and shipped from Romania in two to three weeks.“Most of my fashion designer friends that have their own brands are considering alternative options for when the U.K. will be out of the E.U.,” he said. “Everyone produces outside of the U.K. and most of the materials come from the E.U. anyway, from suppliers in France, Belgium, Italy and Romania.“Really, it just didn’t really makes financial sense for us to keep our company in London anymore,” he added.Across the Black Sea from Romania lies Georgia, another former Soviet republic. The fashion and arts scene of Tbilisi, its capital city, has caught the fashion industry spotlight, in large part because of Demna Gvasalia, founder of the cult street-wear label Vetements and creative director of Balenciaga. Now emerging designers still based in the region are reaping the benefits, too.N-Duo-Concept, the brainchild of Nina Tsilosani and Natuka Karkashadze, a former fashion writer for publications like Elle Ukraine and Harper’s Bazaar Kazakhstan, started life in 2014 as an e-commerce website championing lesser-known brands. A year later, they unveiled a clothing line under the same name and with a similarly offbeat aesthetic, produced in Tbilisi and now stocked in a number of foreign boutiques. They have a staff of 15 and are looking for outside investment.Ms. Butrym’s decision to introduce her brand from Warsaw has paid off: She is beloved by industry insiders and has 70,000 followers on Instagram, and her work is stocked by Net-a-Porter, Selfridges and Moda Operandi. Given her prices — which start at around $700 for blouses and $1,100 for shirts — the majority of sales are made outside Poland, in markets like the United States and Britain. But Ms. Butrym, who works on contract with four factories in Poland, said she has no plans to leave her homeland anytime soon.“It is a really exciting time to be working here and I wouldn’t want to be anywhere else,” Ms. Butrym said, noting that Vogue Poland is expected to debut early next year. “There is energy and optimism around young designers in Warsaw. People are paying attention to this region in a way they haven’t before.“Eastern Europe doesn’t have brands with heritage, and not everyone will be successful,” she said. “But there is a sense that something is really beginning in this region. And I like being a part of it.”
Review: On Violence and the Pain of Others in ‘Three Billboards’ At one point in “Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri,” Frances McDormand tears the movie open, showing you what a broken heart looks like. It happens during an uneasily intimate encounter between her character, a tough number named Mildred, and an ailing police chief, Willoughby (Woody Harrelson). Until then, Mildred has seemed impervious to his pain. She has rented three billboards attacking his failure to solve her daughter’s murder — one reads “Raped While Dying” — and has been so wrapped up in her hurt that she hasn’t seen anyone else’s. When she realizes how sick Willoughby is, she looks at him as if for the first time. She’s staggered, and so are you.The pain of others haunts “Three Billboards,” at least whenever the writer-director Martin McDonagh lets it. A playwright (“The Pillowman”) turned filmmaker (“In Bruges”) who’s somewhat of a subgenre unto himself, Mr. McDonagh is a pain artist whose tools include absurd violence, cruel laughs and sucker punches. He skated through his last movie, “Seven Psychopaths,” a barely there comedy that pivots on a creatively stalled screenwriter. As this précis suggests, Mr. McDonagh doesn’t have much to say in that movie — it has a bunny, stolen dogs, guys with guns, good and bad jokes — but what little is said is said by very fine performers grooving on all his words and larky nonsense.“Three Billboards” is more ambitious than Mr. McDonagh’s earlier features. Like the older ones, it has loads of gab, plenty of guns and the spectacle of men (mainly) behaving terribly. It also restlessly, if not satisfyingly, shifts between comedy and tragedy — a McDonagh specialty — splattering blood along the way. This time, though, he has also given his movie characters instead of disposable contrivances, a plot instead of self-reflexive ideas about storytelling and a rather diffuse overarching metaphor. Mostly, he has freighted it with a tragedy that allows the performers — primarily Ms. McDormand but also the equally excellent Mr. Harrelson and Sam Rockwell — to play to their range.The movie opens on low boil with Mildred behind the wheel of her station wagon near three derelict billboards. It’s an inviting landscape smudged with soft color, but as she stares at the signs with furrowed intensity, she chews on a fingernail so ferociously she seems on the verge of tearing it off. The billboards aren’t blank — the faded image of a baby smiles down from one, the word “life” pops off another — but they’re the opening pages in Mildred’s opus. Stamping black text against a blood-red background, she uses the billboards to announce her crusade while Mr. McDonagh (who likes self-aware gestures) lays out the story’s fundamentals: its setting, characters, problem, plot and possible villain.The billboards are a gimmick for Mr. McDonagh and a gambit for Mildred, a way to get things jumping (the investigators, the tale) and splash some foreboding on an outwardly pacific scene. Much of the story involves the ripples of outrage, confusion and buffoonery that the billboards inspire and that soon envelop almost everyone Mildred knows. Months after her daughter’s death, grief has walled her in; isolating and seemingly impenetrable, it is inscribed in the hardness of her gaze and in her grim new identity as a mother of a dead girl. The billboards turn that grief into a weapon, a means of taking on the law and assorted men — a threatening stranger, a vigilante dentist and an abusive ex (John Hawkes) — who collectively suggest another wall that has closed Mildred in.Mr. McDonagh likes to play comedy against violence and to wring laughs out of the unspeakable. This kind of juxtaposition (in his movies, at any rate) can produce laughter that catches in your throat, giving you pause and maybe provoking thought about why exactly you are giggling. But he doesn’t always know his A material from his B, or doesn’t care; his jokes can be uninterestingly glib with tiny, bloodless pricks that are less about challenging the audience than about obscuring the material’s clichés and overriding theatricality. Everything fits together too neatly in “Three Billboards,” even when chaos descends, but the performers add enough rough texture so that it doesn’t always feel so worked.Ms. McDormand roughs it up beautifully. A performer of great unforced naturalism, she has always come across more like a character actor than a star, even when she has the lead. She never seems concerned about losing the audience’s love or its sympathy, which can be thrilling, particularly given that female performers are often asked to pander or seduce. In this movie, she makes pain so palpably all-encompassing that you see it in her character’s every glance and gesture: It squares Mildred’s jaw, hardens her mouth and turns her face to stone, as if she were further fortifying her defenses. But pain also makes her ugly, maybe irredeemable, which also makes her joltingly, excitingly human.That same stone face is good for comedy, too, even if Mr. McDonagh’s bids at humor grow progressively less successful. He plays with tones, realisms and ideas in “Three Billboards,” including the sentimentally redeemed white racist, a character that suggests — despite the rage and invective — that Mr. McDonagh holds out hope for humanity after all. The problem is that the idea he hits most insistently is that vengeance is the hurt that never subsides; it’s the hurt that Mildred nurtures and that hardens her and that, over time, becomes so brutally consuming its violence is all but indistinguishable from its cause. Ms. McDormand still breaks your heart, but Mr. McDonagh just wears you out.
Review: An All-Star ‘Murder on the Orient Express’ With Few Surprises In my boyhood I read Agatha Christie’s 1934 mystery novel “Murder on the Orient Express,” a copy of which was handed down to me by my mother, a mystery enthusiast. In my early teens I saw the then-grand movie adaptation, an all-star cast affair directed by Sidney Lumet and featuring Albert Finney as the finicky Belgian detective Hercule Poirot. Christie’s novel derives much of its notoriety from the solution to its mystery. It’s very novel; whether it’s ingenious or just ostentatious is still debated by mystery lovers. But even more than 40 years after Mr. Lumet’s film I had presumed that the ending was so well-known that there would be little point in a remake. And yet, as the poet Gerard Manley Hopkins said in a different context, generations have trod, have trod, have trod, and there are plenty of millennials who haven’t read the book.Mr. Finney’s embodiment of Poirot in the Lumet picture was a marathon of sorts, with the actor testing how many of the beloved character’s irritating yet endearing quirks could be pushed to the limits of coherence. In this latest version, Kenneth Branagh, who also directs (from a script by Michael Green), gives us a Poirot who’s fussy but not too fussy, and rather crisp in his English-language diction. Most radically, this is a Poirot with heart. This interpretation is a dumb idea, but Mr. Branagh, an actor of prodigious skills, can at least pull this one half off. It’s not the only dumb idea in this film, which nevertheless bounces along in a way that’s sometimes almost entertaining.Mr. Branagh shot the film in the 65-millimeter format, which offers a particular kind of “big movie” resolution. People tend to think that big-gauge celluloid is best for big-vista movies, such as “Lawrence of Arabia,” but Mr. Branagh’s picture is set almost entirely on a train. It is a very opulent train, and the cinematography by Haris Zambarloukos gets all its ornate detail. It also gets the detail of the mostly C.G.I. special effects and settings, and here the marriage of digital and analog is awkward. In further pursuit of 65-millimeter shots, Mr. Branagh opens up the story regularly, however. He has the train stall on a cliff-side rail, supported by elaborate scaffolding on which he stages a foot chase. He has Poirot deliver his final summation of the case in a train tunnel.As in Mr. Lumet’s adaptation, the supporting cast here is full of stars. Michelle Pfeiffer, Judi Dench, Willem Dafoe, Penélope Cruz, Derek Jacobi, and newer faces like Daisy Ridley and Leslie Odom Jr., fill out the roster of subjects. Johnny Depp, who is known to make some eccentric choices in crafting his characters, does not (necessarily) disappoint in the role of the murder victim, Edward Ratchett. Imbuing that unsavory character with the dopiest of gangster mannerisms, Mr. Depp may remind you of Matt LeBlanc’s “Friends” character, Joey Tribbiani. It’s as if Joey, that lovable bad actor, is trying to make the most of his first big break in the movies.
Louis C.K. Admits to Sexual Misconduct as Media Companies Cut Ties The comedian Louis C.K. admitted on Friday that he had engaged in sexual misconduct with several women. His acknowledgment came as a film distributor canceled the release of his forthcoming comedy and as media companies cut ties with him in response to a  New York Times report in which the women detailed his behavior toward them.In a statement on Friday, Louis C.K. said, “I want to address the stories told to The New York Times by five women named Abby, Rebecca, Dana, Julia who felt able to name themselves and one who did not.”He continued, “These stories are true.”[Read the statement from Louis C.K.]In the Times report, the comedians Dana Min Goodman, Julia Wolov and Rebecca Corry, the writer Abby Schachner, and a fifth woman who spoke on condition of anonymity described upsetting interactions with Louis C.K. in which he undressed and masturbated in front of them, asked if he could masturbate in front of them, or could be heard masturbating during a telephone call.Louis C.K. said in his statement that he told himself “what I did was O.K.” because he asked the women first. But, he continued, he learned “too late” that “when you have power over another person,” such a request “isn’t a question. It’s a predicament for them.”“The power I had over these women is that they admired me,” he added. “And I wielded that power irresponsibly.”Even as Louis C.K. remained one of the most popular and influential performers in comedy – he has won multiple Emmy Awards for his stand-up specials and his semi-autobiographical FX series, “Louie” – rumors about his misconduct had persisted for several years.In a substantial rebuke, the FX Networks and FX Productions, which produce and broadcast several of his television shows, said Friday they were ending their association with him. His overall production deal with FX was canceled, and he lost his role as executive producer – as well as the compensation that came with that title – on the FX comedy shows “Better Things” and “Baskets,” the Amazon series “One Mississippi,” and a TBS animated series, “The Cops.”The “One Mississippi” star Tig Notaro, who had earlier criticized Louis C.K. for not addressing his behavior, said after learning of FX’s decision, “My response is the lyrics to Johnny Nash’s ‘I Can See Clearly Now.’ May the dark clouds continue to move.”Pamela Adlon, the star of “Better Things,” which she created with Louis C.K., a frequent performer in his work (including his film “I Love You, Daddy”), said on Friday that she was troubled by Louis C.K.’s admission. “My family and I are devastated and in shock after the admission of abhorrent behavior by my friend and partner, Louis C.K.,” Ms. Adlon said in a statement. “I feel deep sorrow and empathy for the women who have come forward. I am asking for privacy at this time for myself and my family. I am processing and grieving and hope to say more as soon as I am able.”TBS said in its own statement that production on “The Cops,” which was planned for a 2018 debut, had been “suspended until further review.”Also on Friday, 3 Arts Entertainment, which had been managing Louis C.K., dropped him as a client. Two women who had experienced Louis C.K.’s misconduct believed that his manager, Dave Becky, wanted them to stop talking about their encounter with him. Mr. Becky denied making threats toward them.And Lewis Kay, who had been the comedian’s publicist, said in a Twitter post Friday, “As of today, I no longer represent Louis C.K.”In their statement, the FX companies said, “Louis has now confirmed the truth of the reports relating to the five women victimized by his misconduct, which we were unaware of previously.”The companies added, “As far as we know, his behavior over the past eight years on all five series he has produced for FX Networks and/or FX Productions has been professional.”They continued, “However, now is not the time for him to make television shows. Now is the time for him to honestly address the women who have come forth to speak about their painful experiences, a process which he began today with his public statement.”In that statement, Louis C.K. did not offer apologies to the women who shared their stories with The Times.He said, however, “I have been remorseful of my actions. And I’ve tried to learn from them. And run from them. Now I’m aware of the extent of the impact of my actions. I learned yesterday the extent to which I left these women who admired me feeling badly about themselves and cautious around other men who would never have put them in that position.”Louis C.K. also said he needed to acknowledge “the hurt that I’ve brought on people who I work with.”He added, “I’ve brought pain to my family, my friends, my children and their mother.”Louis C.K. is just one of several powerful men who have recently faced rapid consequences after media reports brought attention to allegations of their sexual misconduct or harassment. Harvey Weinstein, the film producer and media executive; the actor Kevin Spacey; the filmmaker Brett Ratner; and the journalist Mark Halperin are among the prominent men to have experienced precipitous downfalls as accounts about them accumulated.While Louis C.K. was one of the few men to admit to the conduct he’d been accused of, many people found his statement unsatisfactory and wondered why his behavior had not been addressed sooner. The actress Rose McGowan, who has said Mr. Weinstein sexually assaulted her, wrote in a Twitter post on Friday that she had heard stories about Louis C.K. two years ago even though she isn’t connected to the comedy scene. “Industry faux-shock is such a tired lie. I send my strength and love to all women hurt by him and the code of complicity.”The distributor of Louis C.K.’s coming film, “I Love You, Daddy,” said Friday that it would not go ahead with its Nov. 17 release of the movie. The comedy, which he wrote and directed, was acquired by the entertainment company the Orchard in a $5 million deal. Louis C.K. stars in it as a TV comedy writer opposite John Malkovich as a notorious 68-year-old filmmaker who strikes up an uncomfortable relationship with the writer’s daughter (Chloe Grace Moretz), who has not yet turned 18.[ Louis C.K. is accused by 5 women of sexual misconduct ]Following preview screenings of “I Love You, Daddy,” several critics remarked on its troubling sexual politics and how certain scenes seemed to be commenting on Louis C.K.’s own reputation for misconduct.HBO said that Louis C.K. had been dropped from the lineup of “Night of Too Many Stars,” a comedy benefit on Nov. 18, and that it had pulled other works of his from its on-demand service.Netflix, which struck a deal with Louis C.K. to create two new stand-up specials for the streaming service, said on Friday that it will not produce the planned second special. (The first one, “Louis C.K. 2017,” was released in April.)In a statement, Netflix said, “The allegations made by several women in The New York Times about Louis C.K.’s behavior are disturbing. Louis’s unprofessional and inappropriate behavior with female colleagues has led us to decide not to produce a second stand-up special, as had been planned.” Netflix continues to show earlier stand-up performances by Louis C.K.
Battered and Tattered, Puerto Rico’s Flag Still Waves Mike Vargas knows how to deal with wrecks, even ones that could take years. The cars he repairs or soups up inside his northeast Bronx auto body shop, East Coast Customs Automotive Playground, seem like easy fixes compared with the devastation in Puerto Rico, where he has family and property. Now, while he works on his cars, a vibrant mural looms over him, constantly reminding him of more dire human challenges. Suggesting the famous photograph, “Raising the Flag on Iwo Jima,” the mural depicts hard-hatted workers lifting a flag-topped utility pole over a devastated landscape.Not that Mr. Vargas needs reminders. As a Puerto Rican New Yorker, he is always thinking about the island’s humanitarian crisis. Within days of Hurricane Maria, he and a group of local body shop owners started collecting water and emergency supplies, which they shipped to the island in two cargo containers. And though the urgency of the situation may be fading from the headlines, his resolve has not.“Once Thanksgiving hits, people are going to forget,” Mr. Vargas lamented. “When I look at that wall it tells me that we’re down. But we’re rebuilding. We’re going to get better. It’s like 9/11. I do not want to forget.”The mural was created by two graffiti artists: Alfredo Oyague, better known as Per One of the FX Crew, and Alfred Bennett, known as the Royal Kingbee. Over the years, Mr. Oyague had painted various murals at the shop, and he had been planning to redo the waiting room a few weeks ago at Mr. Vargas’ request. When Mr. Vargas suggested something based on the crisis in Puerto Rico, Mr. Oyague showed him an image a friend had found online, where recovery workers were portrayed as the figures in Joe Rosenthal’s Iwo Jima photo.“I told him, ‘Yo Mike, I have a beautiful image and it’s an awesome statement, but it won’t fit in the waiting room,’” Mr. Oyague recalled. “He immediately fell in love with it and gave us the big wall inside the shop.”Like many Puerto Ricans, Mr. Vargas felt the federal response had been slow and inadequate, a situation made worse by President Trump’s Twitter feed, which reminded people that the cash-strapped island was already “billions of dollars” in debt to “Wall Street and the banks.” And when $4.9 billion in federal aid was proposed to help the island’s government pay its bills, it came as a loan.“It’s like because we owe them money, we shouldn’t get any help.” Mr. Vargas said. “It’s like they turned their backs on us.”Mr. Oyague had deeply personal reasons that inspired him to work on the mural. His mother Ana, 72, a retired Metropolitan Transportation Authority bus driver, lived in Barranquitas, a hard-hit mountain town halfway between San Juan and Ponce. She had planned to ride out the storm along with her sister, an 85-year-old nun. Her brick house was solid, but not immune from wind and water. To prepare for the storm, she had moved a generator and ruptured a disc in her back. Then, during the hurricane, her condition had worsened.“The storm blew a sliding door in and my Mom was trying to push it back, but the wind was too strong,” Mr. Oyague said. “She blew out her back, so she let the door go and went to her bedroom with her sister. They got on top of the bed when the place started to flood. There was nothing to do but wait it out.”Even though the waters receded, it took eight days for roads to be cleared. His aunt is now staying at her religious order’s Philadelphia convent, while his mother — who is using a wheelchair until her back heals — moved into an apartment in the Soundview section of the Bronx, where Mr. Oyague also lives. In this time of uncertain exile, their thoughts remain fixed on their many relatives on the island, like one uncle who lives close to his mother’s house in Barranquitas.“We’re losing him,” Mr. Oyague said. “He’s not doing too well since he is depending on himself. He has no light or water and he has bad diabetes and a little bit — no, a lot — of a drinking problem. He can’t fend for himself. I don’t think he’s going to make it through the holidays.”Given the complicated history between the United States and its island territory, Mr. Oyague sees the mural as a political statement that many can relate to on a personal level. He is still seething over Mr. Trump’s brief — and limited — visit to the island, where he tossed rolls of paper towels to the crowd.“That was so degrading,” he said. “He just thinks of us as second-rate citizens. We’re dependent upon the U.S. because the U.S. purposely made us dependent on them. They needed to use us. But we have a lot of good traits and I don’t want people to forget that.”Mr. Oyague thought that a strong, positive image could help inspire Puerto Ricans in the community. “It shows us rebuilding and not giving up. The Puerto Rican flag is still waving. Even though the island has been obliterated, we’re still here.”
David Dinkins Doesn’t Think He Failed. He Might Be Right. David N. Dinkins became the 106th mayor of New York on Jan. 1, 1990, pledging to be the “toughest mayor on crime this city has ever seen.” On that day, 12 people were murdered in the city. Four years later, Mr. Dinkins lost his bid for re-election, beginning a contested legacy that can still generate an argument.“David Dinkins failed as mayor,” begins a 2012 biography of Mr. Dinkins.“David Dinkins is a leader we can look to,” Hillary Clinton said in 2015, adding that Mr. Dinkins “helped lay the foundation for dramatic drops in crime.”So goes the complicated late career of David Dinkins, who won office by the slightest of margins over Rudolph W. Giuliani, and lost it again to the same man four years later. To critics, he symbolizes the bad old days of unchecked crime, racial tension and fiscal anarchy. To supporters, he began a turnaround for which his successors still take credit. When New Yorkers voted overwhelmingly to re-elect Mayor Bill de Blasio this week, it was in part a vote for the values they once rejected.What does it mean to succeed or fail as mayor of New York City? And how does a former mayor live amid this judgment?On a recent afternoon in his office at Columbia University, Mr. Dinkins sat surrounded by plaques and photographs celebrating highlights from his career, a world apart from the arrows that once filled his days. At 90, the only African-American mayor in the city’s history, he has been a former mayor for one quarter of his life, three times as long as he held elective office. Across from his desk was a New York Newsday headline celebrating him as “Mayor Cool.”“I sit here sometimes and I look and I reminisce,” Mr. Dinkins said, nodding toward a photograph of him with Harry Belafonte, a friend. Both men turned 90 this year. “He was the M.C. of my inauguration,” Mr. Dinkins said. “He was one of those who said to me: ‘You have to run. You must run.’ He insisted I run for mayor.”Mr. Dinkins wore a red patterned bow tie and a blue double-breasted suit, filled out since he stopped playing tennis a few years ago. As he talked, his daughter called to ask whether he had seen a doctor about a nagging pain in his knee, and an alarm on his cellphone, programmed by his grandson, reminded him to take his several medications. These would have to wait; he left them at home.He noted his unique place in New York lore. All mayors face criticism for problems that linger after they leave office; Mr. Dinkins’s critics focus on problems that quickly abated.“The New York Times probably has an obit there for me now,” he said, raising a grievance he has aired before. He spoke with a courtly formality, quick with a set piece or a score to settle. “I always used to say, they’ll say, ‘David Dinkins, first black mayor of the City of New York,’ and the next sentence will be about Crown Heights,” the Brooklyn neighborhood where a four-day riot broke out on his watch, for which he was widely criticized.Would that be unfair?“In a way,” he said. “I don’t say it’s unfair, but there are things that are more accurate or of greater moment. I think we did overall a pretty good job. When things went well, we didn’t always get the credit to which we were entitled, but if things do not go well, you’re the mayor, it’s your fault. Still the greatest job in the world.”In 2013, when Bill de Blasio was running to be the first Democratic mayor since Mr. Dinkins — a two-decade drought in a city where Democrats outnumber Republicans by six to one — the state Republican chairman, Edward F. Cox, warned that Mr. de Blasio “is going to take the city back to the Dinkins era,” adding, “The Dinkins era of crime and grime and high welfare rolls, that’s what’s going to happen to the city.”David Dinkins was not always a code word for the bad old days. The son of a housekeeper and a barber, raised in segregated schools in Trenton, N.J., he entered New York politics through the powerful Harlem Democratic clubhouse, where he formed alliances with Charles Rangel, Basil A. Paterson and Percy E. Sutton — the “gang of four” of the city’s African-American power structure. When he ran for mayor in 1989, it was as a figure of civility and healing.At the time, the first African-American mayors were in office in Los Angeles, Philadelphia, Detroit, Oakland and Baltimore; black mayors governed in Atlanta, Newark and Washington, D.C., as well. The Rev. Jesse Jackson carried New York City in the 1988 Democratic presidential primary. New York seemed due.The city, in turn, needed healing. Recent racially charged attacks of a white jogger in Central Park and of a black teenager fleeing a white mob in Bensonhurst, Brooklyn, and a skyrocketing murder rate exacerbated by the crack trade, created an image of a city out of control, ungovernable. Wall Street was still reeling from the Black Monday crash of 1987, and the city government faced budget shortfalls of more than $1 billion.Mr. Dinkins arrived in office on a wave of hope, said Wilbur C. Rich, a professor emeritus at Wellesley College and author of “David Dinkins and New York City Politics.”“I was excited, and many other black people were excited to see what he’d do,” Mr. Rich said. “There was some triumphalism. But there’s just so far you can go with that. After a while that wears off, and he’s just the mayor. A lot of us thought that he would do something about the police department. He didn’t do that. A lot of us thought that he would demonstrate to the white community that black people were competent to manage a city of that size.”Mr. Dinkins’s first year saw record numbers of murders and other major crimes, a fiscal crisis, high levels of homelessness and a city hall that seemed in disarray, with staffers battling with one another and then leaking to the press.But by his second year, crime began a long decline that few imagined possible. Mr. Dinkins added more cops on the streets — wangling a tax increase to do so — and more cadets in the police academy, who went on duty only after he left office. He averted a fiscal takeover by the state, began the remarkable transformation of Times Square, returned the public libraries to six-day weeks, opened schools at night for community use and expanded the National Tennis Center in Flushing Meadows, Queens, in what the city’s 108th mayor, Michael R. Bloomberg, called “the only good athletic sports stadium deal, not just in New York but in the country.”“Overall I think we did not bad,” Mr. Dinkins said.Yet mayors succeed or fail not just in the halls of government but also in the public imagination, said Kenneth T. Jackson, editor of “The Encyclopedia of New York City” and a history professor at Columbia.“I think Dinkins’s heart was in the right place, but he didn’t create the image of someone who’s strong,” Mr. Jackson said. “Koch and Giuliani, who book-ended Dinkins, both seemed more powerful, more take-charge. Whether they were wrong or right as a policy for New York is a different issue.”Nor did Mr. Dinkins, who promised to be a healer, mollify black leaders or other potential allies. The civil rights activist C. Vernon Mason called Mr. Dinkins a “traitor,” and Alton Maddox called him “an Ed Koch in blackface”; Fernando Ferrer, then a Democratic city councilman, called him “maddeningly slow”; Al Sharpton called him an Uncle Tom and a “whore turning tricks in City Hall.” Jewish leaders accused him of allowing black mobs to attack Jews in Crown Heights. Even this newspaper’s endorsement of Mr. Dinkins for a second term called him “disengaged,” undisciplined, “slow to react” and “maddeningly phlegmatic.”Numbers are not stories, though they sometimes get turned into them. In one story, homicides fell by 13 percent during Mr. Dinkins’s tenure, from a record high of 2,245 in his first year to 1,946 his last. In another, 1,946 killings is the mark of a city still in crisis. (Last year there were 335.)Successful mayors are those who inhabit the first story; failed mayors live in the other one.“The key thing about the Dinkins years was a sense of fear,” said Fred Siegel, a scholar in residence at St. Francis College and contributing editor at the conservative City Journal, and a former adviser to Mr. Giuliani. “Crime fell, but it fell marginally. People were panicked. His response to crime was ineffectual.”Asked about Mr. Dinkins’s impact on the city, Mr. Siegel said: “He made it possible for a moderately conservative mayor to be elected in New York. Who turned out to be the most competent mayor we’ve had since La Guardia.”At the heart of David Dinkins’s story as mayor are four days in August 1991, after a car in a rabbi’s motorcade in Crown Heights ran a red light and killed a 7-year-old Guyanese boy named Gavin Cato.The neighborhood exploded. Angry black residents assailed the driver, who escaped via a volunteer Jewish ambulance crew. Two hours later, a crowd surrounded and stabbed a rabbinical student named Yankel Rosenbaum, who died of a wound not noticed at the hospital.Three days of mayhem followed, with bands of black residents taking over the streets, some chanting “Heil Hitler” or “Kill the Jews,” and Jewish residents accusing the black mayor of permitting a “pogrom,” or organized massacre of an ethnic group. Crowds hurled bricks and bottles at police patrols, forcing them to run for their lives; the mayor and police commissioner also came under attack. Network news reports showed buildings and police cars on fire, and a mayor who appeared powerless — some said unwilling — to restore order.Finally, the mayor and police department changed tactics, from negotiating to arresting the combatants. The fires and crowds dissipated. The news cameras went home. But the damage was done.In his office a quarter-century later, Mr. Dinkins dismissed a question about whether, had he changed tactics one night sooner, he might have won re-election.“You don’t know that until after the fact,” he said. “I said to the police brass, Whatever you guys are doing, it ain’t working. You need to get it together. But whether some police thought that I wanted them to be lenient on blacks attacking Jews — I can’t imagine how they would have thought that — but that was not the case. I got accused of that, and that’s painful.”Had he won, in turn, his place in history might have been different, said John H. Mollenkopf, director of the Center for Urban Research at the Graduate Center of the City University of New York. The police cadets he had authorized would have hit the streets on his watch; crime might have really dropped, as it did under Mr. Giuliani, aided by the end of the crack epidemic; and the Walt Disney Company’s restoration of the New Amsterdam Theater in 1997, which began the transformation of 42nd Street (the deal was started by Mr. Dinkins and closed by Mr. Giuliani), would have lifted his mayoralty.Mr. Dinkins declined to speculate. “The action that one takes in a circumstance like that ought not be based on what will get me votes or lose me votes,” he said. “It ought to be based on what is the right thing to do. Everybody’s a whole lot smarter after the fact.”New Yorkers do not always love their mayors. Mr. de Blasio, in a July poll by Quinnipiac University, had an approval rating of just 50 percent, with only 46 percent of respondents saying he deserved re-election. After three years in office, Mr. Bloomberg had an approval rating of just 43 percent.Neither met any real resistance to re-election. Mr. Giuliani finished his first term with a 62 percent approval rating, but sunk badly in his second, before he rebounded with his dynamism after the attacks of Sept. 11, 2001.Mr. de Blasio, who was a junior staffer under Mr. Dinkins, said Mr. Dinkins’s problem was an image created for him by the tabloids, which were still loud and powerful in the early ’90s.“Dinkins got a raw deal largely because of race,” Mr. de Blasio said in a telephone interview before his re-election. “And he got a raw deal because he was not a loud, showy personality and he wasn’t always trying to claim credit. But any normal assessment of history would say, wait a minute, he added cops, that’s why this turned around.”“The thing I learned from that is an audacity of how to deal with what appeared to be an intractable problem,” Mr. de Blasio added. “The fact that we’re the safest big city in America today directly links to his actions with getting resources from Albany to get us the size of the police force we needed.“None of his predecessors figured out how to do it. I’m not sure his successor, who took a lot of the credit for work done with resources Dinkins got — I’m not sure his successor could have pulled it off in Albany as a political reality.”Yet if Mr. Dinkins failed, it was not among voters at the time. After winning the election in 1989 with just over 50 percent of the vote, he lost in 1993 with just below 50 percent, a difference often attributed to a surge in voter turnout in Staten Island, where voters had a ballot initiative to secede from the city. So he was almost as well regarded after four years as he was before taking office. In neither election did he win more than one third of white voters, even though most were Democratic and his opponent in both races, Mr. Giuliani, had no political experience and a lot of rough edges.In Mr. Dinkins’s 2013 autobiography, he attributed his loss to “just racism, pure and simple.”J. Phillip Thompson III, who worked in Mr. Dinkins’s administration and now teaches urban politics at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, said that Mr. Dinkins’s true legacy is coming to fruition only now.“A lot of the things that de Blasio has been successful around, such as his emphasis on affordable housing and universal pre-K, those were things that Dinkins pushed for very hard,” Mr. Thompson said. “Also, the way he went after the crime issue was a much deeper approach to community policing than Giuliani had, and over time those approaches have proved to be more effective. And you avoid the issues we got into with stop and frisk and police chokings. Dinkins worked hard to develop strong relationships between the police and the community.“He doesn’t get credit for a lot of those things,” he added. “Giuliani took credit for reducing crime, but he isn’t the one who hired 5,000 cops with a $3 billion budget gap. The narrative tends to skip over that.”In defeat, Mr. Dinkins became just the second New York mayor in the last century to lose re-election after a single four-year term. This, too, is a legacy he has had to live with. Before him, no black mayor of a major American city had failed to win a second term.“I’m not sure how people think of me today,” Mr. Dinkins said dryly. “I think we should have won re-election. I can’t answer why we didn’t. For that matter, it could be argued that we never should have won in the first place, but we did. Then the people in their infinite wisdom determined on that great American mayor, Rudy Giuliani.”He added, “We didn’t go into the job saying, well, we can’t solve the problems of crime, and we can’t solve the problems of homelessness. Everything you thought you could do. And overall I think we did not bad.”His two successors, Mr. Giuliani and Mr. Bloomberg, were courted to run for president, largely for the differences between their cities and Mr. Dinkins’s. Mr. Giuliani promised at his inauguration, “The era of fear has had a long-enough reign,” and by the end of his first term, that reign was over and has not returned.Even now, said Letitia James, who was re-elected as public advocate on Nov. 7, New Yorkers are too contentious to agree upon the Dinkins legacy. Ms. James, who studied under Mr. Dinkins at Columbia, became the first African-American woman to hold citywide office when she was elected public advocate in 2013. But she said that this distinction, like being the city’s first black mayor, was “nothing more than a historical footnote, particularly if you don’t reach across and form coalitions with others.”Still, Mr. Thompson, the M.I.T. professor and former Dinkins staffer, said history would be kind to his old boss. In recent years, the city named a historic Harlem tennis court after him, as well as the Manhattan Municipal Building downtown and David Dinkins Circle in Flushing Meadows, near the tennis stadium.“If you look at blacks, Latinos and progressive whites, in 80 percent of cities they’re the majority now,” Mr. Thompson said. “And Dinkins symbolized the beginning of that.“Whether you agree with everything he said or did is kind of secondary. The point was, we did this. David Dinkins didn’t elect himself. We the African-American community, we the Latino community, we the progressive white community did this. And if we did it for Dinkins, we can do it again.“The message is change. It’s possible. That’s what Dinkins symbolized.”
With Statement Win Over Notre Dame, Miami Is Back MIAMI GARDENS, Fla. — One of the few times the N.F.L. lets its hair down is during certain broadcasts, notably NBC’s “Sunday Night Football,” when the starters for each team give their names and colleges in quick video introductions.There is one alma mater whose name is always announced by its alumni with the same words and in the same way, in a businesslike tone mixing seriousness and pride, and with no room for doubt about which team they are referring to. It is the most generic of nicknames: The U.A reference to the “U” that makes up the University of Miami logo, the moniker reflects the team’s track record of producing exciting stars, its brash affect, and its raucous city.When The U is going strong, it might be the coolest party in college sports. The potential for such a thing could be felt at Saturday night’s marquee matchup at Hard Rock Stadium, where Miami, the ostensible underdog at No. 7, dropped No. 3 Notre Dame, 41-8.“This is to me natural order restored,” said defensive coordinator Manny Diaz, who was an adolescent Miami native in the 1980s when in five seasons the Hurricanes went 55-5 and won two national titles. “This is the way it should be.”No one young enough to be a college player could well remember the days when Miami’s teams stalked the landscape breathing fire and exuding intimidation, when the program won five national titles between 1983 and 2002.Since the Hurricanes won the national title after the 2001 season — featuring a roster so crammed with N.F.L. prospects that it eventually produced 17 first-round picks — and endured a devastating overtime loss to Ohio State in the national title game a year later, the Hurricanes have been in the wilderness, mired in coaching changes and mediocre records.“I had an older brother and he talked to me about when he first got here, The U was back on the rise,” said left tackle K.C. McDermott, a senior and the younger brother of Miami’s center from 2012 through 2014.“This wasn’t just a one-year thing,” he added. “This has taken years, and taken blood, sweat and tears out of a lot of recruits.”When Mark Richt was fired in 2015 after a long and successful tenure at Georgia, the Miami job pulled at the former quarterback who had backed up Jim Kelly at The U.“When I decided to continue to coach, I really did want to enjoy it — I wanted to have fun,” Richt said. “And what better place than Miami can you have some fun?”With the arrival this week of a showcase game against Notre Dame — not only a significant obstacle this season, but one of Miami’s most bitter rivals — former Miami players appeared like the ghosts of championships past. Ed Reed, the former safety for the Baltimore Ravens, attended practice every day last week, and on Saturday night he joined ex-Hurricanes-turned-N.F.L. stars Warren Sapp and Clinton Portis on the sideline pregame as living monuments to better times, trying to show current players the way to a similar future.“Those guys actually did it,” said linebacker Shaq Quarterman, a sophomore, “so how could you not take heed in what they’re saying?”And now, The U is back.Ranked No. 7 entering Saturday by the committee that determines the four-team College Football Playoff, Miami improved to 9-0 by handing the Irish their second defeat. Miami is set to face defending champion Clemson (9-1), ranked 4th, in the Atlantic Coast Conference championship game on Dec. 2, with the winner all but certain to be invited to the national semifinals.The postseason picture came into firmer relief Saturday even before Miami’s victory over Notre Dame. No. 1 Georgia (9-1) lost at No. 10 Auburn (8-2) earlier Saturday, a serious blow to the Bulldogs’ aspirations and a lift for the Tigers, who face Alabama in two weeks. Stanford’s upset of No. 9 Washington (8-2) on Friday night most likely ended the Pacific-12’s chance at the playoff.The clearing of the field most conspicuously aided No. 7 Wisconsin (10-0), partially neutralizing its soft schedule. But it also set up the annual game between Auburn and Alabama (10-0) as the most consequential Iron Bowl since the 2013 iteration, of Kick-Six fame.The Fighting Irish dropped to 8-2, with their No. 3 seed in The Associated Press poll and the playoff rankings due for a serious readjustment. While frequently derided as (to quote Miami’s crowd during the second half) “overrated,” Notre Dame entered Saturday with wins over two ranked teams and a loss to a third, Georgia, by a single point, and it arrived with the country’s seventh-best scoring offense, averaging more than 41 points per game.For a game with clear and severe playoff implications, much of the pregame chatter tended in the direction of mythology.Notre Dame and Miami were once yearly rivals, and in the late 1980s played several games that defined the entire season nationally. Their ostensibly divergent identities — the Irish as pious Midwestern schoolboys; the Hurricanes as bold, athletic and steeped in hip-hop culture — were crystallized in a Notre Dame fan-made T-shirt that summarized the rivalry as “Catholics vs. Convicts.”The dynamic was exaggerated even then (and also loaded with ugly racial subtext). College football has deracinated since those days, with teams’ ties to place and culture evaporating in a fog of national broadcast deals and coast-to-coast recruiting. Such extratextual contrivances are now mainly ways for teams and fans to imagine communities.This year, for instance, Miami brought out the turnover chain, a heavy hunk of Cuban link chain that goes to defensive players who steal the ball from the offense. It harks back not only to past defensive Hurricanes standouts like Sapp, Reed and Sean Taylor, but to Miami’s culture of unsubtle audacity.The turnover chain changed hands several times Saturday night, beginning in the first quarter, when the junior safety Jaquan Johnson picked off Notre Dame quarterback Brandon Wimbush, and peaking when cornerback Trajan Bandy, a true freshman who like so many Miami stars past is a South Florida native, jumped a route just before the end of the first half, caught a Notre Dame pass in stride and returned it 65 yards to give Miami a 27-0 halftime lead.He happily slipped on the chain for his turn with it, but The U aspires to a different piece of jewelry this season.“We’re not back,” said quarterback Malik Rosier, a redshirt junior, “‘til there’s a ring on my finger.”
N.F.L. Picks: Redskins Over Vikings; Patriots Over Broncos For a second consecutive week, the N.F.L. does not have an obvious contender for a great game. All of the matchups seem one-sided, and no shake-ups at the top of the league seem imminent. That being said, mismatches can turn into upsets when teams do not take their preparations seriously, so some of these games could turn interesting in a hurry.Last week’s record against the spread: 7-5-1Overall record: 64-65-3Texans at Rams, 4:05 p.m., CBSLine: Rams by 12It is easy to get caught up in focusing on what has changed for an improving team than on the foundation of its success. In the case of the Rams (6-2), an uptick in offense has managed to steal attention from a defense that has been quietly excellent for years.Everything starts up front for Los Angeles, with Aaron Donald and Michael Brockers. Donald, the team’s mammoth defensive tackle, is not only rated as the top defensive lineman by Pro Football Focus, but he is also the highest graded player at any position. Traditional statistics for interior linemen fail to capture a player’s true value, but Donald manages to be one of the few defensive tackles who is elite in stopping both the pass and the run. If you watch enough Rams games you know that despite being 285 pounds, he does not embarrass himself or his team when he drops back into coverage.Donald and Brockers are an ideal pairing inside, and they are complemented on defense by several other top-level players including a star-studded secondary that features Lamarcus Joyner, John Johnson, Kayvon Webster and Nickell Robey-Coleman. While the defense has struggled some to stop the run, it has been tremendous against the pass, allowing an average of 223.6 yards a game through the air and an opposing quarterback rating of 75.6, which is the fourth lowest mark in the N.F.L. They are a top-six team in both interceptions and sacks, and their average of 19.4 points allowed a game is good but also inflated by a pair of high-scoring wins against San Francisco and Dallas.All of that should add up to a horrible day for the Texans (3-5). Tom Savage is not a good quarterback regardless of opponent, but with him running away from Donald and trying to throw into tight coverage, he should be especially bad.Here’s the tricky thing about picking this game: 12 points is an enormous spread, even at home, and Jared Goff, while vastly improved from last season, is still inconsistent. There is not much concern that the Rams could lose, but a few garbage-time touchdowns are likely to swing the spread in favor of Houston. Pick: TexansCowboys at Falcons, 4:25 p.m., FoxLine: Falcons by 3Atlanta’s season can be summed up in one play from last week: Matt Ryan throwing a perfect 40-yard pass to a wide-open Julio Jones in the end zone, and Jones simply dropping the ball. It was such a painful and shocking turn of events — the play came on fourth down with the Falcons (4-4) trailing by 10 points — that Kurt Coleman, a defensive back for the Panthers, walked over to console Jones. Such is life for Atlanta a year after a magical run to the Super Bowl ended with a brutal collapse. There is some intrigue in this game still, as neither team knows if Ezekiel Elliott will be allowed to play, but with the recent improvement the Cowboys (5-3) have shown on both sides of the ball, Dallas should be in line for a road win regardless of what happens in Thursday’s court hearing. Pick: CowboysPatriots at Broncos, 8:30 p.m., NBCLine: Patriots by 7.5Before anyone gets too excited about the Patriots (6-2) drastically cutting down the number of passing yards the team allowed in its last two games, it is worth noting that they gave up an average of 138.5 rushing yards a game in the two wins. New England’s defense might just not have that higher gear, but it is not as if the Broncos (3-5) and Brock Osweiler present much of a challenge. Add in C. J. Anderson working his way through an ankle injury and Denver does not seem to have the personnel to keep up with New England, no matter how bad the Patriots’ defense is. Pick: PatriotsVikings at Redskins, 1 p.m., FoxLine: Vikings by 1The error margin for Case Keenum has been reduced to zero. If Keenum, a career backup, wants to remain at starting quarterback for the Vikings (6-2), he will need to keep winning. Teddy Bridgewater has been cleared to play, and unless his knee injury has turned him into an entirely different quarterback, he represents an enormous upgrade for Minnesota. With that in mind, the Redskins (4-4) could be a problem for Keenum because they are far more talented than their 4-4 record indicates. Their four losses have come against the Eagles (twice), the Chiefs (when that team looked unbeatable) and the Cowboys. Last week’s win over Seattle showed that they are resilient and that Kirk Cousins continues to be fearless. Taking too many chances against Minnesota’s secondary could be dangerous, but a Redskins win, and Bridgewater’s return to the field a week later, seem well within the realm of possibilities. Pick: RedskinsSaints at Bills, 1 p.m., FoxLine: Saints by 2.5The Saints (6-2) are a passing team that loves playing indoors, so a trip to Buffalo on a chilly Sunday afternoon should present an interesting test. A huge factor in how they fare, though, will come in which version of the Bills (5-3) shows up. Two weeks ago, Buffalo looked great and easily beat the Raiders, but last week, they were hardly competitive against the Jets, allowing 194 rushing yards and three rushing touchdowns. It is that rushing success by the Jets that the Saints may want to pay attention to: In Mark Ingram and Alvin Kamara, they have the running backs to exploit the same weakness. Another win would be seven in a row for New Orleans. More important, it would improve the team’s road record to 4-1. Pick: SaintsSteelers at Colts, 1 p.m., CBSLine: Steelers by 10.5The Steelers (6-2) have settled into a groove. Their defense shuts things down, keeping the score nice and low, and their offense, despite the presence of three of the N.F.L.’s biggest stars, does just enough to win. Whether it is the aging of Ben Roethlisberger, tension among players or their opponents adjusting to a unit that has been together for several seasons, they just don’t run up the score the way they used to. Going on the road against the Colts (3-6) does not present a true upset opportunity: The Steelers are extremely likely to win, but a spread of 10.5 points seems high considering Pittsburgh’s track record. Pick: ColtsSeahawks at Cardinals, 8:25 p.m. (Thursday), NBCLine: Seahawks by 6The Seahawks (5-3) are one game removed from a four-game winning streak, but the defense has taken a huge step back in the last few weeks: Both the Texans and the Redskins showed no fear in throwing directly into Seattle’s secondary. Injuries are a factor, with Earl Thomas out and Richard Sherman playing through injuries, but it is still shocking to see teams have so much success throwing the ball against them. Drew Stanton of the Cardinals (4-4) is not an aggressive passer like Deshaun Watson or Kirk Cousins, so the same level of exploitation should not be expected. Arizona will probably try to make up for that by running early and often with the veteran back Adrian Peterson, and while he has performed well since coming over from New Orleans, he may not find as much room to run this week. Thursday games are messy, but Seattle has had success in Arizona, and if it wants to avoid falling way behind the Rams in the N.F.C. West, this game needs to be something of a statement. Pick: SeahawksChargers at Jaguars, 1 p.m., CBSLine: Jaguars by 4The Jaguars (5-3) had a nearly perfect defense with one glaring flaw: It could not stop the run. A trade for Marcell Dareus, a run-stopping defensive tackle who was a known quantity to Coach Doug Marrone, may not deserve all the credit for last week’s effort (29 rushing yards allowed), but if he has whipped the unit into shape, Jacksonville will be hard to score upon.The Chargers (3-5) are an interesting test for that theory, as Melvin Gordon, their star running back, is the type of player who would have torched the Jaguars in previous weeks. If Dareus stops him, then Jacksonville’s run of losing in even-numbered weeks of the season may finally end.On offense, the Jaguars should get a nice boost from Leonard Fournette, who showed up to practice on time during the week, which will get him back on the field after he was held out for a violation of team rules. Pick: JaguarsBrowns at Lions, 1 p.m., CBSLine: Lions by 12.5The Lions (4-4) may not look like a playoff contender, with a .500 record and several frustrating losses, but they have been considerably better than their record, and last week’s win at Green Bay opened the door for them to go on a winning streak ahead of their Week 12 showdown with division-leading Minnesota. The Browns (0-8) are a speed bump on that path. Detroit will probably not cover the 12.5-point spread, but if it cares about its playoff hopes it will win the game. Pick: BrownsJets at Buccaneers, 1 p.m., CBSLine: Jets by 2.5With Jameis Winston having been shut down for at least two weeks, the Buccaneers (2-6) will turn to Ryan Fitzpatrick at quarterback. It is a downgrade from Winston at full strength, but probably an upgrade from the way Winston had played since injuring his shoulder. Add the revenge factor of Fitzpatrick’s playing against the Jets (4-5), who discarded him a season after he set the franchise single-season record for passing touchdowns, and this could turn into a mild upset. Pick: BuccaneersPackers at Bears, 1 p.m., FoxLine: Bears by 5The statistics for Mitchell Trubisky are not that much better than those for Brett Hundley, but the difference between them is that Trubisky, the rookie quarterback for the Bears (3-5), is trying to overcome his subpar wide receivers, while Hundley, a third-year backup for the Packers (4-4), has teammates on offense that made Green Bay a Super Bowl contender until Hundley replaced the injured Aaron Rodgers. Hundley’s lack of production has partially been a result of an ultraconservative game plan, but an opportunistic Bears defense may make him pay if he tries to be aggressive in his third career start. Pick: BearsBengals at Titans, 1 p.m., FoxLine: Titans by 4.5The Bengals (3-5) got a huge boost for this matchup when the N.F.L. chose not to suspend A. J. Green over his fight during a loss to Jacksonville last week. His presence gives Cincinnati enough offense to compete, and while the Titans (5-3) have won back-to-back games, they have put little distance between themselves and their lowly opponents (Baltimore and Cleveland). This will probably be another close game. Pick: BengalsGiants at 49ers, 4:25 p.m., FoxLine: Giants by 1With how poorly the 49ers (0-9) have played in almost every facet of the game, having a reason for optimism is a welcome change. Quarterback Jimmy Garoppolo, acquired in a recent trade with New England, represents that optimism, but San Francisco has yet to make any commitment about when, or if, he will play. If the young and talent-deprived team insists on sticking with C. J. Beathard for another week, the Giants (1-7) are destined for their second win. Pick: GiantsDolphins at Panthers, 8:30 p.m., ESPNLine: Panthers by 9For a second consecutive week, a prime-time audience will be forced to endure the atrocious offense of the Dolphins (4-4). It was supposed to be a breakout season for Miami, with quarterback Ryan Tannehill leading several star-level wide receivers and a young Pro Bowler at running back in Jay Ajayi. Instead, Tannehill is out for the season, Ajayi was traded to Philadelphia and the Dolphins’ wide receivers are left shuffling along for a team that often struggles to score in double digits. The Panthers (6-3) are inconsistent and frustrating, but their defense may look to prove a point by making this game a laugher. Pick: Panthers.
Antidoping Officials Obtain Trove of Russian Lab Data The World Anti-Doping Agency, the global regulator of drugs in sports, said Friday it had obtained a digital trove of information that could greatly expand revelations about Russia’s state-sponsored doping program. The massive scheme has corrupted the results of several Olympics and has imperiled the country’s eligibility for the coming Winter Games in South Korea.The agency said that its investigations department had been in possession since late October of an electronic file that was long considered a final piece of the puzzle revealing the contours of the doping system. The agency said in a news release that it was confident that the file contained “all testing data” from January 2012 to August 2015 — thousands of drug screenings run on Russian athletes.“This evidence could be another mother lode and potentially open a new dimension to the gravity of the fraud perpetrated by the Russia doping conspiracy,” Travis T. Tygart, the chief executive of the United States Anti-Doping Agency, said Friday. “Clean athletes expect and deserve justice and the whole truth being brought to light.”The database, which the Russian authorities were unwilling to share with antidoping investigators, arrived through a whistle-blower, according to two people with direct knowledge of the situation who spoke on the condition of anonymity.Information in the database is expected to provide a new level of evidence just as the International Olympic Committee weighs how to penalize Russia ahead of the Winter Games in Pyeongchang, South Korea. The new information could compel Olympic officials to issue stiffer penalties.“This confirms the schemes and provides more definitive evidence about disappearing positives at the Moscow lab,” said Richard McLaren, a Canadian lawyer whose independent investigation conducted last year illuminated the breadth and depth of the doping program. “If the information provides what we think it will provide, it should confirm doping rule violations. There are already a series of cases that have been closed with the approval of WADA, and now those cases may well be reopened.”The antidoping agency said in a news release that its investigators were “finalizing the forensic analysis of the enormous backup file and assessing what information is relevant,” asserting that they were “confident” in the authenticity of the information.Russian officials did not immediately respond to a request for comment submitted to the government’s sports ministry.The antidoping regulator seized the opportunity on Friday to restate another request: that Russia accept the findings of Mr. McLaren’s inquiry, which confirmed that top government officials and Russia’s Federal Security Service had helped with coordinated cheating.“This new intelligence serves to reinforce our requirement of Russian authorities that they too publicly accept the outcomes,” of last year’s investigation, the global antidoping agency’s president, Craig Reedie, said in a statement.Through Mr. McLaren’s inquiry, the antidoping watchdog deconstructed Russia’s cheating schemes and determined that some 1,000 athletes had been tied up in them over three and a half years. Still, officials determined that many individual cases would be hard or impossible to prosecute, in part because of Russia’s lack of cooperation in providing certain evidence, including stored urine samples and the electronic lab records on past tests.Antidoping officials from several countries who have urged Olympic leaders to take a harder stance against Russia in the wake of Mr. McLaren’s investigation — even calling for the nation to be barred from the Pyeongchang Games — have pointed to Russia’s refusal to turn over the electronic data.The World Anti-Doping Agency had ordered Russia to share the database before the watchdog would agree to restore Russia to good standing and certify its compliance with the global antidoping code. The agency is due to evaluate Russia’s cooperation and decide whether to recertify the nation at a meeting next week in Seoul.Investigators who have studied how Russia corrupted several Olympics — most notably the 2014 Sochi Games, where the country controlled the antidoping laboratory and dominated the medal standings — have coveted the electronic files from Moscow.Known as laboratory information management system data, the records reflect the results of lab tests run on the machines in Russia’s national antidoping lab, a nondescript five-story building a few miles from the Kremlin. They also reveal the identity of the athlete to whom each lab analysis corresponded.Outside of international competitions, nations are responsible for drug-testing their own athletes and for reporting the results of those tests to a global database. In Russia, however, the national antidoping laboratory alerted the nation’s sports ministry when athletes tested positive, and they often followed a deputy sports minister’s directive to falsely report positive drug tests as clean results to international authorities, according to both Mr. McLaren and the former longtime director of Russia’s lab, Dr. Grigory Rodchenkov.In an inquiry report published last December, Mr. McLaren said that he had uncovered records that more than 500 such incriminating tests were falsely recorded from 2011 to 2015.“Well-known and elite level athletes had their initial results automatically falsified,” he wrote, noting that, without access to Russia’s lab data and forensic analysis of it, the extent of similar discrepancies and the full scope of cheating could not possibly be known.But if the database now in the regulator’s possession reveals new inconsistencies in the testing histories of Russian athletes, sports officials could mount strong disciplinary cases.Without a positive drug test, it can be challenging to build a case against an athlete that will withstand a legal challenge. To date, Olympic officials have issued penalties against six Russian Olympians who competed in Sochi and have exonerated another; investigations into scores of others are continuing.Global officials from each sport have separately been asked to review allegations against hundreds of athletes. The antidoping regulator itself has agreed to close at least 95 such suspicious cases identified by Mr. McLaren based on a lack of evidence.Olympic officials are currently deliberating how to punish Russia for its state-sponsored schemes, for which no Russian government official was allowed to attend the 2016 Rio Games. The International Olympic Committee is expected to announced its decision regarding Russia’s participation in the 2018 Winter Games in early December.The issue has escalated far beyond the sports world, stirring geopolitical rhetoric. President Vladimir V. Putin this week criticized the recent disciplinary decisions against Russian Olympians as an American attempt to undermine Russia and affect his nation’s presidential election in March.
Review: ‘The Band’s Visit’ Is a Ravishing Musical That Whispers With Romance Breaking news for Broadway theatergoers, even — or perhaps especially — those who thought they were past the age of infatuation: It is time to fall in love again.One of the most ravishing musicals you will ever be seduced by opened on Thursday night at the Barrymore Theater. It is called “The Band’s Visit,” and its undeniable allure is not of the hard-charging, brightly blaring sort common to box-office extravaganzas.Instead, this portrait of a single night in a tiny Israeli desert town confirms a lyric that arrives, like nearly everything in this remarkable show, on a breath of reluctantly romantic hope: “Nothing is as beautiful as something you don’t expect.”With songs by David Yazbek and a script by Itamar Moses, “The Band’s Visit” is a Broadway rarity seldom found these days outside of the canon of Stephen Sondheim: an honest-to-God musical for grown-ups. It is not a work to be punctuated with rowdy cheers and foot-stomping ovations, despite the uncanny virtuosity of Mr. Yazbek’s benchmark score.That would stop the show, and you really don’t want that to happen. Directed by David Cromer with an inspired inventiveness that never calls attention to itself, “The Band’s Visit” flows with the grave and joyful insistence of life itself. All it asks is that you be quiet enough to hear the music in the murmurs, whispers and silences of human existence at its most mundane — and transcendent.And, oh yes, be willing to have your heart broken, at least a little. Because “The Band’s Visit,” which stars a magnificent Katrina Lenk and Tony Shalhoub as would-be lovers in a not-quite paradise, is like life in that way, too.There were worries that this finely detailed show, based on Eran Kolirin’s screenplay for the 2007 film of the same title, might not survive the transfer to Broadway. First staged to sold-out houses late last year at the Atlantic Theater Company, it exuded a shimmering transparency that might well have evaporated in less intimate quarters.Yet “The Band’s Visit” — which follows the modest adventures of a touring Egyptian band stranded in an Israeli village significant only for its insignificance — more than holds its own on a larger stage. Its impeccably coordinated creative team has magnified and polished its assets to a high sheen that never feels synthetic.This show was always close to perfect musically. (Mr. Yazbek’s quietly simmering score, which inflects Broadway balladry and character songs with a haunting Middle Eastern accent, felt as essential as oxygen.) But it felt a shade less persuasive in its connective spoken scenes.That is, to say the least, no longer a problem. Though the lives it depicts are governed by a caution born of chronic disappointment, Mr. Cromer’s production now moves wire to wire with a thoroughbred’s confidence.Such assurance is all the more impressive when you consider that “The Band’s Visit” is built on delicately balanced contradictions. It finds ecstasy in ennui; eroticism among people who rarely make physical contact; and a sense of profound eventfulness in a plot in which, all told, very little happens.The story is sprung when the members of the Alexandria Ceremonial Band, led by their straight-backed conductor, Tewfiq (Mr. Shalhoub), board a bus in 1996 for an engagement at the Arab Cultural Center in the city of Petah Tikva. Thanks to some understandable confusion at the ticket counter, they wind up instead in the flyblown backwater of Bet Hatikva.They register as unmistakably alien figures there, looking like refugees from Sgt. Pepper’s Lonely Hearts Club Band in their powder-blue uniforms. (Sarah Laux did the costumes.) And there’s not a bus out of this godforsaken hole until the next morning.Just how uninteresting is Bet Hatikva? Its residents are happy to tell you, in some of the wittiest songs ever written about being bored. The “B” that begins its name might as well stand for “basically bleak and beige and blah blah blah.”Leading this civic inventory is a cafe proprietor named Dina (Ms. Lenk, in a star-making performance), a wry beauty who clearly doesn’t belong here and just as clearly will never leave. Like her fellow citizens, she sees the defining condition of her life as eternal waiting, a state in which you “keep looking off out into the distance/ Even though you know the view is never gonna change.”Scott Pask’s revolving set, so fitting for a world in which life seems to spin in an endless circle, captures the sameness of the view. But Tyler Micoleau’s lighting, and the whispers of projections by Maya Ciarrocchi, evoke the subliminal changes of perspective stirred by the arrival of strangers.Connections among the Egyptian and the Israeli characters are inevitably incomplete. To begin with, they don’t share a language and must communicate in broken English. And as the stranded musicians interact with their hosts, their shared story becomes a tally of sweet nothings, of regretful might-have-beens.That means that the cultural collisions and consummations that you — and they — might anticipate don’t occur. Even the frictions that emerge from uninvited Arabs on Israeli soil flicker and die like damp matches.The show is carefully veined with images of incompleteness: a forever unlit cigarette in the mouth of a violinist (George Abud); a clarinet concerto that has never been completed by its composer (Alok Tewari); a public telephone that never rings, guarded by a local (Adam Kantor) waiting for a call from his girlfriend; and a pickup line that’s dangled like an unbaited hook by the band’s aspiring Lothario (Ari’el Stachel, whose smooth jazz vocals dazzle in the style of his character’s idol, Chet Baker).All the cast members — who also include a deeply affecting John Cariani, Kristen Sieh, Etai Benson and Andrew Polk — forge precisely individualized characters, lonely people who have all known loss, with everything and nothing in common. A marvelous Mr. Shalhoub (“Monk”) has only grown in the role of a man who carries his dignity and private grief with the stiffness of someone transporting perilously fragile cargo.As for Ms. Lenk, seen on Broadway last season in Paula Vogel’s “Indecent,” she is the ideal avatar of this show’s paradoxical spirit, at once coolly evasive and warmly expansive, like the jasmine wind that Dina describes in the breakout ballad “Omar Sharif.”Listening to Tewfiq sing in Arabic, she wonders, “Is he singing about wishing?” She goes on: “I don’t know what I feel, and I don’t know what I know/All I know is I feel something different.”Mr. Yazbek’s melody matches the exquisitely uncertain certainty of the lyrics. That “something different” is the heart-clutching sensation that throbs throughout this miraculous show, as precise as it is elusive, and all the more poignant for being both.
Uma Thurman, Ready to Be Tested Uma Thurman knows that there are no retakes in theater, no postproduction fixes, no chances to dub in a line. When she strides onstage for “The Parisian Woman,” a play by Beau Willimon, the “House of Cards” creator, that opens Nov. 30 at the Hudson Theater, no flattering lenses or editing trickery will help her.“Of course it’s exposing,” she said over dinner recently, “but no exposure, no challenge. You can’t test yourself in safety.”How many more tests does Ms. Thurman, 47, have to pass? An Oscar nominee for “Pulp Fiction,” she has been a forceful, high-voltage presence in film from “Dangerous Liaisons” in 1988, through the “Kill Bill” movies of the early aughts, to the “Nymphomaniac” movies of 2013. But she is a 5-foot-11-inch woman with a Pre-Raphaelite face and a spiky wit. The movies haven’t always known what to do with her. And vice versa.“A great cinema role comes along a few times,” Ms. Thurman said dryly. “Maybe for some people, more often. But not everybody.”This goes a long way toward explaining the wild incoherence of her IMDB page, which bounces from “Henry & June” to “A Muppets Christmas: Letters to Santa,” “My Super Ex-Girlfriend” to “The Golden Bowl.”It also suggests why an actress of Ms. Thurman’s starry rank, with only one previous professional theater credit, will be onstage for every second of every scene as Chloe, a chic pleasure-seeker with a workaholic husband and a carousel of lovers.With a career spent trying “to be decent and work hard” amid what she described as Hollywood’s “contempt and dismissiveness toward women of all kinds,” it comes as a relief to find a role like this one.Yet even this opportunity has been shadowed by outside forces: the allegations of sexual assault and harassment against the Miramax co-founder Harvey Weinstein, who produced several of Ms. Thurman’s movies, and the accusations of sexual misconduct against Kevin Spacey, the star of Mr. Willimon’s Netflix show.After a full day of rehearsal in heels, Ms. Thurman had arrived at the Japanese restaurant late, winded from a steeplechase through tourist-crammed Midtown. She looked like an Olympian goddess in her off hours, a goddess with a rumpled scarf, tousled hair and an immediate need to phone her teenage son and check in on his soccer game. (She has two older children, including that soccer-playing son, with her ex-husband, Ethan Hawke, and a younger daughter with her former fiancé Arpad Busson.)“I’ve definitely reached that point of such complete maximum preoccupation that I’m just trying to keep up,” she said.She first learned of “The Parisian Woman” two years ago, when a shared entertainment lawyer brokered a coffee date between her and the Tony-winning director Pam MacKinnon. Ms. Thurman had always meant to return to the theater, and she was finding quality film roles thin on the ground. (Asked about a lack of great parts for women over 35, Ms. Thurman pounced before the question was finished: “Or under 35,” she said.)She wanted to know what Broadway had to offer. And not just Broadway, Ms. Thurman said. “Any theater.”Over coffee, she and Ms. MacKinnon batted a few classical heroines back and forth. Then Ms. MacKinnon mentioned Mr. Willimon’s script, inspired by “La Parisienne,” an 1885 play by the minor French writer Henry Becque melding boulevard comedy and daring realism. Mr. Willimon, an Off Broadway playwright before creating “House of Cards,” had relocated it to the ethics-optional Beltway of present-day D.C.Ms. MacKinnon sent the script, and Ms. Thurman felt instantly drawn to Chloe, the Parisian woman of the title. (Chloe is actually American. Long story.) She admired Chloe’s “emancipation and her sense of entitlement, of sexual freedom,” she said. “The sheer confidence of the character.”Chloe is a flirt and a schemer, a dilettante and a high-heeled brawler, a woman of appetite.Another coffee date was arranged, this time with Mr. Willimon, who described the meeting as a “hey, let’s get to know each other to make sure that we don’t hate each other’s guts.” Ms. Thurman brought the script, already studded with questions and notes.An earlier version of the play had its premiere at South Coast Repertory in 2013, featuring Dana Delany, a lower-wattage star, as the lead. But speaking with Ms. Thurman, Mr. Willimon had an uncanny feeling, “as though almost impossibly I’d written the play for her — her poise, her charm, her sense of playfulness and humor. All those things that Chloe needs in order to exist, Uma has naturally.” The play’s producers felt the same way, delaying an industry reading until Ms. Thurman recovered from a bone-breaking horse-riding accident.As Ms. MacKinnon said, “Chloe has movie star charisma.” So it’s pretty helpful that Ms. Thurman is already a movie star.Plays, however, were Ms. Thurman’s first taste of acting. As a sophomore at her Massachusetts boarding school, she played the female lead in “The Crucible.” More than 30 years later, there was swagger in her throaty voice when she said, “It was an achievement for a sophomore to get the role that usually a senior gets.”Some agents she’d met while modeling the summer before came to see the play. Their interest helped persuade her parents, Robert Thurman, a professor of Buddhist Studies at Columbia University, and Nena von Schlebrügge, a former fashion model who now helps to run Menla, a retreat in the Catskill Mountains, to let her transfer to Manhattan’s Professional Children’s School. By 17, she had booked her first four film roles, including a clamshell-born Venus in “The Adventures of Baron Munchausen” and the convent girl Cécile in “Dangerous Liaisons.”“It wasn’t very difficult to cast her,” said Stephen Frears, the director of “Dangerous Liaisons,” speaking by telephone. “She was so striking, so beautiful and so fresh.”She was also, as Mr. Frears said, “very formidable.” That’s a hallmark of her career and also maybe a clue to why that career has been so eclectic. Ms. Thurman isn’t a delicate actress or a melting one or the kind who comes right to the front of a movie screen and invites you in. There’s a remove in a lot of her best work (“Henry & June,” “Kill Bill”), a sense that she has emotions and ideas that are hers alone.She has refused to be typecast as a siren or a femme fatale and has struggled to find roles that attract her. It isn’t that she won’t play wives and girlfriends — she will, she has. But these are women as likely to steal a scene as to yield to it.Quentin Tarantino, who directed her as a gangster’s wife in “Pulp Fiction” and wrote the “Kill Bill” movies for her, compared Ms. Thurman to golden-age luminaries like Greta Garbo and Bette Davis. “There’s this year’s blonde and there’s last year’s blonde. Interchangeable. But to me, Uma has a quality that could rank with a Marlene Dietrich,” he said in a phone interview. He also called her, with affection, “a big, tall willow.”Will Ms. Thurman’s old-Hollywood style play on Broadway? Her 1999 outing, as the film star Jennifer in Martin Crimp’s version of Molière’s “The Misanthrope,” didn’t dazzle critics. “She brings to mind a beautiful, sheltered girl at her first grown-up dance, putting on airs and hoping against hope she’ll get away with it,” Ben Brantley wrote in The New York Times.Did the tone of the responses surprise her? “I don’t expect anyone to pat me on the back,” she said. That script, a series of rhymed couplets barnacled with topical quips, “was so impenetrably difficult,” she said. “It was madness.”Since then, the closest Ms. Thurman has come to a stage role was a guest-star arc on the first season of the NBC show “Smash,” in which she played Rebecca, a movie star trying to conquer Broadway, felled at an out-of-town tryout by a tainted smoothie.Nothing so dramatic has affected “The Parisian Woman,” but Ms. Thurman and Mr. Willimon have both found themselves in the news for reasons unrelated to the play. As rehearsals began, accusations against Mr. Weinstein broke wide. As to whether she had personally been subject to abuse, Ms. Thurman gave the clipped response, “I’ll discuss it when I want to discuss it.” (In an “Access Hollywood” interview, which has since gone viral, she offered a similar answer, though in more obviously indignant tones.)In late October, the allegations against Mr. Spacey also surfaced and production on “House of Cards,” was halted. (Mr. Willimon left the series in 2016.)Though “The Parisian Woman” traffics in questions of sex and power, any discussion of these real-world events “never made its way into the rehearsal room,” Ms. MacKinnon said firmly.Inside that room, a few days before the actors were to move into the theater for technical rehearsals, Ms. Thurman clacked onto the temporary set in teal heels, prop phone in her hand, gemstone glint in her eye. With mischief and languor, she subdued her lover (Marton Csokas) and teased her husband (Josh Lucas). (Mischief extended to her downtime, too. When this reporter slunk into the room, Ms. Thurman called brightly, “Write some fake news for us today!”)The blocking for the scene wasn’t set yet; the pacing juddered. But when Ms. Thurman lobbed a line like, “I can’t control who falls in love with me,” it landed.Ms. MacKinnon occasionally stopped the action to offer a suggestion. Sometimes the suggestions were Ms. Thurman’s. Maybe she could speak an early line more lightly. Maybe she should cross the stage later. She asked Ms. MacKinnon if she could sit during an argument with Mr. Csokas’s character, the better to soothe him. “It’s physical de-escalation on an oppositional line,” Ms. Thurman explained with typical hyperarticulacy.Rehearsing a play has required some adjustments in the ways she attacks a role. Her method is still what Mr. Tarantino described as motivated by emotional connection to a character and “from the inside out,” he said. “She’s not surface, right?”But after decades of telling herself, “Everything better be perfect right now,” she has had to adapt to scenes being built gradually, over days and weeks, rather than knocked together in a couple of hours. She has translated a habit of multiple takes into rehearsal room exploration, playing with different tones and stances.As Ms. MacKinnon said, “She’ll complete one version and then look at me and say, ‘Or …’ Then she’ll go back and do it in a completely different way.”An upside: playing those versions opposite live actors rather than place-holding pieces of tape. “I’ve made whole films with tape,” she said.Eight shows a week can wear an actor down. Yet Ms. Thurman wasn’t too worried about keeping Chloe fresh. In the “Kill Bill” movies she’d lived with her character, the Bride, for a year, and still managed to find variation. “Acting has never felt routine to me,” she said.Playing Chloe, she said, was taxing her more than any part in a decade. It was forcing her to use all of her actorly muscles “in a more total and protracted way.”Is Chloe a siren? Maybe. A femme fatale? Depends who you ask. Happily, she is more than that, too.As dinner wound down, with plates of vegetables and tiny bowls of tofu littering the table, Ms. Thurman considered the question of what a woman like Chloe really wants. “I think I’m still exploring that,” she said. Finally, she gave what she called “a most banal and bad answer.”“I think she’s wanting and demanding to be fully alive,” Ms. Thurman said.It didn’t sound so terrible.
Review: ‘What We’re Up Against,’ a Sexism Story More Timely Than Ever If Theresa Rebeck’s furious office comedy “What We’re Up Against” had come along at some other recent moment — had it opened at WP Theater even a couple of months ago instead of just this week — it would have been easy to dismiss as an overblown relic of an age, 25 years ago, when women in traditionally male fields really had the deck stacked against them. And even then, was it all that bad?What a difference a global scandal makes. Since early October, when the public cascade of sexual abuse allegations against the producer Harvey Weinstein began, a fresh awareness of rampant misogyny has stripped the veneer of meritocracy from the workplace. Suddenly “What We’re Up Against” — written in 1992, not long after Anita Hill testified in the Senate, accusing the Supreme Court nominee Clarence Thomas of sexual harassment — feels both cathartic and clarifying, a map of a minefield drawn in bold cartoon colors.Directed by Adrienne Campbell-Holt, Ms. Rebeck’s play isn’t, as it happens, about sexual harassment. It’s about all of the other ugly ways that a woman can be foiled and dismissed, ostracized and worn down, when she’s just trying to do her job. It’s also about what happens when she dares to show her anger, fighting back against being shut out.Talented and ambitious, Eliza (Krysta Rodriguez) is a new architect at a firm whose unseen owner, David, hired her for her excellent mind. (They must be sleeping together, right? Everyone says so.) She’s not as recent an arrival, though, as Weber (Skylar Astin), a sycophantic blowhard whose abundant lack of talent doesn’t keep him from being assigned to project teams. Eliza, meanwhile, sits in her shamefully small office with nothing to do.“When the experience is there, she’ll be put on projects,” the villainous team leader, Stu (Damian Young), says, swilling a drink at his glass-top desk. “She wants to know how she can get the experience if she’s not on a project. This is a good question. And so I tell her: Initiative.”That is garbage, of course — we’ve already heard him call her a sexist slur that can’t be repeated here — and anyway Stu is outraged at Eliza’s initiative. As the play opens, she has just tricked him by putting Weber’s name on a design of her own, then asking Stu to explain what makes it so good. After he fell for it, she said it was hers.“This is what we’re up against,” Stu grouses, retelling the tale.Perhaps best known now as the deposed creator of “Smash,” Ms. Rebeck has long made her way through the man’s world of both theater and television. I remember hearing a male theater director, years ago, disparage her in glaringly misogynistic language — a tipoff that his judgment reflected him more than her. So she understands this terrain from the inside.As sitcomish as it sometimes feels, “What We’re Up Against” has a complex view of its characters and their dynamics. Janice (Marg Helgenberger) has been at the firm for years, and before Eliza’s arrival she was its only woman architect. (The unseen support staff is, she notes, all female.)Janice recognizes the structural flaws in the office culture, but like a lot of people who find themselves the sole representative of a demographic group, she opts not to dwell on them. She gets along by not threatening the men — keeping her expectations low, her comments flattering and her work mediocre. Also, she dresses like a librarian. (The costumes, which don’t always nail the era, are by Tilly Grimes.)Eliza hopes that Janice will be an ally. Janice, halfheartedly gaslighting her, hopes that Eliza will tone it down. She doesn’t, and that’s the fun of Ms. Rebeck’s revenge fantasy, which lets no one off the hook for their bad behavior.The cast is an impressive assemblage of talent, and Ms. Rodriguez and Ms. Helgenberger both do fine. Oddly, though, the flashiest roles belong to men: the showboating worm Weber and, especially, the toxic Stu — hardly the only villain here, but the one with the most power, and he relishes abusing it.Playing Stu is a tricky challenge that Mr. Young expertly meets, giving a comic performance with just enough bite that we can’t dismiss Stu as a buffoon. His body language — the way he cringes in not-so-mock fear when he talks about Eliza — is like a cry straight from his psyche.But Ben (Jim Parrack), a project leader at the firm, is more insidiously harmful. A casual sexist, he’s also a pragmatist, and good work is his principal concern. He knows Eliza could help with that, but he’s not the kind of guy to make waves. Instead he goes along.In the production’s bi-level set, by Narelle Sissons, we get a cross-section view of the office. With lumber and metal seams exposed at the edges, we see how this structure was built. It’s a metaphor for what Ms. Rebeck’s play does: rips away the smooth surfaces and lays bare the skeleton, where it’s plain that the rot is in the bones.
Debating Whether Reptiles or Amphibians Should Be House Pets Reclining with a laptop on my couch in Brooklyn, I searched “buy lizard online” and clicked the first link. I filled my cart with a flying dragon, a couple of caimans, a red-eared slider turtle, a poison dart frog and an albino garter snake.I agreed to the terms and conditions, certifying that I knew the laws governing reptile ownership (it is illegal for me to own some of these reptiles in New York), that I understood exceptions for baby turtles (I still don’t), and that I wouldn’t hold the company responsible.Now all I had to do was provide a credit-card number and my new pets would be delivered to my doorstep the next day.That I can impulsively buy a reptile — or hundreds at the same time — without fully understanding what I’m getting into is startling to some experts concerned with animal welfare. And that is only part of a growing debate over whether it’s appropriate to keep reptiles and amphibians as pets.At first, the justification seems simple: If you can keep an animal happy and healthy with proper food and housing, then it shouldn’t matter if it’s a dog, lizard or cat.But animals and their requirements widely vary. For reptiles, there are particular concerns about welfare, ecological sustainability and human health.These issues were examined in a collection of articles in a recent issue of the journal Veterinary Record. The authors hope pleas based on science will inform proposed restrictions for keeping exotic animals as pets.A century ago, you could buy a living lizard lapel pin, one of a wide variety of domestic cruelties once inflicted on reptiles. Today, people are more keenly conscious of animal welfare, and keepers and breeders know more about nutrition and husbandry of reptiles and amphibians.A multimillion-dollar industry has emerged around caring for them, with many veterinarians specializing in exotic pet care and herpetology. In addition to the internet, reptiles are sold at pet stores, flea markets, street vendors and herpetology fairs.Reptiles are popular pets because they are relatively quiet, odorless and “compatible with modern lifestyles,” said Gordon Burghardt, a herpetologist who specializes in behavior at the University of Tennessee, Knoxville. (As a child in the 1950s, he got his start with dime-store turtles and lizards.)Caring for these animals is rewarding to their keepers, inspiring for scientists, important for research, and may foster conservation efforts by improving public perceptions of reptiles like snakes, which have been unjustly killed in the past, argued Dr. Burghardt and Frank Pasmans, a veterinarian at Ghent University in Belgium and lead author of a review in the veterinary journal.While there are worries about the impact of domestic reptiles on human health — especially in homes with children or people with compromised immune systems — the bigger concerns are animal welfare and ecological damage, said Dr. Pasmans.On their journey to your living room, reptiles and amphibians first survive unregulated and sometimes illegal methods of capture or breeding, housing and transportation.In 2014, researchers, vets and animal welfare workers investigated a major wholesale supplier of exotic animals. Eighty percent, including reptiles and amphibians, were sick, injured or dead as a result of overcrowding, stress, poor hygiene and nutrition, or cannibalism.“High mortality rates are the cost of doing business, whether captured in the wild or bred in captivity,” said Debbie Leahy, a wildlife manager at The Humane Society of the United States who was not involved in the study.Collector demand for rare animals means some suppliers seek threatened, new or unclassified species in the wild, a trend that has become so problematic that scientists withhold details about the locations of species they study in publications for fear of poaching.To bypass international trade regulations, collectors may pass off wild animals as captive-bred. Overexploitation also becomes a problem when demand is high and wild animals are cheaper to capture than breed.Captive breeding is favored over wild capture because of conservation concerns. But it isn’t perfect and may introduce problems, like increased susceptibility to disease in some species or contributing to demand for animals falsely claimed to be captive-bred.In your home, it’s hard to read the demands of stone-faced herps evolved for wild living. They need proper temperature, humidity, food, lighting and exercise, and have other species-specific psychological and social requirements.If you meet these needs, you must accept that your pet could grow quite big and live a couple decades. If you don’t, yours will probably die in its first year, like 75 percent of pet reptiles and amphibians brought home as pets.Reptiles and amphibians don’t make good pets “and should not be part of the pet trade,” said Lorelei Tibbetts, a vet technician and manager at The Center for Avian and Exotic Medicine in New York. Most of the time, animal patients come to her with metabolic or reproductive issues related to improper nutrition, husbandry and life in captivity.“It’s really not possible for us to care for these animals in order for them to thrive and live a decent life,” she said.People may neglect pet reptiles and amphibians no more than common pets. But even the best environments “will result in ‘controlled deprivation’,” as is also the case with caged birds and rabbits, or fish in tanks, wrote Dr. Pasmans in his review.Just as many pet owners provide a high standard of care for dogs, cats, birds or fish, it is possible, with a lot of effort, to properly look after some reptiles and amphibians in homes, he adds. For instance, bearded dragons adapt rather well to captivity.Clifford Warwick, a consulting biologist on exotic animal welfare and lead author of a viewpoint in the journal, said we can’t provide proper care because we don’t know what many species need. Even when we do, misinformation on the internet leads pet owners astray.It’s easy to buy a cute pet on impulse, but “when people find out how much trouble they are, they turn them loose,” said Ms. Leahy.Generally, the limited options for dealing with unwanted exotic pets means many owners just release them. Discarded pets can wreak havoc on nonnative ecosystems. That red-eared slider in my cart from Mississippi is a huge problem in Europe and Asia.And Florida is dealing with the biggest invasive species problem on the planet, mostly because of the pet trade. There, iguanas have destroyed concrete infrastructure and Burmese pythons have eaten protected and common species, setting off a disease-spreading chain reaction.Despite all these concerns, reptile and amphibian owners aren’t going to disappear any sooner than dog, cat or bird owners.In the past, people have summoned emotional arguments to single out slick-skinned exotic pets with bad reputations. But the animals aren’t as harmful as the harm inherent in trading them.The contributors to the review hope that by heeding scientific arguments, rules about reptile ownership will be conceived of fairly.
The Bridge Wobbles. So Do You. That’s When the Trouble Starts. A bouncy foot bridge is charming — until it isn’t.This was the case for Brooklyn’s Squibb Park Bridge in 2014, London’s Millennium Bridge in 2000 and a long list of other bridges throughout history that became worrisomely wobbly when large crowds crossed over them. Authorities temporarily closed the Squibb Park and Millennium bridges and spent millions of dollars on repairs.What gives?Engineers expect all bridges to move a little with cars, people and wind. But when things get dangerous, like during the Millennium Bridge opening, you can blame it on the interactions between moving crowds and bridges, scientists suggest in a study published Friday in the journal Science Advances.Movements of bridges and people feed off one another, Igor Belykh, an applied mathematician at Georgia State University, who led the study, explained. You step on a bridge, it moves a little bit; you adjust to steady yourself. And on and on. “However when the bridge starts wobbling significantly, I, as a pedestrian, have to adjust my gait,” he said. And when a critical number of people try to find balance at the same time and their movements sync up, they can align with the sway of the bridge. And that’s when things get scary.Researchers had attributed the wobbly Millennium Bridge to this phenomenon, which they call phase-locking. The new study confirmed that and challenged a popular belief that the sway gradually grew with crowd size. They found that the wobble starts suddenly, after the crowd exceeds a critical threshold. For the Millennium Bridge, that was about 165 people.Dr. Belykh and his colleagues described these dynamic relationships using complex mathematical models — which they jokingly call “crash test dummies” — that they hope will become part of industry standards. Using these models, engineers and designers may be able to plug in all the details about a bridge and its potential pedestrians and figure out how big a crowd must get before a bridge starts to wobble.What exactly causes the initial wobbling, though, is something the researchers are still trying to figure out. It may have something to do with how you might switch your gait to find balance, taking wider steps, moving from side to side and lifting your legs more. They describe pedestrians moving in this manner as non-smooth oscillators in their models.Every time you step, you push the ground one way, then the other. If you’re on a bridge, you push it too. This causes it to sway. You respond. It sways. And so on. Now imagine a whole bunch of you in a crowd — hundreds of non-smooth oscillators. The timing of your steps, and the force they put on the bridge are important to what happens with wobbliness.This might also explain cases of wobbly bridges that didn’t show visual signs of crowds syncing up steps, like the Clifton Suspension Bridge in Bristol, England, where authorities limited pedestrian traffic during the city’s busy annual Balloon Fiesta. The researchers are currently collaborating with scientists in England and the United States to see if this is the case and if visual signals could help orchestrate crowd movements to prevent or stop bridges from wobbling.But until then, we all may think twice when crossing a bridge. “Unfortunately, the more I study and know about the bridges, the more uncomfortable I become when I cross,” said Dr. Belykh.
Fred Cole, Leader of Garage-Rock Band Dead Moon, Dies at 69 Fred Cole, a guitarist and singer who became a cult hero of the Pacific Northwest music scene as the leader of the long-running garage-rock band Dead Moon, died on Thursday at his home in Clackamas, Ore. He was 69.The cause was cancer, said his wife and bandmate, Toody Cole.As the grunge gold rush in the 1990s made stars of young bands in and around Seattle like Nirvana and Soundgarden, Mr. Cole and Dead Moon remained beloved local stars despite being decades older than their peers.Well into his 40s by then, Mr. Cole had been a regular of the garage-rock circuit — playing a rough and raw sound that long predated grunge’s noisy take on punk — since the mid-1960s, when he was a member of the Lollipop Shoppe, which had a minor hit in 1968 with “You Must Be a Witch.”But with Dead Moon and various other groups over the years, Mr. Cole set a standard for do-it-yourself perseverance. He and his wife released records on their own label, Tombstone, with a dark, handmade aesthetic. He even cut lacquer discs, used to make vinyl records, on an old mono lathe at their home outside Portland; according to legend, it was the same machine used to make the Kingsmen’s “Louie Louie” in 1963.In a scratchy wail, Mr. Cole led Dead Moon in ragged, macabre-obsessed songs, like “Graveyard” and “Dead Moon Night,” that sounded as though they could have been made at any time in the last 50 years.From its first album, “In the Graveyard,” in 1988, until it disbanded in 2006, Dead Moon stayed far under the radar of the mainstream music industry, building a following around the world while still being celebrated as local heroes. Besides Ms. Cole on bass — she was usually credited simply as Toody — the band included Andrew Loomis on drums.“We felt proud of them up here,” said Dean Whitmore, an executive at Sub Pop Records in Seattle, who worked with Dead Moon on a 2006 compilation album, “Echoes of the Past.” “They were the real deal, and they were ours.”Frederick Lee Cole was born on Aug. 28, 1948, in Tacoma, Wash., and moved with his mother to Las Vegas, where he attended high school. But as he recounted in the Dead Moon song “Kicked Out — Kicked In,” he was dismissed from school at age 16 for having long hair and a bad attitude.By then he was already a veteran of bands, including the Lords and the Weeds. In 1966, the Weeds were told that they could play with the Yardbirds at the Fillmore in San Francisco. Upon arriving, Ms. Cole said in an interview, the band learned it had no such invitation.Intending to avoid the Vietnam draft, the young men decided to drive north to Canada, but ran out of gas in Portland. There Mr. Cole met Kathleen Conner, nicknamed Toody.They married in June 1967. The Weeds, signed to the same label as the Strawberry Alarm Clock, were renamed the Lollipop Shoppe. They released one album, “Just Colour,” the following year, before breaking up.In the 1970s, while Mr. Cole continued to pursue a music career, he and his wife started their first of several retail businesses in and around Portland, including a music store called Captain Whizeagle’s, and they also began to raise a family. In addition to his wife, Mr. Cole is survived by their two sons, Weeden and Shane; a daughter, Amanda; and seven grandchildren.It was only when Ms. Cole was about 30, after years of her “doing the domestic thing” and raising their children, she said, that her husband asked her to play music with him.“Fred talked me into it,” she said. “He was so sick of male bass players who were flaky as hell.”They started the Rats in 1980, and later recruited Mr. Loomis to form Dead Moon. A year after the group broke up, the Coles founded Pierced Arrows with another drummer, Kelly Halliburton. With Mr. Cole’s health worsening, the couple officially retired from performing in 2016. That year, Mr. Loomis, who had lymphoma, died at 54.Dead Moon appeared in “Hype!,” a 1996 film about the grunge era in Seattle, and in 2006 the band got its own documentary, “Unknown Passage: The Dead Moon Story.” Next year, its career will be documented in a book to be published by Mississippi Records, a label and record store in Portland that has been reissuing Dead Moon’s catalog.As the music industry descended on Seattle and the Northwest in the early ’90s, Dead Moon stayed its course, releasing records on Tombstone and touring constantly.Asked what it was like to be an older couple in the midst of a youth-driven media frenzy, Ms. Cole said, “Most of the young ones had a hard time keeping up with us.”
Katie Lee, Folk Singer Who Fought to Protect a Canyon, Dies at 98 Katie Lee, a free-spirited folk singer who found her mission as a performer and writer protesting the loss of Glen Canyon’s spectacular beauty to a dam on the Colorado River, died on Nov. 1 at her home in Jerome, Ariz. She was 98.Her death was confirmed by Kathleen Williamson, the executor of her will.“Rivers are the lifeblood of our planet and they need to flow,” Ms. Lee said in “Kickass Katie Lee” (2016), a short biographical film by Beth and George Gage. “They don’t need to be dammed every 15 feet.”Eloquent and blissfully profane, Ms. Lee joined conservationists like David Brower, executive director of the Sierra Club, and the writer Edward Abbey to try to stop construction of the 710-foot-high Glen Canyon Dam in Northern Arizona, which opened in 1963. She became part of the chorus of environmentalists that ever since has demanded that the canyon be restored.The only impediment to her blowing up the dam, she would say, was that she did not know how.Her enchantment with Glen Canyon began in 1953 during a visit with friends and continued when she became a river runner. She adored its rapids, and the breezes that she said sounded like voices speaking to her. She swam nude in its potholes and waterfalls. She explored its 125 contoured side canyons, each of them named (some by her), and each one a different aesthetic experience.“When they drowned that place, they drowned my whole guts,” she said in an interview in 2010 at Telluride MountainFilm, a documentary festival. “And I will never forgive the bastards. May they rot in hell.”Her anger at the federal government, in particular the Bureau of Reclamation, which built the Glen Canyon Dam, fueled her music and made her a magnet for filmmakers. In her ballads, she sang about rivers and boatmen. In her protest songs, she rebuked dam builders.In “Colorado River Songs,” an album she released in 1964, she pilloried the Bureau of Reclamation.Three jeers for the Wreck-the-Nation BureauFreeloaders with souls so pure-oWiped out the good Lord’s work in six short years.Eric Balken, executive director of the nonprofit Glen Canyon Institute, said that Ms. Lee was an important part of the environmental movement to the end of her life.“She converted her passion for the canyon into fiery opposition to the Glen Canyon Dam,” Mr. Balken said in a telephone interview. “She conveyed the canyon’s beauty and essence to so many people nationwide.”She was often referred to as “the Desert Goddess of Glen Canyon.”Once the dam was built, she did not return to Glen Canyon. The loss was too great.“What’s left of my rivers, what’s left of me,” she said when she was 96. “We’re probably going to go together.”Kathryn Louise Lee was born on Oct. 23, 1919, in Aledo, Ill. Her family moved to Tucson when she was three months old, and she grew up loving the desert. Her father, Zanna, was an architect and homebuilder; her mother, the former Ruth Detwiler, was a decorator. Her mother pushed her to play the piano. Her father taught her to hunt rabbit and quail with a Remington shotgun.Earning the lead in a high school play called “The Patsy” made her feel as if the stage were her living room. “Wow! This is where I belong!” she recalled thinking in 2008 in an oral history interview for the Cline Library at Northern Arizona University. “I knew every line of the play, I knew exactly what to do, and I was fine.”That early acting experience led her to study drama at the University of Arizona. She went on to have a modest career as an actress that included roles on radio shows like “The Great Gildersleeve” and “The Railroad Hour,” a music series starring the singer Gordon MacRae.She found greater acclaim as a folk singer, developing friendships with stars like Burl Ives, Josh White and Ramblin’ Jack Elliott. Mr. Ives praised her once by saying, “The best cowboy singer I know is a girl — Katie Lee.” Her repertoire was traditional for folk singers in the 1950s: songs about outlaws and murder, love and hate, cowboys, labor, poverty, injustice and politics.But the planning for the dam on Glen Canyon gave her a particularly strong motivatation to sing.“My river was about to be unjustly dammed … politically dammed,” she wrote in “All My Rivers Are Gone” (1998), one of several books she wrote about Glen Canyon. “Songs about my river! Songs of protest! Folk songs. Holy Mother!”She added: “I had a cause! A cause that didn’t center on me-me-me: one that asked nothing of me, really, yet was far from mute. I’d never had a cause before, but now there was a place, almost a person, that needed my help.”She did not sing only folk or protest songs. She recorded humorous songs about psychoanalysis on the 1957 album “Songs of Couch and Consultation.” With lyrics by the jazz saxophonist Bud Freeman and music by Leon Prober, the album became a hit in England and the songs became a popular element of her act. She had initially rejected Mr. Freeman’s suggestion that she record the songs but reconsidered after listening to his demo tapes on her way back from a trip to the Colorado River.“The tunes were catchy,” she told The Arizona Republic in 1960, “so I thought, ‘Why not?’ ”In “Stay as Sick as You Are,” she sang:I love your streak of crueltyYour psychopathic liesThe homicidal tendenciesShining in your eyes.She continued to sing about cowboys, rivers and canyons. She recorded the album “Love’s Little Sisters” in 1975 at a studio on the ranch owned by the Grateful Dead drummer Mickey Hart in Novato, Calif. At the time, Mr. Hart was living and working with Jerilyn Lee Brandelius, Ms. Lee’s stepdaughter.Last month, at a party for her 98th birthday, Ms. Lee performed her composition “Song of the Boatman.” Holding a birthday card, she sang:Today I know your magic callWill lead me back to the canyon wall.And the music in your rapids roarMake this boatman’s song from his soul outpour.In addition to Ms. Brandelius, Ms. Lee is survived by her son, Ronald Eld; another stepdaughter, Susie Brandelius; and two stepsons, Ken and John Brandelius.Her longtime partner, Joey van Leeuwen, whom she met on a trip to Australia in 1979, committed suicide one day after her death, Ms. Williamson said. Mr. van Leeuwen, who filled their house with his wood carvings of birds, worried about what would happen to him if Ms. Lee died first. In “Kickass Katie Lee,” he said, “I would have a terrible life on my own.”Ms. Lee was married at least twice. She was divorced from Eugene Busch Jr., a businessman, and became a widow after the death of Edwin C. Brandelius Jr., a racecar driver and track announcer.Ms. Lee recalled in “All My Rivers Are Gone” that while on a trip to Glen Canyon in 1957, a year after the first dynamite blast that initiated construction of the dam, she took a break from lunch, stared at the river and talked to the water.“I feel betrayed,” she said. “Homo sapiens! Greedy pathetic fools with a genetic mania to destroy all the sanctuaries that feed their souls. Well, hell, I don’t give a damn if we’re blotted out. I don’t want to be a part of the human race when I see the pimps in government and the whores who do their bidding. I’d rather be a coyote.”
Robert De Cormier, Arranger for Folk and Pop Stars, Dies at 95 Robert De Cormier, who led a musical double life as a choral director and composer in classical music and an arranger and a conductor for folk and pop stars like Harry Belafonte and Peter, Paul and Mary, died on Tuesday in Rutland, Vt. He was 95.His wife, Louise De Cormier, said the cause was kidney failure.Mr. De Cormier spent much of his career behind the scenes, in the rehearsal rooms and orchestra pits of Manhattan. He joined forces with Mr. Belafonte as an arranger after Mr. Belafonte’s album “Calypso” became a breakout hit in 1956.But sometimes performers put him in the spotlight. In Carnegie Hall in 1959, Mr. Belafonte turned the calypso tune “Matilda” into an audience singalong. He got laughs and, eventually, some singing when he called on “all the big spenders” and “women over 40” — and, at one point, on “the conductor.”Mr. De Cormier started to sing, solo, but Mr. Belafonte stopped him after only a few bars.“Good heavens, Bob,” Mr. Belafonte said, lecturing him: “You must learn. Can’t turn your back on the masses, man. Turn about. Face them.”Mr. De Cormier did as ordered, to laughter and applause from the audience, and sang:Ma-til-da,Ma-til-da,Ma-til-da, she take me money and run Venezuela.The audience applauded as he finished and gave the next downbeat.Peter, Paul and Mary tried to hire Mr. De Cormier the next year, when they were starting out. “Bob was our first choice,” Noel Paul Stookey — Paul to the world — recalled in 2016, “and we didn’t get him.” He was busy working with Mr. Belafonte. He had also signed on to be the musical director for “The Happiest Girl in the World,” a Broadway musical with lyrics by E. Y. Harburg to music by Jacques Offenbach.He became Peter, Paul and Mary’s music director in the 1970s, writing out the vocal lines that Peter Yarrow, Mr. Stookey and Mary Travers improvised in rehearsal. Explaining the way they worked, Ms. Travers said in 2002, “What we do, it’s kind of like a bunch of people cooking together.”Mr. De Cormier said in an interview last year that “when we got something we all liked,” he put it on paper, “because if I didn’t, the next day it was start all over again.”Mr. Stookey called Mr. De Cormier the group’s “recording secretary.” Mr. Yarrow, called him the fourth member of Peter, Paul and Mary and said his role was invaluable because “none of us was musically articulate enough to write it down.“I could do it laboriously, but he was a whiz,” Mr. Yarrow said. “He could hear everything at the same time. You could feel his point of view, and that helped us to find our identity, but he did not attempt to say, ‘O.K., here’s the arrangement, this is it.’ He knew the most authentic way was for us to do it in person, singing the parts to each other.”Mr. De Cormier worked with Peter, Paul and Mary while continuing as the director of the New York Choral Society, a position he had taken in 1970.Sometimes he did more than just conduct the group. Sometimes he conducted everyone, as in December 1970, when he taught the audience in what was then Philharmonic Hall at Lincoln Center to sing 10 measures of “Beatus Vir,” a setting of Psalm 112 by Vivaldi.Sometimes he brought the stars he knew from popular music to the choral society, as when he persuaded Mr. Belafonte to be the narrator in the first New York performance of “Moralities,” by Hans Werner Henze, a setting of “morality plays” by W. H. Auden that were based on Aesop’s fables. From time to time Peter, Paul and Mary also appeared with the choral society.Mr. De Cormier retired from the society in 1987 and later helped found the Vermont Symphony Orchestra Chorus, but his influence on the New York group continues. Its associate conductor, Michael A. Ciavaglia, wrote his doctoral dissertation at the University of Cincinnati College-Conservatory of Music on “The Choral Music of Robert De Cormier” in 2013.Robert Romeo De Cormier Jr. was born on Jan. 7, 1922, in Farmingdale, N.Y., on Long Island. His father was a teacher. His mother, the former Selma Stigberg, had been a musician.The family moved to Poughkeepsie, N.Y., and he took up the trumpet when he was 7. He played in a dance band during his two years at Colby College in Waterville, Me., and then transferred to the University of New Mexico. He studied music there before he joined the Army in World War II.His prospects for a postwar career as a performer, at least on the trumpet, were dashed when he was struck by a mortar shell in Europe, where he served in the infantry. His wrist was hurt in the explosion, and he underwent 13 operations to repair it.Mr. De Cormier said last year that he had considered becoming a union organizer before deciding on music and entering the Juilliard School.After accompanying Paul Robeson on the Upper West Side one night in 1950, he met the woman he would marry, Louise Dobbs. In addition to his wife, he is survived by their daughter, Robin; two grandchildren; and two great-grandchildren. A son, Christopher, died in 1977. Mr. De Cormier and his wife had lived in Belmont, Vt., since 1977.But while he used his own name when he worked on a few Broadway shows in the 1950s and ’60s, he was listed in the credits for a number of Belafonte’s recordings under the name Robert Corman.“McCarthy was responsible for the name change,” Mr. De Cormier said, referring to Senator Joseph R. McCarthy and explaining that the stage name was a way of protecting Mr. Belafonte amid the blacklisting of the 1950s. “I told Harry I didn’t want to jeopardize him in any way. I was on many lists.” He had joined the Communist Party as a young man, he said.Peter, Paul and Mary knew Mr. De Cormier because of Ms. Travers, who died in 2009. She had been a student at the Little Red School House, a progressive school in Greenwich Village where Mr. De Cormier taught before he worked for Mr. Belafonte. “Mary used to wax on about him,” Mr. Stookey said last year.But Mr. De Cormier said he did not expect her to become famous in music.“I had some very gifted students — a couple of pianists who were really excellent and one who was a composer,” he said. “Mary was kind of a surprise.”
You Love ‘The Simpsons’? Then Let’s Talk About Apu LOS ANGELES — “I hate Apu,” the actor Kal Penn says in a new documentary about the penny-pinching, Squishee-slinging, thickly accented convenience store owner on one of the most celebrated TV shows in history. “And because of that, I dislike ‘The Simpsons.’”The feelings of South Asian Americans toward the character and the show he inhabits are the focus of “The Problem with Apu,” a documentary debuting Nov. 19 on truTV. The brainchild of the actor and standup comic Hari Kondabolu, a lifelong lover of “The Simpsons,” the film wrestles with how a show praised for its incisive humor — over the years, it has explored issues like homophobia and political corruption — could resort to such a charged stereotype. Making matters worse is the fact that the Indian character is voiced by a non-Indian (albeit an Emmy-winning) actor, Hank Azaria.“Everything with Apu is like this running joke,” Mr. Kondabolu, 35, said in a phone interview. “And the running joke is that he’s Indian.”Mr. Kondabolu, who grew up in Queens, the son of Indian immigrants, knows all about the show’s history (the longest-running American sitcom), its many awards (32 Primetime Emmys), its international and adoring fan base. “I’m a comedian going after the biggest comedy show of all time,” he said.The documentary grew out of a five-minute piece that Mr. Kondabolu performed on the FX series “Totally Biased With W. Kamau Bell” in 2012. Mindy Kaling had just become the first Indian-American to star in her own series (“The Mindy Project”), and Mr. Kondabolu thought he’d use that breakthrough to talk about Apu, South Asian stereotypes and the struggles of Indians in Hollywood. As a successful standup who has appeared on the Letterman and Jimmy Kimmel shows but who has been heckled with bigoted taunts during other performances, he knew the subject.But the topic seemed corny and overworked to him. When he took his concerns to Mr. Bell, however, the show host was puzzled. “I was like, no, no one’s talking about this,” Mr. Bell said in a phone interview. “Do you mean like all the other pieces that the South Asian community has done about Apu? And that’s when Hari went, oh yeah, you’re right.”The piece touched a nerve with audiences, but it was the one-minute section about Apu that people most remembered. Why not make a full-length documentary about his issues with the Kwik-E-Mart owner, Mr. Kondabolu thought, which could serve as a jumping-off point to talk about all the other things the comic had been stewing about?Working with the director Michael Melamedoff, the film crew began production in April 2016, greenlit by truTV as part of its shift to comedy programming. To tackle the project, he enlisted some high-powered help. In one sequence, the actor Aziz Ansari (“Master of None”) describes being in a car with his dad when a man drives up and asks them where the nearest Quik-E-Mart is. Dr. Vivek Murthy, the 19th surgeon general of the United States, talks about enduring the taunts of an Apu-imitating bully in the seventh grade. And Maulik Pancholy (“30 Rock”) recounts how much he hated going into 7-Eleven stores as a kid, lest his friends see an Indian store clerk and start doing “the Apu thing.”In the film, Mr. Kondabolu places Apu within the broader history of Hollywood’s depiction of Indians, including Peter Sellers’s brownface rendition of an idiot in the 1968 Blake Edwards film “The Party” and the Indians feasting on chilled monkey brains in Steven Spielberg’s “Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom.” He also reached out to a who’s-who of South Asian actors to talk about their experiences in Hollywood, in the vein of Philip Kan Gotanda’s 1987 play “Yankee Dawg You Die” and Mr. Ansari’s 2015 “Master of None” episode “Indians on TV.”Among the anecdotes: Sakina Jaffrey (“House of Cards”) cornering the market on “weeping, ethnic moms of potential rapists and murderers,” and Mr. Penn being asked to play a character named Taj Mahal, which he credits with his subsequent starring roles in the “Harold and Kumar” movies. “For the record,” Mr. Penn said in an interview, “I had a great time doing it.”The narrative spine of the film, however, chronicles Mr. Kondabolu’s attempts to trace the character’s origin story and secure an interview with Mr. Azaria, the voice of Apu since the character’s creation in 1990.In a 2007 interview, Mr. Azaria, who declined to comment for this article, conceded that his rendering of an Indian accent is “not tremendously accurate.” Mr. Kondabolu agrees. In the film, he describes Mr. Azaria’s rendition as “a white guy doing an impression of a white guy making fun of my father.”Onscreen, Dana Gould, a writer and executive producer on “The Simpsons,” tries to explain what makes Apu humorous. Barney, the town wino, is funny because he’s a drunkard, he explains; Smithers, Mr. Burns’s sycophantic assistant, is funny because he’s closeted. (Since that interview, Smithers has come out.) Apu? He’s funny because he sounds like an Indian, or at least Mr. Azaria’s version of one. “There are accents that by their nature, to white Americans, I can only speak from experience, sound funny,” Mr. Gould says in the film.“This isn’t just a blind spot that the writers had,” Mr. Melamedoff said. “This was a blind spot we all had, on a national level.”The unintended result: a generation of Indian actors being asked to channel Apu in countless auditions. “Here you are, you’ve gone to theater and film school, you’re pursuing this dream, and you’re being told, do it just like Apu from ‘The Simpsons,’” Mr. Penn said in an interview.Still unclear is who originally pushed for Apu’s broad accent. Was Mr. Azaria asked by producers “how offensive can you make it,” as he claimed in that earlier interview? Or did he come up with the accent unprompted, as the “Simpsons” writer Mike Reiss said in a 2016 podcast?Mr. Kondabolu pressed Mr. Azaria for an interview. The two exchanged emails, had one phone conversation (untaped) and even discussed the possibility of conducting the interview on neutral ground (on the podcast “WTF With Marc Maron,” say, or on NPR’s “Fresh Air,” with Terry Gross).“Hari was sort of like, what’s the purpose if I can’t get Hank,” said Utkarsh Ambudkar (“Pitch Perfect”), who, as Apu’s Indian-American nephew on a 2016 episode of the series, blasted Apu to his animated face as a sellout and a stereotype.“And I was like, are you kidding me?” Mr. Ambudkar said. “You got all these brown people to come together and talk about something. We could have been talking about model trains! But some 15-year-old kid is going to be like, look at all these powerful, talented, visible brown people in one place. I can do this, too.”
Ending Medical Tax Break Could Be a ‘Gut Punch’ to the Middle Class Suzanne Hollack tried to care for her husband at home after he was diagnosed with frontotemporal dementia at age 69. But it got to the point where she couldn’t take a shower for fear he would stray out of the house.So 18 months ago, she moved him to a memory care community near their home in Scottsdale, Az., which like most long-term care, is not covered by Medicare. That, plus his other medical expenses, cost the couple $90,000 last year.“These expenses place a huge burden on your retirement savings,” said Mrs. Hollack, whose husband, Harry, managed operations for semiconductor companies. “Losing that tax deduction becomes a double burden.”The Republican tax overhaul bill introduced in the House last week would eliminate that deduction, which allows people who itemize their federal income taxes to deduct medical expenses that exceed 10 percent of their total income. The change is part of a broad effort to rewrite the tax code in a way that Republicans say will be simpler and fairer. But while the party has framed its tax plan as a boon for the middle class, eliminating the medical-expense deduction would hit the middle class squarely, eliminating a source of relief that has helped millions of people cope with steep medical costs in a country without comprehensive, universal health coverage.Republicans say the deduction affects relatively few people — 8.8 million out of about 150 million taxpayers last year — and that the bill as a whole would benefit more families by lowering tax rates and increasing the standard deduction in lieu of itemizing.“This bill helps Americans keep more of the money they earn for expenses that arise throughout their lives — such as medical bills — rather than providing a myriad of provisions that many Americans may only use once in their lifetimes, and only if they go through the hassle and frustration of itemizing,” said Lauren Aronson, a spokeswoman for the House Ways and Means committee.According to an analysis in January from the Joint Committee on Taxation, most taxpayers who claim the deduction have incomes below $100,000, with about 40 percent below $75,000. More than half of those who claim it are older than 65, according to AARP, the lobby for older Americans. They often face staggering medical and long-term care costs.The deduction also helps younger families struggling to pay the enormous cost of caring for children with chronic conditions or disabilities, and couples going through costly fertility treatments like in vitro fertilization. In interviews, some who claimed it said the deduction is the difference allowing them to afford mental health care, new chemotherapy drugs, or cancer surgeries by doctors who fall outside insurance networks.“I understand that in order to get tax reform through there need to be some ‘pay fors,’ but getting those revenues from families who have been hardest hit by high cost medical conditions like autism or cancer seems a bit like targeting hurricane victims as a potential source of revenue,” said John Rodakis, 48, of Dallas, who has a son with autism and runs a nonprofit foundation devoted to autism research.The Joint Committee estimated that the deduction for medical expenses would cost the federal government $10 billion next year, if it were not eliminated. That is far less than the two big deductions the Republican bill would preserve: one for interest paid on home mortgages is expected to cost $63.6 billion, and one for charitable donations, $47.8 billion. Most taxpayers claiming those deductions have incomes above $100,000.Taxpayers claimed a total of $87 billion in medical costs through the deduction in 2015, according to the Internal Revenue Service. An increase in the standard deduction would not nearly make up for that, tax experts said. The average Medicare beneficiary, for example, pays $5,680 a year in out-of-pocket costs, according to AARP.Last year Heather Block, 54, deducted $9,349 in medical expenses. For most of her career as a freelance international aid worker, she carried two health insurance policies. Before she got breast cancer six years ago, she said, “it wouldn’t have dawned on me that people had these medical expenses.”Her cancer is now stage 4. One month this year, she said, oral chemotherapy alone was $4,000. “I feel like I’ve had a running contest since I got cancer,” she said, “Am I going to use up my savings and go bankrupt or am I going to die first?”While the Affordable Care Act expanded coverage to millions more Americans and limited out-of-pocket costs, many, like Ms. Block, still face large expenses that insurance does not cover.“It’s like a backstop, and until such time that we have a health care system that covers everybody for everything, we’re going to need that backstop,” said Alexandra Thornton, the senior director of tax policy at the liberal-leaning Center for American Progress. “That’s the thing with deductions, they recognize that sometimes people are in a situation where it’s harder to pay their taxes. Some are harder to defend, but this is one of the easier ones.”Lisa and Peter Witzler’s second son, Jackson, was born with spina bifida, a defect caused when the spinal cord does not close in the womb. By his fifth month of life, he’d spent three months in the hospital — six weeks in neonatal intensive care — and his parents had spent the money they had planned to put toward day care.Doctors had recommended private nursing because Jackson had severe sleep apnea and would repeatedly stop breathing and turn blue. But insurance would not cover it.“We didn’t have that time to prepare or save for anything,” said Mr. Witzler, a union organizer.The family, which lives in Montgomery Village, Md., had $25,000 in unreimbursed medical expenses last year. Being able to deduct those expenses, the Witzlers said, is the difference between their son getting treatment now, or needing more public services later in his life.“It’s a misnomer,” said Ms. Witzler, who works for the federal government doing conflict resolution. “The idea that these are extra things, that it’s deducting things that are not essential or necessary.”Adrienne Lynch, who is 34 and lives in Austin, Tex., is undergoing in vitro fertilization for the second time this year. “We have spent around $43,586, and that won’t be the last of it for 2017,” she said. Ms. Lynch, who manages regional media advocacy for the American Cancer Society Cancer Action Network, said that the deduction, which would lower her taxable income by more than $20,000, would help rebuild the emergency savings that she and her husband have spent on fertility treatments this year.“To go after this is a gut punch,” she said.Robert Graboyes, a senior research fellow at the Mercatus Center at George Mason University, said the plan to eliminate the deduction was “part of a larger deal where one way you pay for broad tax cuts for a large part of the population is by ending a variety of small ones. My guess is they needed some revenue and this was a way to do it.”But eliminating the deduction could hasten the speed at which some older Americans spend down their savings and have to go on Medicaid, a far greater expense for the federal government.“Already I’m having to dip severely into whatever I’ve saved,” said Jennifer Clark, 76, of Falls Church, Va. She has multiple sclerosis and a form of blood cancer, and while insurance covers her chemotherapy and other medications, she pays out of pocket for part-time aides, dental care, a portion of her physical therapy, some of her medications and the continuing care retirement community she lives in.“If I lose this and the ability to deduct my state income taxes,” Ms. Clark said, “we are talking wiped out.”
Do Pesticides Get Into the Flesh of Fruits and Vegetables? Q. Do pesticides get into the flesh of conventional fruits and vegetables like cantaloupe, apples and cucumbers?A. Pesticides sprayed on fruits and vegetables accumulate on the outer peel or skin, but the skin does not form an impermeable barrier, and some pesticides are actually designed to be absorbed into the tissue of the fruit or vegetable to protect it from pests that penetrate the skin to suck out the liquid insideThicker peels may be more effective at keeping pesticides out of the flesh of some fruits like cantaloupe, said Lili He, an assistant professor in food science at the University of Massachusetts, Amherst, who studied the best methods for washing chemical pesticide residues off apples.If you’re trying to prioritize which fruits and vegetables to buy organic, check the Environmental Working Group’s list of the so-called “Dirty Dozen” and the “Clean Fifteen,” as well as Consumer Reports’ Always Buy Organic list. Both make recommendations based on tests of pesticide residues on fruits and vegetables, done by the United States Department of Agriculture after the produce has been washed.Cantaloupe is on the “Clean Fifteen” list, meaning it has relatively low levels of pesticide residues.Apples, on the other hand, are on the “Dirty Dozen,” meaning they’re high in pesticides, ranking fourth most contaminated after strawberries, spinach and nectarines. Cucumbers barely escaped the “Dirty Dozen,” ranking 13th from the top for pesticide residues.If you buy conventional apples, wash them in a solution of baking soda and water. A recent study by Dr. He, published in the Journal of Agricultural and Food Chemistry, found baking soda solution was more effective than either plain water or a bleach solution at removing pesticide residues from the surface of the peels, but the fruit had to be immersed for up to 15 minutes before being rinsed.Even then, washing didn’t remove pesticide residues that had penetrated deep into the peel or through the peel to the flesh of the fruit. Peeling might be effective, the researchers said, but would involve a loss of the nutrients in the skin.Cucumbers and apples are both covered by a natural protective layer of wax, but once pesticides diffuse through that layer, rinsing them off becomes harder, said Dr. Jeffrey Jenkins, director of the National Pesticide Information Center. And when distributors apply yet another layer of wax to these fruits and vegetables to preserve them for shipping, he said, “that kind of seals in the residues, and all the washing in the world probably isn’t going to have much effect on removing them.”Do you have a health question? Ask Well
Edwidge Danticat: Dawn After the Tempests I WAS HEADING to Grenada at the same time that the island was hosting the State of the Tourism Industry Conference, one of the region’s largest gatherings on the subject. Though the conference was planned before Hurricanes Irma and Maria devastated many Caribbean islands whose economies rely heavily on tourism, the timing seemed prescient. Indeed, on the conference program I scrolled through on the plane were discussions focused on disaster preparedness as well as recovery and rebuilding. I was not going to the conference though, because I am not a tourism expert.The people sitting on either side of me on the plane were not tourism experts either. They were tourists, two young American couples on their honeymoons. After listening to them exchange wedding stories, I turned to the poet and essayist Audre Lorde’s “Grenada Revisited: An Interim Report,” an essay she wrote a few weeks after the 1983 United States’ invasion of her parents’ homeland.I had read Lorde’s essay many times before — it’s the last chapter of her seminal 1984 collection “Sister Outsider”— but I wanted to read it again before seeing Grenada for the first time.That we landed at Maurice Bishop International Airport, which is named after the former Prime Minister of Grenada who was assassinated six days before the start of the U.S. invasion, might have intrigued Lorde. I felt her begin this journey with me as I walked down the airplane steps, the sun that is only this sparkling bright in the Caribbean, beaming down on my face.“The first time I came to Grenada I came seeking ‘home,’” began Lorde’s essay of her 1978 visit. She had flown into the now closed Pearl’s Airport in Grenville on the northeastern coast of the island. Back then, there was one paved road, she reported. Now, there are many smooth and winding ones through lively neighborhoods as well as tree-covered hills.Among Lorde’s most striking recollections was seeing Grand Anse Beach, not the hotel-lined miles of white sand that attract both locals and tourists, but the busy thoroughfare that runs alongside it.She saw: “Children in proper school uniforms carrying shoes, trying to decide between the lure of a coco palm adventure to one side and the delicious morning sea on the other.”I, too, saw children, dozens of them on either side of the street one morning. Most of the children wore traditional uniforms, white shirts and blouses and plaid skirts or dark or khaki shorts or pants. They huddled together chatting and giggling, not paying attention to the dark blue sea on one side or the colorfully painted houses and buildings in the hills on the other. These children reminded me of children you would see heading to school in my native Haiti, or most other Caribbean islands, their range of black and brown skin glistening in the sun. The older ones kept their younger siblings at their side, even as they climbed into public transportation minivans and buses.I went in search of more of those “vivid images” in Lorde’s essay and, besides the school children at Grand Anse Beach, there was Fat Woman-Who-Fries-Fish-In-The-Market. I did not see her inside the turquoise-and-white square building downtown. She was not standing near the massive fish laid out on slabs waiting to be gutted. Nor was she by the smaller ones piled into buckets out front.The fish market smelled predictably like the sea. The buzz of the customer and buyer exchanges was a lot more subdued than I expected. Not all the vendors had customers. The market’s relative calm on a Friday afternoon reminded me how small Grenada is. The island is 120 square miles and has about 100,000 residents.That night while pondering all this in my hotel room at the Coyaba Beach Resort, I parted the curtains and looked for a full moon to turn the beach outside “flash green.” October is perhaps the wrong time of year for this. Lorde had seen the sand turn green in April. There was no full moon, but I slept with the sliding door to the terrace open so I could hear the waves gently grazing the shore.I AM NOT A GOOD TOURIST. I can easily evoke for myself the worse case scenario in any type of travel situation. I have immigrant guilt about taking time off. I am a bad swimmer. I am self-conscious in bathing suits, so most of my tourism is done through books. But because of my writing, I am invited to quite a few places and whenever I can I go.I was in Grenada, which was largely unaffected by the hurricanes, to receive an honorary degree from the University of the West Indies Open Campus. Unlike U.W.I.’s brick and mortar campuses, the Open Campus is a virtual one. The 657 students in my graduating class hailed from all over the English-speaking Caribbean. They earned their degrees online. Only 139 graduates would cross the stage though.Not all the graduates always travel to the Open Campus ceremonies, my hosts from the University of the West Indies told me. However, this year there were students who wanted to come to their graduation in Grenada but could not. Most of the graduates travel from other countries for the Open Campus ceremony, which takes place in a different location each year. Many had homes that were damaged or destroyed. Some lost loved ones along with everything they owned.I was told the story of one graduate from Trinidad who stayed home because she had donated her plane ticket money to relief efforts in Dominica, which has U.W.I.’s most devastated campus. Some of the students from that campus are still unaccounted for.Hurricane Maria struck Dominica, the southernmost of the Leeward Islands as a Category 5 storm on Sept. 18. Dominica’s Prime Minister, Roosevelt Skerrit, whose own roof collapsed during the storm, later told CNN: “Our agriculture sector is 100 percent destroyed. Our tourism is, I would say, about 95 percent destroyed.”In front of the supermarket across from the Coyaba Beach Resort were blue barrels lined up to collect food and other urgently needed supplies for Dominica. At The Beach House Restaurant, just north of the airport, where I attended a pre-graduation cocktail party the night before the ceremony, the young female singer entertaining us with classic soul, as well as Caribbean covers, reminded everyone to drop something in the basket that would usually hold her tips. This time the funds would go to Dominica.I have never been to Dominica but now I wish I had. This is not just born out of a desire to see a place “before.” Before the devastation, before the storm. I am from a place, Haiti, that constantly evokes nostalgia in the people who have seen it, lived in it, and loved it “before.”This longing for before always saddens me because it makes the present seem even worse. But I still wish I had seen Dominica before, in part because it is the birthplace of one of my favorite novelists, Jean Rhys. The places that Antoinette, Rhys’ doomed narrator in “Wide Sargasso Sea,” longs for have flaming sunsets and rivers so clear that you can see the pebbles at the bottom. They have moss-covered gardens filled with orchids, hibiscus and flamboyants, which are illuminated at night by fireflies.This is one of the ways I have imagined Dominica, along with what I have seen in travel guides: its high mountain peaks, forts, lush rain forests, reefs, gorges, lakes and water falls.Dominica is also home to Xuela Claudette Richardson, the narrator of Jamaica Kincaid’s novel “The Autobiography of My Mother.” At 15, Xuela was taken by her father to Roseau, the capital of Dominica. Roseau, Xuela finds — like a lot of places in the Caribbean — “had a fragile foundation, and from time to time was destroyed by forces of nature, a hurricane or water coming from the sky as if suddenly the sea were above and the heavens below.”“THE SECOND TIME I came to Grenada,” Audre Lorde wrote in “Grenada Revisited,” “I came in mourning and fear that this land which I was learning had been savaged, invaded, its people maneuvered into saying thank you to their invaders.”Lorde’s second visit was in late 1983, after then U.S. president Ronald Reagan had deployed Marines to the island. Reagan declared that he wanted to prevent a “Soviet-Cuban” colony from taking root in Grenada and protect American citizens on the island, many of whom were students at St. George’s University School of Medicine.I visited St. George’s University, whose students and officials, Lorde pointed out, later denied that they were ever in danger. The school, which is no longer just a medical school, but also covers other disciplines, is an island unto itself, with its many salmon-colored buildings, massive water tanks, security personnel and buses. All over the campus are breathtaking views of True Blue Bay, the point where the Caribbean Sea and the Atlantic Ocean meet.If Reagan was so interested in seeing democracy flourish in the Caribbean, Lorde wondered, why did the U.S. government support Haiti’s Jean-Claude Duvalier and his repressive regime? She also mentioned Puerto Rico.In 1897, she wrote, “U.S. Marines landed in Puerto Rico to fight the Spanish-American War. They never left.”Puerto Rico was as devastated by Hurricanes Irma and Maria as Dominica, Barbuda and the U.S. Virgin Islands. I have not been to Puerto Rico either. I have only visited it in books, particularly through the eyes of young Esmeralda Santiago in her memoir, “When I Was Puerto Rican.”I imagined the guavas that she taught me and other readers to eat at the beginning of her book being no longer able to grow, the fields they came from deep in the countryside flattened, and the families that farmed them struggling to stay alive without food or clean water.I watched an interview with the tireless mayor of San Juan, Carmen Yulín Cruz Soto, and heard echoes of Audre Lorde in her voice.“There is nothing that unites people more anywhere in the world than injustice,” the mayor said. “We have to get food, we have to get water or else we are being condemned to a slow death. It may be easy to try to disregard us. It may be easy because we are a U.S. territory and a colony of the United States. But we’re a people, damn it.”The blessings of our islands are also our curse. Our geography gives us year-round sun and beautiful beaches, but more and more in the age of climate change, we are on the front line of destruction.“We are a people” seems to be what we have been saying for generations to all our colonizers and invaders who seemed intent on destroying us. And now more than ever, Mother Nature, too.We are a people, the Arawaks and Taínos might have said, even as they died trying to prove it. We have even inherited the word for hurricane, huracán, from them.“Much has been terribly lost in Grenada,” Lorde wrote at the end of her 1983 visit, “but not all — not the spirit of the people.”THE SPIRIT of the people is also captured in this poem I have been carrying with me for years before coming to Grenada. It was written by the Grenadian poet and short story writer Merle Collins.“We speak,” she wrote in “Because the Dawn Breaks,” “for the same reason that the thunder frightens the childthat the lightning startles the tree …”The people of the Caribbean speak, the poet wrote, because we “were not bornto be your vassals.”________________________
7 Cyber Monday Travel Deals Cyber Monday, on Nov. 27 this year, isn’t just a day to score discounts on retail goods — in the world of travel, it means attractive deals on hotel stays, safaris, group tours and more.But buy with caution, said the travel industry analyst Henry Harteveldt, the founder of Atmosphere Research Group. “Travel brands discount throughout the year so make sure that the sale you’re considering really is a good one,” he said.Here are seven offers which may just entice you to book your next vacation.Guests at the Cloister at Sea Island, in Sea Island, Ga., who book two or more nights between Jan. 2 and Feb. 28, get 90 percent off the third night, breakfast and a 10 percent discount on all activities. Nightly rates start at $395. Book at seaisland.com.The home rental company Oasis is offering $200 off a stay and $50 of drinks and snacks (and free housekeeping) at one of its properties in more than 22 destinations, including Paris, Miami and Cartagena. Stays must be between Nov. 27, 2017 and Nov. 27, 2019. Book at oasiscollections.com, and use the code DIGITALGETDOWN.From Nov. 27 to Dec. 4, the 12 properties that make up Viceroy Hotel Group will offer nightly rates at a discount of between 30 and 40 percent for travel between Nov. 27, 2017 and December 2018 (the exact date ranges vary by property). The Viceroy Central Park, in New York, for example, is offering 40 percent off nightly rates; usual rates start at $275, but with the Cyber Week discount, they begin at $195. Book at viceroyhotelsandresorts.com.The safari outfitter AndBeyond is offering 30 percent off one of its four small group journeys in 2018 (each journey has multiple departure dates), including a mobile camping trip to Botswana and a photography safari in Kenya. Itineraries range from five nights to two weeks. Rates before the discount begin at $4,030 a person, but with the discount, the starting rate is $2,821 a person. Book at andbeyond.com.Grace Bay Club, in Turks and Caicos, is offering 35 percent off nightly rates. A junior suite, for example, usually begins at $720, but after the discount, it drops to $468. A stay includes breakfast, nonmotorized watersports and afternoon tea with wine. Travel must be between Nov. 27, 2017 and Dec. 19, 2018. Book at gracebayresorts.com.The tour operator Friendly Planet Travel is offering up to $1,100 off per person on 68 tours in 2018 to over 40 countries, including Portugal, China, South Africa and Peru. The sale lasts through Nov. 28. The 14-day Best of Kenya and Tanzania tour, for example, is $4,599 a person — a savings of $900. All trips include airfare, accommodations, most meals and guided tours. Book at friendlyplanet.com.Expedia has several Cyber Monday deals: From noon to 7 p.m. E.S.T., nightly rates at select hotels are 90 percent off on Expedia’s app while select hotels on the site are offering 50 percent off nightly rates (around 2,000 hotels in total are participating, but the exact number will change every hour). Also, all day, Expedia.com is offering $100 off on $1,000 travel packages and is giving $100 credit for a hotel stay to travelers who book a cruise through the site.
Joe Biden Talks About His New Memoir, ‘Promise Me, Dad’ Joe Biden’s new memoir, “Promise Me, Dad,” is all about time — but not its sweep or fullness. Instead he has written about the fearsome ticktock of seconds, minutes and hours when our backs are against the wall, and there are obstacles to be faced.In substance, it is a classic “year in the life” memoir. The book starts just before Thanksgiving 2014 and covers the three signal story lines of his next year: the grueling illness and death of his elder son, Beau, of brain cancer at 46; his difficult decision not to pursue the Democratic nomination for president in 2016; and his welcome workload as vice president, particularly on foreign crises in Iraq, Ukraine and Central America.Scene by scene, Biden toggles briskly among his three story lines: from an emotional family meeting at the M.D. Anderson Cancer Center in Houston, to an urgent phone call with Iraqi Prime Minister Haider al-Abadi about the Islamic State, to a friendly lunch with President Obama, who is tactfully trying to discourage the vice president from pursuing the Democratic nomination. Leaping from strand to strand, Biden creates a propulsive energy and a distinct hope that things may turn out differently — better — than we know they will.“Promise Me, Dad” may not be as probing as President Obama’s bildungsroman, “Dreams From My Father,” or as thoroughly thorough (at 494 pages) as Hillary Clinton’s “What Happened.” But it is impressive on its own terms. Section by section, Biden splices a heartbreaking story with an election story and a foreign affairs story. And in so doing, he offers something for everyone, no matter which strand draws you in.Of course, the centerpiece of the book is Biden’s unflinching account of the death of his son, a two-term attorney general and a major in the National Guard who had been deployed to Iraq in 2008. Here, Biden exudes the same Everyman quality that’s been on display for more than 40 years of public life. He shares his grief, knowing that everyone grieves. Ultimately, his message is this: By engaging with life, as bewildering as that may seem after a tragedy, we can thrive again.Last month, Biden sat down in the book-lined study of his home in a leafy neighborhood of Wilmington, Del., to discuss his memoir, which will be published on Nov. 14.Philip Galanes: Why write this book? Why tear your heart open again?Joe Biden: For my kids. Look, I have two beautiful grandchildren. I have a thousand pictures of them all around. For a year, when they were building a home, they lived here: Beau, [his wife] Hallie and the two kids. I wish they’d never moved. But after he died, the kids would come into my bed and lie on my chest: “Pop, tell me stories about Daddy.” “Tell me the one about when he fell out of the tree.” “Tell me the one about when that guy went after Daddy, and Uncle Hunt beat him up.”PG: In planning the book, were there authors or memoirs, books about loss that spoke to you?JB: No. I didn’t want to be like anyone else. I’m not being facetious. And I didn’t want to write a book about grief. I didn’t want anyone feeling sorry for me. I wanted to celebrate Beau’s life and the people he touched. Beau had a strict code of honor. That may sound silly, but it’s true. My Dad had an expression: “Never explain and never complain.” I never once heard Beau complain. Not once.When his brother and sister, Hunter and Ashley, stood up to give their eulogies, I don’t know how they did it, but I’ve never been prouder of them in my life. Hunter, who’s a beautiful writer, said: “My first memory of Beau was when I was 3 years old.” They were in the hospital [following the death of their mother and baby sister in a car accident]. Hunt had a skull fracture, almost every bone in his body was broken. And Beau, just 4, in the next bed, held his hand and kept saying: “Hunt, I love you. Look at me. I love you, I love you, I love you.” At the funeral Hunt said in 42 years that “he has never stopped holding my hand.”I want readers to know that there are people like Beau in this world, who put country first, family first, friends first.PG: Let’s talk about the structure of the book. You keep three narrative strands running throughout the text.JB: It was all about time: seconds, minutes, hours — not months or years. We were either going to beat Beau’s illness or not, and we had a very narrow window. My assignments at the White House were similar. They weren’t about managing relationships; they were crisis management. If Prime Minister Abadi didn’t reach a deal with the Sunnis, the government would implode. It got down to minutes and phone calls and seconds.PG: For a famous talker, it’s a taut book.JB: Well, there’s a difference between talking and writing. When I’m talking with someone who’s looking for something — for assurance or help, for me to take a position — I try to engage them. I draw them out by talking, by listening to what they’re saying and what they’re not saying. But in the book, I had to be disciplined to bring all those strands together. I wanted to make my points as crisply as I could.PG: There’s a beautiful line in the book: “My story precedes me.”JB: And it does. Look, I was on top of the world in 1972. My sister managed my Senate campaign and pulled off the most improbable upset. I’m down in Washington, hiring staff, and I get a call from a young woman who says: “Your wife and daughter have been in a terrible accident. You have to come home.” I said, “She’s dead.” And she said yes. So, I know the stages of grief, like a lot of other people. From the pain, to the sense of hopelessness, to recovery, it’s all about time.PG: There’s an undertow on every page, a knowledge that we’re all suffering. Did that predate 1972?JB: I used to be a very bad stutterer. Everybody thinks I know Irish poets because I’m Irish. But I know them because of my uncle, an educated bachelor who lived with us, off and on. He had a volume of Yeats. And I used to get up at night and put a flashlight on the mirror, practicing and practicing, reading aloud from those books. Everybody has a burden to carry.PG: Maybe that’s why the strands of the book bleed together? When one of Beau’s doctor visits goes well, there’s an optimism that carries into the next section about Iraq.JB: I wanted to write precisely about the crises and dilemmas I faced as they intersected in the moment. I wanted to show that in the ebb and flow of life, nothing is totally separable. As much as I try to compartmentalize, what you’re doing in one phase of your life washes over and affects the others.PG: And occasionally, the crosscutting made me think you’d actually cheat death, that Beau would live.JB: Oh! We were praying and working and believing. I’ve always been an optimist. When I had a couple of cranial aneurysms [in 1988] and the doctor’s were giving me less than even chances of living, I was still talking as if everything was going to be O.K.PG: Several times, Beau says: Don’t look at me sad, Dad. Or: Promise me you’ll be O.K., Dad. Did he ever let you comfort him?JB: One night, when it was clear that the odds weren’t good, he asked me to stay after dinner at his house, about a mile from here. He said: “Dad, I know you love me more than anyone in the world. But promise me you’ll be O.K. I’ll be O.K., Dad.” He had come face to face with his mortality. He watched me go through the loss of his mother and sister. And he didn’t want me to turn inward. He didn’t want me to give up on the robustness of life.PG: You were reluctant to confide in President Obama about Beau.JB: It was complex. I didn’t want him to carry the burden of feeling sorry for me. Several times, when we talked about Beau, he started sobbing, and I had to console him. I didn’t want to put him through that, not with all the responsibility he had on his back. I also didn’t want him to do what most people would do, what my staff wanted to do: Have Joe do less. I had to do more. And I had my diaries. I’m able to write and express emotions fairly well. And I was completely honest with myself in those diaries.PG: Let’s turn to the 2016 election. You write that President Obama was pretty discouraging about your running for the Democratic nomination. But in the book you also say that the race was coming to you: The badly beaten middle class, the populism, the authenticity.JB: What people don’t realize is that Beau was essentially diagnosed with a death sentence in 2013. Virtually nobody makes it. I had an obligation to tell the president because of my duties. So, he knew what was going on. By late 2014, we were walking after lunch, and Barack said: “Joe, if I had the power of appointment, I’d appoint you president. We agree on the issues, I know your leadership skills, and I think you’d be the best president.” But he had other pressures. I felt them, too. If I were to say “I am not going to run,” in the face of all this data that’s coming in saying, you can do it. If I said that, everybody would have known there was something wrong with Beau. I would have violated my commitment to him to keep it secret. The piece that complicated it is that after he passed, it was clear that he really wanted me to run.PG: Both sons wanted you to run.JB: I believe Beau, looking down, understands why I didn’t run, and he accepts it. Beau, Hunt and Ashley didn’t want me stepping back. They thought that what limited talents I have that may not have been suited for winning decades earlier were exactly what the public was looking for now.PG: There’s a scene in the book where Hillary Clinton comes to visit with you to see if you’re planning to run for president. You write that she was propelled by forces not entirely of her own making. What does that mean?JB: I think she wanted to be president and would have been a good president. But she also had to understand how difficult her life was going to be, how she would be vilified. But Hillary is also driven by the need to empower women. Having known her for a long time, I can’t believe she didn’t think: What will young women in the world think if I walk away?PG: We’re so dug in and divided now. Do you really think a President Biden could make a difference?JB: The obvious answer is: I don’t know. But I have always been good at bringing people together. Trying to understand the other person’s perspective, and trying to figure out how to get to “go.” That skill was always useful, but it has a higher premium now that we don’t work together as much. And that’s why I wrote this book about Beau. I wanted people to see how honorable political life can be. He had so many chances to advance himself — he was offered my Senate seat when he came back from Iraq — but he wouldn’t take it. He wanted to earn it. Beau’s ambition was to be a man who always did his duty.
Krysten Ritter: By the Book The actress and author of a thriller, “Bonfire,” can’t read on the set of “Jessica Jones”: “It is crazy exciting! But it’s not a reading environment.”What books are on your nightstand?I have a huge pile next to my bed and dream of days when I just pick up each one and devour them! I have a signed copy of “The Lying Game,” by Ruth Ware, which is next on deck. Underneath are copies of “The Sirens of Titan,” by Kurt Vonnegut, and “In Cold Blood,” by Truman Capote, both of which have long been on my list. I am also currently leafing through a stack of meditation books that I bought at a meditation studio I like. “Wherever You Go, There You Are,” “Zen Flesh, Zen Bones.”What’s the last great book you read?I have read a few great novels recently, but the one that stuck with me the most over the last few months is “Eleanor Oliphant Is Completely Fine,” by Gail Honeyman. It made me laugh, it made me cry, and the entire time I beamed with joy at the beauty of this story. I fell in love with Eleanor and never wanted the book to end. I wanted so badly to keep following her journey.I also loved “Unshakeable,” by Tony Robbins. Understanding the economy, the stock market and the world of investing is foreign to me, but Tony makes it so digestible and empowering. I really appreciate his focus on finding confidence in your own ideas and the importance of building forward momentum. I have such a crush on Tony Robbins and his passion, empathy and sheer talent.What do you read for solace? For escape? For sheer pleasure?For solace, I love a book that opens up my perspective. The other day I realized I buy a new copy of “The Untethered Soul,” by Michael A. Singer, in every city I visit. I don’t know if it’s because I forget that I own it already or I just need it again when I’m on the road and missing home. I own at least four copies. I also love Singer’s audio lectures, even just to put on in the background. For escape, I love popcorn thrillers that you can read in a weekend, like “Sharp Objects” and “The Woman in Cabin 10.” For pure pleasure, I love a good rock ‘n’ roll/rock bio or oral history. I recently read “Meet Me in the Bathroom,” by Lizzy Goodman, which follows the Strokes, Interpol and the whole early 2000s NYC rock scene. It is so much fun to relive that incredible time in music, particularly because I was there for more than I should admit.What are your favorite books about acting or about Hollywood? My favorite acting books are Stella Adler’s “The Art of Acting” and “Sanford Meisner on Acting.” Which writers – novelists, playwrights, critics, journalists, poets – working today do you admire most? Right now, I admire the writers on “Jessica Jones.” Melissa Rosenberg and her team, the level of material they write for me, and their imaginations so consistently blow me away. They have my full attention and admiration right now.How do you like to read? Paper or electronic? One book at a time or simultaneously? Morning or night? Do you like reading on set?I can’t read on set because I have too much to stay focused on. Often you hear about people on set living this “hurry up and wait” kind of work life. But for me, specifically on “Jessica Jones,” it’s more like “hurry up and hurry up.” I get to be fully immersed all day every day and it is crazy exciting! But it’s not a reading environment. On set, if anything, I’ll knit because it’s mechanical, a meditation and doesn’t pull focus from the work. In terms of how I read, I am hard copy all the way. I love having a book in my hand. There are already so many digital distractions in our lives and for me, reading on a screen and getting alerts and text messages totally ruins it. I like to read in the park, or I like to get in bed early, get cozy and get lost in a good book.What book might people be surprised to find on your shelves?Stacks of knitting and crochet books. What’s the best book you’ve ever received as a gift?“Don’t Forget to Sing in the Lifeboats,” by Kathryn and Ross Petras. A friend gave it to me and it has been kind of life-changing. It is this little book of inspirational quotes and wisdom, and it’s such a pick-me-up to read a few pages a day. I’ve since given it as a gift a few times and I often post pages from it on my Instagram stories. People seem to love it!What kind of reader were you as a child? Which childhood books and authors stick with you most?I wasn’t a big reader as a kid and I often think about that. I was told that I had poor reading comprehension, but now I recognize that is not true at all. I just wasn’t interested in what I was given and I had too wild an imagination to sit still long enough unless it was something I really loved. I didn’t fit in the box. So, I think it’s important to encourage kids to read whatever interests them, outside of what’s on a curriculum.You’re organizing a literary dinner party. Which three writers, dead or alive, do you invite?Gillian Flynn, Hemingway, Stephen King. I feel like no one would know what to say to each other, but how fun?Who would you want to write your life story? I think I would feel more comfortable writing my own.
Six Myths About Choosing a College Major Many colleges ask you to choose a major as early as your senior year of high school, on your admissions application. Yet there’s a good chance you’ll change your mind. The Education Department says that about 30 percent of students switch majors at least once.Students get plenty of advice about picking a major. It turns out, though, that most of it is from family and friends, according to a September Gallup survey. Only 11 percent had sought guidance from a high school counselor, and 28 percent from a college adviser. And most didn’t think that the advice was especially helpful. Maybe it’s because much of the conventional thinking about majors is wrong.It’s true that computer science and engineering top all the pay rankings, but salaries within specific majors vary greatly.“Students and parents have a pretty good idea of what majors pay the most, but they have a poor sense of the magnitude of the differences within the major,” said Douglas A. Webber, an associate professor of economics at Temple University who studies earnings by academic field. He points to one example: The top quarter of earners who majored in English make more over their lifetimes than the bottom quarter of chemical engineers.But what if you never make it to the top of the pay scale? Even English or history graduates who make just above the median lifetime earnings for their major do pretty well when compared to typical graduates in business or a STEM field.Take the median lifetime earnings of business majors, the most popular undergraduate degree. The typical graduate earns $2.86 million over a lifetime. When you put business graduates side by side with those who graduated with what are considered low-paying majors, you’ll see that those who are slightly above the median salary in their fields are not that far behind the business grads. For example, an English major in the 60th percentile makes $2.76 million in a lifetime, a major in psychology $2.57 million and a history major $2.64 million.Women are now the clear majority on college campuses, making up 56 percent of students enrolled this fall. They are also more likely than men to graduate.But when it comes to selecting a major, what women choose tends to segregate them into lower paying fields, such as education and social services, according to a report that Georgetown University’s Center on Education and the Workforce will publish later this year. Just look at some of the highest paying fields and the proportion of women who major in them: business economics (31 percent), chemical engineering (28 percent), computer science (20 percent), electrical engineering (10 percent), mechanical engineering (8 percent).“Women can’t win even as they dominate at every level of higher education,” said Anthony P. Carnevale, director of the Georgetown center.Dr. Carnevale wouldn’t speculate as to why women make their choices. But he notes that if the proportion of women in fields where men dominate increased by just 10 percent, the gender pay gap would narrow considerably: from 78 cents paid to women for every dollar men receive to 90 cents for every dollar men receive.Not so. In seven states — Arkansas, Colorado, Minnesota, Tennessee, Texas, Virginia and Washington — students can search public databases for early earnings of graduates of institutions within the state. And those databases show that students who graduate from more selective schools tend to make more money. After all, the better the college, the better the professional network opportunities, through alumni, parents of classmates and eventually classmates themselves.These undergraduates are more able to pursue majors in lower paying fields because their networks help them land good jobs. Arts, humanities and social science majors are more prevalent on elite campuses than at second-tier colleges, where students tend to pick vocational majors like business, education and health. In all, more than half of students at less selective schools major in career-focused subjects; at elite schools, less than a quarter do, according to an analysis by the website FiveThirtyEight of the 78 “most selective schools” in Barron’s rankings, compared with 1,800 “less selective schools.”“Students at selective colleges are allowed to explore their intellectual curiosity as undergraduates because they will get their job training in graduate school or have access to a network that gets them top jobs, regardless of their undergraduate major,” Dr. Carnevale said.They are also more likely to have two majors than students at second-tier colleges, who tend to be more financially needy and have to work, affording less time to double major.One tip: Complementary majors with overlapping requirements are easier to juggle, but two unrelated majors probably yield bigger gains in the job market, said Richard N. Pitt, an associate professor of sociology at Vanderbilt University who has studied the rise of the double major. “It increases your breadth of knowledge,” he said.The liberal arts is a favorite target of politicians, with the latest salvo coming from the governor of Kentucky, Matt Bevin. “If you’re studying interpretive dance, God bless you, but there’s not a lot of jobs right now in America looking for people with that as a skill set,” Governor Bevin said in a speech in September.Interpretive dance may not be in demand, but the competencies that liberal arts majors emphasize — writing, synthesis, problem solving — are sought after by employers. A 2017 study by David J. Deming, an associate professor of education and economics at Harvard, found jobs requiring both the so-called soft skills and thinking skills have seen the largest growth in employment and pay in the last three decades.One knock on the liberal arts is that it’s difficult to find a first job. But a study by Burning Glass Technologies, a Boston-based company that analyzes job-market trends, concluded that if liberal arts graduates gain proficiency in one of eight technical skills, such as social media or data analysis, their prospects of landing entry-level jobs increase substantially.The long-held belief by parents and students that liberal arts graduates are unemployable ignores the reality of the modern economy, where jobs require a mix of skills not easily packaged in a college major, said George Anders, author of “You Can Do Anything: The Surprising Power of a ‘Useless’ Liberal Arts Education.” In his book, Mr. Anders profiles graduates with degrees in philosophy, sociology and linguistics in jobs as diverse as sales, finance and market research.“Once C.E.O.s see liberal arts graduates in action,” Mr. Anders said, “they come aboard to the idea that they need more of them.”Why settle on a field of study before experiencing the smorgasbord college has to offer, be it study abroad, a club activity or a surprising elective?Of students who said they felt committed to their major when they arrived on campus, 20 percent had selected a new major by the end of their first year, according to a national survey by the University of California, Los Angeles.Changing majors can cost you a semester or two, especially if you switch to one unrelated to your first choice. To reduce that risk, several schools, including Arizona State University, Georgia State University and Lehman College in the Bronx, have created “meta-majors,” which group majors under a larger academic umbrella.“We have moved away from trying to get students to choose their majors as they enter,” said Timothy Renick, Georgia State’s vice provost and vice president for enrollment management and student success.Instead, all incoming students choose from one of seven meta-majors, representing large academic and work force fields, such as business, education and STEM. First semester, students gather in learning communities and register for a block of general-education courses within that meta-major. Programming is designed so that students get to know the differences between majors within the field.“Students in our business meta-major get to understand the difference between finance, accounting, management and marketing so they can choose their major from an informed perspective,” Dr. Renick said. They usually do by the end of their first year.A handful of colleges, including Indiana University and the Evergreen State College, offer the option to ignore the official list of majors and design a course of study. Will Shortz, the crossword puzzle editor for The Times, designed his at Indiana — enigmatology.“Majors are artificial and restrictive,” said Christine Ortiz, a dean at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology on leave to design a new nonprofit university that will have no majors, and also no lectures or classrooms.“Majors result from the academic structure of the university, tied to the classic academic disciplines. There is no reason they need to be boxed up like that. They don’t take into account emerging fields that cross disciplines.”Majors tend to lag behind changes in the workplace. No wonder fewer than a third of college graduates work in jobs related to their majors. And picking one based on today’s in-demand jobs is risky, said Dr. Webber of Temple, especially if the occupation is threatened by automation.“I would argue against majoring in accounting,” he said, “or anything that a computer can be programmed to do.”
10 Things to Know About Getting Into Your Dream College There’s no magic formula for getting into a selective college, but over a decade covering admissions for The Chronicle of Higher Education, I’ve picked up a thing or two. These takeaways, based on hundreds of interviews with admissions deans over the years, may help you navigate the process.When colleges choose applicants, they’re juggling competing goals, like increasing diversity and bringing in more revenue. Admissions officers aren’t looking for students who fit just one description — say, those who’ve earned all A’s or won the most awards. So don’t take rejection personally.Colleges often say they want to get to know the real you, but that’s probably true only if your academic accomplishments (and the rigor of courses you’ve taken) pass muster.After colleges identify a big batch of students with outstanding credentials, differences among them become more important, admissions deans say. Among some of the attributes they tell me they would like to see evidence of (in essays, extracurricular activities, recommendations) are: leadership, risk taking, emotional intelligence, fire for learning, critical thinking, curiosity, empathy, optimism, grit, perseverance and the ability to overcome obstacles.Overwhelmed by slick, boastful essays, colleges are eager for what they call “authentic” glimpses of applicants — their experiences, passions and goals. Some deans believe they’ll get deeper insight through alternative formats like videos, pictures, audio files or documents (an Advanced Placement English paper, maybe). A handful of prestigious schools, including Yale, the University of Chicago, Pomona College, Reed College and the University of Rochester, recently introduced this option. As with essays, too much polish is no good, deans say, so you might think twice about hiring a professional videographer. At Yale, about 400 applicants (out of nearly 33,000) for this year’s freshman class sent in something in an alternative format. In at least one case, the submission — a video showing leadership and impact on others — was, the dean told me, a “difference maker.”Are you a first-generation or low-income student? Many colleges are trying to increase access, so it can help to emphasize your background — and how your personal story relates to your achievements — in essays and interviews. Admissions officers are thinking harder about socioeconomic context, such as the quality of an applicant’s high school, to better understand the opportunities they’ve had and the challenges they’ve faced.At many colleges, financial circumstances comes into play. Being able to pay all or some of the freight is a bonus. And some qualified students of limited means might get rejected for no reason other than lack of money.Many selective colleges want students from all over, ideally from all 50 states. Last year’s presidential election illuminated the urban-rural divide, which some colleges have been trying to bridge by paying closer attention to promising applicants from less-populous areas. Generally, a Northeastern college will look more favorably on an applicant from Montana than an equally strong one from the Northeast.Legacy status certainly helps, but big-name colleges reject plenty of these applicants. Don’t assume Mom or Dad’s connections alone will get you in.A new initiative called “Turning the Tide” urges admissions offices to reward applicants for sustained community service. And some colleges, such as the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, are taking a closer look at what applicants have done to help others, be they neighbors or family members. You don’t have to fly to Belize to do good (admissions officers are often skeptical of these fleeting trips). Showing up to tutor someone at the library each week might be even more impressive, and rewarding.About one in five colleges allot “considerable importance” to “demonstrated interest,” whereby applicants convey their willingness to attend the college they’re applying to. Open those emails. Connect with admissions officers. Let them know when you visit campus. Only those who are sure about their first choice and don’t need to compare financial aid packages should choose the strongest expression of demonstrated interest: applying early decision, which is binding.
Endowments Boom as Colleges Bury Earnings Overseas In 2006, the endowments of Indiana University and Texas Christian University invested millions of dollars in a partnership, hoping to mint riches from oil, gas and coal.The partnership was formed by the Houston-based Quintana Capital Group, whose principals include Donald L. Evans, an influential Texan and longtime supporter of former President George W. Bush. Little more than a year earlier, Mr. Evans had left his cabinet position as commerce secretary.Though the group had an impressive Texas pedigree, presidential cachet and ambitions for operations in the United States, the new partnership was established in the Cayman Islands. The founders promised their university and nonprofit investors that the partnership would try to avoid federal taxes by exploiting a loophole called “blocker corporations,” which are typically established in tax havens around the world.A trove of millions of leaked documents from a Bermuda-based law firm, Appleby, reflects some of the tax wizardry used by American colleges and universities. Schools have increasingly turned to secretive offshore investments, the files show, which let them swell their endowments with blocker corporations, and avoid scrutiny of ventures involving fossil fuels or other issues that could set off campus controversy.Buoyed by lucrative tax breaks, college endowments have amassed more than $500 billion nationwide. The wealth is concentrated in a small group of schools, tilting toward private institutions like those in the Ivy League and other highly selective colleges. About 11 percent of higher-education institutions in the United States hold 74 percent of the money, according to an analysis in 2015 by the Congressional Research Service.“It’s overwhelmingly weighted towards the 1 percent,” said Dean Zerbe, former tax counsel to the Senate Finance Committee. “Most of the schools are the most elites in the country.”The House Republican tax plan includes a 1.4 percent tax on the investment income of private colleges and universities with endowment assets of $250,000 or more per student. It would not apply to public schools. If passed, the new tax would affect about 70 elite private colleges, though it would not touch the type of offshore benefits the Texan partnership pursued.On Monday, 45 education groups declared their opposition to the bill in a letter to Kevin Brady, the Texas Republican who is the chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee.College and university endowment earnings are usually tax-exempt. But as endowments have sought greater investment returns in recent years, they have shifted more of their money out of traditional holdings like United States equities to alternative, potentially more lucrative investments. These include private equity and hedge funds that frequently borrow money, opening them up to tax consequences.When schools earn income from enterprises unrelated to their core educational missions, they can be required to pay a tax that was intended to prevent nonprofits from competing unfairly with for-profit businesses.Establishing another corporate layer between private equity funds and endowments effectively blocks any taxable income from flowing to the endowments, the reason they are called blocker corporations. The tax is instead owed by the corporations, which are established in no-tax or low-tax jurisdictions like the Cayman Islands or the British Virgin Islands.“Congress is essentially subsidizing nonprofits by allowing them to engage in these transactions,” said Norman I. Silber, a law professor at Hofstra University who co-authored a paper on blocker corporations in 2015. “They’re allowing them to borrow so that they can build up their endowments.”The use of blocker corporations has raised concerns among policymakers in recent years. That’s partly because they cost the United States Treasury millions of dollars, but also because they legitimize an opaque offshore network sometimes used for nefarious purposes.“They’re not cheating. They’re not hiding money or disguising money,” said Samuel Brunson, a law professor at Loyola University Chicago who has studied endowment taxation. “But they’re adding money to a system that allows people, if they want to hide their money, to do it.” Not only do the universities benefit — so does the wealthy and influential private equity industry.Perhaps illustrating the sensitivity of the topic, officials at most of the college and university endowments that use blocker corporations, including Colgate, Dartmouth, Duke and Stanford, declined to comment specifically, citing longstanding policies against discussing their investments. Among them was Matt Kavgian, the director of strategic communications for Indiana University’s $2 billion endowment, which had invested $10 million with Quintana.An exception was the Quintana shareholder Texas Christian University, whose chief investment officer, Jim Hille, acknowledged that the $1.5 billion endowment had used blocker corporations. Mr. Hille said the decision to use one often came down to whether the expected return would offset the cost of establishing a blocker corporation.References to such corporations in the Appleby files, shared with The New York Times by the International Consortium of Investigative Journalists, which obtained them from the German newspaper Süddeutsche Zeitung, date back at least to 2003. At that time, five elite schools — Columbia University, Dartmouth College, the University of Southern California, Stanford University and Johns Hopkins University — became partners in a Bermuda-based group called H&F Investors Blocker.H&F Investors Blocker was formed to invest with one of the largest private equity firms, Hellman & Friedman, in shares of Axel Springer, a German publisher of newspapers and magazines.Minutes from meetings at Appleby’s office in Hamilton, Bermuda, never mention tax avoidance or even explain why the word “blocker” is used in the partnership’s title. But an audit by Ernst & Young, contained in the minutes, shows that H&F Investors Blocker would owe no federal income tax.By 2008, the University of Texas system — whose endowment last year was $24.2 billion, behind Harvard’s ($34.5 billion) and Yale’s ($25.4 billion) — asked Appleby to set up a Cayman Islands company called TX Liquidity Capital so “certain tax advantages will accrue to the system,” documents show.Colgate University, with an endowment worth $822 million last year, stood to benefit from blocker corporations in 2008 when it invested in Genstar Capital, a private equity fund specializing in leveraged buyouts, according to the records. One investor in that Cayman Islands partnership, called Genstar Capital Partners V HV, took pains to include a handwritten a note near his signature: “elect to invest through the blocker.” Other investors were Dartmouth, Stanford and a Duke fund called Gothic Corporation.While legal, blocker corporations are part of a system of endowment tax breaks fueling an undercurrent of populist anger. Many students across the country struggle under massive college debt. At the same time, critics say, some wealthy schools use these tax advantages to stockpile endowments that exceed the gross national product of entire countries.Last year, three influential Republican legislators, led by Senator Orrin G. Hatch of Utah, sent a letter to 56 private universities with endowments of $1 billion or more, requesting information on “the numerous tax preferences” they enjoy. “Despite these large and growing endowments,” the letter said, “many colleges and universities have raised tuition far in excess of inflation.”So far, universities have mobilized lobbyists to emphasize the public benefits they deliver, beating back challenges to their tax breaks. But there is evidence that the mood has shifted, said Charlie Eaton, a professor at the University of California, Merced, who has studied endowment tax breaks.“In some ways, the anti-elite and anti-university spirit of Trumpism could create a favorable environment on Capitol Hill for some kind of action on this,” Dr. Eaton said. “That’s part of the reason universities urgently need to grapple with this. Because people genuinely feel that our elite universities have become islands of wealth.”In a study this year, Dr. Eaton estimated that a trio of tax breaks benefiting universities costs federal taxpayers $19.6 billion a year. Taxpayers, many of them wealthy, get breaks when they donate to colleges. Tax-free municipal bonds allow schools to borrow money at low rates. And for the most part, endowment investment returns are tax-free.Multiple Appleby documents offer a glimpse into the complex financial transactions and investments, some controversial, that university endowments engage in all over the world, aside from using blockers.Universities have been under pressure from both students and activists to shift to “green” investments in response to climate change, as well as to take social policy and global governance issues into account in investments.The Appleby records show that investment funds of Columbia and Duke, both ranked in the top 20 endowments, held shares as recently as 2015 in Ferrous Resources, registered in the Isle of Man. Its primary business is iron mining in Brazil.The company drew criticism there with a planned 480 kilometer pipeline to transport iron slurry from a mine in Minas Gerais to a port.“Major demonstrations took place against this project, which culminated in the creation of a campaign,’” researchers wrote in a 2015 paper published in the journal Society & Nature.A 2010 environmental study of the pipeline revealed that more than 110,000 people might be affected by noise, dust, soil degradation and water quality issues. The project was postponed in 2012 after a downturn in iron prices.The company, Ferrous Resources, declined to comment, except to say that the project had been discontinued.Columbia, which owned more than eight million shares in Ferrous Recources, or 1.1 percent of the company, declined to comment. Various investment funds connected to Duke, which also declined to comment, held more than two million shares in the company.While some schools have announced shifts away from controversial investments, others have pointed out that divesting from fossil fuels would probably lead to a significant drop in operating funds.Underscoring endowments’ reliance on hydrocarbon holdings, 10 schools invested in a Cayman Islands partnership in 2012 known as EnCap Energy Capital Fund IX-C, part of EnCap Investments, a private equity firm known for the acquisition and development of North American oil and gas properties.Among the investors were the University of Alabama, DePauw, Northeastern, Pittsburgh, Purdue, Reed College, Rutgers, Syracuse, Texas Tech and Washington State.
A Thanksgiving Casserole for Everyone at the Table The traditional Thanksgiving meal is a giant spread that lacks for nothing. Unless you have a dietary restriction, in which case it might lack something you can actually eat.There is likely to be flour lurking in the gravy, bacon in the brussels sprouts, chicken stock in the dressing and butter in nearly everything else. While you would think most people would be safe with cranberry sauce, there’s always the possibility that the host somehow got the idea to use honey instead of sugar, or dash in some soy sauce to give it that umami tang.What every modern Thanksgiving table needs is one great dish that anyone can eat. It should be satisfying and hearty enough to be a meal on its own, but appealing enough to share as a side dish.This golden-topped casserole of wild rice, white beans and seared mushrooms fits the bill.The white beans, some of which are puréed, give it creaminess, while the wild rice adds a robust, chewy texture. The combination of mushrooms, leeks and fennel makes it autumnal. And plenty of sautéed spinach not only helps lighten the starchiness of the beans and rice, but also adds some necessary color.Like many casseroles, this one is adaptable so you can tailor it to your tastes and your crowd. You can use gluten-free panko for celiac friends, or leave off the Parmesan in the topping for vegans and the lactose-intolerant. If you can’t get, or don’t want to spring for, the pricey wild rice, brown rice makes an equally nubby substitute. Cilantro haters can substitute basil.One thing to keep in mind is that canned beans vary a lot in terms of salt content. If possible, find a brand that lists sea salt as an ingredient. These tend to have a better flavor than unsalted beans. But in either case, taste as you go, adjusting the salt as you see fit.Conveniently for Thanksgiving (or any other dinner party), you can assemble the components for this dish the day before you want to serve it. Store the filling and topping separately in the fridge. Just before baking, spread the crumbs over the casserole and bake until steaming hot inside and golden on top.Then serve it to your loved ones, because this is a dish they all can love.Recipe: Wild Rice and Mushroom CasseroleFollow NYT Food on Facebook, Instagram, Twitter and Pinterest. Get regular updates from NYT Cooking, with recipe suggestions, cooking tips and shopping advice.
Cabernet Franc and the Finger Lakes: Made for Each Other Over the course of the last decade or so, only one New York State region has been recognized for the world-class wines it has produced.No, it’s not the North Fork of Long Island. That is often the first guess. Perhaps the North Fork’s proximity to New York City and the Hamptons is the reason even those with just a tepid interest in wine know about it. Long Island has great potential, certainly, and it has some fine producers. But as a region it has yet to establish an identity for either quality or style.The region we’re looking for is the Finger Lakes of New York in western New York State, where the nearest big cities are Rochester and Syracuse.This area — with its deep, slender lakes that look as if they were clawed from the earth by a giant prehistoric feline — has defined itself as an unlikely source of superb rieslings. Focusing on riesling was a bold strategy in an era dominated by other white grapes, like chardonnay and sauvignon blanc. It made sense because of the diverse soils and the cool climate, in which riesling can thrive while many other grapes often struggle to ripen.It is not often in the United States that decisions about which grapes to plant are motivated more by sound viticultural reasons than by commercial concerns. Few marketers looking for a wine to tempt the masses would settle on riesling, a critically adored grape that has had difficulty achieving a clear identity with consumers, even, paradoxically, as it has become more popular in the United States.For the Finger Lakes, though, it was a sound decision. The critical acclaim for its rieslings has fed a growth in production and the arrival of new producers.By 2011, the last year for which New York kept records of grape acreage, riesling was by far the region’s most planted of white vinifera grapes, the European species that accounts for all the familiar fine-wine grapes. Even so, the region still has many acres of hybrid and native American grapes, like concord and Niagara, a legacy of its history both as a producer of cheap fortified wines and of small wineries that did the bulk of their business selling directly to visitors.Still, few regions in the world flourish with only one signature wine. For as long as riesling has prospered in the Finger Lakes, winemakers there have debated what its red counterpart ought to be.I’ve had charming pinot noirs, made in a fresh, delicate style rather than with opulent fruit. I’ve had intriguing teroldegos and blaufränkisches. Yet the most consistently good and distinctive reds I’ve had from the Finger Lakes have been cabernet francs.In the last five years or so, I have seen more cabernet francs from the region. It has not been a lot — cab franc acreage accounts for less than a third of riesling acreage — but enough to notice.As with riesling, focusing on cab franc is not at all a marketing no-brainer. It’s the other cabernet, the one without a clear identity and name recognition. The easy path is not necessarily the best path, as was true with riesling, so maybe cabernet franc, too, makes sense.Seeking a deeper understanding of Finger Lakes cabernet franc, the wine panel recently tasted 20 bottles primarily from the 2014 and ’15 vintages, with one ’16 thrown in. For the tasting, Florence Fabricant and I were joined by Christy Frank — who, with her husband, owns Copake Wine Works in Columbia County, N.Y. — and Thomas Pastuszak, wine director of the NoMad.Thomas and his wife, Jessica Brown, also happen to own a small Finger Lakes label, Terrassen Cellars, that makes cabernet franc. Our tasting coordinator, Bernard Kirsch, was unaware of the connection and included a bottle in our blind tasting. To avoid any appearance of a conflict of interest, we did not include it in our rankings.As we tasted through the 20 bottles, a clear profile of Finger Lakes cabernet franc emerged. These wines were pale in color, savory and spicy, more than sweetly fruity. Indeed, the fruit flavor tended more toward the tart end of the spectrum, leavened with herbal and mineral touches.These wines spoke plainly of cool-climate viticulture, a phrase often bandied about by regions that have little claim to it. Yet it is a true description of conditions in the Finger Lakes, where alcohol levels only occasionally rise above 13 percent, compared with the 14 percent to 15 percent seen regularly in California. The best cabernet francs were light- to medium-bodied with almost delicate textures and lively acidity, the sort that would go especially well on the Thanksgiving table.“People are looking for more food-friendly wines,” Thomas said. “Cool-climate cabernet franc will appeal to those seeking mineral-driven, acid-driven, more firmly tannic wines.”It’s certainly a lovely, desirable style, though perhaps not mainstream American yet.“Up in Copake, a lot of people want something local,” Christy said. “But they also want something that’s big and rich, so it’s a fine line.”As a sommelier, Thomas has tried to pique his customers’ interest in NoMad’s excellent selection of Finger Lakes wines.“I used to say, ‘Think of a lighter version of cabernet sauvignon,’” he said. “Now I say, ‘A spicier version of pinot noir.’ It’s been more successful in terms of peoples’ expectations.”Our top wine, a 2014 from Lakewood Vineyards, epitomized the prevailing Finger Lakes style. The wine was fresh, with an almost crunchy texture and nuanced, savory flavors of flowers, herbs and spicy fruit. By contrast, our No. 2 bottle, a 2015 Le Breton from Schneider & Bieler, was darker and more concentrated than many of the other wines. It nonetheless was well balanced, with the typical tart, herbal flavors.No. 3 was the 2014 Wisdom from Inspire Moore, a deliciously saline, savory mouthful, with flavors of both tart and sweet fruit. No. 4 was the 2014 North Block Six from Atwater Estate, floral and herbal, with a kind of tense energy to it.Other wines well worth trying include the savory 2014 Hermann J. Wiemer; the floral, earthy 2015 Damiani; the spicy, refreshing 2016 Hosmer and the delicate but deep 2015 Keuka Lake Vineyards.Almost any of these bottles is an excellent value. None of our favorites cost more than $25.A few cabernet franc-based wines like Bloomer Creek’s excellent White Horse were not included in our tasting because they didn’t meet the 75 percent threshold for using the name of the grape on the label. Perhaps we were being arbitrary, but it was how we narrowed the field.The focus on riesling and cabernet franc is not to say that the Finger Lakes do not produce many other fine wines. I’ve had good chardonnays and gamays. I’ve enjoyed pinot noirs. And the sommelier Pascaline Lepeltier has recently teamed with Nathan Kendall, of N. Kendall, to make Chëpìka, an intriguing pétillant naturel made of the native grapes Catawba and Delaware.It’s the kind of experimentation that suggests a serious exploration of the region’s potential. It will only get better from here.Best Value: ★★★ Lakewood Vineyards Finger Lakes Cabernet Franc 2014 $18Fresh and crunchy, with savory, nuanced flavors of tart red fruit, flowers and herbs.★★★ Schneider & Bieler Finger Lakes Cabernet Franc Le Breton 2015 $21Concentrated and dark, with well-balanced, lingering flavors of cranberries and herbs.★★★ Inspire Moore Finger Lakes Cabernet Franc Wisdom 2014 $19Textured and saline, with flavors of tart and sweet red fruits and herbs.★★½ Atwater Estate Finger Lakes Cabernet Franc North Block Six 2014 $17Tense and floral, with aromas and flavors of red fruits, herbs and a touch of oak.★★½ Hermann J. Wiemer Finger Lakes Cabernet Franc 2014 $25Savory and tart, with flavors of red fruits and herbs.★★½ Damiani Finger Lakes Cabernet Franc 2015 $20Tart and floral, with flavors of savory, earthy red fruits and a touch of oak.★★ Hosmer Finger Lakes Cayuga Lake Cabernet Franc 2016 $20Spicy and saline, with lip-smacking flavors of red fruits and herbs.★★ Keuka Lake Vineyards Finger Lakes Cabernet Franc 2015 $22Delicate but deep, with savory, lingering flavors of red fruits, flowers and herbs.★★ Sheldrake Point Finger Lakes Cabernet Franc 2014 $18Straightforward, with flavors of cranberries and herbs.★★ Red Newt Finger Lakes Cabernet Franc 2014 $19Juicy, with savory flavors of tart cherries and herbs.Recipe: Braised Chicken With GochujangMany of the Finger Lakes cabernet franc wines exhibited restrained fruit, whispers of spice and musky smoke in a brooding package. The wines could handle food with some complexity and heat, so I turned to a slow braise, which infuses meat with deep flavor and produces a warming, stewlike dish. It’s the cooking method of choice when the weather brings a chill. The process is what I call the usual three-step affair (brown chicken parts or meat, add other ingredients and some liquid, cover and slowly simmer). But I gave the chicken a bit of heat, unpacking the Korean condiment gochujang with sake, ginger, garlic and some well-mannered poblano chiles. The finished dish would welcome a pillow of steamed rice alongside. FLORENCE FABRICANTFollow NYT Food on Facebook, Instagram, Twitter and Pinterest. Get regular updates from NYT Cooking, with recipe suggestions, cooking tips and shopping advice.
The Plight of the Postwar Apartment Don’t get her wrong: Kaya Chwals loves her 1960s red-brick co-op in the West Village. In 14 years, she has owned three different apartments in the building, and she is now getting ready to move into a fourth.She likes the unassuming facade, the unfussy style. But as with most long-term relationships, she has her pet peeves.“It’s old enough to be crappy, but not old enough to be charming,” she said, in a gut-punch to her plain mid-rise building on Jane Street. “It doesn’t have the patina that I love in prewar buildings.”That’s the reaction many buyers have to postwar apartment buildings, roughly defined as those built after World War II. Wedged between the engineering feats of the latest condo boom and the grandeur of prewar buildings, the postwar era often gets short shrift in the eyes of New Yorkers. No doubt the period has its flaws: lower ceilings, sometimes-uninspired design, fewer amenities. But those willing to look closer may find better deals, more flexible floor plans and a balancing act that mixes the perks of old and new.To get a sense of how building design might affect the market, we asked the real estate appraisal firm Miller Samuel to parse recent apartment sales in Manhattan based on the decade in which the buildings were constructed. (Buildings that were converted years after they were built — say, from rental to co-op — were analyzed separately.) There were a total of 11,893 sales, using data from July 2016 to June 2017.Unsurprisingly, the city’s newest apartments, dominated by luxury condos, got top dollar, with a median sales price of $3.05 million, almost twice that of units in buildings constructed during the previous decade. The best bargains, however, weren’t found in the oldest apartments, but in the 1950s stock, which sold for a median $737,500, the lowest of any decade. Time was kinder to apartments built before World War II, which reached a sales peak of $1.5 million for apartments in buildings from the early 1900s.The midcentury price drop is not just a matter of taste, but also of substance. “By postwar, the size of apartments were shrinking, the ceiling heights were down, and the number of rooms declined,” said Andrew S. Dolkart, a professor of historic preservation at Columbia University.After World War II, a surge in housing demand and the development of previously underused land around the city’s elevated train lines, especially on the East Side, brought a wave of new rental buildings, he said.One of the early successes was Manhattan House, built in 1951: a sleek, light-brick building in Lenox Hill, set back from the street with a large green space and private balconies for some residents. Now a condo, the building frequently has $3 million-plus listings.The model was perhaps too successful, as developers cashed in on the white-brick look with derivative designs on the cheap. “It’s second-class architecture,” said Andrew Alpern, an architectural historian and author, of the era that eschewed the structural hallmarks of prewar design, like double masonry walls for sound insulation and windows in bathrooms and kitchens.“For a while, they were despised by people who thought they had the right to despise them,” said Carol Herselle Krinsky, a professor of art history at New York University, about the early reception of postwar brick buildings. Even now, she added, “things haven’t changed much.”As the New York Times lamented in a 1979 article, “Tower after tower of white or brown or red brick is the norm, with cramped rooms that are not so much well laid out as they are squeezed in for maximum profit.”But these buildings, by and large, were not meant for the elite, historians said. Built mostly as rentals to meet pent-up demand, they catered to the middle class — or at least what passes for middle class in Manhattan.And they remain some of the most affordable apartments in the city. More than two-thirds of sales in 1960s buildings over the past year were for less than $1 million — more in that price range than in buildings from any decade. Apartments from the 1960s were also among the most popular with the past year’s buyers, accounting for more than 14 percent of the analyzed sales, second only to those from the 1920s (16.3 percent of sales).Many of the postwar buildings that were built as rentals were converted to co-ops in the 1980s, and they deserve recognition in their own right, said Jonathan J. Miller, president of the appraisal firm Miller Samuel, which analyzed the data.“We could talk all day about the cranes dotting the sky today, but it pales in comparison to the conversion and new-development frenzy of the 1980s,” he said. Because most of the buildings being converted were originally rental, the units tended to be smaller and more affordable — especially compared to the luxury condos being sold today.That combination of factors is why midcentury apartments remain one of the cheaper ways to get into hip neighborhoods, said Jaclyn B. Treinkman, an associate broker with Compass who recently listed an apartment in a stout 1959 building in Greenwich Village for $550,000. Similar but newer apartments in the area might list in the $700,000 range, she said.“It was homey-slash-ugly,” said Devon Talbott, 30, an actor who owns the apartment with his family. The unit was configured as a studio, with red walls and dated finishes, when Mr. Talbott and his family bought it in 2007 for $465,000. But the comparatively low price, he said, allowed them to transform the roughly 500-square-foot space into a one-bedroom with two Murphy beds, a sliding partition wall and a small recording booth for Mr. Talbott, a voice actor for the Japanese animated series “Yu-Gi-Oh! Arc-V.”The renovation, designed by Elise Kodish of Anne Zuckerberg Associates, incorporated 1960s and 1970s motifs like painted glass cabinets and a modernist chandelier hung above Macassar ebony wood cabinets with a tiger-stripe pattern. Mr. Talbott, who is now working on a horror web series called “Fear,” is selling because his family is moving to Brooklyn. But their fondness for postwar redos remains: They plan to keep a smaller studio that Ms. Kodish also revamped in a white-brick 1960s building across the street.The postwar pedigree is a lure for others as well. The Sovereign, a 47-story tower in Sutton Place built in 1974, was designed by Emery Roth & Sons, an architecture firm known for prewar developments like the San Remo towers. Its International-style lobby — complete with Venini crystal chandeliers, iron-mesh curtains and rosewood paneling — remains largely unchanged.In the building’s heyday, celebrities like Freddie Mercury and Calvin Klein lived there, said Jessica G. Ushan, an associate broker with Brown Harris Stevens who has sold more than 200 apartments in the Sovereign since the 1990s. The rock-star edge has dulled a bit in recent years, with more empty nesters than pop artists calling it home. But the building’s staying power is in its design.Half the units have floor plans resembling the Classic Six or Classic Seven layouts of prewar apartments, with distinct living and dining areas and a maid’s room, Ms. Ushan said, while the other half are L-shaped, with a more modern, open floor plan. The under-nine-foot ceilings may be lower than those in most new development, but they are offset in part by the private balconies — and by the prices. As Ms. Ushan said, “It’s about half the price of a new condo.”H.R. Vanoosten Morris, 52, a retired asset fund manager, is selling a two-bedroom, three-and-a-half-bath unit in the building for $2.295 million. His husband, Neal Prince, who died in April and was an architect known for his interior design of the InterContinental Hotels, bought the unit in 1978. Mr. Prince kept the original Classic Six floor plan intact because he thought the formal dining and living rooms were ideal for entertaining. The space still has the designer’s antique-green marble flooring, mirrored walls and custom-built glass-and-metal dining table that seats at least 12, which will stay with the apartment.Ms. Ushan said the buyer will likely want to renovate the kitchen, which is dated by today’s standards, and possibly open the adjacent pantry and maid’s room to create a larger open space. But she is not discounting the vintage appeal.“Some things get so old, they get new again,” she said, noting that some buyers seek out retro décor with an eye to giving it a modern spin.For other buyers of postwar apartments — particularly those built later — age is just a number.“I guess the ’80s is a long time ago now, but it doesn’t seem like it,” said Sander Ross, a retired tax attorney. In 2014, he bought an apartment with his wife, Carol, the general counsel for a publishing company, at the Dag Hammarskjold, a concrete-and-glass condo built in 1984, for $1.775 million.The 43-story tower in Turtle Bay, near the United Nations, was one of the first luxury condos built in the 1980s, said Richard Balzano, an associate broker with Douglas Elliman who sold the couple the two-bedroom, two-and-a-half-bath apartment.“It was very much ahead of its time,” Mr. Balzano said, with features like nine-foot ceilings and building amenities like a children’s playroom and an indoor pool on the top floor — unheard of today, because developers now put the most expensive units at the top of the building.The apartment needed work. Mr. Ross and his wife raised the ceilings, which had been lowered by a previous owner to house lighting, installed taller doors and gutted most of the space, at a cost of about $400,000. “I don’t think a co-op would have allowed us to do this kind of thing,” he said.For their effort, they got a condo with some of the amenities of a newer building at a fraction of the price. (The median cost of a 1980s apartment last year was $1.19 million, compared to $3.05 million for new construction.) The unit has a balcony that overlooks several parks, and the master bedroom has a dead-on view of the Pepsi-Cola sign in Long Island City. They’re not planning to sell.For Ms. Chwals, the serial home buyer in the 1960s West Village co-op, living in a midcentury building also meant a break from new-condo monotony.“I liked that it wasn’t the sleek, post-Carrie Bradshaw version of New York,” she said, referring to the television series “Sex and the City,” which aired in the late 1990s and early 2000s. More to the point, she thought the prewar stock in her price range was tiny and overpriced.Over the years, she has learned to appreciate the plainness of her building, the way an artist sees a canvas. “Because it’s a box, there’s no loyalty to preserving someone’s architectural vision,” she said of the renovations that she and her husband, Walter Lee, have done.Ms. Chwals, 37, who works for an arts education nonprofit, made her first purchase there: a studio apartment, in 2004. In 2010, she and Mr. Lee, who is also 37 and works in financial services, bought a two-bedroom. Then they bought an adjacent studio to create a combined three-bedroom home with room for their two young daughters. Now they’re selling that three-bedroom apartment, which is listed for $3.795 million with James Morgan of Compass, to move into a larger duplex in the building.In the three-bedroom, the couple took down interior walls to create a largely open floor plan. Working with the design firm Studio g & a, they used bright wallpaper, big art and colorful carpets to decorate the unadorned space. The living and dining areas flow together, and a sliding walnut door closes off a dressing room. The windows are not floor to ceiling, as in newer buildings, but Ms. Chwals sees that as a plus: “You’d end up living with your shades drawn, anyway.”There is also something comforting about not living in the “it” building on the block. Over the years she has become friendly with her neighbors, who range in age from young parents to retirees.“There’s a real sense of community that I don’t think we’d get if we were in a shinier new building,” she said.
The Ever-Expanding Rental When a new job sent Olaf Olafsson from Silicon Valley to Manhattan in 1989, his wife, Anna, was well short of gung-ho about the move.“She didn’t know much of the city except what you see from a hotel in Midtown,” said Mr. Olafsson, 55, an executive vice president at Time Warner who is also a playwright, poet and the author of five novels, including “One Station Away”, due out in early December.By way of putting out the welcome mat, a colleague invited the couple to dinner at a restaurant on the Upper East Side. They arrived early and went for a stroll, taking note of the stately houses, the mix of Queen Anne, Italianate, Beaux-Arts and Renaissance architecture, and shops like the Corner Bookstore.Smitten by the neighborhood, they rented a two-bedroom apartment on the fourth floor of a townhouse, on a quiet side street. “It had just been renovated, so everything was brand new,” Mr. Olafsson said.A few years later, when the first of their three children was born and the couple needed more room, they added half of the fifth floor. Then came the rest of the fifth floor and the sixth floor, which included the rooftop deck and garden. And, finally, the third floor and another parcel of outdoor space. (The rest of the building is given over to other lodgers.)With the approval of the owner, who has become a good friend, the Olafssons broke through ceilings and built floating wood staircases to connect the units. Along the way, they added a laundry room and did away with one bathroom and three kitchens, moving their own kitchen one flight up to capture as much sunlight as possible.“One of the problems with townhouses is that the kitchen is usually on the ground floor, and that’s always the darkest place in the building,” said Mr. Olafsson, who, like his wife, was born and raised in Reykjavik, Iceland.Granted, there is duplication of space: Each floor has a sitting room. The third-floor sitting room is the spot for doing puzzles and, thanks to the recent acquisition of a turntable, for listening to music. The fourth-floor sitting room is for watching television. The fifth-floor sitting room with the piano is the place for making music. But the family tends to do most of its sitting in the kitchen, which is outfitted with one of Mr. Olafsson’s favorite possessions, a Viking stove. Of course.Do the Olafssons ever ask themselves if it was crazy to do expensive renovations on an ever-expanding place they don’t own? Yes, they do. Often.“I wouldn’t call this a perfect situation,” Mr. Olafsson acknowledged. “You probably wouldn’t design it this way if you were starting from scratch. And it may not have been the wisest financial move. But we don’t think about that much.”He needn’t add that hope springs eternal. The owner has promised the Olafssons first dibs on the building should he ever decide to sell.Midcentury modern is the dominant theme, as represented by the kitchen table, by the desk and the Eames chair in Mr. Olafsson’s study, and by a Scandinavian side table, a bright-red Saarinen womb chair and an Eames lounge chair. But this is design without dogmatism. Deeming the effect too stark and off-putting, the Olafssons got rid of two very nice white midcentury sofas in the third-floor sitting room, replacing them with a pair of simple loden-green ones from Crate and Barrel.Books are everywhere. So is Icelandic art, which the couple avidly collects. Among the paintings are works by Kristjan Davidsson, Jon Engilberts, Georg Gudni and Hordur Agustsson. “When I was growing up, I knew some of these people through my father, who was a novelist,” Mr. Olafsson said. “It’s always fun, in addition to having art you really like, to know the artist. You can still sort of relate to them through their work, though many of them have passed away.”Four years ago, the Olafssons almost bought a six-story townhouse on the Upper West Side. What a prize: 7,000 square feet for them to divide and arrange as they pleased. “We were thinking we could finally have everything exactly the way we wanted,” Mr. Olafsson said.The contract was to be signed on a Monday. The preceding Friday, the couple’s architect gave them a floor plan of their future home along with, quite literally, a homework assignment: Figure out what rooms you want to put where.“We sat down at the kitchen table, and we were so excited,” Mrs. Olafsson said. “We were like, ‘Oh, the kitchen will be here and the living room will be here.’ We would have the perfect little entryway for guests, the bedrooms up here, a little office for Olaf up there. And I was thinking, ‘Maybe I’ll get a nice laundry room and maybe an exercise room because I like to exercise.’”Things were moving along nicely. “And then we were like, ‘What are we going to do on the fifth and the sixth floor?’” Mr. Olafsson recalled. “‘We’re going to be talking to each other through an intercom. We’re going to be searching for each other.’ And our two sons were old enough that they were going to be out of the house soon.”The couple looked across the table at each other, then looked again at the floor plan and the paperwork: 7,000 square feet; two years of construction. What were they thinking? They decided to stay put.“We’re creatures of habit, I guess, but we like it here,” Mr. Olafsson said. “It’s home.”
Does Anyone Really Want to Pick Apples with the Neighbors? For many New Yorkers, the best kind of neighbor is a quiet one who offers little more than a cursory nod in the elevator. Yet, when Gotham West, a luxury apartment building in Hell’s Kitchen, announced an October outing to an apple orchard, nearly 50 people signed up in 15 minutes, filling the charter bus, and leaving another 15 names on a waiting list.Why did so many people jump at the opportunity to spend an entire day with their neighbors at a farm in Warwick, N.Y., a small town about an hour and a half north of Manhattan?Maybe New Yorkers actually want to bond with the people down the hall, at least that’s what Gotham West management seems to think. Residents who sign up for the building’s $700-a-year amenity package have access to an endless social calendar with events like movie nights, mixology classes, cider tastings and a Halloween costume party.The trip to Pennings Farm was the building’s first foray off-campus, taking the theme of building-sanctioned fun on the road.Apple picking “kind of feeds into that club atmosphere,” said Patrick Hazlewood, the event producer who accompanied Gotham West tenants on their trip. “It is part of that collegial, dorm lifestyle.” (Assuming, of course, you want to relive the dorms.)Next getaway on the agenda: a weekend ski trip. Mr. Hazlewood is considering Vermont, which would mean a sleepover with the neighbors.Gotham West is one of a handful of expensive rental buildings offering excursions as the latest perk. Common, a developer of co-living housing, led New York City residents to a sleep-away camp near Lake George a few times this year. At 525 West 52nd Street, another Hell’s Kitchen rental, residents visited Storm King Art Center in Cornwall, N.Y., in September. And the Eugene, a rental near Hudson Yards, also took its residents apple picking last month.In a sluggish rental market where renters at the top have oodles of options, the thinking goes: Shower existing tenants with unusual perks and maybe a new one will sign a lease. Post pictures of the events on social media, and prospective renters, particularly those who are new to the city and looking for friends, might take notice.Such offerings are also a relatively inexpensive investment compared to a permanent fixture like a pet spa or an indoor pool. A field trip does not occupy valuable square footage, nor does it require expensive equipment.On a dewy Saturday morning in October, Michael Borth, 43, a Broadway musician who went on the Warwick trip, stood in front of a row of Empire apple trees and described Gotham West as “by far the most social building I’ve ever lived in.” He shares a studio apartment there with his girlfriend, Deborah Avery, 43, also a Broadway musician.Ms. Avery said that she was a Girl Scout the last time she went apple picking. “There are many buildings where I’ve lived next to people and never talked to them,” said Mr. Borth, who grew up in Wichita, Kan. Apparently, that’s not a good thing. “It’s very strange.”I get that avoiding the neighbors might seem strange to some people, but do you really want the alternative? Get too chummy, and you could end up with a neighbor like Kramer from “Seinfeld,” who barges in unannounced. I grew up in California, a state where strangers are always striking up conversations. That’s why I left and moved to New York.Even so, do you really make friends on a field trip for grown-ups? Maybe it’s just a good way to make the most of that hefty $700 amenity fee and get enough apples for a pie.Residents said the morning ride up to Warwick was quiet as riders nursed their coffees and got a few more minutes of sleep before they disembarked. When the bus arrived around 10 a.m., the group quickly fanned out, couples breaking off together and single tenants wandering alone. Within minutes, everyone had dispersed.Sign up for the outing without a plus-one and there was a good chance you would stay that way all day. As other orchard visitors meandered past me, clutching sticky children and heavy bags of fruit, I smiled weakly. They had no way of knowing that I had come with a group. I imagined them thinking: What grown-up goes apple picking alone?Ruth Whippman, the author of “America the Anxious: How Our Pursuit of Happiness Is Creating a Nation of Nervous Wrecks,” likened the outing to the corporate retreat where you go bowling with the group from accounting. “Sometimes that can feel quite forced,” she said.Yet, people are desperately seeking ways to look up from their iPhones and strike up a real-life conversation — at least 20 percent of Americans suffer from loneliness and social isolation, Ms. Whippman said. “There is a really big need for people to have new kinds of social opportunities,” she said.But one that is choreographed might not produce the result management wants. “It’s so hard to know whether any social occasion will be a great party or whether it will be intrinsically awful where someone’s crying into their bag of apples,” she said.The goal of these activities might be to “provide lifestyle enhancement opportunities,” as Christopher Jaskiewicz, the chief operating officer of the Gotham Organization, the developer of Gotham West, told me.Even so, as enhancing as the day trip might be, people may not actually make friends. At best, you make some small talk until you go home. At worst, you get stuck sitting next to someone you really don’t like.Melissa, a 38-year-old playwright who lives in a one-bedroom in Gotham West, had doubts about the trip, but she signed up anyway. “I was a little apprehensive,” she said, cradling an enormous bag of apples as we walked. Melissa asked to withhold her last name because she did not want anyone knowing where she lived. “I was worried that I would be picking apples with couples,” she said.Instead, she spent the morning wandering the orchard alone, gathering fruit. “I got lost and I loved it,” she said. Other single day-trippers I encountered also spent much of the day on their own. While we were chatting, Melissa bumped into a cheerful woman from the building who had also come on her own. They traded pleasantries and went back to foraging for fruit.As I bit into a crisp Winesap, I asked Melissa what she thought of other Gotham West mixers. Many of the events were geared toward singles, she said. But just because someone signed a lease to live in the same apartment complex does not mean you have anything more than that in common. “They want these events for people to meet other people,” she said. “But if you’re on your own, you just go off by yourself.”And maybe, you just end up with a lot of apples.
A Link Between Alcohol and Cancer? It’s Not Nearly as Scary as It Seems The headline had some of my friends in a panic.Citing evidence, the American Society of Clinical Oncology warned that even light drinking could increase the risk of cancer.Once again, we’ve been told that something we eat or drink is going to kill us. Once again, we’re provided an opportunity: A more nuanced discussion of risk — and how we communicate it — can leave us much happier, and perhaps healthier.Let’s begin with the fact that it’s easy to use studies to talk about cancer. Nothing illustrates this better than the classic 2013 study that examined research on 40 common ingredients selected from an ordinary cookbook. Researchers found 264 different studies touching on at least one of those ingredients. Their conclusion? Depending where you look, you can find evidence that says that nearly everything we eat is both associated with higher rates of cancer and lower rates of cancer.The gist of the oncology society announcement is that there is a reasonable amount of evidence finding an association between some cancers (specifically oropharyngeal and larynx cancer, esophageal cancer, hepatocellular carcinoma, breast cancer and colon cancer) and alcohol. It acknowledges that the greatest risks are with those who drink heavily, but it cautions that even modest drinking may increase the risk of cancer. In the United States, the announcement also notes, 3.5 percent of cancer deaths are attributable to alcohol.Of course, this means that 96.5 percent of cancer deaths are not attributable to alcohol. If we eliminate heavy drinking, which no one endorses as healthy and where the association is surest, that number climbs. If we also eliminate those who smoke — smoking is believed to intensify the relationship between alcohol and cancer — the number of cancer deaths not attributable to alcohol approaches 100 percent.Let’s stipulate that there may be a correlation between light or moderate drinking and some cancers. We still don’t know if the relationship is causal, but let’s accept that there’s at least an association. For breast cancer — which is the cancer that seems to be garnering the most headlines — light drinking was associated with a relative risk of 1.04 in the announcement. Relative risk refers to the percentage change in one’s absolute (overall) risk as a result of some change in behavior. (And 1.04 is a 4 percent change from 1.0, which represents a baseline of no difference in risk between an experimental group and a control group.)A 40-year-old woman has an absolute risk of 1.45 percent of developing breast cancer in the next 10 years. This announcement would argue that if she’s a light drinker, that risk would become 1.51 percent. This is an absolute risk increase of 0.06 percent. Using what’s known as the Number Needed to Harm, this could be interpreted such that if 1,667 40-year-old women became light drinkers, one additional person might develop breast cancer. The other 1,666 would see no difference.Of course, moderate or heavy drinking might increase the risks further. The absolute risks for that 40-year-old would go to 1.78 percent from 1.45 percent for the moderate drinker, and to 2.33 percent for the heavy drinker. Those numbers are still not that scary.But maybe any increase in risk is too much for you. That’s fine. If you’re one of those people, though, you have to acknowledge that you can’t look at any one cancer in a vacuum. A person can get almost any cancer.The large meta-analysis upon which this announcement was based looked at 23 types of cancer with respect to alcohol consumption. It found a harmful relationship between three of them and light drinking. But it also found protective relationships — meaning a decreased risk of cancer — between six of them and light drinking.I’m not arguing that you should engage in light drinking to avoid those six cancers. I’m merely pointing out that cherry-picking allows you to come to different conclusions. With respect to moderate drinking, there were harmful relationships with seven cancers and protective relationships with three. The announcement focused on the former, not the latter.A 2013 meta-analysis in the Annals of Oncology that looked at all cancers found that, over all, light drinking was protective; moderate drinking had no effect; and heavy drinking was detrimental.It’s even cherry-picking to focus only on cancer, though. A person can get any number of diseases, and this fact makes the dangers of light and moderate drinking even muddier.If you accept the methodology of case-control and cohort studies, from which many of the links between alcohol and cancer arise, you have to accept the results of similar studies of other diseases. For instance, a cohort study of about 6,000 people found that those who drank at least once a week had better cognitive function in middle age than those who didn’t. A 2004 systematic review found that moderate drinkers had lower rates of diabetes (up to 56 percent lower, although that’s a relative risk reduction).Randomized controlled trials of alcohol (they do exist) show that light to moderate drinking can lead to a reduction in risk factors for heart disease, diabetes and stroke. These protective factors may be greater than all the other negative risk factors (even cancer) that might be associated with light or moderate drinking. More women die in the United States of heart disease than cancer. So do more men.Moreover, dire warnings have consequences. I know far too many people who now throw up their hands at every news story because it seems as if “everything” causes cancer. These stories rarely acknowledge an alternative point of view. The absolute risks of light and moderate drinking are small, while many people derive pleasure from the occasional cocktail or glass of wine. It’s perfectly reasonable even if a risk exists — and the overall risk is debatable — to decide that the quality of life gained from that drink is greater than the potential harms it entails.This is true for many, many foods, not just alcohol.What can we do about this? We could make simple changes to have a better understanding of risk so that each new proclamation doesn’t send us into a tizzy:1) Consider the absolute risks. A 30 percent increase in risk sounds scary, but an increase from 1 percent to 1.3 percent absolute risk does not, though these are the same things. Likewise, we should be more concerned about a 5 percent risk increase to 21 percent from 20 percent than about a 30 percent increase to 1.3 percent from 1 percent.2) Don’t give too much weight to observational data. This is especially true when causal data are available.3) Don’t focus on any one disease while ignoring others. Something may be harmful regarding one disease while beneficial regarding another.4) Don’t cherry-pick. That is, don’t focus only on some studies, or only on some results. Review all the evidence for the most holistic picture possible.5) Acknowledge the harms, as well as the benefits, of recommendations. Consider both cost and joy.These rules may not make for exciting headlines. They may, however, lead to happier, and perhaps healthier, lives.
The Unsung Role That Ordinary Citizens Played in the Great Crime Decline Most theories for the great crime decline that swept across nearly every major American city over the last 25 years have focused on the would-be criminals.Their lives changed in many ways starting in the 1990s: Strict new policing tactics kept closer watch on them. Mass incarceration locked them up in growing numbers. The crack epidemic that ensnared many began to recede. Even the more unorthodox theories — around the rise of abortion, the reduction in lead or the spread of A.D.H.D. medication — have argued that larger shifts in society altered the behavior (and existence) of potential criminals.But none of these explanations have paid much attention to the communities where violence plummeted the most. New research suggests that people there were working hard, with little credit, to address the problem themselves.Local nonprofit groups that responded to the violence by cleaning streets, building playgrounds, mentoring children and employing young men had a real effect on the crime rate. That’s what Patrick Sharkey, a sociologist at New York University, argues in a new study and a forthcoming book. Mr. Sharkey doesn’t contend that community groups alone drove the national decline in crime, but rather that their impact is a major missing piece.“This was a part that has been completely overlooked and ignored in national debates over the crime drop,” he said. “But I think it’s fundamental to what happened.”Between the early 1990s and 2015, the homicide rate in America fell by half. Rates of robbery, assault and theft tumbled in tandem. In New York, Washington and San Diego, murders dropped by more than 75 percent. Although violence has increased over the last two years in some cities, including Chicago and Baltimore, even those places remain safer than they were 25 years ago. And crime has continued to fall in other cities, most notably New York, where shootings are at a record low.This long-term trend has fundamentally altered city life. It has transformed fear-inducing parks and subways into vibrant public spaces. It has lured wealthier whites back into cities. It has raised the life expectancies of black men. And even in an age of widening urban inequality, it has meant that the daily lives of the most disadvantaged are less dangerous now than they were a generation ago. These poor neighborhoods, Mr. Sharkey has found, have been the greatest beneficiaries of this tectonic change in safety.The same communities were participating in another big shift that started in the 1990s: The number of nonprofits began to rise sharply across the country, particularly those addressing neighborhood and youth development.Mr. Sharkey and the doctoral students Gerard Torrats-Espinosa and Delaram Takyar used data from the National Center for Charitable Statistics to track the rise of nonprofits in 264 cities across more than 20 years. Nonprofits were more likely to form in the communities with the gravest problems. But they also sprang up for reasons that had little to do with local crime trends, such as an expansion in philanthropic funding. A spike in nonprofits addressing subjects like the arts and medical research occurred in this same era.Comparing the growth of other kinds of nonprofits, the researchers believe they were able to identify the causal effect of these community groups: Every 10 additional organizations in a city with 100,000 residents, they estimate, led to a 9 percent drop in the murder rate and a 6 percent drop in violent crime.In a criminology field that has produced some eyebrow-raising ideas, this one is actually not so surprising. That national finding echoes local studies of some individual programs, like one run by the Pennsylvania Horticultural Society that converts abandoned lots into green spaces and that has been linked in Philadelphia to reduced gun violence.The research also affirms some of the tenets of community policing: that neighborhoods are vital to policing themselves, and that they can address the complex roots of violence in ways that fall beyond traditional police work.“It’s absolutely consistent with what I would argue is probably the prevalent theory of policing among the major cities today,” Richard Myers, the executive director of the Major Cities Chiefs Association, said of the new research.Local organizations also say Mr. Sharkey’s results validate what they have already witnessed.“Any time people’s basic needs are met, violence goes down — that’s not new,” said Noreen McClendon, who directs the nonprofit Concerned Citizens of South Central Los Angeles.The group, led by Ms. McClendon’s mother for many years, was formed in the 1980s to fight a proposed waste incinerator in the neighborhood. It evolved in the 1990s to address many of the neighborhood’s other challenges. The group created dozens of block clubs to care for individual streets. It cleaned alleys and repaired potholes, and hired local ex-offenders to do that work. It established a credit union, sponsored a jazz festival and developed hundreds of units of affordable housing.During a time of major disinvestment in cities, and severe cuts in federal support for urban programs, residents of the neighborhood believed no one else was coming to help. “Nobody,” Ms. McClendon said. And if the group had not done this work itself? “There would have been a lot more death,” she said, “between violence amongst people, violence from police brutality, just drugs.”Many similar groups did not explicitly think of what they were doing as violence prevention. But in creating playgrounds, they enabled parents to better monitor their children. In connecting neighbors, they improved the capacity of residents to control their streets. In forming after-school programs, they offered alternatives to crime.In the East Lake neighborhood of Atlanta, the crime rate in the mid 1990s was 18 times the national average. The drug market in the neighborhood was estimated to be doing $35 million in business a year. There hadn’t been a new building permit issued in the neighborhood in nearly three decades, a sign of how little anyone had invested in the community other than to buy drugs there.Then the newly formed East Lake Foundation developed new mixed-income housing to replace a decaying public housing project. It started a golf program for neighborhood children on a nearby but long-deteriorating golf course. The foundation eventually opened a charter school, where the first class of seniors had a 100 percent graduation rate in May.“We knew we wanted to see violence and crime go down in the community,” said Carol Naughton, who led the foundation for years and today is the president of a national group, Purpose Built Communities, that is trying to teach East Lake’s model in other cities. “But we’ve never had a crime-prevention program.”Today violent crime in East Lake is down 90 percent from 1995. But Ms. Naughton is momentarily perplexed by the question of whether she believes groups like hers have gotten enough credit for contributing to that outcome.“We’re not part of the crime-reduction world, or the public safety world, in the same way that we’re part of the health and education and housing world,” she said. “It never occurred to us that we’re not getting the credit, because we don’t even know that world is out there.”The lesson in that response, and in Mr. Sharkey’s work — that effective crime prevention doesn’t necessarily look like stop-and-frisk, or hot-spot policing, or mass incarceration — is particularly relevant today as cities rethink policing.“A lot of these communities were in despair because they needed resources,” said Robert Sampson, a sociologist at Harvard who has studied Chicago neighborhoods damaged by violence. “And what did they get? Well, they mainly got crime control. They got increases in incarceration.”Those tactics may have contributed to the decline in crime as well. But they’ve come with costs that have become clearer over time, in antagonizing communities and disrupting families.Mr. Sharkey is pointing to one possible solution with less evident downsides. And he’s suggesting that communities can effectively take on the very roles that the police say have strained them as they’ve increasingly been asked to perform jobs they weren’t trained for, as guidance counselors or marriage therapists or substance-abuse experts.“They are taking that burden away from the police that probably never should have been there, but by default has kind of landed there,” said Mr. Myers of the chiefs association, who is also a former longtime police chief himself, in Michigan, Virginia, Colorado and elsewhere.As Mr. Sharkey publishes his findings, crime rates are now diverging after a generation in which violence fell reliably year after year nearly everywhere. It’s not clear yet whether the great crime decline he writes about will continue. But he argues that it’s time for a new model of violence prevention, one that relies more heavily on the kind of work that these community groups have been quietly doing than on the aggressive police tactics and tough sentencing that the Trump administration now advocates.“The model that we’ve relied on to control violence for a long time has broken down,” Mr. Sharkey said. If communities want police to step back, he is pointing to some of the people who can step in. “This gives us a model. It gives us another set of actors who can play a larger role.”
Democrats Cheer, but They May Have to Do Better in ’18 After a year of high-profile moral victories in special congressional elections, Democrats finally got actual victories on the board, and more. They won big in Virginia, took full control of state government in New Jersey and Washington State, prevailed on an important ballot measure in Maine, and generally posted strong results across the nation.Together, it was the clearest sign yet that college-educated white voters’ unhappiness with President Trump would jeopardize suburban Republicans in next year’s midterm elections.But the biggest difference between Tuesday’s Democratic wins and the earlier Republican wins is deceptively simple: This time, elections were held on neutral or even Democratic-leaning terrain.For that reason, it is not obvious that Tuesday’s performance represents a significant improvement over the Democrats’ showings earlier in the year. In 2018, they won’t always get the luxury of competing in such favorable districts. To take the House next November, they might have to do even better than they did on Tuesday.Make no mistake: The results Tuesday are fully consistent with a so-called wave election, like the ones that brought Democrats to power in the House in 2006 and back out in 2010.All of the conditions for a 2018 wave are in place. The president’s approval rating is stuck in the mid-to-high 30s. The Democrats hold nearly a double-digit lead on the generic congressional ballot. The president’s party nearly always struggles in midterm elections.These conditions have been in place all year. They just haven’t yielded Democratic victories until now because the high-profile races have been fought in reliably Republican areas — districts that voted for either Mr. Trump or Mitt Romney by at least 15 points.But Virginia voted for Hillary Clinton by five points in 2016, and it backed Barack Obama twice as well. New Jersey, Washington State’s 45th Senate district, New York’s Westchester and Nassau Counties and Maine are generally even more Democratic-leaning.The big surprise of the night was the huge Democratic surge in Virginia’s House of Delegates, but that also came in Clinton Country. Of the 16 districts where Democrats currently lead in Virginia, Mrs. Clinton won 15 of them and received 49.7 percent of the vote in the other, according to data from the Virginia Public Access Project and Daily Kos Elections. Twelve of those 15 districts voted for Mrs. Clinton by at least five points.Just because Tuesday’s victories came in states or districts won by Mrs. Clinton doesn’t mean they can be dismissed, however. College-educated white voters, paired with nonwhite voters, could profoundly endanger the G.O.P. in traditionally Republican, upscale districts.Up until the polls closed in Virginia, it was reasonable to suppose that Mrs. Clinton’s performance represented something of a ceiling for Democrats in well-educated areas. It would be easy, the theory went, for Republican voters to distinguish their longtime Republican representatives from Mr. Trump. Jon Ossoff’s failure to outdo Mrs. Clinton in Georgia’s Sixth Congressional District seemed fully consistent with that possibility.But well-educated voters in Virginia didn’t appear to make any distinction between Mr. Trump and their incumbent representatives. Ed Gillespie, who was thought to have run a pretty strong campaign for governor against Ralph S. Northam, wound up running well behind Mr. Trump in many well-educated suburbs, a possibility that few imagined heading into the contest.The catch, though, is that the overwhelming Democratic strength in well-educated areas did not cross the political divides of the 2016 election and reach into white working-class areas. In fact, Mr. Northam, a Virginia Military Institute graduate with a strong Southern pedigree, didn’t even come close to matching Gov. Terry McAuliffe, Mr. Obama or Senator Tim Kaine in rural western Virginia. Democratic State Assembly candidates didn’t run well ahead of Mrs. Clinton, either.Yes, the political divisions of the 2016 presidential election wound up working pretty well for Democrats in Virginia, a highly educated state. But that might not be the case for Democrats in a lot of the rest of the country. There are only 11 Republican-held congressional districts in the United States where Mrs. Clinton won by five points or more. Even if Democrats swept those 11 districts, it wouldn’t get them that far toward the 24 seats they need to flip the House.To my surprise, it’s not obvious that a rerun of the Virginia House of Delegates election on a national scale would yield Democratic control of the House. Without greater strength in areas that supported Mr. Trump, it would still be a tossup.The good news for Democrats is that they did run well ahead of Mrs. Clinton in white working-class areas during this spring’s special congressional elections. And on Tuesday, Mr. Northam ran ahead of her in some of those areas, too, even if he landed short of prior Democratic benchmarks.The big question in 2018 might prove to be whether Democrats can have it all: Will it be possible to combine a Virginia-like near sweep of Republicans in Clinton districts with a broad Democratic overperformance in white working-class districts? If they can do both, they will be favored to retake the House. One or the other would probably make the fight for House control a tossup. The fact that they’ve done both at various points this year might be an early clue.
The New York Times Takes a Trip to a Driverless Future Ever since I started as an editor at The New York Times Magazine a little more than three years ago, one of my main guiding principles has been: Don’t go too far out on a limb. That precept feels particularly important to me because many of the stories I oversee are about science and technology, two subjects where it can be easy for journalists to get too far ahead of the facts. A new study might suggest some scientific breakthrough is on the horizon, but The Times should never cover it in a way that seems to imply it’s already here. In my previous job, at Wired magazine, my colleagues and I had one example of hyperactive prognostication that we used as a running joke: “commuting in dirigibles.” That absurd mental image was a stand-in for all the other ridiculous sci-fi fantasies that, cool as they may look on a magazine cover, have basically no chance of arriving.In the Tech and Design issue, out this week, my colleagues and I have made an exception to my rule.Indeed, we’ve gone so far out on a limb — veering into pure speculation — that the branch has surely broken. That’s because the subject of our issue, self-driving cars, is a science-fictional technology that has taken tremendous strides over the past few years, with billions of dollars being invested every year by some of the world’s biggest companies, toward becoming a reality. This looming transformation of the car, itself the most transformative invention in American history, is still quite a few years off, and it still very well might stall or reverse entirely. But if it does arrive, and human drivers go the way of the carriage horse, the implications of that shift would be profound. With that in mind, we thought a little speculation might be called for.This week’s edition is one of 15 special issues that the magazine will put out this year. Some of these issues let us give broad attention to important subjects — education, say, or business — that we otherwise might not cover enough. But in many cases, we’ve found it especially fun (for us and also, we hope, for readers) to use them to go deep on one story or theme, turning it around and seeing it from every angle.For the Tech and Design issue, we zeroed in on the autonomous car — and the future it might usher in. Two of our favorite business writers, Kevin Roose and Jon Gertner, visited and Tesla to take the measure of their self-driving projects — and ride around in the autonomous cars they’re making. Kim Tingley visited a start-up that’s teaching large trucks to coordinate on highways in order to save on fuel.But the real limb-breaking happens in the two essay packages that consume much of the magazine. In twenty short provocations, we’ve asked writers to imagine transformations the world could undergo if humans are no longer driving themselves around. The Times business reporter Nathaniel Popper thinks through the question of how car insurance would change. Gretchen Reynolds, our Well columnist, sketched out an autonomous-car workout. Other writers forecast the effects of autonomous cars on everything from drug dealing to sex to roadkill. Definitely don’t miss the back page, where the illustrator Tomi Um has envisioned what a “Museum of Driving” would be like, in a future where the idea of driving your own car seems as remote as piloting a horse and buggy would today.Will any of us see a driverless future? It’s hard to say. Right now, the technology works only under very controlled conditions, and something as simple as snow can change the environment around cars in ways that researchers are only beginning to figure out how to account for. But the strides have been so great, and the investment in the technology so vast. Certainly you’re more likely to commute some day in a self-driving car than you are in a dirigible.
‘“We the People” Are Out of Hibernation’ Here are the top 10 comments of the week on our digital platforms, as selected by our readers and the journalists who moderate nearly every comment. Some comments were edited for length and clarity.1. Trump has poked the bear. I’m not talking about North Korea or Iran. “We the people” are out of hibernation. From the time of the election, through the women’s march, to today, our winter as sleepy citizens is over.Women, people of color, people of any ethnicity — heck, any human being who believes in justice, integrity, the rule of law, and the heart of our country itself — will not stand for what Trump is trying to do.— LindaP, Boston, reacting to an article about American suburbs appearing to be in revolt against President Trump, based on the results of Tuesday’s election. 2. It’s news — when Democrats win where they should have won all along? Really? Liberals are in for disappointment in 2018. Their policies haven’t changed. It’s still identity politics and class warfare. Until Democrats decide to sideline their elitist zealots and elect more centrist candidates, Tuesday’s results will be an aberration.— Jesse the Conservative, Orleans, Vt.3. I am a 19-year-old stand-up comedian in college. Louis C.K. was the first comedian I ever really watched. I had heard rumors, but I always pushed them to the back of my mind. This is like finding out that Santa Claus is a serial killer, or that Head and Shoulders shampoo is made from kitten bones or something.— Max, Boston, reacting to an article about the comedian Louis C.K. being accused by five women of overstepping professional bounds by masturbating in front of them. 4. As a three-tour combat vet of Iraq I have used semiautomatic and automatic weapons in the defense of my nation to fight the war on terrorism. We shouldn’t have to attend church with a concealed carry just to worship the deity of our choice.Instead of calling for thoughts and prayers we should be calling for action to solve this national crisis where we feel the right to bear arms is more sacred than life itself.— Damon Walton, Clarksville, Tenn., reacting to an article about Devin Patrick Kelley killing 26 of people at a Texas church using a military-style rifle.5. The guy who stopped this lunatic was a card-carrying member of the National Rifle Association. In New York, we’re still reeling from that horrific attack where a crazed driver mowed down tourists and bike riders armed only with a truck he rented from Home Depot. Anything can be turned into a weapon for some nefarious purpose.— Sharon5101, Rockaway Beach, N.Y.6. blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah #280Characters @jack Should have left it at #140— @enggirl, via Twitter, reacting  to  an article about Twitter’s announcement that nearly all of its 330 million users would now be able to tweet with 280 characters.7. I’m 74 and I still am not over it. My abuse happened when I was 4 years old until I was 7 years old. I felt ashamed. I tried to tell my mother.I am afraid of men. The message I want to convey is that it is never over. I have been alone for over 40 years and I will die alone.— Nancy, Massachusetts, reacting to an Op-Ed by the endurance swimmer Diana Nyad about her experience of sexual abuse by a coach, and the value of speaking out.8. If you already have more money than you, your children, and your grandchildren can spend in a lifetime and you still want to save an extra million, you are just a bad human being. Big corporations and the uber wealthy receive the most benefits from society, after all we, society, are what made them rich to begin with.Instead of acknowledging that, they want tax cuts and tax havens so they can accumulate more money. Honestly, they are just absolutely despicable.— SH, Virginia, reacting to an article about the Paradise Papers, which illustrate how the wealthiest people, who control 90 percent of the world’s wealth, use offshore tax havens to avoid paying taxes.9. My son has severe dairy allergy and so many people are incredibly clueless about it. One of the most frequent responses I get after explaining to people that my son cannot have dairy is, “it’s gluten free!”— Karissa Jean Rosenfield, on The Times’s Facebook page, reacting to an article about the death of 3-year-old Elijah Silvera, who was served a grilled cheese sandwich despite a known allergy.10. Obviously, you haven’t heard my toddler.— Kyle Key, on The Times’s Facebook page, reacting to an article about the soprano Audrey Luna singing the A above high C in Thomas Adès’s “The Exterminating Angel” at the Metropolitan Opera.
When Designing Luxury Cars Is Like Making Jewelry. And Friends. Earl Lucas, 47, is the chief exterior designer at the Lincoln Motor Company, in Dearborn, Mich.Q. What is your day-to-day like?It’s different every day. I interface with multiple disciplines, whether it be packaging, engineering, marketing or public relations. Some days I am at my computer designing digitally. Then I might be in our studio seeing that image converted to a clay model, and later as a fiberglass version of it. Another day I go to our wind tunnel, where we test aerodynamics to make sure we have the right drag count to get the best fuel economy for our product.A. Did you always want to be an automobile designer?I always knew I wanted to do something with design. I studied industrial design focusing on jewelry — rings, pendants and earrings — for two years at the College of Creative Studies in Detroit. The college also happened to have an outstanding automobile design curriculum. After taking one class in that program, I was hooked. It turns out the principles of designing a ring are the same as designing a car.What or who were your early design influences?I would have to start with my mother, Vessie Lucas, who is an interior decorator. She taught me to think abstractly — of what could be — at an early age. I read a lot of comics, like “The Mighty Thor” and “Spiderman.” I also watched cartoons such as “Speed Racer,” “Battle of the Planets” and “Star Blazers.” In terms of cars, I loved my grandfather’s 1984 Continental Mark VII, with two tones of blue paint and an impeccable white interior. After he died, I got to drive it on Sundays to church.What considerations influence your design concepts? I try to reflect the personality of the brand. In the case of Lincoln, our cars embody effortless luxury. We think of our car as a friend. We convey that through form, shape, color and texture. The most influential design element may be the front grille. It has to stand out but be in proportion with everything else. The centerpiece is our logo — called the Lincoln Star — which was developed in the 1950s. I have managed to tweak it a little.What do you envision for auto design in the future?Autonomous cars — driverless automobiles — are the future and we are already developing technologies to accommodate for this shift, which we predict could be in effect by 2030. As highways and streets will be modified, cars will also have different shapes and silhouettes; they may look more like living rooms. We’ll need to anticipate caravans, where cars will link up to each other to save energy.Will that be the death knell for humans actually driving their own cars?While there’s something to be said for autonomous cars, I believe people will still want to drive. They want to be in control. They want to enjoy just taking a drive without knowing where they are going and being able to decide en route. It comes down to a bigger question: Do humans want to be part of a collective or be an individual? It’s a matter of how much freedom we want.
Cars Lose the Spare Tire for a Leaner Ride, but It Could Cost You To the list of items you should no longer expect to see in a new car — those once-common features like a metal ignition key, an ashtray or a vent window that swings open — you may soon be adding the spare tire.Already, nearly a third of the 2017 models offered in the United States do not come outfitted with a save-the-day spare as standard equipment, according to a recent study by AAA.In truth, the extinction of the spare tire has been happening, if gradually, for years. Full-size spares gave way to the space-saving “doughnut” versions you sometimes spot on vehicles traveling at worrying speeds. They, in turn, are yielding their under-floor real estate to no tire at all.The elimination of the spare by automakers is not entirely an abandonment of good sense or a severe example of cost-cutting; in fact, it can benefit drivers. The primary goal is weight reduction, a crucial factor in meeting fuel economy standards.Removing a substantial amount of rubber and steel — up to 40 pounds, according to industry experts — along with a jack and a lug wrench is a big win for engineers who are conditioned to shave ounces wherever possible. But as appealing as it may be to skip the doughnut and lose a little weight, the disappearing spare can cause headaches: AAA said that last year it had answered roadside assistance calls from 450,000 members whose cars did not have spares — a situation that can mean a trip to the repair shop on a flatbed.The freedom to eliminate spare tires altogether is largely possible as a result of developments in tire construction technology.An increasingly popular alternative to spares is the so-called run-flat design, which most new BMW models use. Intended to make roadside tire changes unnecessary, this solution employs a reinforced tire sidewall that typically lets the driver continue for 50 miles at up to 50 miles an hour after air pressure is lost. But they can be more costly: It may be necessary to replace, rather than simply patch, a damaged tire, and replacements are typically priced $25 to $50 higher than a conventional design.Another alternative is the self-sealing tire, an older solution reappearing in modern form on the battery-powered Chevrolet Bolt, where reduced weight translates to more miles per charge. Designed solely as an electric vehicle, the Bolt has no provision for carrying a spare. According to Michelin, which supplies the Bolt’s Energy Saver A/S Selfseal rubber, the extra cost of a self-sealing tire — which can continue down the road even with a nail in the tread — is about $33 compared with conventional tires of the same size.But some models are losing the spare without the benefit of run-flat or self-sealing rubber, instead including conventional tires and a leak repair kit — packaged in an aerosol can or used in conjunction with a small air compressor powered by the car’s battery.Such kits skim weight while skipping the tire, but have limited abilities to deal with any road hazard more serious than a nail hole in the tire’s tread section. A larger tear in the tire — something that can happen when modern low-profile tires meet a pothole — or damage to the sidewall or wheel rim will not be fixed by a leak kit. The sealants, which are usually one-time use devices, have a finite shelf life — usually from four to eight years, AAA said — and cost about $40 to replace.Even if a leak sealant kit gets you back on the road in a hurry after a minor puncture, it could complicate a permanent repair. Affixing an internal patch after a sealant has been used requires a thorough cleanup of all the goo inside, said Tom Carter, technical communications director for Michelin.For a car owner — and certainly renters who might not know what they are getting into — the best way to prevent an unpleasant middle-of-the-night surprise is to check for a spare and be sure that it holds air. If there’s a sealant kit instead, read the owner’s manual (which may be on a DVD or available on the car’s display screen) and learn how to use it.In some cases, greater peace of mind is available from the automakers.For instance, although mainstream versions of the 2017 Honda Civic come from the factory with space-saver spares, the Civic Si does not. A spare wheel kit, including a jack and tools, is available from Honda dealers as an accessory for the Civic Si at a suggested retail price of $254. The tire, which must be purchased separately, runs about $115 from sources like Tirerack.com.BMW offers a compact spare kit — including jack and wrench — for many of its X Series sport utility vehicles and for the 5 and 7 Series sedans. In most cases, it’s a $150 option when ordering the car, though on some models with conventional tires it is free. On the sport utility models, the compact spare fits entirely within a compartment under the rear floor, but on the sedans it juts out too high, meaning the floor panel cannot lie flat.Not surprisingly, independent online retailers have also emerged to fill the hole. Buyers should make sure to compare prices with the dealership and to determine that there is a storage spot in the car where the tire can be secured. As designers work to smooth airflow under the car for fuel-economy improvements, those compartments are going away, too.The disappearance of the spare tire might be more than just an exercise in efficiency. It may be a sociological statement. A survey by AAA found that some 20 percent of drivers do not know how to change a flat tire, and with the rise of roadside assistance coverage for new cars, that number is unlikely to shrink.The era of cars proudly displaying a spare tire mounted on the front fender or rear bumper — a standby of prewar classics — is long gone, and the tradition of suburban dads gathering to inspect a neighbor’s new purchase may have to undergo a major change.Instead of crowding around the front end to see what’s under the hood, perhaps they’ll be checking the trunk to see if it’s got a spare.
Asian-American Cuisine’s Rise, and Triumph On the plate, the egg looks like an eye plucked from a baby dragon. The yolk is the green-black of smoked glass, with a gray, nearly calcified halo, trapped in an oval of wobbling amber and emitting the faintest whiff of brimstone.So begins the $285, 19-course tasting menu at Benu in San Francisco. The egg is a traditional Chinese snack, often called (poetically, if inaccurately) a 1,000-year-old egg, preserved for a few weeks or months in lye or slaked lime, salt and tea. It’s sold by street vendors, tossed into stir-fries and scattered over congee throughout China, parts of Southeast Asia and the world’s Chinatowns. To more than a billion people, it is an utterly commonplace food.But to present it as an amuse-bouche at one of the most acclaimed fine-dining restaurants in the United States, to a predominantly non-Asian clientele, is radical. For despite America’s long, complicated love affair with Asian cooking, it is hard to imagine such a food, so alien to Western culinary ideals in appearance, aroma, flavor and texture, being served in this kind of setting, let alone embraced, a decade ago.This, though, is the new American palate. As a nation we were once beholden to the Old World traditions of early settlers; we now crave ingredients from farther shores. The briny rush of soy; ginger’s low burn; pickled cabbage with that heady funk so close to rot. Vinegar applied to everything. Fish sauce like the underbelly of the sea. Palm sugar, velvet to cane sugar’s silk. Coconut milk slowing the tongue. Smoky black cardamom with its menthol aftermath. Sichuan peppercorns that paralyze the lips and turn speech to a burr, and Thai bird chilies that immolate everything they touch. Fat rice grains that cling, that you can scoop up with your hands. (As a child raised in a Filipino-American household, I was bewildered by commercials for Uncle Ben’s rice that promised grains that were “separate, not sticky,” as if that were a good thing.)These are American ingredients now, part of a movement in cooking that often gets filed under the melting-pot, free-for-all category of New American cuisine. But it’s more specific than that: This is food borne of a particular diaspora, made by chefs who are “third culture kids,” heirs to both their parents’ culture and the one they were raised in, and thus forced to create their own.Could we call it Asian-American cuisine? The term is problematic, subsuming countries across a vast region with no shared language or single unifying religion. It elides numerous divides: city and countryside, aristocrats and laborers, colonizers and colonized — “fancy Asian” and “jungle Asian,” as the comedian Ali Wong puts it. (She’s speaking specifically of East and Southeast Asians, who followed similar patterns of immigration to the U.S. and who are the primary focus of this piece.) As a yoke of two origins, it can also be read as an impugning of loyalties and as a code for “less than fully American.” When I asked American chefs of Asian heritage whether their cooking could be considered Asian-American cuisine, there was always a pause, and sometimes a sigh.But this is what happens in America: Borders blur. When there aren’t many of you — Americans of Asian descent are only 6 percent of the population, a legacy of decades of immigration quotas and denial of citizenship — you find common cause with your neighbors. The term Asian-American was not imposed on us, like “Yellow Peril” in the late 19th century or “Oriental”; it was coined in the 1960s by Yuji Ichioka, a California-born historian and civil rights activist, to give us a political voice. If we call this kind of cooking just American, something is lost.The rise of contemporary Asian-American cuisine began with Korean-American chef David Chang’s Momofuku Noodle Bar, which opened in New York in 2004 and was followed four years later by fellow Korean-American chef Roy Choi’s Kogi BBQ truck in Los Angeles. Their approach to cooking is typically, reductively, framed as an East-meets-West marriage of big flavors and elevated (i.e., French) technique — as if every Asian cuisine were hellbent on storming the palate (some, like Cantonese, are, in fact, renowned for their subtlety); as if culinary refinement were proprietary to the West.But the history of Asian-American cuisine goes further back than that, to the first tearooms and banquet halls set up by Chinese immigrants who came to seek their fortune in Gold Rush California in the 1850s. By the end of the 19th century, despite Congress’s passage of the Chinese Exclusion Act in 1882 and attempts to condemn San Francisco’s Chinatown as a threat to the American way of life — “in their quarters all civilization of the white race ceases,” declared a pamphlet published by the Workingmen’s Party of California in 1880 — Cantonese restaurants were all the rage in New York. The food was cheap and fast, swiftly stir-fried in woks, a technique that remained a mystery for decades to most in the West. (One journalist, touring a Chinatown kitchen in 1880, did wonder if “the funny little things we saw at the bottom of a deep earthen jar were rat’s-tails skinned.”)When outsiders came flocking in the 1890s, Chinese chefs altered and invented dishes to please them. This was less concession than calculation, capitalizing on opportunity. The work of immigrants — in food as in the arts — has always been dogged by accusations of impurity and inauthenticity, suggesting that there is one standard, preserved in amber, for what a dish should be or what a writer or artist with roots in another country should have to say. It’s a specious argument, as if being born into a culture were insufficient bona fides to speak of it. (Immigrants are always being asked to show their papers, in more ways than one.) The history of food, like the history of man, is a series of adaptations, to environment and circumstance. Recipes aren’t static. Immigrant cooks, often living in poverty, have always made do with what’s on hand, like the Japanese-Americans rounded up and shipped to internment camps during the Second World War, who improvised rice balls with rations of Spam, and the Korean and Filipino-Americans who, having survived on canned goods in the aftermath of war, eked out household budgets by deploying hot dogs in kimbap and banana-ketchup spaghetti.Sometimes the nostalgia for this kind of food can be difficult to convey to those who don’t share the same history. At Bad Saint, a Filipino restaurant in Washington, D.C., the chef Tom Cunanan makes adobo with pig tails, a cheap, snubbed part of the animal that was treasured by Depression-era Filipino immigrants working in California labor camps. Diep Tran, the Vietnamese-American chef of Good Girl Dinette in Los Angeles, told me that she wishes she could serve a breakfast of nothing but baguette accompanied by condensed milk diluted with hot water, for dipping. “It’s refugee food,” she said. “Proustian, kind of like Spam. But people get upset; they think they’re being ripped off.”Almost every Asian-American chef I spoke to — most of whom are in their late 20s to early 40s — came to the U.S. as children or were born to parents who were immigrants. (In 1952, the last racial barriers to naturalization were lifted, and in 1965, immigration quotas based on national origin — for Asia, 100 visas per country per year — were abolished.) Almost all had stories of neighbors alarmed by the smells from their families’ kitchens or classmates recoiling from their lunchboxes. “I was that kid, with farty-smelling food,” said Jonathan Wu, the Chinese-American chef at Nom Wah Tu in New York. “I still feel that, if I’m taking the train with garlic chives in my bag.”So these chefs’ cooking, born of shame, rebellion and reconciliation, is not some wistful ode to an imperfectly remembered or never-known, idealized country. It’s a mixture of nostalgia and resilience. It wasn’t taught — certainly not in the way other cuisines have been traditionally taught. Graduates of the Culinary Institute of America in Hyde Park, N.Y., recalled that little time was devoted to Asian cooking; at Le Cordon Bleu in London and in Paris, none. One instructor took offense when Preeti Mistry, whose Indian-inflected restaurants include Juhu Beach Club in Oakland, Calif., likened a French stew to curry. Another told David Chang that pork stock, essential to tonkotsu ramen, was “disgusting.”Neither does their cooking have much kinship with the “fusion” cuisine of the early 1990s, when non-Asian chefs like Jean-Georges Vongerichten and Gray Kunz began folding Eastern ingredients into otherwise Western dishes. (“Fusion” is another term that sits uneasily with Asian-American chefs. “I wouldn’t call myself ‘fusion,’ ” said Maiko Kyogoku, the owner of the idiosyncratic Bessou in New York. “To describe food that way? It’s an extension of myself.”) In spirit, Asian-American cooking is closer to other American-born cuisines with tangled roots: the Lowcountry cooking of coastal South Carolina, which owes a debt to slaves from West Africa who brought over one-pot stews and ingredients like okra, peanuts and black-eyed peas; and Tex-Mex, which is not a bastardization of Mexican food but a regional variant of it, cultivated by Tejanos, descendants of Hispanics who lived in Texas when it was part of Mexico and, before that, New Spain.There’s also no one cultural touchstone or trauma that binds Asian immigrants: no event on a national scale that has brought us together. But part of what distinguishes our experience from that of other immigrants and people of color is the fraught, intimate relationship between our countries of origin and the U.S., which has been foe and protector, oppressor and liberator, feared and adored. In 1899, the British writer Rudyard Kipling urged the U.S. to “take up the White Man’s burden” in the Philippines after the Spanish-American War:Go send your sons to exileTo serve your captives’ need[...] Your new-caught, sullen peoples,Half devil and half child.This begot more than a century of American military intervention in East and Southeast Asia, and a history of conflicting images: Pearl Harbor and Hiroshima; the Vietcong in black pajamas and the American atrocities at My Lai; teeming refugee camps and smiling American G.I.s handing out candy, decade after decade, to throngs of dark-haired, starving children.Any immigrant is an outsider at first. But for Asians in America, there is a starker sense of otherness. We don’t fit in to the American binary of white and black. We have been the enemy; the subjugated; the “lesser” peoples whose scramble for a foothold in society was historically seen as a menace to the American order. And yet we’ve also been the “good” immigrants, proving ourselves worthy of American beneficence — polite, humble, grateful, willing to work 20-hour days running a grocery store or a laundry or a restaurant that will never be “authentic” enough, to spend every dime on our children’s test prep so that they get into the best schools, because we believe in the promise of America, that if you work hard, you can become anyone. If you try hard enough, you might even be mistaken for white.Among the children of immigrants, Asians in America seem most caught in a state of limbo: no longer beholden to their parents’ countries of origin but still grasping for a role in the American narrative. There is a unique foreignness that persists, despite the presence of Asians on American soil for more than two centuries; none of us, no matter how bald our American accent, has gone through life without being asked, “Where are you from? I mean, originally?” But while this can lead to alienation, it can also have a liberating effect. When you are raised in two cultures at once — when people see in you two heritages at odds, unresolved, in abeyance — you learn to shift at will between them. You may never feel like you quite belong in either, but neither are you fully constrained. The acute awareness of borders (culinary as well as cultural) that both enclose and exclude, allows, paradoxically, a claim to borderlessness, taking freely from both sides to forge something new. For Asian-American chefs, this seesaw between the obligations of inheritance and the thrill of go-it-aloneness, between respecting your ancestors and lighting out for the hills, manifests in dishes that arguably could come only from minds fluent in two ways of life.Thus the kaiseki at Niki Nakayama’s n/naka, in Los Angeles, always includes a pasta course. Her slyly voluptuous “carbonara” of abalone livers and egg yolks is a homage to Tokyo-style wafu spaghetti with briny pickled cod roe — only here it’s capped with shaved truffles. At Tao Yuan, in Brunswick, Me., Cara Stadler takes tiles of goat cheese made by a local creamery and sears them, as is done in Yunnan, to approximate rubing, a sturdy farmer’s cheese. But instead of merely sprinkling the cheese with sugar or salt, she counters its meatiness with a bright grace note of mint and watermelon from summer’s height. A Caesar salad might be supplanted by a canoe of romaine, grilled for a hint of smoke and loaded with dainty jako (dried baby sardines) and quail eggs as anchors, as at Bessou in New York. Or, as re-envisioned by Chris Kajioka at Senia, in Honolulu, it might be a mossy cliff of charred cabbage — a wink at an iceberg wedge — dusted with shio kombu (shredded kelp boiled in soy and mirin), soaked through with dashi and ginger, and surrounded by daubs of heady green goddess dressing and buttermilk turned to gel. It’s not so much a salad as a cheeky biography of it by the barbarian at the gates, achieving the quintessence of an American classic through Asian ingredients.And while Asian-American cooking may not be expressed in or identified by a single set of flavors, one thing that does unite such disparate traditions is an emphasis on textures. Indeed, if the cuisine can be said to have revolutionized American food, it’s by introducing unfamiliar mouth feels — crackle where one doesn’t expect it, slime in a country that’s always shied away from that sensation — into our culinary vocabulary. Justin Yu, who recently opened Theodore Rex in Houston, rhapsodizes about “the crunch that you can hear in the back of your head”; unrendered, gelatinous animal skin, “a fun burst of fat and softness”; broths barely skimmed, or with a spoonful of fat added “to coat the lips.” The maverick Katsuya Fukushima, of Daikaya in Washington, D.C., once turned natto — a gooey, slippery skein of fermented soybeans, with the perfume of castoff socks — into an earthy caramel over soft-serve. Like Latin-American food, which made Americans crave heat, Asian-American cuisine has made “difficult” textures not only desirable but as integral to food as flavor itself. That certain ingredients still make some Western diners squeamish is part of its provocative fun.But the question remains: Does calling this kind of cooking Asian-American cuisine deepen and contextualize our understanding of it, or is it just a label, like speaking of Asian-American art or fiction — a way of simplifying a complex story and making it a marketable cliché? The danger is fetishizing Asian features, a tendency that diminishes: If you are an exotic object or phenomenon, you may never become recognized or acknowledged as more. “White chefs are using these ingredients and saying, ‘Oh, it’s so strange,’ ” Tin Vuong, of Little Sister in Los Angeles, said. “It isn’t.” Instead of a historical matrix of Asian culinary traditions, “young cooks just see a big pantry,” Fukushima said. “Take a little bit of this, a little bit of that — there’s no soul to it.”Chang believes that food “has the potential to sort of show that we’re all the same.” But even he isn’t entirely comfortable with the ubiquity of kimchi. “Let’s say you spent no time in Asia, you just found a recipe on YouTube,” he said. “That’s appropriation. It’s not about skin color. You have to have a story, pay respect to what it was and what it means.” At the same time, it seems reductive to expect Asian-American chefs to make food that somehow reflects their personal “story.” On season three of “Top Chef,” Hung Huynh, a Vietnamese-American contestant, was faulted for cooking that was technically dazzling but lacked explicit reference to his roots. “You were born in Vietnam,” Tom Colicchio, the head judge, said. “I don’t see any of that in your food.” (It’s hard not to hear an echo of the trope of the inscrutable Oriental, whose motives can’t be deciphered, and the common criticism of Asian-Americans at school and at work as being overly cerebral and lacking feeling.) The strictures of reality TV do demand a baring of the soul, but not all Asian-American chefs want to work with Asian flavors — and when they do, it’s not always in expected ways.Must every Italian chef make lasagna, every French chef coq au vin? Anita Lo, who closed her fine-dining restaurant Annisa in New York earlier this year, cooked there for 17 years without fealty to one region or cultural tradition. This puzzled some diners. “I had someone come in and say, ‘Where’s the big Buddha head?’ ” she said. When publications request recipes and she submits one without Asian ingredients, the response is often, “We were really hoping for something Asian” — or Asian-ish: Anything with soy, apparently, will do. “I send in Japanese, which isn’t even my background, but that works,” she said.Corey Lee’s “Benu” cookbook is filled with stories: of his grandmother foraging for acorns; of his mother forcing him to drink a tonic of brewed deer’s antlers; of his father bringing home live lobster for his son’s birthday, and of the joys of eating tomalley (the wet gray-green paste that acts as a lobster’s liver and pancreas) on buttered bread. All suggest that Lee’s dishes, however rarefied, are also deeply autobiographical. But Lee demurs, the way a novelist might, fending off a critic’s attempt to find in his books correlations to actual events, wanting them to stand alone as fully imagined works of art. “There’s great pressure for chefs to have a story,” he said. “Maybe there’s no story beyond, ‘I want to serve this food and it tastes good.’ ”It’s the eternal plea of the minority, to ask to be judged not by one’s appearance or the rituals of one’s forbears but for the quality of one’s mind and powers of invention. Certainly our country was predicated on the right to shed one’s past and be reborn, to come from nothing and work your way up; in this, Asians may be among the most American of Americans. But why is the choice always between exotic caricature or rootlessness? The philosopher Slavoj Zizek argues that the embrace of “ethnic” restaurants is merely “tolerance” of a “folklorist Other deprived of its substance”: “The ‘real Other’ is by definition ‘patriarchal,’ ‘violent,’ never the Other of ethereal wisdom and charming customs.” Too often Asian-American chefs are presumed to double as educators or ambassadors, representing an entire race, culture or cuisine.In the end, doesn’t it matter — not to others, but to ourselves — where we are from? And no, I don’t mean “originally.” I mean the forces that made us: the immigrants who raised us, with all their burdens and expectations, their exhortations to fit in but never forget who we are; and the country we grew up in, that is our only home, that taught us we are “other” but also seems, in some confused, tentative way, to want to learn something from us.For Asian-American chefs, this is the conundrum, and the opportunity. The foods of their childhoods were once mocked and rejected by their non-Asian peers (and by their ashamed or rebellious younger selves); then accepted in dilute, placating form; and now are able to command audiences who clamor for their sensations and aggressive flavors, and who might be unnerved if they knew exactly what they were putting in their mouths. What may be most radical about Asian-American cuisine is the attitude that informs and powers it, reflecting a new cockiness in a population that has historically kept quiet and encouraged to lay low. It’s food that celebrates crunchy cartilage and gelatinous ooze, that openly stinks, that declares: This is what I like to eat. What about you? Do you dare?
Queen Elizabeth II Delegates Wreath Ceremony to Prince Charles LONDON — In a significant step in the British monarchy’s transition, Queen Elizabeth II watched from a balcony in central London on Sunday as her eldest son, Prince Charles, placed a wreath at the Cenotaph, Britain’s memorial to its war dead.Often praised for being rigorous about her royal obligations, the queen, 91, had delegated the Remembrance Sunday duty to Charles, 68, who is next in line to the British throne.Buckingham Palace announced the change last month, a move seen by royals observers as a major step in the shift to the monarchy’s next generation.The queen watched the ceremony unfold from a nearby Foreign and Commonwealth Office balcony in Whitehall on a chilly morning, flanked by her husband, Prince Philip, and Charles’s wife, Camilla, the Duchess of Cornwall.Prime Minister Theresa May and the leader of the opposition Labour Party, Jeremy Corbyn, were among the officials in attendance.The chimes of Big Ben, which had been silent for a lengthy restoration project, tolled during the event, the second time in two days, before the nation observed two minutes of silence. The bell also rang on Saturday to mark Armistice Day.Elizabeth is Britain’s longest-reigning monarch, having been crowned in Westminster Abbey on June 2, 1953.Prince Philip, 96, retired in August from solo public appearances, remarking that he had been “the world’s most experienced plaque-unveiler.”Charles recently represented his mother on a 10-day tour of four Commonwealth countries: Brunei, India, Malaysia and Singapore. Sunday wasn’t the first time he had stepped in for his mother at the annual wreath-laying ceremony in London: He performed the ritual in 1983 — but while she was in Kenya.Security was tightened this year, with the authorities employing facial recognition cameras, bag searches, sniffer dogs and body scanners, according to news reports.On Saturday night, Elizabeth and Philip joined thousands of veterans at Royal Albert Hall for a program honoring British military men and women. The event included hymns, prayers and performances by the Scottish singer-songwriter Emeli Sandé and the English tenor Alfie Boe.
In Barcelona, Rajoy Calls for Record Turnout to Defeat Secessionism MADRID — In his first visit to Catalonia since taking control of the restive region in Spain, Prime Minister Mariano Rajoy on Sunday urged Catalans to vote in next month’s elections to defeat the independence movement and return the region to “normality.”Mr. Rajoy, addressing Catalan supporters of his conservative Popular Party, rejected criticism of the jailing of separatist politicians, a day after hundreds of thousands of pro-independence demonstrators marched in Barcelona, the Catalan capital, to demand their release.“In Spain, you can defend any idea,” Mr. Rajoy said, but only as long as it is done within the rule of law.Mr. Rajoy’s government took charge of Catalonia on Oct. 27, using emergency powers under Article 155 of the Spanish Constitution, shortly after separatist lawmakers voted for independence from Spain. He fired the Catalan government, dissolved the Catalan Parliament and set new regional elections for Dec. 21.After Mr. Rajoy imposed direct rule on Catalonia, the region’s former leader, Carles Puigdemont, arrived in Brussels. He is fighting an arrest warrant issued by Spain’s judiciary to force him and four other Catalan politicians to return to Madrid to stand trial on charges including rebellion. Other members of the former Catalan government were recently jailed without bail.But ahead of the December elections, the independence movement has shown signs of strain. Mr. Puigdemont failed this past week to strike an agreement between the two main Catalan parties to renew the joint, pro-independence ticket that brought them into office in late 2015.On Sunday, the representatives of the far-left party of Ada Colau, the mayor of Barcelona, voted to break up their governing coalition in Barcelona’s City Hall with the Socialists, because the Socialists had backed Mr. Rajoy’s decision to take over Catalonia’s administration.In response, Miquel Iceta, the Socialist leader in Catalonia, accused Ms. Colau’s party of choosing Catalan independence over the interests of Barcelona.On Twitter, Ms. Colau called the breakup of her governing coalition on Sunday “a difficult decision.” She recently had criticized the separatist lawmakers for unilaterally declaring independence. Still, the mayor joined the protest on Saturday to demand the release of eight jailed former members of the Catalan government, as well as that of two other separatist leaders.About 750,000 people marched in Barcelona, according to the local police. From Brussels, Mr. Puidgemont thanked the demonstrators, on Twitter, for being “our strength.”On Sunday, however, Mr. Rajoy called on “the silent or silenced majority” that opposes secessionism to “convert its voice into votes” on Dec. 21. In the most recent regional elections, in September 2015, separatist parties won a majority of the seats in the Catalan Parliament, but with only 48 percent of the votes.The leading candidate of the Popular Party in Catalonia, Xavier García Albiol, told supporters that “independence is toxic and destroys Catalonia.”Mr. García Albiol condemned suggestions that Catalan separatist leaders were being held in Madrid jails as political prisoners.“Spain is today is one of the most consolidated democracy of Europe and the world,” he said.Both Mr. Rajoy and Mr. García Albiol highlighted the negative financial consequences of the secessionist conflict and assured Catalan voters that they would help return the region to economic health by beating the separatist parties next month.Mr. Rajoy urged Spanish consumers not to boycott Catalan goods and said that he was determined to stop separatists from pursuing “a journey to nowhere, that will again bring crisis, unemployment and the fracture of Catalan society.”Mr. García Albiol said that more than 2,400 companies had moved their legal headquarters from Catalonia since the start of October.“Never have companies left any part of the world so quickly,” he said.
Slovenia Chooses Between the Incumbent and an Ex-Actor for President LJUBLJANA, Slovenia — Voters in Slovenia went to the polls on Sunday to decide a runoff election between a sitting president deeply rooted in the political establishment and a former actor who has appealed to the electorate by tapping into concern about the struggling economy.According to the latest opinion polls, the incumbent, Borut Pahor, who is seeking a second term, is favored to win a five-year mandate over his rival, Marjan Sarec, who is the mayor of a small town north of the capital, Ljubljana, in this tiny Alpine country once home to America’s first lady, Melania Trump.If Mr. Pahor, 54, named by one news media outlet as Europe’s Instagram president, triumphs, he will become Slovenia’s second two-term president since 1991, when the Slavic nation of two million people gained independence after the collapse of Communist Yugoslavia.Public opinion experts had predicted a tight race after Mr. Sarec forced a runoff with the widely popular president in the first round of balloting, on Oct. 22. Mr. Pahor came first among nine candidates, with 47 percent of the vote. Mr. Sarec was a distant second, with 25 percent, enough to deny the incumbent an outright victory.“It’s really telling that a candidate like Pahor, with so much experience, skill and popularity, had such a challenger in Saric, who comes from nowhere and appears to have little to offer,” said Tanja Staric, a veteran political reporter who is now the news editor of Slovenia’s public broadcasting network.Leading up to the runoff, Mr. Sarec, 39, had narrowed Mr. Pahor’s lead in the opinion polls, an indication that Slovenian voters were in sync with those across Europe, where candidates campaigning from the fringe of traditional political parties and the governing elites have steadily gained support.The presidential election is, however, considered a dress rehearsal for next year’s vote for Parliament.While there is a populist tilt in Slovenia, the shift is nowhere near the seismic changes in Britain, where voters last year backed leaving the European Union; in Germany, where the Alternative for Germany became the first far-right party to enter Parliament in decades after elections in October; or in Austria, where the People’s Party emerged in October as the strongest political force in the country, setting the course for a rightward shift.Both candidates in Slovenia have run as independents, but Mr. Pahor is deeply entrenched in the traditional party system of the left that has ridden the waves of European social democracy since the collapse of Communism.Mr. Sarec, who was elected mayor of Kamnik in 2010, is better known for impersonating politicians on a satirical radio program than for being one himself, Ms. Staric said. In the past three weeks, however, he has managed, she said, to appeal to “ordinary people, the average Joe, who feels left behind in the global economy.”The collapse of the health care system, unemployment among the youth and the economic recovery were among the major issues for voters. While Slovenians say they do not expect the president to solve their problems, they say they hope that the elected candidate will provide moral guidance to the new Parliament next year.Slovenia is the wealthiest and most socially progressive of the states that have emerged from the collapse of Yugoslavia. In 2004, it was also the first to join the European Union and NATO as the rest the region still reeled from devastating wars and the grip of nationalist rulers.Yet Slovenia, a country the size of New Jersey, has struggled to find its place in the European Union, with its leaders refusing to partner openly with other Central European countries like Hungary and Poland, which are striving to be one of the 28-member bloc’s core decision-makers, like Germany and France.During the campaign, Mr. Pahor, who led an American-style campaign using social media to lure voters, insisted that Slovenia belonged to that group of powerful countries. And he frequently dropped the names of Chancellor Angela Merkel of Germany and Jean-Claude Juncker, president of the European Commission, as his “friends.”While Mr. Sarec has emphasized his pro-European Union stance, he has also promised to address Slovenians’ concerns about what they see as the European Union’s failure to hold a unified position on immigration or to find solutions to economic malaise in the eurozone.Slovenia has yet to recover from a downturn in 2009; its economy has shrunk by 8 percent.During the migration crisis in 2015, Slovenia was a front-line country, with tens of thousands of migrants crossing on their way to seek asylum in Germany and Sweden. Last year, Slovenia’s government was instrumental in closing the so-called Balkan route for migrants, working with Austria to its north and fencing off its border with Croatia to the south to stem the flow.The presidency in Slovenia’s highest elected office, but it holds no executive powers. The winner will be the commander in chief of the armed forces and will have the power to dissolve Parliament and call early elections.The fight for control of the government next year will pit the right-wing nationalist Janez Jansa, the former prime minister and the current opposition leader, against Dejan Zidan and his left-of-center social democrats.
Pakistani Cleric’s Supporters Block an Entrance to Islamabad ISLAMABAD, Pakistan — Thousands of supporters of a firebrand Pakistani cleric, many armed with sticks and iron rods, have blocked a main entrance to Islamabad since last week, demanding the resignation of the country’s law minister and a strict adherence to blasphemy laws.Led by Khadim Hussain Rizvi of the Tehreek-e-Labaik Pakistan party, at least 3,000 protesters were staging a sit-in on one of the main highways leading to the capital.Officials say they suspect some of the protesters are carrying more serious weapons, and there is concern the standoff might turn violent. In response, the government has blocked several other roads to stop the protesters from moving to important government buildings.Crippling, hourslong traffic jams have resulted. Long lines of vehicles could be seen for much of the past week and on Sunday on the roads leading to Islamabad from the suburbs and neighboring Rawalpindi. Several schools near the protest site remained closed. Shipping containers barricading the main streets are a ubiquitous sight.“Hectic efforts and negotiations are on to resolve the issue,” said Kamran Cheema, the assistant commissioner of Islamabad.But the leaders of the protesters remained defiant.“We will lay our lives, but we will not step down from our demands,” Mr. Rizvi, the cleric, said from atop a stage set up on a cargo truck as his supporters chanted “Labaik Ya Rasool Allah, Labaik” (I am here, Prophet of God, I am here).The sit-in underscores the difficulties the government faces in dealing with right-wing extremist groups. The governing political party, Pakistan Muslim League-Nawaz, is already reeling from the fallout over the disqualification in July of its leader Nawaz Sharif, as prime minister, over a corruption investigation.Any violent confrontation with hard-line clerics would further exacerbate a tumultuous political situation.The latest controversy erupted last month, when the government introduced changes to electoral laws. A change in the wording of an oath for lawmakers that dealt with a declaration of Prophet Muhammad as God’s final prophet quickly set off a furor among opposition parties, especially the religious groups.They protested that the change amounted to blasphemy.Blasphemy is a particularly combustible issue in Pakistan, often leading to violent riots and vigilante justice. Critics and rights groups say the blasphemy laws are used to persecute religious minorities, especially the Ahmadis, who are considered non-Muslims, according to the country’s Constitution.The government quickly reversed the change to the oath, but the damage had been done. It remains unclear what prompted the alteration of the electoral oath. Officials initially said the change had been the result of a “clerical error.”The law minister, Zahid Hamid, is now in the center of the storm. Religious leaders have accused him of blasphemy and of being an Ahmadi. Mr. Hamid has denied both accusations, and in a video message last week, emphatically stated that he believed that Muhammad was God’s final prophet.But the protesters are calling for Mr. Hamid to be fired — a demand unacceptable to the government.Mr. Rizvi, a virtual unknown few years ago, belongs to the Barelvi sect and has built his reputation as a staunch defender of the country’s blasphemy laws. In the process he has amassed considerable political muscle. His sermons are often laced with invectives and profanities aimed at religious minorities and opponents.In September, Mr. Rizvi’s party entered the political fray and — to the surprise of many observers — won more than 7,000 votes, or 6 percent, in a by-election in Lahore, in eastern Pakistan, for the seat vacated by the ouster of Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif.The relatively strong showing seems to have further emboldened Mr. Rizvi, as he used the electoral oath controversy to charge toward the capital. The ease with which the protesters were able to gather near Islamabad has drawn attention.“Any violence will work to the advantage of the right wing, and they know it,” Dawn, a leading newspaper, said in a Sunday editorial. “ The government must not give in to them.”The protesters have threatened to lay siege to the airport in Islamabad, a railway station in Rawalpindi and several other government buildings if their demands are not met.At least 10,000 law enforcement officers were poised to act if negotiations failed and protesters tried to take the law into their hands, officials said.“The current situation cannot be tolerated endlessly,” Mr. Cheema warned.
Holding Hands, Drinking Wine and Other Ways to Go to Jail in Dubai DUBAI, United Arab Emirates — A Scottish electrician named Jamie Harron, visiting Dubai as a tourist, was sentenced to three months in jail for touching a man in a bar.The British head of a professional soccer team, David Haigh, was ordered jailed for seven months for a tweet that he says could not have been from him — since he was already in jail without a phone.An Australian aid worker living in Dubai, Scott Richards, was locked up for trying to raise money to buy blankets for freezing Afghan children, because he was not part of a recognized charity.Dubai, one of the seven United Arab Emirates, portrays itself as welcoming to foreigners. Its boosters claim it is the fourth most-visited tourism destination in the world, and it has at least 12 times as many foreign residents as citizens.But a legal system based on a hard-line interpretation of Shariah law often lands foreigners in jail for offenses that few Westerners would dream were even crimes.Recent examples cited by lawyers include holding hands in public; posting praise on Facebook for a charity opposed to fox hunting; drinking alcohol without a license; and sharing a hotel room with a person of the opposite sex (other than one’s spouse).Mostly, the Dubai authorities look the other way when it comes to such behavior by foreigners — until they don’t. Hotels do not ask couples for their marriage licenses. Dubai has a lively night life, with numerous gay bars and nightclubs where East European prostitutes openly solicit customers.Yet cohabitation is a crime, homosexuality is subject to the death penalty (though it is rarely imposed) and prostitution can be punished with lashes and even worse.Even victims of violent crimes can be accused of morality offenses: Gay people who report assaults have been jailed along with their attackers, and women who report being raped can be imprisoned for adultery if they do not have four male witnesses to support their story.Radha Stirling, a British lawyer, says she has represented hundreds of Westerners who have been jailed in Dubai for behavior that is usually permitted there.“You go there and its facade is that all of this is legal, everyone is doing it, you think it’s O.K.,” said Ms. Stirling, who runs a British-based group, Detained in Dubai, that publicizes such cases. “But you offend someone and you’re the one who gets it.”Two recent cases, both handled by Ms. Stirling, have aroused widespread ire in Britain, which has more nationals living in Dubai than any other Western country.Mr. Harron, 27, the Scottish electrician visiting Dubai, was arrested and sentenced to three months in jail for public indecency for allegedly touching a man’s hip as he brushed past him in a crowded bar. And a British man from Leicester, Jamil Ahmed Mukadam, 23, is facing trial for giving the middle finger to a Dubai driver who he said was tailgating him.Mr. Mukadam, a computer consultant, had been in a rental car, so it took the police a while to trace him. But six months later, in September, he was arrested at the airport upon returning to Dubai. He is now free on bail, without his passport, awaiting trial.He could face six months in jail if convicted of making the “obscene gesture.” Mr. Mukadam said he had often visited Dubai with his wife and that he liked the city, particularly its variety of halal food, but does not plan to return.“No chance I’m coming back here again,” he said. “I wouldn’t set foot here again, not the way I’ve been treated.”Emiratis are mostly unapologetic about their country’s contradictions.“Westerners’ culture differs from Arab culture,” Judge Ahmad Saif, head of the Dubai civil court, said in a recent interview with The National, a newspaper based in Abu Dhabi. “In their countries, flashing your middle finger or insulting another is not acceptable but it is not punishable by the law. The culture for people living in the U.A.E. is much different. At the end of the day, we are Muslims and committing such acts is not acceptable.”Most cases that ensnare unwary foreigners involve morality offenses. It is against the law to drink without a license, for instance, but foreigners can only get one if they are residents. So any tourist who is drinking is doing so illegally, even in a licensed bar. Couples cannot share a room together if they are not married, even in their homes.When Emlyn Culverwell, a 29-year-old South African, took his fiancée, Iryna Nohal, a Ukrainian, to a doctor in Dubai, complaining of stomach pain, the diagnosis was pregnancy — and the treatment was a phone call to the police. The couple were arrested and jailed when they could not produce a marriage license.Some Emiratis acknowledge that their laws have not kept pace with a rapidly changing society.“It is unreasonable to expect a country to warn each and every visitor about its complete set of rules and regulations in place,” Essam Tamimi, a Dubai lawyer, said in an email. “In a short period of time, Dubai has greatly developed and has become one of the world’s most diverse melting pots. That being said, laws in general are made to accommodate the society’s needs and the U.A.E., like most other countries, still has some changes to make.”Dubai officials did not respond to requests for comment for this article.Critics complain that the Emirates’ legal system is stacked against foreigners, and both Amnesty International and Human Rights Watch have accused the country of arbitrary detention and abuse of prisoners.Mr. Haigh, a former managing director of Leeds United Football Club and a partner in Ms. Stirling’s law firm, said he was jailed for 22 months and tortured repeatedly in an attempt to force him to sign a confession, but never managed to see a copy of the charges to which he was supposed to confess.Mr. Haigh had gotten into a business dispute with a Dubai bank, GFH Capital, that owned a stake in the team. He said he was tricked into coming to Dubai to resolve their differences, then jailed on arrival for breach of trust and held for several months without being allowed to see a lawyer.While in jail, he was charged with posting an offensive Twitter message, though he says he had no phone or internet access. For that, his sentence was increased by seven months. He was eventually acquitted of the Twitter charge, but not until he had served another seven months on top of his original 15 month sentence.“Ninety percent of the population are breaking the law 90 percent of the time and no one does anything against them until they upset the wrong person and they get arrested,” Mr. Haigh said of Dubai.In recent years, the United Arab Emirates has cracked down on social media, making it a crime to criticize the country, its citizens or businesses on Facebook or Twitter. The law has mainly been used to punish domestic critics, but it also swept up Ryan Pate, a helicopter mechanic from Florida, who was jailed after he unleashed a Facebook rant over a sick leave dispute with his employer, Global Aerospace Logistics, a U.A.E. company.Foreign residents and tourists encounter similar problems throughout the Emirates — Mr. Pate’s company was based in Abu Dhabi — but they are more common in Dubai because more Westerners live and visit there.Other offenses that few foreigners realize can lead to jail time include passing a bad check, even accidentally; failing to pay a credit-card bill on time; taking a photograph of someone without his or her permission; and touching someone.That was the accusation against Mr. Harron: that he had touched a man intimately in a public place, the Rock Bottom Cafe, a club frequented by gay men. He says he was just pushing through a crowd and put a hand on the man’s hip to avoid spilling his drink.He was sentenced to three months in jail, although he was allowed to leave the country after the ruler of Dubai, Sheikh Mohammed bin Rashid al-Maktoum, nullified the court’s ruling. Heavy publicity has often helped resolve such cases, even when legally they looked hopeless.“The U.A.E. government is just a huge public relations entity,” Ms. Stirling said. “If they think a case is going to harm them, the government will speak to the police and get the charges dropped.”
Putin’s Bridge to Crimea May Carry More Symbolism Than Traffic KERCH, Crimea — The looming bridge is the best show in town.Every two weeks, Nikolai Ench, a retired sailor, and his wife, Olga, scale the scrublands above Kerch in their white Toyota truck to marvel at the colossal engineering feat inching its way across the strait separating Crimea from the Russian mainland.“This is the first time they can build something like this in Russia,” said Mr. Ench, 67, who even spent an entire night in August staring at the bridge through binoculars until construction workers slotted the first of two arches into place at what he said was exactly 7:27 a.m. “We feel a certain pride.”Expected to open to traffic in December 2018, the $7 billion bridge project is likely to come more freighted with symbolism than with actual vehicles. It is the latest in a series of megaprojects of the type much beloved by President Vladimir V. Putin.“It is showing the world the great things it can do,” said Ekaterina Schulmann, a political scientist at the Russian Presidential Academy of National Economy and Public Administration. “The government might not be able to provide safety, good health care and education, but it can provide big projects. If you cannot do bread, you can at least do circuses.”The bridge, nearly 12 miles long, carries even weightier symbolism because much of the world considers Russia’s 2014 seizure of Crimea illegitimate.“It signifies in the most visible way the connection between Crimea and Russia, that Crimea is part of Russia, connected to it by a solid bridge — that is as symbolic as it gets,” Ms. Schulmann said.Mr. Putin has taken a keen public interest in the project, not least because the annexation of the Black Sea peninsula buoyed his political fortunes domestically by resurrecting the image of Russia as a muscular power.In Crimea, billboards bearing his picture and a quotation from him lauding the “historic mission” of building the bridge loom over various potholed highways.When the project was first announced, however, it seemed that no Russian company wanted to touch it. There were extraordinary engineering challenges, and anything involving Crimea carried the risk of international sanctions. Even more daunting, perhaps, the ultimate project supervisor, known to be a demanding boss, was laying out a rigorous construction schedule.“The bridge itself is difficult, the scale is huge and it is tough to meet the deadline,” said Oleg Skvortsov, a bridge specialist who led a 50-member expert advisory council. “The deadline was set by the president, so nobody wanted to take the risk.”Into the breach stepped Arkady R. Rotenberg, a billionaire who has made a career of taking on Mr. Putin’s pet projects. A judo partner with the president since their youth in St. Petersburg, Mr. Rotenberg was also conveniently already under Western sanctions over Crimea because of his status as a member of Mr. Putin’s inner circle.There is some question whether Mr. Rotenberg volunteered or was pushed. The official version that he voiced himself is that no sacrifice is too great when serving the motherland, plus the bridge would stand as his crowning construction achievement.“It seems that this is the last big project for me, and I am doing it not to make money,” he told the daily Kommersant in a 2015 interview. “If you permit me to say this, it is my contribution to the country’s development.”The padding involved in huge government construction projects has often served as the conduit for the Kremlin to enrich its friends. The most notorious recent example was the development of the Black Sea resort city of Sochi for the 2014 Winter Olympics, with costs mushrooming to $51 billion, the most expensive Olympics ever.Boris Nemtsov, a politician and anticorruption crusader who was shot dead outside the Kremlin in 2015, had estimated that 15 percent of that Olympics budget went to the Rotenbergs, Arkady and his brother Boris. Arkady Rotenberg has long denied exploiting his friendship with the president for personal gain.By some reckoning, the Kerch bridge would be exceptional if it did not end in the welter of embezzlement scandals that plague most megaprojects. The cost of assembling a bridge across such difficult waters is so high and the deadline so tight that some analysts believe there is little leeway for pocketing construction funds.Spanning the Kerch Strait with a bridge has been proposed repeatedly for more than 100 years and even tried once before, but some combination of costs, war and Mother Nature doomed every previous effort.Not everyone is convinced the current effort will succeed, either.The strait runs between two mountain ranges, sending fierce winds howling through its narrow confines. The alluvial flow from various rivers has carpeted the seabed with 80 meters of fine silt. Ice floes crash through during the spring thaw — indeed, an ice floe sundered a German military bridge constructed during World War II — and the area is prone to earthquakes.For the new bridge to overcome those conditions, thousands upon thousands of pylons were driven into the seabed for stability. In addition, various parts were built using aerodynamics akin to an airplane wing, ensuring that the winds flow around the structure.“All this discussion about geology, ice, wind, waves — it would have been relevant 50 years ago,” said Mikhail Y. Blinkin, the director of a transportation policy institute at Moscow’s Higher School of Economics. “Now, it is just a question of cost. It just gets more expensive, that is all, because there have been huge advancements in technology.”On the other hand, he noted, it is an interesting project for Russia’s engineering and construction industry, which rarely faces such complicated tasks. The construction actually involves twin bridges — one for vehicles and a second due to open in 2019 for trains. Double arches rising about 115 feet above the water allow passage for ships.The huge costs involve not just the bridge, but also rail lines and highways linking to it, as well as a new highway across Crimea. The bridge has sucked up a significant portion of the budget for road and bridge construction throughout Russia, experts said, despite an official denial. The government plans to raise the gas tax in part to help pay for Crimea’s development.“The fact that some other bridges are not being built, what can I say,” said Mr. Skvortsov, the head of the advisory council. “We are short on bridges and roads. We do not have enough money, so there is a system of priorities.”Mr. Skvortsov confessed that he was once a skeptic, thinking like some others that a more modern, more efficient ferry service would be far cheaper and more practical. When finished, the bridge should be able to carry 40,000 vehicles and 94 trains a day. That is more cars in one day than the 38,000 the ferry transported during the entire month of December 2016, although 305,000 were transited that August, the peak tourist season.The Russian annexation of Crimea changed the calculations, however. Ukraine severed most transportation links, effectively isolating the peninsula. Kiev opposes the bridge.Some Crimeans consider the bridge the most tangible sign that Russia is improving their lot. “For more than 20 years everything was just collapsing, and now finally something is being built,” said Nadezhda Nesterenko, 39, a postal worker who also regularly monitors the construction.Some residents hope the bridge will wrench Crimea out of its provincial doldrums, even if, for the moment, the main point appears to be solidifying Russia’s claim to the peninsula.In ancient times, said Mr. Blinkin, the transportation expert, there were two philosophies behind road building. The Romans, he noted, extended highways everywhere to buttress their claim to their vast empire. By contrast, the Scythians around the upper reaches of the Black Sea avoided building roads to help keep enemies out.Russia adopted the latter attitude for centuries, Mr. Blinkin said. Leaders like Stalin shunned roads so that invaders could not come and Russians could not leave. Hence the Kerch bridge is a departure.“Politically, you had to build a physical connection,” he said. “If you build a bridge somewhere, if you build a highway somewhere, you declare that this is yours.”
Nationalist March Dominates Poland’s Independence Day Thousands of far-right nationalists marched through Poland’s capital, Warsaw, on Saturday, waving red-and-white Polish flags and carrying flares.The crowd at the march, which coincided with Poland’s Independence Day, commemorating the reinstatement of sovereignty at the end of World War I, far outnumbered those at official government events earlier in the day.Many participants held up Christian iconography.But others held banners of white supremacy, including one that read “White Europe of brotherly nations,” according to The Associated Press. Still others carried signs equating Islam with terrorism, waved signs denouncing same-sex marriage, and carried banners of the National Radical Camp, an anti-Semitic group founded before World War II on extreme nationalist values.The annual march has become something of a magnet for white supremacists and far-right groups from across Europe since it began in 2009.As Poland has moved further to the right, the rally has grown. The right-wing Law and Justice Party, which was voted into power in 2015, has moved the nation from liberal European cooperation to an inward-facing agenda.The slogan for Saturday’s march, “We want God,” comes from an old Polish nationalist song. President Trump quoted the phrase during his visit this year.The crowd at a counterdemonstration, with the slogan “For our freedom and yours,” was greatly outnumbered. Some participants held umbrellas that spelled out “Stop Facism” and others carried a banner that read “Rainbow is the new black.”
In Lahore, Pakistan, Smog Has Become a ‘Fifth Season’ LAHORE, Pakistan — For nearly two weeks, Lahore, Pakistan’s second-largest city, has been like one huge airport smokers’ lounge. But Abid Omar’s jaw still dropped on Wednesday, when he checked the air-quality monitor he had installed to track the city’s appalling pollution.It said that levels of the dangerous particulates known as PM2.5, small enough to penetrate deep into the lungs and enter the bloodstream, had reached 1,077 micrograms per cubic meter — more than 30 times what Pakistan’s government considers the safe limit.“You can see and smell the smoke all day; you can actually touch the filth,” said Amna Manan, a 26-year-old manager for a multinational company in Lahore, a city of 11 million. “Half the time, I’m scared to breathe in.”While Delhi’s air quality has generated headlines worldwide in recent days, experts say the air in Lahore rivals the Indian capital’s for toxicity. The problem is not limited to the city; in 2015, according to a World Health Organization estimate, almost 60,000 Pakistanis died from the high level of fine particles in the air, one of the world’s highest death tolls from air pollution.For years, Pakistani environmentalists have referred to November, when crop burning, higher emissions and cold weather combine to blanket Lahore and the rest of Punjab Province with acrid smog, as a “fifth season.” As in India, which Punjab borders, the problem seems to have been getting worse, and this month it has reached what many Pakistanis are calling a crisis point.Yet there is little official data on the sources of the pollution, or on just how bad the air actually is. In announcing a new antismog policy this month, the Punjab government admitted it had “scant” air quality data, saying only that the official safety limit for PM2.5 particles, 35 micrograms per cubic meter, was “exceeded frequently.”Naseem-ur-Rehman, a director at Punjab’s Environment Protection Department, admitted that the government had bought six air-quality monitors last year but never installed them — until last week, when a public outcry over the lack of data led to a scramble to set them up across Lahore. He said the department was “closely monitoring the situation,” but as of Thursday it was still not releasing air-quality numbers.“This is a crisis of data,” said Ahmad Rafay Alam, an environmental lawyer and activist in Lahore. He said six meters were insufficient for a city the size of Lahore, let alone for all of Punjab.In the absence of official information, some Pakistanis have taken matters into their own hands. One is Mr. Omar, who installed air monitors in Lahore, Islamabad, Peshawar and Karachi, where he lives. He has set up Twitter accounts to post the readings in real time.Mr. Omar was inspired by his experience living in Beijing, where the American Embassy changed the debate about pollution years ago by publishing air-quality readings on Twitter. The Chinese authorities were ultimately prompted to set up dozens of air monitoring stations in the capital and across China.“I realized that in order for air quality to become a national conversation in the way it had in China and to raise awareness about hazards and solutions, we needed the numbers to be out there,” said Mr. Omar, whose Pakistan Air Quality Initiative publishes data about air pollution and information about its effects on health.Mr. Omar’s Twitter updates have prompted many of Lahore’s middle- and upper-class residents to buy air purifiers and don face masks.Another activist, Aysha Raja, who runs a popular bookstore in Lahore, started a Facebook group called Citizens for Clean Air, to discuss possible solutions to the smog problem and put pressure on the government to address it.“The political will is missing on the government side,” Ms. Raja said. “We the public need to act as a pressure group, as a watchdog, to make sure that they do something effective.”The throat-burning, eye-stinging smoke plaguing Punjab has created problems beyond the obvious health concerns. On Tuesday alone, at least a dozen people were killed in road accidents linked to poor visibility in Lahore, according to the police. Major highways have been intermittently closed because of the visibility problems.Thirteen power plants that run on fuel oil have been shut down since last weekend, and power generation has been cut back at four others, leading to daily outages of more than 12 hours in many urban areas. At one Lahore hospital alone, more than 500 people have been arriving daily with complaints of respiratory difficulties and eye irritation.“Lahore looks like a dystopian wasteland right now, kind of like a scene from ‘Blade Runner,’” said Adil Ghazi, a business owner.The Punjab government says it has taken several emergency measures, including a ban on burning crops and solid waste. It says that more than 100 people have been arrested for crop burning and that hundreds of factories have been shut down for not having proper emission-control equipment. The Lahore traffic police say that they have collected more than $50,000 in fines in recent days from drivers whose vehicles did not meet emissions standards and that two centers have been set up for checking commercial vehicles for compliance.But environmentalists say a real solution would require much more serious measures: improving fuel quality, phasing out fuel-guzzling cars, introducing solar and other renewable sources of energy, planting trees on a large scale and improving public transportation to reduce the number of cars on the roads.“There is a lot of media interest in the story and public anger right now, so emergency measures are being taken, but a long-term solution doesn’t seem to be a priority,” Mr. Alam said. “The sense of urgency has to be sustained.”Most important, he said, the government needs to stop looking for others to blame, including India, whose crop fires Pakistani environmental officials have blamed for the worsening smog this year.“No doubt smoke from crop burning in India is a big problem, but let’s not pretend we don’t have our own part to play in this crisis,” Mr. Omar said. “The government needs to acknowledge the problem and create awareness.”
Case of Missing Lebanese Prime Minister Stirs Middle East Tensions BEIRUT, Lebanon — When the Lebanese prime minister Saad Hariri made a sudden trip abroad last week, it was taken at first to be a routine visit with his political patron, Saudi Arabia. But the next day, he unexpectedly announced his resignation by video from Riyadh, the Saudi capital.He has yet to return to Lebanon.On Friday, the Iranian-backed Hezbollah movement, part of his governing coalition at home, charged that the Saudis were holding him against his will, while the Saudis have said they were protecting him from an unspecified assassination plot.The Hariri case has become just one in a profusion of bewildering events — from Saudi Arabia’s arrest of princes and wealthy businessmen last weekend to ordering its citizens out of Lebanon on Thursday — that are escalating tensions in the Middle East and fueling anxiety about whether the region is on the verge of military conflict.The American secretary of state Rex W. Tillerson warned Friday “against any party, within or outside Lebanon, using Lebanon as a venue for proxy conflicts or in any manner contributing to instability in that country,” a message apparently aimed at Hezbollah, Saudi Arabia and Iran.Even before the events of the past week, analysts and officials in the region had been increasingly anxious about what they see as a volatile combination: an impulsive, youthful Saudi leader escalating threats to roll back growing Iranian influence, an equally impulsive Trump administration signaling broad agreement with Saudi policies, and increasingly pointed warnings from Israel that it may eventually fight another war with Hezbollah.Now analysts and diplomats are scrambling to figure out what the latest developments mean, whether they are connected and whether, as some analysts fear, they are part of a buildup to a regional war.Mr. Hariri, until he announced his resignation on Saturday, had shown no signs of planning to do so.Hours later, on Saturday evening, a missile fired from Yemen came close to Riyadh before being shot down. Saudi Arabia later blamed Iran and Hezbollah for the missile, suggesting that they had aided the Iran-aligned Houthi rebels in Yemen to fire it.Before the world had a chance to absorb this news, the ambitious and aggressive Saudi Arabian crown prince, Mohammed bin Salman, ordered the arrest of hundreds of Saudis — including 11 princes, government ministers and some of the kingdom’s most prominent businessmen — in what was either a crackdown on corruption, as Saudi officials put it, or a purge, as outside analysts have suggested.It then emerged that on a visit to Riyadh the week before, Jared Kushner, President Trump’s son-in-law and adviser, who has been sent on missions both to Israel and Saudi Arabia, had a previously undisclosed meeting with the crown prince, talking with him until the early morning hours. The White House has not announced what they discussed but officials privately said that they were meeting about the administration’s efforts to forge an Israeli-Palestinian peace deal.On Monday, Saudi officials said they considered the missile from Yemen an act of war by Iran and Lebanon, and on Thursday the kingdom rattled Lebanon by ordering its citizens to evacuate.No one expects Saudi Arabia, which is mired in a war in Yemen, to start another war itself. But Israel, which fought a war with Hezbollah in 2006, has expressed increasing concern about Hezbollah’s growing arsenal on its northern border.On Friday, Hezbollah’s leader, Hassan Nasrallah, said that Saudi Arabia had asked Israel to attack Lebanon, after essentially kidnapping Mr. Hariri.“I’m not talking here about analysis, but information,” he said. “The Saudis asked Israel to attack Lebanon.”He provided no evidence of his claim, but Western and regional analysts have also said that, given all the confusing and unexpected events and unpredictable players, they could not entirely rule out such a scenario.Israeli officials, however, have been publicly predicting another war with Hezbollah while also vowing to do all they can to postpone it.“There are now those in the region who would like Israel to go to war with Hezbollah and fight a Saudi war to the last Israeli,” said Ofer Zalzberg, a Jerusalem-based analyst for International Crisis Group. “There is no interest in that here.”Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu has long considered Iran to be Israel’s foremost enemy, a potential nuclear threat as well as a strategic adversary seeking to convert postwar Syria into a staging ground for attacks against Israel or into a corridor to transfer missiles and other weapons to Hezbollah in Lebanon.So Saudi Arabia’s stepped-up efforts to oppose Iranian influence in Lebanon drew measured applause in Jerusalem. But many Israelis fear that the aggressive actions by the Saudi crown prince could drag Israel into a war that it does not want.Daniel Shapiro, a former United States ambassador to Israel, said that Israel and Saudi Arabia were pursuing similar goals at sharply different speeds and levels of proficiency.“I’m not sure they’re aligned tactically,” he said in an interview. Prince Mohammed, he added, “seems very impatient to actually spark the confrontation.”There are no signs of war preparations in Israel. The country is not mobilizing troops on its northern border or calling up reservists, and Mr. Netanyahu has given no indication that he sees a conflict as imminent.Moreover, Israel’s war planners predict that the next war with Hezbollah may be catastrophic, particularly if it lasts more than a few days. Hezbollah now has more than 120,000 rockets and missiles, Israel estimates, enough to overwhelm Israeli missile defenses.Many of them are long-range and accurate enough to bring down Tel Aviv high-rises, sink offshore gas platforms, knock out Ben-Gurion Airport or level landmark buildings across Israel.Nor is Hezbollah necessarily hankering for battle with Israel, according to analysts who study the militant group closely. It is still fighting in Syria, where it has been backing the government of President Bashar al-Assad, and it is being drained by medical costs for wounded fighters and survivor benefits for the families of those killed, said Giora Eiland, a retired Israeli major general and former head of the country’s National Security Council.“Hezbollah as an organization is in a very deep economic crisis today,” Mr. Eiland said. “But at the same time, the weaker they are, the more dependent they are on Iranian assistance — so they might have to comply with Iran’s instructions.”But there have long been fears that now that the Syrian war — in which Hezbollah played a decisive role, gaining new influence, power and weapons — is almost over, Hezbollah’s enemies might seek to cut it down to size.Mr. Nasrallah, the Hezbollah leader, implied Friday that its fight in Syria was nearly finished. If Saudi Arabia’s goal was to force Hezbollah to leave Syria, he said: “No problem. Our goal there has been achieved. It’s almost over anyway.”World leaders have sought to tamp down tensions.President Emmanuel Macron of France left Saudi Arabia on Friday after a brief, last-minute meeting with the crown prince.During the unexpected two-hour visit on Thursday, Mr. Macron “reiterated the importance France attaches to Lebanon’s stability, security, sovereignty and integrity,” his office said. He also discussed “the situation in Lebanon following the resignation of Prime Minister Hariri,” his office said, but provided no further details.A group of countries and organizations interested in Lebanon’s stability met Friday with the Lebanese president, Michel Aoun, and issued a statement expressing “concern regarding the situation and prevailing uncertainty in Lebanon” and calling for Lebanon to be “shielded from tensions in the region.”The members of the group, the International Support Group for Lebanon — including the United Nations, Britain, China, France, Germany, Italy, Russia and the United States, as well as the European Union and the Arab League — are not all on the same side of the issues at stake so the statement seemed to reflect broad international concern.At a news conference in Dubai, the United Arab Emirates, before the meeting, Mr. Macron said he did not share Saudi Arabia’s “very harsh opinions” of Iran.Analysts say a new war in the region is unlikely but some have warned that the increased tensions could provoke an economic crisis or even start a war accidentally. Miscalculations have started wars before, as in the 2006 war between Israel and Hezbollah.Experts caution that Israel is often only a mistake or two from being drawn into combat.“It’s a dangerous situation now,” said Amos Harel, the military reporter for Haaretz, the Israeli newspaper. “It only takes one provocation, another reaction, and it can get all of a sudden completely out of control. And when you add the Saudis, who evidently want to attack Iran and are looking for action, it gets even more complicated.”
U.S. and Somali Strikes on Shabab Said to Kill Nearly 100 Militants MOGADISHU, Somalia — Nearly 100 members of the Shabab, the Qaeda-linked insurgent group in Somalia, were killed in separate strikes this week, according to Somali and American officials.More than a dozen militants were killed in a United States airstrike 20 miles north of the capital of Mogadishu, according to Samantha Reho, a spokeswoman with the United States Africa Command. The Friday strike was carried out in coordination with the Somali government, she said in an email.It was the 23rd American airstrike in the country this year, and the second in 24 hours. On Thursday, airstrikes killed “several militants” in the Bay region, about 100 miles west of Mogadishu, according to a statement from the Africa Command.Separately, the Somali National Intelligence and Security Agency killed 81 Shabab fighters earlier this week in Jilib, in southern Somalia, government officials said on Saturday.The state security forces “planted mines in a militant bomb-making site in Jilib district,” Abdirahman Omar Osman, the Minister of Information, said by telephone.Jilib is a Shabab stronghold about 75 miles north of the port city of Kismayo, where militants attacked a Somali army base in September.Mr. Osman claimed the attack “destroyed all explosive materials” and “technical vehicles” Shabab had stored at the site. He declined to give further details of the attack, citing a pending investigation.Andalus radio, the broadcast arm of the Shabab, denied there was any attack on Jilib. The group’s spokesman told the radio station that no fighters had been killed.Neither claim could be independently verified, and both the government and the Shabab have been known to exaggerate or minimize casualty claims for propaganda purposes.In October, a truck bomb at a busy intersection in Mogadishu killed 358 people; the Shabab were blamed for the attack.The group also claimed responsibility for a hotel attack that killed 23 people at the end of October.Last Friday, United States forces carried out airstrikes against an Islamic State-affiliated Shabab splinter group, operating in the central Somali region of Puntland. It was the first United States strike against the Islamic State in the country.The United States Mission in Somalia the next day directed nonessential personnel to leave Mogadishu indefinitely, citing a specific threat against Americans in the city.
Iran Sent Them to Syria. Now Afghan Fighters Are a Worry at Home. YAKAWLANG, Afghanistan — Iran has trained and deployed thousands of Shiite Afghans as shock troops in Syria’s sectarian war. Members of the Afghan unit, the Fatemiyoun Division, wear a shoulder patch recounting words of praise from Iran’s supreme leader as a badge of honor.What those fighters might do when they come home is now very much on the minds of officials who fear that Afghanistan may become the next great sectarian battleground between Iran, as the declared guardian of Shiites, and Saudi Arabia, long the sponsor of conservative Sunni doctrine around the world.“This is quite dangerous: What happens to this Fatemiyoun force when the war in Syria is over?” said Rahmatullah Nabil, a former Afghan intelligence chief. “The fear is that rivalry in the region, between Iran and Saudi, will shift to Afghanistan. And I think that clash is already shifting here.”There is reason for worry. First, there’s a history: The factional divisions that drove Afghanistan’s devastating civil war in the 1990s were seized on by foreign powers who were seeking proxies. And there’s a new concern: A stark increase in attacks against Afghanistan’s Shiite minority, mostly by Sunni extremists loyal to the Islamic State, is already providing Iran a pretext to increase its meddling in the country.The attacks have received wide coverage in the Iranian news media. And one Fatemiyoun fighter who returned about three months ago from Syria said the violence against Afghan Shiites was a frequent topic raised by their commanders in the Islamic Revolutionary Guards Corps.The Afghan fighter had returned to his home in Yakawlang, a village in Bamian Province where the Taliban massacred more than 300 Shiites in 2001. Every year, hundreds of residents kneel on the dirt in a hilltop cemetery and beat their chests in mourning for their loved ones, their names listed on a metal sign worn out by time and covered in rust.“The Guards commanders were saying that, if it comes to it, we will make Bamian into a base for you, a base for Fatemiyoun,” said the returning fighter, who like others interviewed for this article spoke on the condition of anonymity to avoid being singled out for attack.“There was always talk about that; the commander would say that one day you will go defend in your own country,” said another fighter, who had lived in Iran for 20 years as a refugee before he joined to go to Syria. He said he enlisted after he saw a video of Islamic State fighters “playing football with a chopped head.” His relatives said he joined after a romantic heartbreak.Iran has long relied more on soft power than armed might in Afghanistan, playing up its cultural, religious and economic influence in western Afghan districts near the border. And though Iran resents the presence of the United States military on its border, it has mostly supported the American-backed administration in Kabul, choosing stability over chaos.But as the war in Afghanistan has stretched late into a second decade, and with the stability of the central government in question, Iran has begun hedging its bets, American and Afghan officials say. That has extended to improving its ties with the Taliban, a group it had long seen as an ideological enemy.Afghan officials acknowledge that they have not yet seen evidence that Iran was actively rallying Fatemiyoun veterans. But the officials are deeply concerned that the groundwork is being laid. And statements by Iran’s military leaders, as well as their use of Afghan fighters in other conflicts, suggests that Iran sees the force as an asset in future engagements.Brig. Gen. Ismail Qaani, the deputy commander of the Quds force within the Revolutionary Guards, recently told a memorial for Afghan fighters that Syria was just a temporary goal in a larger vision.“Fatemiyoun is a new culture — a collection of brave men who do not see boundaries and borders in defending Islamic values,” General Qaani said, as quoted in the local Iranian media.The war in Yemen is one indication of how Afghans are already being drawn deeper into the Iranian-Saudi rivalry, on both sides. Not only did Iran send smaller units of the Fatemiyoun to cross Syrian borders and fight in Yemen, but at least 1,000 Sunni Afghan refugees from camps in Pakistan have also been recruited to fight on Saudi Arabia’s behalf in Yemen, according to three senior Afghan officials.The core of what is now the Fatemiyoun Division included fighters from Shiite militias that had Iranian support during the Afghan civil war. Some even went to Iraq to fight on behalf of Iran against Saddam Hussein, or to Lebanon to oppose the Israeli invasion.Many of the Afghan fighters, mostly recruited from among Afghan refugees or illegal laborers in Iran, join for the salary of about $600 a month, and for the promise of Iranian residency paperwork after a deployment to Syria, which usually lasts three months. But they soon realize that the benefits are designed as a hook: The paperwork needs to be validated every year, and that requires enlisting again.“Here, I am scared — of the government, of Daesh,” said one former Fatemiyoun fighter who has returned to Kabul, using another name for the Islamic State. “And if I don’t go back to Syria, my Iranian passport will lose validity.”Afghan officials say the Iranian police have intensified a crackdown on illegal Afghan immigrants, arresting as many as 200 a day. When they arrive at deportation centers, Iranian military officers are there to offer another option.“They said: ‘You had come from Afghanistan to work, to make money. We give you two options: You go to Syria, and we pay you money. Or you go back to your country,’” said the former fighter in Yakawlang, who asked to be identified only as Jawed. He was detained while working at an Iranian construction site and taken to a deportation center where, out of 200 Afghan detainees, he became one of about 60 who chose to serve in Syria. After returning to Afghanistan, he joined the Afghan Army.Extensive ideological indoctrination is a central part of their service. Recruits are told the war in Syria is a defense of some of the holiest shrines of the Shiite faith from attack by the Islamic State — a group their recruiters then describe as a creation of the United States to destabilize the Middle East.“My intention was Syria, to defend the shrine,” said the Afghan fighter who returned to his home in Yakawlang, and who wanted to be identified only by the name Abas.Abas described his fellow Afghan fighters being pitched into battles that resembled the brutality of the Afghan civil war.“You know how the Afghan boys fight — they wouldn’t even leave a chicken behind,” he said. “A unit leader would say, ‘We will capture this hill. What is in it for us? We want this much money.’ Three hundred people would go, 30 would come back.”Other fighters described similarly heavy casualties. One said 15 of his comrades were killed on the first night they arrived at the front lines. And Jawed said there was a day when his unit lost 45 men.“They tell you are defending the shrine of Zainab, and that is true: We believe in defending our religion and faith,” Jawed said. “But when you get there, you realize you have been brought to the slaughterhouse of a war of major powers.”
30 Vaquita Porpoises Are Left. One Died in a Rescue Mission. On a windy afternoon last weekend, Cynthia Smith was on a boat in the Gulf of California, searching for one of the rarest marine mammals in the world.Never before had a vaquita porpoise been successfully captured and cared for by humans. But Dr. Smith, a veterinarian with a group known as Vaquita CPR, knew that the porpoises — whose black-rimmed eyes and dark noses have earned them the moniker “panda of the sea” — were likely to disappear without human intervention. Scientists estimate there are fewer than 30 vaquitas left in the wild. It was a last resort.When Dr. Smith and her team spotted a pair of porpoises, and managed to haul in the female, they were hopeful: the vaquita was calm, her vital signs promising. But soon after they moved her into a sea pen she began swimming too rapidly, then abruptly slowed down. By the time the veterinarians released the vaquita back into the wild, it was too late. “She was no longer breathing,” Dr. Smith said. “We just couldn’t bring her back.”In the past five years, the vaquita population — which lives in only a sliver of water between Mexico’s mainland and Baja California — has plummeted by 90 percent. Humans are to blame, but they are not even hunting for the vaquitas themselves.The animals, the world’s smallest porpoises, get tangled and drown in nets set illegally to catch another endangered species, a fish called the totoaba. The poachers’ bounty is an organ from the totoaba called the swim bladder, which is considered a delicacy and status symbol in China and can sell for up to $50,000 on the black market. It has been dubbed “aquatic cocaine.”Mexico banned totoaba fishing in 1993, but it was only in 2015 — when vaquita numbers dwindled to about 100 — that the government also banned most gill nets, including those used for catching shrimp and other kinds of fish. The gill nets catch the totoaba, and also trap the vaquitas.Fishermen are still allowed to use a different type of net, intended for catching corvina fish, that is not supposed to pose a threat to the vaquitas. But because the corvina and totoaba fishing seasons overlap, fishermen can hide the totoaba nets beneath the corvina nets on their boats, said Lorenzo Rojas-Bracho, the director of Vaquita CPR. “You can use a corvina as a cover-up, and that’s what happened,” he said.Most of the region’s fishermen, who have been out of work since the ban, poach totoaba swim bladders, which fetch $3,000 to $10,000 per kilogram, said Andrea Crosta, the director of a group that investigates the totoaba trade. An equivalent catch of shrimp might earn a fisherman $200 at best.“If you’re out here on the water, you’re not risking jail time to catch shrimp,” said Dave Bader, a spokesman for Vaquita CPR.After the death of the captured vaquita, the scientists agreed to shut down the program. “The evidence today is vaquita are not good candidates for being protected in this way,” Dr. Smith said. “It’s heartbreaking.”The scientists had hoped to keep the animals in captivity temporarily, and possibly even breed them, until gill nets were eliminated from their habitat. While any wild animal is expected to experience some stress when captured, the group had hoped the vaquita could cope with being handled. (Last month, the scientists released a vaquita calf they had pulled from the waters when they determined it was too young to be separated from its mother.)Other conservationists had been critical of the plan. “I was telling them that this was going to happen, you’re going to stress out the animals,” said Paul Watson, the founder of the Sea Shepherd conservation group, which also works to protect vaquitas. “They are very elusive, they are very shy; you’re going to kill one of them.”Mr. Crosta said that while he admired the work of the biologists, they couldn’t possibly solve a problem “that starts in San Felipe and ends in a shop in China.” The fate of the vaquita, he said, was “entirely in the hands of law enforcement.”In the past two years, Sea Shepherd and local groups have recovered more than 25,000 yards of gill nets from the gulf, weighing about 50 tons. Now that efforts to capture the vaquitas have failed, conservationists say hauling in the poachers’ nets is the best bet to save the species from extinction.The Mexican government, conservationists say, also needs to crack down on illegal fishing, while providing sustainable alternatives for the community. Financial compensation from the government often never makes it into the hands of the fishermen, diverted by corruption, Mr. Crosta said.Local economies are an important consideration in conservation biology, Dr. Rojas-Bracho said. “You cannot save vaquita, and drive fishers to extinction.”
Commemorating End of World War I, With Poppies and a Pause With bright red poppies and moments of silence, people across the world on Saturday commemorated World War I’s end 99 years ago, gathering for Armistice Day events that honored the millions who died in the conflict and those who have perished in wars since.In Britain, the country paused for two minutes of silence that began at 11 a.m., the moment on Nov. 11, 1918 that World War I officially ended. The bustle of city life in London came to a halt as Big Ben chimed the hour. The clock had been silenced in August for repair, and only this week began tolling again.Thousands of wooden crosses adorned with poppies and the names of the dead were planted at the Field of Remembrance at Westminster Abbey in London.On Sunday, Britain’s royal family will attend an annual Remembrance Sunday event at the memorial Cenotaph, where Prince Charles, rather than his mother, will lay the head of state’s wreath. It will be the first time he has taken her place at the event while Queen Elizabeth is in the country.In France, President Emmanuel Macron led commemoration events on the Champs-Élysées in a light rain. He laid a wreath at the statue of Prime Minister Georges Clemenceau, who was at the center of peace efforts at the time.Former French Presidents Nicolas Sarkozy and François Hollande were in attendance as Mr. Macron inspected the troops and laid a wreath at the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier at the Arc de Triomphe.Sydney’s Opera House was illuminated with a display of red poppies to commemorate the day.Poland, which regained sovereignty at the end of World War I, held its Independence Day on Saturday. European Council President Donald Tusk joined Polish leaders in his home country for a ceremony in Warsaw.
A Shadow Delegation Stalks the Official U.S. Team at Climate Talks BONN, Germany — The office of the official American delegation at the international climate talks here is almost always closed. A sign taped to the door informs the curious that entry is for authorized staff members only.But there’s another group of Americans who are happy to be found. They are gathered in a nearly 27,000-square-foot inflatable tent adorned with American flags and red, white and blue signs proclaiming that states, cities and businesses are “still in” the Paris agreement, despite President Trump’s vow to leave it.The alternate American pavilion, with its free espresso truck, tins of themed M&M’s and wireless internet that tells new users “the U.S. has not gone dark on climate action,” has rapidly become a hub of activity at the United Nations global warming negotiations taking place this week. On Saturday, a line of people waited in the rain to hear Michael R. Bloomberg, the former mayor of New York, Gov. Jerry Brown of California and a handful of United States senators, all Democrats, declare that much of America remains committed to reducing planet-warming carbon dioxide emissions.“We’re in,” said Mr. Bloomberg, who put more than $1 million toward funding the pavilion, according to his office. “Just because the federal government has chosen not to participate,” he added in an interview, “the American public represented by its elected officials at other levels, by corporations, by universities, we understand that there’s a problem and we have to help solve that problem if we’re going to have a future in this world.”The dueling American delegations here mirror a larger division within the United States over climate change. Mr. Trump’s decision in June to withdraw from the Paris agreement was popular with his supporters. On Thursday, the State Department and the Interior Department sent high-level political officials to address a conference in Texas sponsored by the Heartland Institute, which rejects the scientific consensus that climate change is occurring and primarily caused by human emissions. Scott Pruitt, the administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency, sent a video message of support.“We have tremendous natural resources, from coal to natural gas to oil, to generate electricity in a very cost-effective way,” Mr. Pruitt told the conference. “We should celebrate that and be good stewards.”Yet seven in 10 Americans believe global warming is occurring, according to a Yale University survey, and more than 60 percent say they are at least “somewhat worried” about its effects.“There’s a debate in the United States between the denialists who pooh-pooh any thought about climate change and the catastrophic dangers it portends, and those who agree with the scientific academies of every country in the world that we’re facing an existential threat and we have to do something about it,” Governor Brown said Saturday.He and Mr. Bloomberg announced that the states, cities and businesses that had pledged to abide by the Paris accord were on track to meet the Obama administration pledge to cut emissions at least 26 percent below 2005 levels by 2025.Former Vice President Al Gore, a longtime champion of strong action on climate change, said Mr. Trump represented a minority view on the subject.“President Trump does not speak for the country as a whole on the climate issue,” Mr. Gore said. “Of course he’s our president, of course he has the authority that any president has. But on this issue he is very much out of sync with the country as a whole.”According to a new report from America’s Pledge, a group led by Mr. Bloomberg and Mr. Brown, if the institutions working to meet the Obama targets were a separate country, they would be the third-largest economy in the world after the United States and China. Even as the Trump administration plans to roll back federal climate change policies like the Clean Power Plan, the study found, falling clean technology prices, the low price of natural gas and local carbon-cutting efforts have already cut domestic greenhouse gas emissions by 11.5 percent between 2005 and 2015.The official American negotiating team for now is laying low. Career State Department officials are managing the technical negotiations, speaking up on issues like demanding more transparency from developing countries on their progress cutting emissions.The Trump administration’s true debut will come Monday when a team from the White House hosts a forum promoting fossil fuels and nuclear energy. Speakers will include executives from Peabody Energy, a coal company; NuScale Power, a nuclear engineering firm; and Tellurian, a liquefied natural gas exporter.Christiana Figueres, a former United Nations climate envoy who spent her morning with the shadow American delegation, said the Trump administration was sending the wrong message to a conference aimed at decarbonizing the global economy.“Coal is to be thanked for all of its hard work and it now deserves to be retired. It is of retirement age and needs to be put in the retirement home,” Ms. Figueres said.Jim Lakely, a spokesman for the Heartland Institute, said he hoped United Nations climate delegates would also hear his group’s message. “Carbon dioxide is not a pollutant and it is not the driver of global warming,” he said. “So there is no moral case for restricting the use of fossil fuels, especially because that is vital to raising the quality and length of life of the world’s poorest people.”Diplomats from other countries said they were glad to see governors, mayors and other Americans still committed to the Paris agreement making their presence felt. But they also said they weren’t sure which voice of American policy they should believe.“Unfortunately there’s no connect between those processes,” said Dr. Ian Fry, lead negotiator for Tuvalu, a South Pacific island threatened by rising seas. “It’s just two worlds, unfortunately.”
Trump Says Putin ‘Means It’ About Not Meddling DANANG, Vietnam — President Trump said on Saturday that he believed President Vladimir V. Putin was sincere in his denials of interference in the 2016 presidential elections, calling questions about Moscow’s meddling a politically motivated “hit job” that was hindering cooperation with Russia on life-or-death issues.Speaking after meeting privately with Mr. Putin on the sideline of the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation summit meeting in Danang, Vietnam, Mr. Trump said that he had again asked whether Russia had meddled in the contest, but that the continued focus on the issue was insulting to Mr. Putin.Mr. Trump said it was time to move past the issue so that the United States and Russia could cooperate on confronting the nuclear threat from North Korea, solving the Syrian civil war and working together on Ukraine.“He said he didn’t meddle — I asked him again,” Mr. Trump told reporters traveling with him aboard Air Force One as he flew to Hanoi for more meetings. “You can only ask so many times. I just asked him again. He said he absolutely did not meddle in our election. He did not do what they are saying he did.”Mr. Trump did not answer a direct question about whether he believed Mr. Putin’s denials, but his account of the conversation indicated he was far more inclined to accept the Russian president’s assertions than those of his own intelligence agencies, which have concluded that Mr. Putin directed an elaborate effort to interfere in the vote. The C.I.A., the National Security Agency, the F.B.I. and the Office of the Director of National Intelligence all determined that Russia meddled in the election.“Every time he sees me he says, ‘I didn’t do that,’ and I really believe that when he tells me that, he means it,” Mr. Trump said of Mr. Putin. “I think he is very insulted by it, which is not a good thing for our country.”His remarks came as the investigation into the Trump campaign’s ties to Russia deepened, with disclosures over the past two weeks showing that there were more contacts between Trump campaign advisers and Russians than were previously known, and that senior campaign officials were aware of them.On Sunday, Mr. Trump seemed to walk his comments back a bit, saying that he did not dispute the assessment of the nation’s key intelligence agencies that Russia had intervened in the 2016 presidential election.“As to whether I believe it or not, I’m with our agencies, especially as currently constituted with their leadership,” Mr. Trump said at a news conference in Hanoi alongside Vietnam’s president, Tran Dai Quang. “I believe in our agencies. I’ve worked with them very strongly.”Mr. Trump’s earlier comments inspired immediate ridicule from Democratic lawmakers, including Representative Adam B. Schiff of California, the top Democrat on the House Intelligence Committee, which is investigating Russian interference in the election.“You know who else is insulted by it, Mr. President? The American people,” Mr. Schiff said on Twitter. “You believe a foreign adversary over your own intelligence agencies.”Representative Ted Lieu, another California Democrat, called Mr. Trump “dumb as a rock.” Mr. Lieu wrote on Twitter that both he and Mr. Trump had seen classified information on Russia’s interference in the election, and that Mr. Trump’s comments were lies.“Trump knows the Kremlin hacked America last year,” Mr. Lieu said.Senator John McCain of Arizona, chairman of the Senate Armed Services Committee, said in response to Mr. Trump’s statements, “There’s nothing ‘America First’ about taking the word of a K.G.B. colonel over that of the American intelligence community.”Mr. Trump angrily dismissed the criticism in a tweet on Sunday morning.“When will all the haters and fools out there realize that having a good relationship with Russia is a good thing, not a bad thing,” he wrote, adding that critics were “playing politics — bad for our country.”“I want to solve North Korea, Syria, Ukraine, terrorism,” he added, “and Russia can greatly help!”Mr. Trump also heaped disdain on the former leaders of three American intelligence agencies — John O. Brennan, the former C.I.A. director; James R. Clapper Jr., the former director of national intelligence; and James B. Comey, the F.B.I. director he fired this year — appearing to suggest that they were less trustworthy than Mr. Putin.“I mean, give me a break — they’re political hacks,” Mr. Trump said. “You have Brennan, you have Clapper, and you have Comey. Comey’s proven now to be a liar, and he’s proven to be a leaker, so you look at that. And you have President Putin very strongly, vehemently says he had nothing to do with that.”The Central Intelligence Agency on Saturday declined to comment on the remarks by President Trump about Russian interference in the election.Last week, in response to questions about the views of the director, Mike Pompeo, on the intelligence assessment, the C.I.A. said “the director stands by, and has always stood by, the January 2017 Intelligence Community Assessment.”But since taking over the agency after being appointed by Mr. Trump, Mr. Pompeo has, at times, sought to downplay the Russian interference in the election. At a public appearance last month, he said that the intelligence assessment had found that Russia’s interference did not affect the outcome of the election.In fact, the assessment stated that it did not address whether Russia had any impact on vote’s outcome. “We did not make an assessment of the impact that Russian activities had on the outcome of the 2016 election,” the assessment said.The president said lingering questions about whether his campaign aides had worked with Russia to sway the election were souring Washington’s relationship with Moscow on a host of vital security issues.“Having a good relationship with Russia is a great, great thing,” Mr. Trump said. “This artificial Democratic hit job gets in the way, and that’s a shame, because people will die.”The allegations of collusion are the subject of an investigation by the special counsel Robert S. Mueller III, as well as multiple congressional inquiries.Mr. Trump’s comments about the Russian president and his warning about deteriorating Moscow ties came after the close of the APEC conference in Danang, where the White House steered clear of a formal meeting between the two men and made a point of announcing on Friday that one would not occur.Reporters who travel with Mr. Trump were barred from covering his activities for most of Saturday, leaving them in the dark about his informal interactions. But video showed him shaking hands with Mr. Putin on Friday at a gala dinner and chatting with him on Saturday before and after a group photograph of the APEC leaders.The Kremlin released a statement saying that the leaders had met and struck an agreement on Syria, but the White House did not immediately confirm the information. Speaking with reporters later, Mr. Trump said he had two or three brief conversations with Mr. Putin, mostly about Syria.The talks were described in a joint statement by United States and Russia that reaffirmed previous commitments to defeat the Islamic State and to untangle conflicts between their forces on the Syrian battlefield.It said that Mr. Trump believed he had “a good meeting” with Mr. Putin on common efforts that, once in place, would “save thousands of lives.”Mr. Trump’s description of the exchange about election meddling was striking because it suggested that he concurred with Mr. Putin’s oft-stated contention that the issue was a contrived story that had been allowed to become a detriment to both the United States and Russia.“This is really an artificial barrier that’s put in front of us for solving problems with Russia,” Mr. Trump said of Mr. Putin. “He says that very strongly; he really seems to be insulted by it, and he says he didn’t do it.”Mr. Trump’s reaction recalled the first face-to-face talk between the two presidents, on the sideline of the Group of 20 summit meeting in July in Hamburg, Germany, during which Mr. Trump broached the subject of Russia’s election meddling but threatened no consequences.When Mr. Putin denied meddling, American officials said at the time, Mr. Trump said the two countries must agree to disagree on the issue and move on to other topics where they could work together.Russian officials provided an alternative account, asserting at the time that Mr. Trump had accepted Mr. Putin’s denial of the election interference and even said that some in the United States were “exaggerating” Moscow’s role without proof.That seemed to have been Mr. Trump’s message on Saturday, when he repeatedly blamed Democrats for allegedly harming his efforts to improve relations with Russia by pushing false charges.“I call it the artificial Democrat barrier that gets in the way,” Mr. Trump said. “Which is a shame.”Mr. Putin similarly brushed off recent revelations that Russians had contacts with Mr. Trump’s campaign team — including an aide who had met with a woman described as Mr. Putin’s niece — as a “domestic political struggle” in the United States.“I think that everything connected with the so-called Russian dossier in the United States is a manifestation of a continuing domestic political struggle,” Mr. Putin said after the summit meeting, in remarks carried by Russian news media.“I learned only yesterday about some sort of meeting of my relatives with representatives of the administration or official figures,” Mr. Putin said. He said his press secretary, Dmitry Peskov, had told him about the reports.“I know absolutely nothing about this — absolutely nothing,” Mr. Putin said. “It seems like nonsense.”He told reporters in Danang, “It’s important that we find an opportunity, with our teams, to sit down at the level of presidents and talk through our complex relations.” He added: “Our relations are still in crisis. Russia is ready to turn the page and move on.”Mr. Putin said a scheduling conflict and an unspecified issue with protocol had gotten in the way of a more substantive meeting with Mr. Trump. “This was connected to Mr. Trump’s schedule, and my schedule, and certain formalities with protocol that our teams, unfortunately, didn’t resolve. Well, they will be punished,” he said.“Still, nothing terrible happened,” Mr. Putin added. “We spoke in the course of today’s gathering; we had a conversation.”Mr. Putin said that Mr. Trump behaved at meetings “with the highest level of good will and correctness,” adding, “He is a cultured person, and comfortable discussing matters related to work.”
Trump to Asia: Unite on North Korea, but Go It Alone on Trade DANANG, Vietnam — President Trump has issued two starkly contradictory calls on his trip to Asia this past week: The nations of the world must rally behind the United States to confront the nuclear threat from North Korea, but they should expect America to go its own way on trade.Reconciling those messages will be hard, and it may determine the near-term fate of the United States as a Pacific power.In South Korea on Wednesday, Mr. Trump put on the mantle of a superpower leader. In a speech that crackled with the urgency of a Cold War manifesto, he told lawmakers there, “It is our responsibility and our duty to confront this danger together, because the longer we wait, the greater the danger grows, and the fewer the options become.”Two days later, in the Vietnamese resort city of Danang, where American troops once came ashore to fight Communist insurgents, Mr. Trump reverted to the protectionist themes of his presidential campaign. “There is no place like home,” he told Pacific Rim leaders, warning them that the United States would never again sign a regionwide trade agreement.At one level, the contradictory messages illustrate Mr. Trump’s transactional approach to statecraft — one that prizes individual victories over a unified theory of America’s role in the world. That pragmatism is also reflected in his singular brand of leader-to-leader diplomacy.From Tokyo to Beijing, Mr. Trump has played the dealmaker with foreign leaders, flattering them personally even as his administration pushes hard-edge views on economic issues.But the contradictions also reflect a more fundamental disarray in the presidency’s policy toward Asia. It seems caught between the geopolitical realism of Mr. Trump’s diplomats and the economic nationalism of his political aides.These competing impulses have left allies and adversaries alike confused about America’s motives and staying power. Over time, several experts said, the balancing act will be impossible to maintain.Already with China, Mr. Trump has had to soft-pedal his ambitious trade agenda in an uphill effort to persuade President Xi Jinping to do more to press the neighboring North Korean government.With the smaller nations of Southeast Asia, Mr. Trump may feel less pressure to compromise. His comments in Vietnam lacked the solicitous tone he had used in China and Japan, veering into the defiant populism he used on the campaign trail. Yet his go-it-alone message could drive these countries further into the orbit of China, which has moved at this meeting of Pacific leaders to fill the vacuum left by the United States.“The region is looking for a robust American presence, not just on security but on trade,” said John Delury, an associate professor of Chinese studies at Yonsei University in Seoul, the South Korean capital. “For Trump to come with an ‘America First’ agenda leaves Asian leaders in the lurch.”Jeffrey A. Bader, a former China adviser to President Barack Obama, said Mr. Trump’s words would make Asian leaders “feel that the U.S. is less of a factor in the region.”“They’re always looking for hedges against local bullies, like China,” he added, “and the U.S. is much less of a hedge.”Indeed, Mr. Trump was the odd man out at this meeting of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation forum. The other 20 leaders formally endorsed the idea of a liberal trade regime, arbitrated by the World Trade Organization, and condemned moves to erect new barriers.“We recognize the work of the W.T.O. in ensuring international trade is rules based, free, open, fair, transparent, predictable and inclusive,” the members wrote in their joint statement released on Saturday, using language that American negotiators had reportedly resisted.On Friday, Mr. Trump railed against the W.T.O., accusing it of treating the United States unfairly. Rather than uphold principles of free trade, he said, it contributed to a systematic exploitation of Americans, in which “jobs, factories and industries were stripped out of the United States.”While Mr. Trump vowed never to sign a regional trade deal like the Trans-Pacific Partnership, from which he withdrew the United States early in his presidency, the remaining 11 members of that deal agreed on Saturday to press on with it, creating a “broader free-trade area” across Asia that will pointedly exclude the United States.As the Pacific leaders gathered here on Saturday, much of the attention focused on whether Mr. Trump would meet with President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia.The White House steered clear of a formal meeting, though the two men conferred briefly. The United States and Russia later issued a joint statement on Syria that reaffirmed previous commitments to defeat the Islamic State and to untangle conflicts between their respective forces on the Syrian battlefield.Until Saturday evening, when Mr. Trump unloaded to reporters on Air Force One about Mr. Putin and the investigations into Russian election meddling, this trip had been a surprisingly disciplined exercise for the president.With a jam-packed schedule, he had tweeted sparingly and kept generally on message. The White House cut down on unscripted moments, limiting media access and acquiescing to the Chinese reluctance to allow questions after his joint statements with Mr. Xi.But Mr. Trump let loose on Sunday morning, when he fired back at North Korea’s leader, Kim Jong-un, after North Korean state media disparaged him as a “lunatic old man.”“Why would Kim Jong-un insult me by calling me ‘old,’” Mr. Trump said on Twitter, “when I would NEVER call him ‘short and fat?’ Oh well, I try so hard to be his friend.”Mr. Trump had avoided ridiculing Mr. Kim personally during this trip, though he listed a catalog of North Korea human rights abuses during a speech in Seoul, which drew the angry response from North Korea.At a news conference on Sunday, Mr. Trump also said that he was open to being friends with Mr. Kim. “Strange things happen in life,” he said on a podium next to Vietnam’s president, Tran Dai Quang. “It’s certainly a possibility. If that did happen, it would be a good thing for — I can tell you — for North Korea, but it would also be good for lots of other places, and it would be good for the world.”Throughout the trip, his face-to-face meetings with leaders have been harmonious — even leaders, like President Moon Jae-in of South Korea, with whom he has differences. That is in keeping with Mr. Trump’s pattern throughout his presidency, though it was perhaps never as striking as in Beijing, where he lavished praise on Mr. Xi, only to criticize China’s trade practices a day later in Vietnam.“There is some value in treating counterparties with respect, in trying to build relationships with them, despite the distasteful nature if it,” said Mr. Bader, the former Obama official.But if Mr. Trump’s stops in Northeast Asia were aimed at building a coalition against North Korea, his swing through Southeast Asia seemed calculated to remind people that he has little use for the post-World War II concept of the United States as global leader.At moments, his speech in Vietnam had the tub-thumping atmosphere of one he may have given in Pennsylvania or Wisconsin. When a member of the audience broke into applause after he accused countries of not opening their markets to American goods, a sardonic Mr. Trump exclaimed: “Funny. They must have been one of the beneficiaries.”Administration officials framed the speech as a chance for Mr. Trump to promote a “free and open Indo-Pacific,” which the White House has embraced as its answer to Mr. Obama’s “Asia pivot.” But the president put little meat on the bones, emphasizing the sovereignty and independence of nations over common interests or universal rights.“Human rights are, in essence, an international agreement,” said John Sifton, the director of Asia advocacy for Human Rights Watch. “When he talks about trade in those terms, it suggests that he doesn’t hold the multilateral legal system in very high regard — and that’s frightening.”Human rights groups, Mr. Sifton said, were focusing their energies on lobbying Canada and Japan rather than the United States.Chinese leaders do not dwell on human rights either, to say the least. But Mr. Xi came to Vietnam primed to take over some of the ground usually commanded by the American president. During his speech, which came right after Mr. Trump’s, he declared, “Opening up will bring progress, and those who close down will inevitably lag behind.”In the absence of an alternative sales pitch from the United States, experts said, China will inevitably make further gains.“China has made significant inroads in cultivating Southeast Asia,” said Tang Siew Mun, head of the Asean studies center at the ISEAS-Yusof Ishak Institute in Singapore. “This isn’t an entirely bad proposition for the region, but China’s success is disastrous for the U.S., as Chinese advances are at the U.S.’s expense.”“At the end of the day,” Mr. Tang said, “‘America First’ may devolve into the U.S. being home alone.”
Vietnam, in a Bind, Tries to Chart a Path Between U.S. and China HANOI, Vietnam — Vietnam’s full-on war with the United States lasted a decade. Its tensions with its northern neighbor, China, have persisted for thousands of years — from a millennium of direct Chinese rule and a bloody border war in 1979 to more recent confrontations in the South China Sea.If geography is destiny, then the fate of Vietnam is to be an expert in bargaining with Beijing and balancing between superpowers.So with the rest of the world struggling to reckon with China’s assertive moves in the Pacific, the Vietnamese, hosts of this year’s Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation forum, are offering guidance.“I would like to give advice to the whole world, and especially to the United States, that you must be careful with China,” said Maj. Gen. Le Van Cuong, the retired director of the Institute of Strategic Studies at the Vietnamese Ministry of Public Security.Like any good Communist soldier, General Cuong pays attention to the details of leaders’ abstruse speeches, and he noted that President Xi Jinping of China had referred to his homeland’s status as a “great” or “strong power” 26 times in a lengthy address last month.“Xi Jinping’s ambitions are dangerous for the whole world,” General Cuong said. “China uses its money to buy off many leaders, but none of the countries that are its close allies, like North Korea, Pakistan or Cambodia, have done well. Countries that are close to America have done much better. We must ask: Why is this?”As with other Southeast Asian nations acutely aware that they are positioned in China’s backyard, Vietnam is worried about American inattention.In the name of halting Communism, the United States once sent troops to Indochina and propped up dictators elsewhere in Asia. But the American-devised security landscape also created a stable environment in which regional economies expanded.Now, Mr. Trump’s decision to take the United States out of the Trans-Pacific Partnership trade pact, which would have given 11 other economies an alternative to a Chinese-led economic order, has left the Vietnamese feeling vulnerable.“As Vietnamese, we are always trying to find a way to balance China’s power,” said Nguyen Ngoc Anh, a professor at the Foreign Trade University in Hanoi. “For us, TPP isn’t just an economic issue. It’s also about geopolitics and social issues.”Ms. Anh noted that local liberals had cheered the trade pact because it would have forced Vietnam to adhere to international labor and government accountability standards that Hanoi might otherwise not meet.With the 11 other members of the pact agreeing to  proceed without the United States, Washington’s withdrawal — not to mention Mr. Trump’s “America First” speech at the APEC meeting on Friday — leaves some nations wondering if their best option may be Chinese-backed trade pacts and financing deals that have fewer guarantees for workers and less official transparency.“We are both Communist countries, but people like me in Vietnam don’t want to develop the same way that China has,” said Ms. Anh, who studied economics in Soviet-era Czechoslovakia. “We want to follow the Western-oriented way.”While the United States is the largest market for Vietnamese exports, Vietnam’s biggest trading partner is China. Yet Vietnam runs a significant trade deficit with its populous neighbor, and Vietnamese economists worry that China doesn’t play fairly.“China is one of the few countries in the world that doesn’t observe international law in many areas,” said Le Dang Doanh, an influential economist who has advised members of the Vietnamese Politburo on trade.The Vietnamese watched in alarm last year when Beijing reacted to an international tribunal’s dismissal of China’s expansive claims over the South China Sea by ignoring — and even mocking — the judgment. Vietnam and four other governments have claims of their own on the resource-rich waterway that conflict with China’s.It is hard to overstate the level of Vietnamese antipathy toward China. In a country where public protest is rare and risky, some of the few large-scale demonstrations in Vietnam in recent years have been against the Chinese.But this national aversion puts Vietnam’s leadership in a bind. It cannot ignore China’s growing economic magnetism. For many members of APEC, China now ranks as their No. 1 trading partner.In return for investment and project financing — roads, railways, dams, airports and colossal government buildings — leaders of regional economies are increasingly doing Beijing’s bidding.Cambodia and Laos have given crucial support for Beijing’s South China Sea claims. Thailand has complied with Beijing’s demand that it return Chinese dissidents who once counted on it as a haven.Even the Philippines has appeared to yield, despite the fact it lodged the successful South China Sea suit at The Hague. Days before Mr. Trump’s visit to Manila this Sunday, it disclosed that President Rodrigo Duterte had ordered construction halted on a disputed sandbar in the South China Sea, a move widely regarded as intended to placate Beijing.Since taking office last year, Mr. Duterte has deemed the era of American military and economic pre-eminence over, and has called China his country’s best and faithful friend. He has been rewarded with billions of dollars in infrastructure investment from Beijing.“The U.S. has been playing catch-up to China’s charm offensive since the turn of the new century,” said Tang Siew Mun, who heads the Southeast Asia center at the Iseas-Yusof Ishak Institute, a think tank in Singapore.Vietnam, more than any other country, has grown practiced at divining when not to challenge the two Pacific powers — both of which it fought within the last half-century.In the 1970s and 1980s, China seized spits of land in the South China Sea that Vietnam had controlled or that were unoccupied but claimed by Hanoi.Yet perhaps sensing an American reluctance to confront China in the South China Sea, Vietnam has declined to take China to international court, as the Philippines did, even as the Chinese have turned disputed reefs and sandbars into militarized islands.Chinese pressure continues, despite the United States’ supplying the Vietnamese Coast Guard with a cutter and new patrol boats.This year, a Spanish company with prospecting rights from Vietnam suspended drilling in an oil block off the coast of Vietnam. Beijing claims part of the waters as its own.In 2014, the Chinese parked a state-owned oil rig off Danang, where Mr. Trump attended the APEC summit meeting on Friday, in a forceful incursion into what Hanoi considers its territorial waters.“Living next to China, which has ambitions to become the most powerful country in the world, is not easy,” said Vo Van Tao, a popular political blogger. “To lower the heat, Vietnam needs to withdraw from areas that belong to Vietnam.”Grand strategy is beyond the worldview of Vietnamese like Do Van Duc. In 1979, he was stationed on the border with China, as part of an antiaircraft artillery unit, when hundreds of thousands of People’s Liberation Army soldiers from China flooded south.The Vietnamese, while outmanned, put up an unexpectedly robust defense. Within a month, the Chinese, professing that they had taught the Vietnamese a lesson for interfering in regional geopolitics, withdrew.During the war with China, Mr. Duc was only 17 years old, but he came to understand one thing then that today, as a security guard living in Hanoi, he said he still clings to.“We cannot trust the Chinese,” he said. “They are our ancient enemy, and that will not change.”
Employees of Big French Cleaning Company Win Sexual Harassment Case PARIS — Five immigrant workers won a significant sexual harassment and discrimination case on Friday against one of France’s largest cleaning companies, but up to the moment they read the decision, they hardly thought they had a chance.The four women and one man who brought the case worked at the busy Gare du Nord train station in Paris for little more than the minimum wage cleaning the Eurostar, Thalys and other long-distance rail carriers.“We were considered like trash, but now, other women also have to speak out,” said one of the workers, Houria Dahmani, minutes after hearing the court’s decision in a nondescript building in the north of Paris. “We worked with fear, with anxiety, it’s time to change that.”“It’s a big victory for us, for all the employees,” Ms. Dahmani, 56, added. “There is justice in France, even for us.”Although the amounts of money awarded were small by American standards, few sexual harassment cases in France are adjudicated at all, particularly against such a large company, said Marilyn Baldeck, a lawyer for the European Association Against Violence Against Women at Work, which helped the workers in the long legal process.The court concurred that the four women had been sexually harassed by a man who was their “team leader” at H. Reinier, a subsidiary of ONET, one of France’s largest cleaning companies. The harassment started with uncomfortable kisses and inappropriate touching but became more intrusive.“He would come up behind me in the bathroom when I was leaning over to clean and rub himself against me,” said Karima Emtir, another of the plaintiffs, bursting into tears a few days before the award as she described in an interview the treatment she had endured.The harassment escalated, the women said, after they supported their co-worker, Rachid Lakhal, a whistle-blower who accused one of his superiors of a kickback scheme and was fired twice — once after he had been reinstated. Mr. Lakhal’s discrimination case against the company was heard along with the women’s; he also won damages.H. Reinier’s lawyer, Virginie Monteil, said that the company had not decided whether to appeal but had done an audit and was beginning a training program for salaried employees and managers in “risk prevention.”When asked why the audit did not mention sexual harassment, Ms. Monteil said the company was dealing with broader “psychosocial issues.”The case is also noteworthy because Mr. Lakhal had spoken up on behalf of the women and testified for them. He was given the largest monetary award, essentially creating a precedent for rewarding someone who testified in support of those who allege harassment.“What you won is very significant,” Ms. Baldeck told the women and Mr. Lakhal at a meeting after the decision was released. “It sends a strong message to all the women who talked to me, but who were too afraid to file a complaint.”Ms. Baldeck said in an interview that she had spoken with six other female employees who suffered similar treatment.Ms. Emtir, one of the plaintiffs, said her co-workers did not join the case because they feared reprisals, including losing their jobs, which although poorly paid helped them to make ends meet. One, though, recently changed her mind and filed a complaint, said lawyers involved in the case.The four women each won 20,000 euros (about $23,000) for sexual harassment and 10,000 euros (about $11,500) for discrimination. Mr. Lakhal, 47, won 100,000 euros ($116,000).“It’s not about the money,” Mr. Lakhal said. “We don’t care about the money. It’s about the justice system acknowledging that there was discrimination, there was sexual harassment.”Like Mr. Lakhal, Ms. Emtir, who is 49, was also fired. Both sought to get their jobs back, but the court did not order them to be reinstated.The French labor court judges wrote that the measures taken so far by H. Reinier “to protect the four employees were nonexistent” and that the preventive measures were “wholly insufficient.” Further, the court said, when the women reported the sexual harassment, they were “systematically sanctioned for it.”The company declined for several years even to move the man who was accused of the harassment to a different location. Ms. Monteil, the company’s lawyer, said that from H. Reinier’s point of view, it had to “put everyone on an equal footing.”That decision meant that the women had to see their harasser every day when they went to work, fearing always that he would touch them or follow them into a train bathroom, shut the door and attack them sexually.Maud Beckers, the women’s lawyer, said before the decision was issued that if the company was found to be responsible for the environment of sexual harassment and threats against employees who complained, the company should “clean house” and fire those who were accused as well as the directors who allowed the pernicious behavior.As of Friday, the man named as responsible for the harassment in the court decision, Mbarek Bachchikh, was still working for the company, according to Ms. Monteil, the company’s lawyer.SNCF, France’s national railroad, continued to use the company for cleaning services even after questions about sexual harassment and criminal activities were raised. A company communications official said on Friday that SNCF “welcomed the decision.”The official added that because the case involved internal matters of a subcontractor, she would not offer any other comment.All four women were longtime employees of H. Reinier and had worked cleaning trains at one or more of the company’s sites in Paris for years. Ms. Emtir was a 17-year veteran of the company when she was fired in 2015. Three of the women are Algerian and one is Moroccan, as is Mr. Lakhal.The escalation of the sexual advances began in 2012, Ms. Emtir and Ms. Dahmani said in an interview, after Mr. Lakhal told management that a union delegate had required people he hired as cleaners to pay him one to two months salary, about 2,000 euros ($2,200), in exchange for a job contract.After Mr. Lakhal’s complaint, the women said, the delegate tried to get Mr. Lakhal fired by forcing employees to sign a petition saying he was a poor worker and a liar, among other things. When the four women refused to sign the petition because, they said, they knew it was not true, the sexual harassment intensified.The kickback accusations are the subject of a separate, criminal case along with the sexual harassment charges. Sexual harassment can be adjudicated in both civil and criminal proceedings.With the court’s decision in hand, two of the women and Mr. Lakhal went to the Gare du Nord on Friday with their heads held high. Ms. Dahmani smiled at her daughter, who had come with her. “It’s good to walk into the station without being ashamed,” she said.
Roy Moore, Lebanon, Louis C.K.: Your Friday Evening Briefing (Want to get this briefing by email? Here’s the sign-up.)Good evening. Here’s the latest.1. Senate Republicans are scrambling to figure out how to block Roy Moore’s path to the Senate, after accusations emerged that he made sexual advances on teenage girls when he was in his 30s.Mr. Moore, above, is the Republican nominee for the Alabama Senate seat vacated by Attorney General Jeff Sessions. A special election is scheduled for Dec. 12.He remained defiant, insisting in an interview on Fox News that he would stay in the race and denying that he “had any contact” with a woman who says he molested her when she was 14.Worried Republicans are debating fielding a write-in candidate or trying to delay the election. In an interview, Senator Mitch McConnell would not say whether he would seat Mr. Moore if he wins._____2. In political intrigue elsewhere: The mystery surrounding the resignation of Lebanon’s prime minister is fueling anxiety about whether the region is on the verge of a new conflict.After a sudden flight to Riyadh a week ago, Saad Hariri announced he was stepping down because of Iranian meddling in Lebanon through Hezbollah.He remains there, and the Saudis say there was a plot to assassinate him. The head of Hezbollah countered that Saudi Arabia had essentially kidnapped Mr. Hariri — and asked Israel to attack Lebanon. Above, a poster in Beirut that reads, “We are all Saad.”_____3. President Trump pitched an “America First” trade policy to business leaders at the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation forum in Danang, Vietnam.The remarks were strikingly hostile for the pro-trade audience, and contrasted sharply with a speech by President Xi Jinping of China that championed more robust engagement with the world.In between events, President Trump met with American veterans of the Vietnam War, above, and signed a proclamation commemorating the conflict’s 50th anniversary. He was exempted from military service during the war because of a bone spur diagnosis._____4. We published the video of our interview with Stephen Bannon, the Breitbart News chief and former strategist for President Trump, at our New York headquarters this week. Watch it here.Mr. Bannon said that Senator Mitch McConnell “has to go” and lashed out at the media’s coverage of the president. Here are the key takeaways.Jeremy Peters, the reporter who conducted the interview, will discuss it on another episode of our new podcast, “The New Washington,” out tomorrow. Click here to subscribe and hear past episodes._____5. “These stories are true.”The comedian Louis C.K. admitted that he had engaged in sexual misconduct with five women, as we reported yesterday. He expressed remorse, but did not apologize. Here’s his full statement.The release of his forthcoming comedy, “I Love You, Daddy,” was canceled by the distributor, and Netflix canceled a special with him._____6. Gov. Kenneth E. Mapp of the U.S. Virgin Islands plans to go to Washington next week to request $7 billion in aid.More than two months after Hurricanes Irma and Maria struck, many residents there are still grappling with daily survival. We checked in with people we interviewed in the intermediate aftermath of the storms.“It feels like we’re actually making a bit of progress,” said Kimmeiqua Mahoney, seated above. “But it’s still such a long, long way to go.”_____7. Dozens of young immigrants mailed in their DACA renewal forms weeks before they were due. But their paperwork was delayed in the mail — and then denied for being late.Though the Postal Service took responsibility, immigration authorities were unsympathetic: “USCIS is not responsible for the mail service an individual chooses, or for delays on the part of mail service providers,” an official said._____8. The terrible air quality in Delhi has been making headlines. Now Lahore, Pakistan’s second-largest city, is giving the Indian capital a run for its money. For nearly two weeks, Lahore has been like one huge airport smokers’ lounge.The air quality is usually bad in November, from crop burning, cold weather and higher emissions. This year it reached a crisis point, and critics say the government isn’t doing enough to address it.“Lahore looks like a dystopian wasteland right now, kind of like a scene from ‘Blade Runner,’” one local business owner said._____9. Among the panic-inducing headlines we published this week, this one stood out: “Cancer Doctors Cite Risks of Drinking Alcohol.” The American Society of Clinical Oncology had warned that even modest drinking could increase the risk of cancer. Nearly 500 readers commented on the story.“I’m waiting for the headline that reads, ‘Living Longer Causes Cancer,’” one wrote. “Because that statement would also, technically, be true.”Our colleagues at The Upshot argue it should be taken with a grain of salt, perhaps on the rim of a margarita glass._____10. Finally, Louis C.K. was supposed to be on “The Late Show” on Thursday, after the New York premiere of his new movie, “I Love You, Daddy.” But both events were canceled after we reported on his sexual misconduct.Stephen Colbert only briefly discussed the cancellation. Seth Meyers may have captured the reaction among comics best, starting his bit with a mention of the accusations against Roy Moore.“Politics is so full of perverts and deviants, I’m just so glad I work in comedy,” he said. “Aw, damn it!”Have a great weekend._____Your Evening Briefing is posted at 6 p.m. Eastern.And don’t miss Your Morning Briefing, posted weekdays at 6 a.m. Eastern, and Your Weekend Briefing, posted at 6 a.m. Sundays.Want to catch up on past briefings? You can browse them here.If photographs appear out of order, please download the updated New York Times app from iTunes or Google Play.What did you like? What do you want to see here? Let us know at briefing@nytimes.com.
Did Airstrikes in Afghanistan Last Week Kill Civilians? U.S. and U.N. Disagree KUNDUZ, Afghanistan — Mohammad Anas, a college student, sheltered with friends and relatives in a mosque as they listened, terrified, to the boom of American airstrikes pummeling Taliban positions near their village in northern Afghanistan on Nov. 3.When the bombing subsided the next morning, the villagers came out and tried to return home, but Taliban insurgents ordered them to begin recovering the bodies of slain fighters.Before they finished, Mr. Anas said, warplanes returned and bombed the group. When it was over, village elders say, 19 civilians were left dead and at least six others were wounded — including Mr. Anas, whose wounds were minor.“Three of my friends were dead,” he said.The United Nations confirmed the broad outlines of Mr. Anas’s account, saying at least 10 civilians were killed in airstrikes on Nov. 4 in Kunduz Province. But the American military in Afghanistan insists that the only dead or wounded were Taliban insurgents.It was at least the fourth time in the past two years that airstrikes in the hotly contested area have led to controversy over whether civilians were killed.For the residents of the village, Qatl-e Aam in the Chardara District, the episode has bitter irony.In 1985, Soviet troops killed 650 residents, leaving only a handful alive. Residents renamed the village Qatl-e Aam, which means “massacre” in Dari.“There were so many bodies we turned the whole village into a cemetery,” one survivor of the 1985 violence, Ghulam Nabi, 80, recalled.Another survivor of that massacre was Faiz Mohammad, 53, who said he lost his 13-year-old son in last week’s airstrikes. “He had just finished learning the Holy Quran by heart,” Mr. Mohammad said.The American military moved unusually quickly to release the results of its own internal investigation into the airstrikes, declaring on Tuesday that an “investigation was conducted independently and concluded that there were no civilian casualties.”But the next day, Wednesday, the United Nations mission in Afghanistan took the unusual step of issuing a series of four posts on Twitter saying that its own investigation found that at least 10 civilians had been killed.“Accounts indicate victims were civilians forced by AGE’s to retrieve bodies from earlier fighting,” the mission said on Twitter, referring to antigovernment elements, which in Kunduz usually means Taliban insurgents.The United Nations’ account was similar to what a New York Times reporter in the area was told during interviews this week with local villagers from the vicinity around Qatl-e Aam. “The Taliban forced everyone in the morning to retrieve their bodies,” said one villager, Hajji Mahmoud, 69, who said he was wounded in the head and arm.In a statement, the United States military said that “numerous enemy combatants were killed,” adding that its account was supported by the governor of Kunduz, Asadullah Omarkhel, and a Defense Ministry spokesman, Maj. Gen. Dawlat Waziri.But less senior officials in the area gave divergent accounts. Nimatullah Timory, head of public awareness in Governor Omarkhel’s office, said that one civilian was killed and five civilians were wounded, although he added that the death occurred when the civilian tried to remove the body of a wounded Uzbek insurgent to hide evidence of foreign fighters’ working with the Taliban.The American military claimed that particularly telling was its finding that “no hospitals or clinics in the local area indicated treatment of people with wounds from armed conflict.” But a Times reporter saw six wounded patients in the Kunduz Regional Hospital on Nov. 4 who said they were victims of the airstrikes.Mr. Anas, the student, was among a group of 70 villagers who came to the city of Kunduz, the capital of the province, to protest outside the governor’s house on Wednesday. He displayed photographs on his cellphone that he said showed children who were victims. “The governor is sitting in his office and doesn’t know what is the real story,” he said. Elders from the village presented the governor with a list of 19 civilians they claimed had been killed, all men except for two children.Asked about the divergent accounts, Liam McDowall, director of strategic communications for the United Nations mission, said, “The U.N. has over the past decade proved itself to be the most credible and reliable source for information about the devastating impact of the conflict on civilians in Afghanistan.”“The U.N. in Afghanistan is, given its unsparing focus on safeguarding the lives of Afghan civilians, subject to regular criticism from all parties to the conflict,” Mr. McDowall added. “There is rarely an incident or a day when our work to protect lives through our impartial reporting is not challenged.”He declined to elaborate.An American military spokesman, Capt. Thomas R. Gresback of the Navy, said, “If there is additional credible evidence out there, we’re open to hearing about it, but to date no one has come forward with anything.”The United States has stepped up airstrikes as part of President Trump’s new strategy  in Afghanistan, with the Air Force reporting that it dropped 900 munitions in August and September this year, compared with only 260 in a similar period in 2016.Airstrikes in Kunduz have been particularly numerous, with three earlier serious claims that they resulted in civilian casualties just in the past two years.Those three earlier claims of civilian casualties came from airstrikes during the Obama administration.The most serious was an attack on the Doctors Without Borders hospital in the city of Kunduz on Oct. 3, 2015, which killed 42 civilians, most of them patients and staff members in the hospital. After a lengthy investigation, the American military commander in Afghanistan, Gen. John W. Nicholson Jr., apologized, blaming human error, and 16 soldiers, one of them a special operations general, were disciplined.In June 2016, also in the Chardara District where the airstrikes last Saturday occurred, Afghan officials and local residents claimed that American airstrikes on a Taliban prison killed 7 to 16 prisoners.Last November, 33 civilians and two American soldiers were killed on the outskirts of the city of Kunduz, including many women and children. After a lengthy investigation, the American military admitted in January that 33 civilians had been killed but said that the Taliban had used civilian homes as cover.
Pot Advertising, Leonard Cohen and Chimps: The Canada Letter Legal recreational marijuana smoke wafts into Canadian skies in about eight months, a subject I wrote about this week. The authorities have a mound of details to work out on how legalization will work for sellers and buyers. But a much larger population — all Canadians — will encounter one area in particular: advertising.How will promotion of Canada’s latest legal vice be regulated? The federal government has two models.One is the system for cigarettes, which effectively bans most conventional advertising and marketing, requires stores to keep cigars and cigarettes out of sight and mandates that health warnings with gruesome photos dominate packaging. (A bill now before Parliament would also make the tobacco industry use generic packaging, without logos.)Or the government could follow the regulatory pattern created for beer, wine and spirits. While those rules vary by province, pretty much anything goes other than showing actors and models actually sipping drinks, or making blatant appeals to children though, say, cartoon characters. And ads for spirits feature “consume responsibly” statements.A group of 17 medical marijuana companies — which are all gearing up for the much bigger recreational market — released its advertising proposals this week. To no one’s surprise, they largely mirror the alcohol model.They cast advertising not as a means of lifting sales but as something of a public service. In a news release, the group said that marijuana ads are “vital for the legal industry to have the tools necessary to push back against Canada’s thriving illegal market, while at the same time educating adult consumers about various product strains, responsible use, and how to differentiate between high and low quality cannabis product.”Most of the medical community and experts on drug abuse oppose widespread pot advertising.“We have an opportunity to learn from where we are with alcohol,” said Rebecca Jesseman, a director and senior policy adviser at the Canadian Center on Substance Use and Addiction, a federally funded agency. “We really need to take a more cautious approach.”Among other things, Ms. Jesseman wants cigarette-like limits and packages that show warnings about marijuana-impaired driving and the health dangers of inhaling heated vapors.The government won’t announce its plan until after the bill to legalize marijuana becomes law. Until then, Ms. Jesseman expects heavy lobbying by the industry.“I do not envy the people in the government making the decision,” she told me.Read: Ready or Not, Recreational Marijuana Use Is Coming to CanadaAndrea Kannapell, an editor at The Times, made the pilgrimage from New York to Montreal for the tribute concert for one the city’s best known native sons, the musician and poet Leonard Cohen, who died a year ago this month. Here’s her report.Here’s a review and a few clips from the tribute concert, which will be televised by the Canadian Broadcasting Corporation in January, featuring Sting, k.d. lang, Adam Cohen and Lana Del Rey. The Musée d’Art Contemporain de Montréal is presenting a special exhibition of Mr. Cohen’s work and the art he has inspired, including projections of lyrics from his songs on a grain elevator that dominates Montreal’s port, as well as a concert series of full performances of five of his albums.After about a century, medical research on chimpanzees has effectively ended in North America. But moving the chimps now at universities and other research centers into retirement sanctuaries in the United States is taking longer than advocates for the intelligent and sociable animals had hoped.Jim Gorman, a Times science writer, joined some chimps on the trip to their new home and has produced a moving, witty, not-to-be-missed story about their new lives.Read: Lab Chimps Are Moving to Sanctuaries — SlowlyOne of this week’s must reads from The Times appeared in Opinion. Until she received a cochlear implant seven years ago, Rachel Kolb had been profoundly deaf. During that time, she was frequently asked if she could hear music. Now that she finally can, Ms. Kolb has written an essay about the experience. Her reaction wasn’t what I expected. And after you read the essay, be sure to watch the innovative 360 video about Ms. Kolb’s relationship with music and the hearing world.Read: Sensations of Sound: On Deafness and MusicWatch: 360 Video: Sensations of SoundTwo filmmakers from Vancouver, British Columbia, have gained access to what is perhaps the most mysterious hockey venue in the world: the Pyongyang Ice Rink in North Korea.—My colleague Dan Levin made the trip to the Hart River in the Yukon Territory. Indigenous groups thought they had a deal to preserve its watershed. But the territorial government has a vision for the 26,000 square miles that emphasizes exploitation of gas, coal and other minerals. The dispute may shatter trust between indigenous and non-indigenous Canadians.—Roy Halladay, the former Toronto Blue Jays pitcher who died in a plane crash, was mourned by many baseball fans. In an appreciation, Tyler Kepner, who interviewed Halladay for a book about pitching this spring, wrote that his "legacy, to me, is powerful and instructive in any field: The purity of the effort matters most.”
‘It’s a Black Thing’: Offensive Quip Becomes a Rallying Cry in Brazil SÃO PAULO, Brazil — Black Brazilians have reappropriated an insulting quip by a prominent television anchorman, using his words — “It’s a black thing” — to draw attention to contributions of Brazilians of African ancestry and to the lingering impact of racial subjugation in Brazil.The quip was made in a video that was recorded last year but that only surfaced this week in Brazil.In the video, William Waack, an anchorman for Brazil’s largest television network, Globo, was preparing for a live shot with a guest, with the White House in the background, while covering the presidential campaign in the United States.In response to loud honking from a nearby car, Mr. Waack said under his breath, “It’s a black thing. No doubt,” and laughed about it with his guest.Reaction on social media was swift and indignant after the video started to circulate.By Wednesday evening, #ÉCoisaDePreto — Portuguese for “It’s a black thing” — was one of the top trending topics on Twitter in Brazil.The same day, shortly before Mr. Waack was scheduled to anchor a news show, Globo announced that it had “removed” Mr. Waack until the situation could be clarified.“Globo is viscerally opposed to racism in all of its forms,” the company said in a statement, adding that Mr. Waack had made comments that “everything indicates were of a racist nature.”The video was leaked by a former video editor for Globo, who said he was appalled by the remarks at the time but was afraid he could lose his job if he released the video to the public.The video editor, Diego Rocha Pereira, who no longer works for the network, said he had heard the comments as he sat in the network’s control room.“I rewound the video to be sure, I couldn’t believe he would have said that,” he told the Jovem Pan radio station. “I was so disgusted, I recorded it on my cellphone.”Mr. Waack has not publicly responded. In its statement, Globo said, “Waack affirms he doesn’t remember what he said, given that the audio is not clear, but he offers sincere apologies to those who feel they have been offended.”On social media, the remark has been turned into a campaign, shining a light on the accomplishments of famous black Brazilians like the 19th-century novelist and poet Machado de Assis, as well as global leaders, including Nelson Mandela, and sports stars and artists.Many people have written on Twitter about their own struggles in a country with a long history of slavery and racism. One person wrote: “#It’sABlackThing my mother, a black, single woman, raising 7 children without the help of a white man (my father).”Brazil was the last country in the Americas to abolish slavery, in 1888. Over three centuries, some four million Africans were brought here and forced to work in fields, mines and private homes.Today, just over 50 percent of Brazilians identify as black or biracial, and many Brazilians say there is a racial harmony here that does not exist in the United States.But others say the figures point to a different reality — Brazil is a country where the life expectancy of black men is considerably lower than for their white counterparts, and where people of African descent earn 36 percent less than nonblack Brazilians.In recent years, Globo and other television networks have used their powerful positions to combat racism with more prominent roles for black Brazilians on soap operas and reality TV shows.When Brazil’s first black weather broadcaster on a prime-time news broadcast — Maria Júlia Coutinho, known widely by her nickname, Maju — was subjected to verbal abuse, her colleagues at Globo promoted the #WeAreAllMaju campaign.In the case of Mr. Waack, a veteran journalist who gained the respect of his colleagues over the years with his coverage of the fall of the Berlin Wall and numerous conflicts in the Middle East, Globo said it was in talks with him about what would happen next.
Duterte, Philippine President, Boasts He Killed Someone as a Teenager President Rodrigo Duterte of the Philippines said on Friday that he had stabbed someone to death when he was a teenager, the latest claim from a leader who has boasted of personally killing people while defending a violent crackdown on drugs.“When I was a teenager, I had been in and out of jail, rumble here and there,” Mr. Duterte said during a speech to Filipinos in Danang, Vietnam. “At the age of 16, I already killed someone.”He said he had stabbed the person “just over a look,” and he asked his audience in Vietnam to imagine what he could do as president.“I won’t let you off the hook” if you mess around with Filipinos, he said. “Never mind about the human rights advocates.”Mr. Duterte’s spokesman, Harry Roque, said the comment had been meant as a joke. Officials loyal to the president have said he has a tendency to exaggerate.“I think it was in jest,” Mr. Roque said. “The president uses colorful language when with Pinoys overseas,” he added, referring to Filipinos.The comments came as the leader defended his government’s brutal countrywide crackdown on drugs. His speech was met with applause and laughter.Mr. Duterte is in Vietnam with dozens of other world leaders for the annual Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation summit meeting.In 2015, while he was mayor of Davao City, Mr. Duterte said in an interview with Esquire that he had stabbed someone to death when he was 17 years old. In December 2016, he said that during his time as mayor, he had personally killed at least three people.The Philippine leader has been widely criticized for an extrajudicial crackdown on drug dealers and users that has left an estimated 4,000 people dead since May 2016, according to local news outlets.Human rights groups have condemned Mr. Duterte, saying the crackdown has allowed police officers and vigilantes to ignore due process and to take justice into their own hands.Mr. Duterte is set to meet with President Trump on Sunday in Manila, part of the American president’s 12-day tour to several Asian nations. Mr. Trump praised Mr. Duterte this year, congratulating him on the “unbelievable job on the drug program.”
A Lebanese Rocker Caught in a Human Rights Incident Over Rainbow Flags Hamed Sinno, the 29-year-old Lebanese rocker, showed up at Christopher Street in Manhattan looking agitated. He had gone to the wrong location of Maison Kayser, the French boulangerie, and by the time his cab got to the West Village he was an hour late. Wearing a headband and a loose black shirt, he had forgotten he had to have his photo taken, and apologized for his “bad hair.”Rock-star problems, right? But Mr. Sinno’s are more complicated than most. As one of the only openly gay celebrities in the Arab world, he has become a de facto mouthpiece and lightning rod, becoming embroiled in international human-rights issues when all he really wants to do is play music.His indie band, Mashrou’ Leila, has acquired a young, progressive fan base over the past few years. In the group’s home country, Lebanon, boho crowds flock to see Mr. Sinno, in sequins and muscle T-shirts, sing songs that are alternately brooding and buoyant, sensual and bitingly satirical.But trouble seems to follow him everywhere. On Sept. 22, the group played a concert to 35,000 people in Cairo, where a few spectators waved rainbow flags. Within days, seven people were arrested for “promoting sexual deviancy,” part of President Abdel Fattah el-Sisi’s crackdown on homosexuality. The number grew to at least 65 by the end of October.Arrestees were subject to anal exams to test them for gay sex. Mashrou’ Leila was banned from Egypt, and homophobic rumors swirled online, including that the concert had been a 35,000-person orgy — “which, even if you try to entertain the idea, seems really, really difficult to organize,” Mr. Sinno said with a bitter laugh.“It’s not like we’re going around burning holy books and peeing on national monuments,” he said, after ordering a skim milk latte and a tartine poulet. Outside the window, rainbow flags were as commonplace as stop signs. “It was just a piece of fabric. Those are people saying that they exist, and someone had a problem with that.”He added, wearily, “I love what I do. But it is frightening.”At times, the band has courted controversy, as when it canceled a 2012 gig opening for the Red Hot Chili Peppers to show solidarity with BDS, the movement calling for boycotts, divestment and sanctions against Israel. But most often Mr. Sinno’s sexuality is provocation enough.The group has been banned from Jordan, twice. “And the second time they were much less polite about it,” Mr. Sinno said. “They were just flat out, ‘We don’t want them because he’s gay.’” He rolled his eyes. “Really nice government.”The band is spending the fall in the United States, teaching a graduate course at New York University on the intersection of music and politics. Mr. Sinno, a self-described “pretentious writing snob” (his lyrics teem with allusions to Sappho and Sylvia Plath), described the students as “all extremely woke,” and outlined a syllabus that includes Bertolt Brecht, Judith Butler and the French rap duo the Blaze.On days off from teaching, the group is performing in cities including Philadelphia and Minneapolis. “My mother really doesn’t want me to go back to Beirut,” Mr. Sinno said. “She’s like, ‘Stay in the states!’ ‘I can’t afford a house here, woman!’ She’s like, ‘I’ll buy you a house!’”But Mr. Sinno, who has dual Lebanese and United States citizenship, doesn’t feel much more at ease in America than he does in the Middle East, saying that the “in your face” racism he encounters here is at least as bad as the homophobia back home. Last year, Mr. Sinno was at Le Bain, the nightclub in the meatpacking district, when a guy getting into an elevator shouted, “Build the wall!”“It took me a second to understand that he was talking to me, and that he thought I was Latino,” he said.That same trip, Mr. Sinno found himself torn after the mass shooting at the gay nightclub Pulse in Orlando, Fla., wanting to stand with the gay and lesbian community even as online trolls called him a “terrorist.” “It’s literally disillusioning to have to do away with the romanticized narrative of the U.S. that I had,” he said.He picked the chicken off his tartine. “This is stuff that only pretty people are allowed to eat,” he said of the leftover bread. “I met this boy in San Francisco and he’s, like, way out of my league.”While growing up in Beirut, Mr. Sinno found Western pop culture to be a lifeline. With few representations of gay people in Lebanese culture, he sought refuge in “Will & Grace” and Oscar Wilde. He discovered Allan Ginsberg during his freshman year at the American University of Beirut, where his mother teaches English.He idolized grunge rockers like Eddie Vedder and Kurt Cobain (the “love of my life”) and went through “a bit of a riot-grrrl moment.” Though Mr. Sinno is often compared to Freddie Mercury, in part because of his bushy mustache, he doesn’t see the resemblance.Mashrou’ Leila, which roughly translates as “An Overnight Project,” began in 2008, when someone in the university’s design department put up a sign for a musical workshop. By 2012, the band had released two albums and was headlining Lebanese music festivals, and Mr. Sinno quit his job at an advertising firm.Though he grew up speaking mostly English, he studied Arabic to write lyrics, with the goal of “bringing poetry into Arabic pop music.” One song, “Shim El Yasmine,” or “Smell the Jasmine” (“I would have liked to keep you near me, / Introduce you to my parents”) has been described as Arab pop’s first gay love song.The band’s most recent album, “Ibn El Leil” (“Son of the Night”), was inspired in part by Mr. Sinno’s period of escapism in Beirut nightclubs after the death of his father, a urologist. “I was where the booze was for quite some time,” he said. (He has been sober for almost a year.) But, he added, “clubs are necessarily political.”As he finished lunch, his phone began to blow up with texts from his bandmates, and he got a look of panic. Another international incident? No, nothing urgent, he said with both annoyance and relief. When the bandmates return to Lebanon, they will face an uncertain future. “In the past two years, we’ve lost our two biggest markets, Jordan and Egypt,” Mr. Sinno said glumly.And will their fans still wave rainbow flags?“I think people are more likely to do that now than they were before.”
In Air Force, Colleague Feared Church Gunman Would ‘Shoot Up the Place’ At the start of his Air Force career, Devin P. Kelley was picked for a demanding and selective intelligence analyst school. He walked into his first Monday of class with a crisp blue uniform, shined shoes, and for perhaps the first time in years, with hope. It didn’t last.Two years later, he found himself on the run, in a bleak El Paso bus station at midnight trying to catch the first Greyhound back home after failing out of school, being charged with assault and escaping from a psychiatric hospital.As he waited in jean shorts and a hooded sweatshirt, the ticket in his hand was proof he had once again failed.For Mr. Kelley, who last Sunday opened fire on a rural Texas church, killing 26 people, the Air Force could have been a turning point — a source of discipline and direction that he had not embraced in a troubled childhood. But military records and interviews with fellow airmen show that despite repeated chances, his career fell apart under the weight of his depression and rage, at a time when his mind was churning with half-laid plans to kill his superiors.After only a few months in the service, Mr. Kelley slid back into a long decline that left a wreckage of broken relationships, criminal convictions and eventually bloodshed.“The Air Force tried to give him chances but he was just problem after problem after problem,” said Jessika Edwards, a former Air Force staff sergeant who worked with Mr. Kelley in 2011, near the end of his career.“He was a dude on the edge,” Ms. Edwards added, noting that he would appear at informal squadron social functions in all black and a black trench coat. “This is not just in hindsight. He scared me at the time.”Even after he left the military, he contacted her on Facebook with disturbing posts about his obsession with Dylann S. Roof, the Charleston, S.C., mass murderer, and his target practices using dogs ordered online.Ms. Edwards said the military had tried counseling and tough love, but nothing seemed to work. When punished for poor performance, Mr. Kelley would cry, scream and shake with rage, vowing to kill his superiors, she recalled. His temper was so unsettling that she warned others in the squadron to go easy on him or he was likely to come back and “shoot up the place.”The Air Force, like the civilian world, is often ill-equipped to intervene before violence occurs. Though Mr. Kelley’s behavior raised flags, commanders say they have limited options until a crime is committed. Even then, the priority is more often on getting problem troops out of the military, giving little thought to the possible impact on society. After facing intense criticism for its failure to report Mr. Kelley, the Air Force has opened an investigation into the case and many questions remain about what more it could have done.For Mr. Kelley, the military was likely an encouraging option at first. His family had a tradition of going to Texas A&M University: His grandfather, father and both siblings became Aggies. But growing up in New Braunfels, Tex., Mr. Kelley did not get the grades to attend one of the state’s top schools. Besides earning mostly C’s, he had amassed at least seven suspensions for insubordination, profanity, dishonesty and drugs, according to school records.The Air Force offered him a clean slate and the chance to prove himself. He enlisted right after high school in 2009. Based on above-average aptitude test scores, he was picked to become a fusion analyst — an intelligence specialist trained to interpret and communicate the latest information on enemy tactics. It promised a clear career path and a top-secret clearance.In spring 2010, after two months of basic training, he arrived at Goodfellow Air Force Base near San Angelo, Tex., for the rigorous six-month intelligence technical school. Graduating required passing a polygraph test and a background check to get a security clearance.Mr. Kelley washed out before graduation.The Air Force did not provide details on whether Mr. Kelley passed the required polygraph, which typically scrutinizes mental health, drug use, family issues and disruptive behavior. A military official briefed on Mr. Kelley’s Air Force record said only that he was cut from the school for “academic reasons.”Several airmen who went through school with Mr. Kelley said in a closed Facebook group viewed by The New York Times that he did not last long. Some remembered him being there only a few weeks.“I didn’t even realize he was in for as long as he was,” one of them said. “I thought he was discharged in tech school, let alone retrained into a different career field.”Mr. Kelley’s next assignment was decidedly less demanding. Records show the Air Force made him a traffic management apprentice, a job that includes moving people and freight, and requires a minimal aptitude score. Still, he struggled.He was sent in 2011 to Holloman Air Force Base in New Mexico and assigned to the 49th Logistics Readiness Squadron. Six days before he arrived, he had married 19-year-old Tessa Loge from his hometown — a move that allowed his new wife and her baby from another relationship to move into base housing with him, and gave him increased pay because he had dependents.At the base, Mr. Kelley worked in the receiving department, entering information on incoming supplies into a computer. He was smart enough, said Ms. Edwards, who worked in the same office, but he and his new wife fought constantly and were being investigated by local child protective services for child abuse. His wife, who later divorced him, declined to comment.Mr. Kelley was so emotionally unstable and unfocused, Ms. Edwards said, that he often would not do his work.As punishment, superiors would give Mr. Kelley menial tasks, such as mopping or scrubbing toilets, which would send him into a rage, Ms. Edwards said. “He would get so upset,” she said, “and just keep saying, ‘I want to kill them.’”He was formally disciplined multiple times, she said, including for sneaking a gun onto the base in his car.The Air Force confirmed that Ms. Edwards served in the same squadron as Mr. Kelley, and that evaluations show he performed poorly.The squadron wrote up the airman for every infraction, Ms. Edwards said, laying a paper trail that would allow the Air Force to discharge him for poor performance. Before it could do that, in April 2012, Mr. Kelley was arrested and detained after he pointed a gun at his wife, hitting and choking her, and hit his baby stepson, fracturing his skull.His wife filed for divorce that year.While Mr. Kelley awaited court-martial, the Air Force sent him to a civilian psychiatric hospital in Santa Teresa, N.M., where, according to local emergency dispatch records, he was given medication for depression, anxiety and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, and was considered a “high-risk patient.”On the night of June 7, 2012, Mr. Kelley escaped, made his way 12 miles south in the desert night to the El Paso bus station and bought a ticket home.His counselor at the hospital called the police, according to a police report, warning that Mr. Kelley had talked about killing his chain of command in the Air Force and told other patients he had recently bought guns online.Mr. Kelley was quickly caught and kept in pretrial confinement before his court-martial because his commanders were concerned about the threats, said Don Christensen, a retired colonel who at the time was the Air Force’s chief prosecutor. He pleaded guilty to two counts of assault and in November 2012 was sentenced to 12 months in confinement — a relatively light sentence.“A serious injury to a child is worth more than a year in confinement,” said Mr. Christensen, who is now president of Protect Our Defenders, an advocacy group for victims of sexual assault and domestic violence in the military.Mr. Christensen said that during his military career he had seen service members receive the same punishment Mr. Kelley got for merely abusing over-the-counter cough medicine.The Air Force should have entered Mr. Kelley’s name into federal databases that bar convicted felons from buying firearms — but did not. That mistake allowed him to buy several guns over the next few years.Air Force officials apologized last week after admitting that in recent years an unknown number of violent criminals were never registered with the system. “We’re looking at all of our databases,” the Air Force secretary, Heather Wilson, said.After his guilty plea, Mr. Kelley served just eight months in military prison. In June 2013 he was let out, having been knocked down to the lowest possible rank and given a bad conduct discharge that barred him from nearly all veterans benefits, including mental health treatment.He went back to New Braunfels. Though his parents owned a sprawling ranch house with a patio and pool, he moved into their barn. He married again in 2014, to 19-year-old Danielle Shields.“That’s where things started to get weird,” said Ms. Edwards, who reconnected with Mr. Kelley around that time when he called asking for a job reference. They started chatting occasionally on Facebook, she said, and his posts grew gradually more disturbing until she finally stopped communicating with him this year.At first, Mr. Kelley shared photos of his children and small updates, she said. Then he started complaining about his new wife, and about how his family was trying to get him to take medication. He said he hated his wife, but feared she would leave and take the children, Ms. Edwards said.Law enforcement officials said their rocky relationship may have contributed to the shooting on Sunday.A friend of Mr. Kelley’s mother-in-law, Todd Feltner, said on Friday that the marriage was strained because “Devin was abusing her physically, verbally and mentally.” He added that the mother-in-law told him that Mr. Kelley had threatened her family, too: “He was telling her ‘that he was going to get them.’”Soon, Mr. Kelley’s Facebook conversations turned dark. He started sending Ms. Edwards photos of weapons he had bought and descriptions of killing animals. At first, she brushed it off as the enthusiasm of a hunter in the Texas hill country. But then, she said, he became obsessed with news of Mr. Roof, the 21-year-old who killed nine people in a church in South Carolina in 2015.“He was excited about it. He went on and on and on about it, saying ‘Isn’t it cool? Isn’t it cool?’ Have you watched the videos?’” Ms. Edwards said. She said she told Mr. Kelley that he was not acting normal and needed help.“He told me he would never have the nerve to kill people, he only killed animals,” she said.In 2016 he sent her photos of a new military-style rifle he was building, one that she said looked like the rifle the authorities said he used in the church shooting.This spring, Mr. Kelley’s comments became so disturbing that she unfriended him — something a number of his other friends also said they did.The breaking point came when he told her he was buying dogs online and using them as target practice. “I told him this was not normal, and he needed the kind of help I could not give him,” Ms. Edwards said. “Before I unfriended him, I gave him my number. I told him, ‘If you ever are thinking about hurting yourself or someone else, just call.’”He never called.Now she, like many others in his path, says she cannot help but blame herself for not acting when she saw signs of trouble.On Sunday, she was washing dishes at home when another member of their old squadron texted her. “The shooter, it’s Kelley,” the text said.She dropped the glass in her hands and started crying.
Days After Church Shooting, Texas Town Begins to Bury Its Dead SUTHERLAND SPRINGS, Tex. — In a drizzle-shrouded cemetery, this small town in South Texas that endured one of the most horrific mass shootings in United States history began on Saturday to bury its dead.Mourners gathered on the edge of Sutherland Springs for the funeral of two victims in last Sunday’s massacre: Richard Rodriguez, 64, a retired railroad foreman, and Therese Rodriguez, 66, a retired receptionist at the railroad maintenance company where they both had worked.The married couple was among the 26 parishioners, including children, who were killed by a gunman at First Baptist Church. Convulsing this town of a few hundred people, the mass shooting was the latest of several across the United States.Residents here are bracing for the many more funerals to come.“This has been a trying day — well, a trying week,” Frank Pomeroy, the pastor at First Baptist Church, told the several dozen people gathered on a cemetery hill as he choked back tears.“But remember: God will — no, God has — prevailed,” said the visibly shaken Mr. Pomeroy, whose 14-year-old daughter, Annabelle, died in the shooting.Several hundred people had attended a memorial service on Saturday at Grace Bible Church in the nearby town of La Vernia. As people wept, Erin Weaver, the church’s senior pastor, read from Psalm 23, proclaiming, “Though I walk through the valley of the shadow of death, I will fear no evil.”A display of photographs showed the Rodriguezes throughout their lives. Richard, who was born in Fort Collins, Colo., displayed a scruffy beard and an affection for American flag T-shirts, as well as the music of Carlos Santana and Journey. Therese, who as a child moved from postwar Germany to the United States with her parents, was remembered as a gregarious traveler, breast cancer survivor and faithful parishioner of her church.Friends of Therese said that for pastor appreciation day, she was preparing to give a deer killed by her grandson to Mr. Pomeroy.“They left in a perfect way, together, not having to mourn each other,” Regina Rodriguez, 33, said at the service about her father and stepmother. “Whenever I was having a hard time, if I felt like I was drowning, they were always there to help me,” added Ms. Rodriguez, sobbing at times.People who were gathered for the funeral chatted in Spanish and English, reflecting how the friends and relatives of the couple, like many others in South Texas, mingle Hispanic and Anglo traditions. Children ran around the cemetery while mourners placed flowers on the caskets.“They were two great people and they were always really loving,” said Melanie Picazo, 24, a cousin of Richard who drove three hours from Eagle Pass on Saturday. “It’s very overwhelming,” she said about how Richard and Therese were killed with so many others. “You never think this will happen to you.”The large extended family of Richard and Therese, including numerous grandchildren, sang “Amazing Grace,” the 18th-century hymn written by the English clergyman John Newton. As a light rain coated the burial yard, some grasped hands as they gazed at the caskets and voiced the lyrics:At the service, Mr. Pomeroy said he wanted to remember Richard and Therese as a joyful couple who forged a bond with each other late in life. Both exhibited a sense of humor, Mr. Pomeroy said, recalling a recent occasion when he parked his motorcycle inside the church.“You’re always doing dumb things,” Therese told her pastor. “That’s why I like you.”
A London Meeting of an Unlikely Group: How a Trump Adviser Came to Learn of Clinton ‘Dirt’ WASHINGTON — At midday on March 24, 2016, an improbable group gathered in a London cafe to discuss setting up a meeting between Donald J. Trump, then a candidate, and President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia.There was George Papadopoulos, a 28-year-old from Chicago with an inflated résumé who just days earlier had been publicly named as a foreign policy adviser to Mr. Trump’s campaign. There was Joseph Mifsud, a Maltese academic in his mid-50s with a faltering career who boasted of having high-level contacts in the Russian government.And, perhaps most mysteriously, there was Olga Polonskaya, a 30-year-old Russian from St. Petersburg and the former manager of a wine distribution company. Mr. Mifsud introduced her to Mr. Papadopoulos as Mr. Putin’s niece, according to court papers. Mr. Putin has no niece.The interactions between the three players and a fourth man with contacts inside Russia’s Foreign Ministry have become a central part of the inquiry by the special prosecutor, Robert S. Mueller III, into the Kremlin’s efforts to interfere with the presidential election. Recently released court documents suggest that the F.B.I. suspected that some of the people who showed interest in Mr. Papadopoulos were participants in a Russian intelligence operation.The March 2016 meeting was followed by a breakfast the next month at a London hotel during which Mr. Mifsud revealed to Mr. Papadopoulos that the Russians had “dirt” on Hillary Clinton in the form of “thousands of emails.” That was months before the theft of a trove of emails from the Democratic National Committee by Russian-sponsored hackers became public.Mr. Mueller’s investigators are seeking to determine who — if anyone — in the Trump campaign Mr. Papadopoulos told about the stolen emails. Although there is no evidence that Mr. Papadopoulos emailed that information to the campaign, Mr. Papadopoulos was in regular contact that spring with top campaign officials, including Stephen Miller, now a senior adviser to President Trump, according to interviews and campaign documents reviewed by The New York Times.The revelations about Mr. Papadopoulos’s activities are part of a series of disclosures in the past two weeks about communications between Trump campaign advisers and Russian officials or self-described intermediaries for the Russian government. Taken together, they show not only that the contacts were more extensive than previously known, but also that senior campaign officials were aware of them.Last week, Carter Page, another former foreign policy adviser to the campaign, acknowledged to the House Intelligence Committee that he also had a private conversation with a Russian deputy prime minister on a trip to Moscow in July 2016. Mr. Page, who had previously denied meeting any Russian officials during the trip, said that he had informed at least four campaign officials about his trip beforehand and notified the campaign afterward that the Russian minister had pledged “strong support for Mr. Trump.”Publicly, Mr. Trump and former campaign officials have tried to distance themselves from Mr. Papadopoulos. Although he once praised him as an “excellent guy,” Mr. Trump posted on Twitter that “few people knew the young, low level volunteer named George, who has already proven to be a liar.” Sarah Huckabee Sanders, the White House spokeswoman, said his involvement in the campaign was “extremely limited.”But records and interviews show that in spring 2016, Mr. Papadopoulos was welcomed into the thinly-staffed campaign as a “surrogate” who could articulate the candidate’s views. He even helped edit a major foreign policy speech that Mr. Trump gave in Washington in late April, records indicate.The day before he learned about the hacked emails, Mr. Papadopoulos emailed Mr. Miller, then a senior policy adviser to the campaign, saying Mr. Trump had an “open invitation” from Mr. Putin to visit Russia. The day after, he wrote Mr. Miller that he had “some interesting messages coming in from Moscow about a trip when the time is right.”Those emails were described in court papers unsealed Oct. 30 disclosing that Mr. Papadopoulos had pleaded guilty to lying about his contacts to the F.B.I. But the documents did not identify Mr. Miller by name, citing only a “senior policy adviser.” Neither he nor his lawyer responded on Friday to requests for comment.During interviews with Mr. Mueller’s investigators, former campaign officials now working at the White House have denied having advance knowledge of the stolen emails, according to an official familiar with those discussions. Mr. Miller was among those recently interviewed.Mr. Mifsud’s interest in Mr. Papadopoulos began only after Mr. Papadopoulos had joined the Trump campaign, according to documents released by Mr. Mueller. Mr. Papadopoulos was living in London at the time, hoping to land a full-time job with the campaign, and possibly in a future Trump administration.Stocky and with a receding hairline, Mr. Mifsud boasted of his Russian connections to Mr. Papadopoulos and others. But in interviews, numerous Russia scholars in London and elsewhere said they had never heard of him, and his career had been rocky for years. He had served as the director of two different European institutions with grandiose names but no accreditation, and he had left two jobs dogged by suggestions of financial impropriety.“I remember him as a snake-oil salesman,” recalled Manuel Delia, a former Maltese government official who first encountered him in the late 1990s when Mr. Mifsud was administering a scholarship program. Later, Mr. Mifsud styled himself as an expert in international relations, landing a job in 2012 as director of the London Academy of Diplomacy, a for-profit continuing education program. By early 2016, that academy had shut down.He did not exhibit any special interest or expertise in Russia until 2014, when his academy was beginning to stumble financially. It was at that time a 24-year-old Russian intern, Natalia Kutepova-Jamrom, turned up in his office with an improbably impressive résumé.Fluent in Russian, English, German and Chinese, Ms. Kutepova-Jamrom had worked in the Russian government as a legislative aide and would move on to a Russian state newspaper. Both Mr. Mifsud’s lawyer and Ms. Kutepova-Jamrom declined to comment. Mr. Mifsud did not respond to messages.Ms. Kutepova-Jamrom introduced Mr. Mifsud to senior Russian officials, diplomats and scholars. Despite Mr. Mifsud’s lack of qualifications, she managed to arrange an invitation for him to join the prestigious Valdai Discussion Club, an elite gathering of Western and Russian academics that meets each year with Mr. Putin.Mr. Mifsud’s inclusion in the group was “very, very strange,” said James Sherr, the former head of the Russian studies program at Chatham House in London and a member of Valdai for nearly a decade. It “might suggest he does have connections,” Mr. Sherr said.Mr. Mifsud suddenly became a popular pundit with state-run news outlets in Russia, praising the country and Mr. Putin. At his first Valdai conference in 2014, he argued against Western sanctions that punished Russia for its annexation of Crimea that year.“Global security and economy needs partners, and who is better in this than the Russian Federation,” he said.Among Mr. Mifsud’s most important new contacts was Ivan Timofeev, a graduate of the elite Moscow State Institute of International Relations and a program director for the Valdai conference. Mr. Mifsud would eventually introduce Mr. Timofeev to Mr. Papadopoulos by email in April 2016, and the two men communicated for months about possible meetings between the Trump campaign and Russian government officials.During those exchanges, Mr. Timofeev referred repeatedly to his contacts in Russia’s Ministry of Foreign Affairs, court records show.Reached by phone, Mr. Timofeev declined to comment on his relationships with Mr. Mifsud or Mr. Papadopoulos. But in an interview with the online news website Gazeta.ru in August, he acknowledged corresponding with Mr. Papadopoulos.“At some point, he started asking whether it would be possible to set up a meeting between Trump and Putin or some other high-ranking Russian politicians,” Mr. Timofeev said at the time. “Our conversations made it clear that George was not well acquainted with the Russian foreign political landscape. You obviously can’t just go and set up a meeting with the president, for instance. Things just aren’t done that way.”Exactly how Mr. Mifsud first met Ms. Polonskaya, the Russian woman who attended the London cafe meeting in March 2016, is unclear.In a recent interview with the Italian newspaper La Repubblica, Mr. Mifsud said the Russian woman who met Mr. Papadopoulos was “a simple student, very beautiful.” He suggested Mr. Papadopoulos hoped for a romantic involvement, adding, “Putin had nothing to do with it, a lovely invention.”Mr. Mifsud did not reveal her name in that interview — and court records do not identify her — but The Times identified her through emails, interviews and other records.Ms. Polonskaya did not respond to emails from The Times this week. After Politico identified her on Thursday by her maiden name, Vinogradova, her brother, Sergei Vinogradov, spoke to The Times on her behalf.He said she was in London discussing a possible internship with Mr. Mifsud, a friend of hers, the morning before the meeting with Mr. Papadopoulos. He insisted that she had no connections to the Russian government and never portrayed herself as Mr. Putin’s niece, despite the court records unsealed by Mr. Mueller.He said that she only exchanged pleasantries with Mr. Papadopoulos, and that she understood only about half of the discussion between Mr. Mifsud and Mr. Papadopoulos. He shared a text message from her in which she explained to him the reason: “Because my English was bad,” it read.“It’s totally ridiculous,” Mr. Vinogradov said. “She’s not interested in politics. She can barely tell the difference between Lenin and Stalin.”
For Alabama Women, Disgust, Fatigue and a Sense Moore Could Win Anyway VESTAVIA HILLS, Ala. — Sallie Gunter, 61, a freelance court reporter, was having breakfast with her friend Lisa Hicks, 44, a legal assistant, at Panera Bread when the subject of Roy S. Moore came up. It felt like revisiting a recurring bad dream.“How am I processing it?” Ms. Gunter said. “I do a lot of work with gender discrimination and sexual discrimination so I need to carefully word this. I just would probably say where there’s smoke, there’s usually fire.”Both women considered themselves independents who have voted for both Democrats and Republicans, although Ms. Hicks said she leaned Republican. And Ms. Gunter said she had gone to high school with Mr. Moore’s Democratic opponent, Doug Jones, and would be voting for him.But like many in urban and suburban Alabama, the two women viewed the allegations reported by The Washington Post that Mr. Moore had made sexual overtures to teenagers decades ago not so much as a discrete scandal. Rather, it felt to them like the latest episode in a tawdry political sideshow with seemingly endless chapters.“We’ve spent millions in Alabama on Roy Moore’s antics,” Ms. Gunter said. “Millions that could have been spent on our kids and schools. I’m just fed up. He needs to find something to do for people who adore him.’’Alabama is not Virginia, and the political leanings of suburban women do not have the same political weight here as they did Tuesday in Virginia. Census statistics show that Alabama’s voting age population is, on balance, whiter, poorer and less educated than the nation’s. Like many other Republican candidates in statewide elections in the South, Mr. Moore draws much of his political strength from rural areas, which still have enormous clout. Still, 47 percent of the state’s active registered voters are concentrated in its seven most populous counties.And in this upper-middle-class suburb of Birmingham, a place of establishment Republicans, moderate Democrats and true swing voters, women interviewed about Mr. Moore, for the most part, said the allegations came less as a shocking bolt from the blue than as just one more reason not to like a man they never much cared for in the first place.“He’s just embarrassing,” Ms. Gunter said.“He’s embarrassing,” Ms. Hicks repeated.Still, the race holds hard choices for many. Rhonda Beacham, 64, a retired kindergarten teacher, described herself as a firm Christian who believes there is a place for the Ten Commandments in the judicial sphere. Yet she voted for Luther Strange, Mr. Moore’s opponent in the Republican primary. She considered Mr. Moore — the man who famously refused to take down a statue of the commandments at the State Supreme Court building — a “showman” and a “Barnum & Bailey of the 21st century.”“He knows he can get votes in Alabama if he shows himself to be some Christian religious person,” she said.She was skeptical about the report in The Post. “Why haven’t we heard about all this before?” she said. “Because this clown’s been around a long time.”Ms. Beacham is anti-abortion, and would prefer to see the Republicans continue to maintain control of the Senate. She is no fan of the Affordable Care Act, which she blames for an increase in her monthly health insurance payment.She did not feel as if she had much of a choice in the coming election. She said it reminded her of the presidential contest, when she wrote in Condoleezza Rice. “I wanted a woman,” she said. “But I didn’t want Hillary.”She held out the possibility of voting for Mr. Jones, but only because he wasn’t Roy Moore. But Mr. Moore, she said, would probably win, “because of the way he exploits Christianity” and, she added half-joking, that the allegations were coming from a “Yankee paper.”“I mean, who’s going to believe that?” she said, chortling.Also uncertain was Susie Frazier, 56, who was finishing a meal at a fast-food restaurant with her husband, Ed, on Friday morning. They had voted for Mr. Moore in the Republican primary, they said, but not because they had any great love for him: Mr. Frazier said they had largely voted against Mr. Strange because they had received so many of his annoying robocalls.Ms. Frazier said that she had liked Mr. Moore well enough. She called herself a conservative, but not an extremist. She and her husband had both voted for President Trump, though Mr. Frazier said they were disappointed thus far. It seemed, he said, that Mr. Trump’s swamp-draining skills were not as potent as he had promised.Ms. Frazier seemed unsure what to think about the allegations, and was not sure whom she would vote for in December. “I’m just trying to see what happens with all of this,” she said, “and if there’s someone better.”Gwen Williams, 63, the head of business development for a technology company, was having breakfast with two female friends Friday morning who declined to be identified. The friends did not want to talk about Mr. Moore — one of them said she had many family members who were passionate supporters of Mr. Moore, and speaking out against him would cause too much grief.“I’m not going to talk to you,” the woman said. “My relatives would go nuts.”Ms. Williams described herself as a conservative Christian and a Bush Republican who voted for Mr. Trump with no great zeal, but rather, she said, “because ‘none of the above’ was not on the ballot.”She summed up her response to the allegations with the words “nausea” and “disgust,” particularly the allegations that he had engaged in sexual touching with a 14-year-old when he was in his 30s.“Even in Alabama that’s illegal,” Ms. Williams said. “It’s called statutory rape.”Then again, Ms. Williams, who lives in rural Chilton County south of Birmingham, had never been a Roy Moore fan. She said she would “absolutely” be voting for Mr. Jones, but she was not so sure about her neighbors. “I’ve lived here all my life, but I don’t have a lot of confidence in my fellow voters making that shift,” she said. And at this point, she had no idea whether Mr. Moore could pull out a win. “It depends where the story goes,” she said. “This is the Bible Belt, and a 14-year-old is a 14-year-old is a 14-year-old.”Not everyone was overly concerned. Susan Remick, 48, a principal at an elementary school, said: “This all happened many years ago, correct? I honestly think we’re paying too much attention to it.” Ms. Remick, a Republican, said there were many more pressing problems. And the fact that the allegations were so old bothered her. “I’m a little disappointed in society right now,” she said. “It ultimately hurts somebody’s reputation. If it were true at the time, it should have been addressed at the time.”Still, whatever their views of the allegations, many seemed to think that Mr. Moore had an excellent chance of becoming Alabama’s next senator.Susie Barganier, 55, a worker at Redbox, the movie rental company, was waiting for her color treatment at a busy hair salon. “I’m not sure what to make of it,” she said of the allegations. It seemed, she said, that so many women were coming out with so many allegations these days. “But the fact that she was 14 and he was 32, I have a problem with. But I don’t like Roy Moore anyway.”She also thought the allegations would not hurt Mr. Moore’s chances in December. “Probably not,” she said. “Not in Alabama.”
Silence Lifts in State Houses as Harassment Scandals Bring Swift Penalties Beneath the wave of sexual misconduct allegations in recent weeks against male lawmakers and candidates lies a common theme: These offenses had been going on for decades, but were either unacknowledged or dealt with quietly.Now, veils of silence in legislative chambers are lifting as public disavowals and calls for resignations pour in against the accused, even from fellow party members.Roiling the political world in the last week was a report in The Washington Post that four women had accused Roy S. Moore, the Republican nominee for a United States Senate seat in Alabama, of sexual or romantic advances when he was in his 30s and they were teenagers, one as young as 14.While many Republican officials in Alabama have come to Mr. Moore’s defense, a chorus of others — including the president, vice president and Senator Mitch McConnell, the majority leader — immediately called on the candidate to step aside if the allegations were true. The Senate campaign arm of the party cut its fund-raising agreement with him, and some two Republican senators have rescinded their endorsements.But as the debate over Mr. Moore, who called the allegations “completely false,” plays out on a national scale, a blitz of scandals has also hit statehouses from California to Florida, where accusations that might have been ignored in the past are drawing aggressive responses. And those accused have found themselves with few colleagues to back them up in public.“There’s not the sense of trying to defend these guys in the same way,” said Debbie Walsh, director of the Center for Women and American Politics at Rutgers University. “I don’t know if all of these men really get it or if now at least they know they’d better get it.”Women continue to come forward, writing public letters about abuses ranging from lewd comments to groping, and joining others in a wide range of industries where powerful figures have been toppled, seemingly by the week, in the wake of the Harvey Weinstein scandal. As a result, legislators have resigned or have been removed from posts, sexual harassment policies have been revised, women’s caucuses have been formed, and broad investigations have kicked into gear.So far, many of the accused have held on to their seats — if not their stature. Some of the accusers have raised questions about whether they are witnessing the beginning of a systemic change or a short-lived political Band-Aid.“Now they’re doing this because — why?” asked Denise Rotheimer, a political activist and Republican candidate for the Illinois House of Representatives. She complained last year that State Senator Ira Silverstein, the chairman of the Democratic majority caucus, had sent her midnight messages and asked numerous personal questions when she tried to work with him on a bill. “Because the media grabbed onto this? Because now it’s public? Because there’s nothing different from my complaint in November last year to my testimony this year.”Ms. Rotheimer testified publicly late last month at a state legislative hearing on a fast-moving measure addressing sexual harassment; within a day Mr. Silverstein had resigned his leadership position, though he disputed the charges, according to The Chicago Tribune. (Messages left with his office were not returned.) Lawmakers then moved quickly to appoint an interim legislative inspector general to lead the office charged with receiving and investigating complaints, after the position had sat vacant for about three years.The upheaval in Illinois is just one of many in recent days. And with so many allegations, the speed of repercussions has picked up.This month, the speaker of the Kentucky House of Representatives, Jeff Hoover, was reported to have secretly settled with a staff member over claims of sexual harassment. The Republican governor, Matt Bevin, and eight of Mr. Hoover’s fellow Republicans in the House demanded his resignation. Last week, Mr. Hoover stepped down as speaker, though he remained in his House seat. Three other Republican lawmakers — who were also named in the Oct. 25 settlement, The Courier-Journal of Louisville, Ky., reported — were removed from their committee leadership posts pending an investigation.The president of the Florida Senate ordered an independent investigation and  took a powerful chairmanship post from State Senator Jack Latvala, a fellow Republican, who last week was accused of inappropriately touching or making derogatory comments by several women who work at the State Capitol.On Wednesday, MinnPost, an online news site, reported that several women had described Minnesota State Senator Dan Schoen, a Democrat, making unwanted advances or even grabbing them, prompting immediate calls for his resignation from his fellow lawmakers, including the Senate minority leader and Gov. Mark Dayton, both Democrats. (Mr. Schoen, in a statement, said the allegations were “either completely false or have been taken far out of context.”)And The Denver Post reported on Friday that Representative Steve Lebsock, a Democrat in the Colorado House, had been accused of sexual harassment by his colleague and fellow party member Faith Winter. House Speaker Crisanta Duran, also a Democrat, quickly urged Mr. Lebsock to step down, and he later apologized for “offending” Ms. Winter.Both political parties have had to reckon with sexual misconduct allegations as an urgent threat to their power.“This is a real issue and you want to do the right thing,” said Kent Redfield, a professor emeritus of political science at the University of Illinois at Springfield. In Illinois, Democrats have controlled both chambers in the State Legislature since 2003. “But it is also a potentially very damning political issue when the Democrats have been in charge.”That dynamic is now in play in Kentucky, where Republicans won complete control of the Legislature last year for the first time in nearly a century. The Democrats they ousted were only two years removed from a sexual harassment scandal that led to the resignation of a Democratic state representative, John Arnold.So when the Republican House majority leader, Jonathan Shell, insisted on the caucus’s full support for Mr. Hoover in the days after news broke of the sexual harassment settlement, the partisan backstop was unlikely to hold.“I’m not going to condone or justify inappropriate behavior between membership and staff,” said Representative Robert Benvenuti, a Republican who was a member of the panel investigating Mr. Arnold in 2014.This month, he was among the eight lawmakers publicly demanding the resignation of Mr. Hoover and others. Mr. Hoover admitted to the settlement in a news conference last week, though he said that the behavior — consisting of “inappropriate text messages”— was consensual and that he was stepping down as speaker mainly to keep the Legislature’s focus on a hotly debated pension crisis.Mr. Benvenuti and his colleagues still maintain that the only acceptable resolution is the resignation of Mr. Hoover and of the other legislators involved.“There is enough distrust and thoughts of hypocrisy about people in government,” Mr. Benvenuti said. “We’ve got to do our best in gaining some trust back.”
Full Transcript of Trump’s Remarks on Russia President Trump spoke to reporters aboard Air Force One on his way to Hanoi, Vietnam, where he attended a state dinner Saturday evening. While talking to the reporters, he was asked about his private meeting with Russian President Vladimir V. Putin on the sideline of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation summit meeting in Danang, Vietnam. Mr. Trump said Mr. Putin was sincere in his denials of Russian interference in the 2016 presidential election, and that questions about Moscow’s meddling were a politically motivated “hit job.”Following is a transcript of those comments, as prepared by the White House. It has been lightly edited for clarity.Read more coverage »___________REPORTER: How were your discussions with Vladimir Putin? Did you discuss Syria? And apparently they’ve issued a joint statement that —TRUMP: We issued a joint statement. We’re going to be — have you seen the statement yet?SARAH HUCKABEE SANDERS, White House press secretary: It’s going out — it’s on the way.TRUMP: So I think it’ll go out. You’ll see it in a little while.SANDERS: It may be out, now that you guys — now that we’re in the air.TRUMP: It’s going to save tremendous numbers of lives. And we did that very quickly. We agreed very quickly.As you know, we saw each other last night just for a picture, and that was the first time. And then today we had a round table with numerous countries. You have a list of the countries, obviously. Right? You have a list.And we spoke intermittently during that round table. We seem to have a very good feeling for each other and a good relationship considering we don’t know each other well. I think it’s a very good relationship.We had two or three very short conversations because of the meeting, the fact that we’re at a meeting. But during those conversations, we talked about Syria and de-conflicting, etc. You know, we have areas where troops are facing — our troops — I mean, their troops are facing our troops and there’s nothing in between.And we issued a statement — a joint statement. It was just approved, and I think people are going to be extremely happy with it and also very impressed with it.REPORTER: Did Russia’s attempts to meddle in U.S. elections come up in the conversation?TRUMP: He said he didn’t meddle. He said he didn’t meddle. I asked him again. You can only ask so many times. But I just asked him again, and he said he absolutely did not meddle in our election. He did not do what they’re saying he did. And he said —REPORTER: Do you believe him?TRUMP: Well, look, I can’t stand there and argue with him. I’d rather have him get out of Syria, to be honest with you. I’d rather have him — you know, work with him on the Ukraine than standing and arguing about whether or not — because that whole thing was set up by the Democrats.I mean, they ought to look at Podesta. They ought to look at all of the things that they’ve done with the phony dossier. Those are the big events. Those are the big events.But Putin said he did not do what they said he did. And, you know, there are those that say, if he did do it, he wouldn’t have gotten caught, all right? Which is a very interesting statement. But we have a — you know, we have a good feeling toward getting things done.If we had a relationship with Russia, that would be a good thing. In fact, it would be a great thing, not a bad thing. Because he could really help us in North Korea. We have a big problem with North Korea. And China is helping us. And because of the lack of a relationship that we have with Russia because of this artificial thing that’s happening with this Democratic-inspired thing, we could really be helped a lot, tremendously, with Russia having to do with North Korea.And, you know, you’re talking about millions and millions of lives. This isn’t baby stuff. This is the real deal. And if Russia helped us, in addition to China, that problem would go away a lot faster.REPORTER: How did you bring up the issue of election meddling? Did you ask him a question?TRUMP: He just — every time he sees me, he says, “I didn’t do that.” And I believe — I really believe that when he tells me that, he means it. But he says, “I didn’t do that.” I think he’s very insulted by it, if you want to know the truth.Don’t forget, all he said is he never did that, he didn’t do that. I think he’s very insulted by it, which is not a good thing for our country. Because again, if we had a relationship with Russia, North Korea — which is our single biggest problem right now — North Korea, it would be helped a lot. I think I’m doing very well with respect to China. They’ve cut off financing; they’ve cut off bank lines; they’ve cut off lots of oil and lots of other things, lots of trade. And it’s having a big impact. But Russia, on the other hand, may be making up the difference. And if they are, that’s not a good thing.So having a relationship with Russia would be a great thing — not a good thing — it would be a great thing, especially as it relates to North Korea.And I’ll say this, Hillary had her stupid reset button that she spelled the word wrong, but she doesn’t have what it takes to have that kind of a relationship where you could call or you could do something and they would pull back from North Korea, or they’d pull back from Syria, or maybe pull back from Ukraine. I mean, if we could solve the Ukraine problem —But this is really an artificial barrier that’s put in front of us for solving problems with Russia, and he says that very strongly. He really seems to be insulted by it, and he says he didn’t do it. So —REPORTER: (Inaudible) do you believe him —TRUMP: Excuse me?REPORTER: Even if he (inaudible) one-on-one, do you believe him?TRUMP: I think that he is very, very strong in the fact that he didn’t do it. And then you look, and you look at what’s going on with Podesta, and you look at what’s going on with the server from the D.N.C. and why didn’t the F.B.I. take it, why did they leave it, why did a third party look at the server and not the FBI — if you look at all of this stuff, and you say, what’s going on here?And then you hear it’s 17 agencies. Well, it’s three. And one is Brennan and one is whatever. I mean, give me a break. They’re political hacks.So you look at it — I mean, you have Brennan, you have Clapper, and you have Comey. Comey is proven now to be a liar and he’s proven to be a leaker.So you look at that, and you have President Putin very strongly, vehemently says he had nothing to do with that. Now, you’re not going to get into an argument. You’re going to start talking about Syria and the Ukraine.
Marine Drill Instructor Gets 10 Years for Tormenting Recruits RALEIGH, N.C. — A Marine Corps drill instructor was sentenced on Friday to 10 years in prison for choking, punching or otherwise tormenting recruits, especially three Muslims — one of whom ultimately killed himself by leaping down a stairwell.A military jury handed out the punishment to Gunnery Sgt. Joseph Felix one day after convicting him of abusing more than a dozen trainees at the Marine boot camp at Parris Island, S.C.Among other things, he taunted the Muslims as “terrorists” or “ISIS” and ordered two of them to climb into an industrial clothes dryer, spinning one of them around in the scorching machine until he renounced his faith, the jury decided.Sergeant Felix, 34, a veteran of the Iraq War, was also ordered to forfeit all pay, demoted to private and given a dishonorable discharge.Sergeant Felix was a central figure in what was found to be a group of abusive drill instructors at Parris Island. After the March 2016 suicide at the base, a hazing investigation led to charges against him, five other drill instructors and the training battalion’s commanding officer. Eleven others faced lesser discipline.Abusive drill instructors have long been stock characters in books and movies like “Full Metal Jacket.” But that 1987 film was set during the Vietnam War, and the Felix trial shows that since then the Marines have drawn clearer lines between what instructors can and cannot do, said Michael Hanzel, a former Navy lawyer who attended the proceedings at Camp Lejeune, N.C.“This generation now, there’s things that I think that we’re much more focused on. In particular, in this trial, it’s calling people names based on their religion and targeting people based on their religion,” said Mr. Hanzel, now a lawyer in private practice specializing in military law. “I don’t think anyone would say that was acceptable ever, but it probably was not prosecuted in the past the way it would be now.”The charges against Sergeant Felix included commanding recruits to choke one another; ordering them to drink chocolate milk and then training them until they vomited; and punching recruits in the face or kicking them to the ground.“He wasn’t making Marines. He was breaking Marines,” Lt. Col. John Norman, a prosecutor, told the jury on Wednesday. He called Sergeant Felix a bully who heaped special abuse on three Muslim recruits because of their faith.One of them, Raheel Siddiqui, 20, a Pakistani-American from Taylor, Mich., hurled himself to his death after what the jury decided was mistreatment by Sergeant Felix that included slapping Mr. Siddiqui and calling him a terrorist. Mr. Siddiqui’s family sued the Marine Corps last month for $100 million.The government did not charge Sergeant Felix with any crime directly related to Mr. Siddiqui’s death. The judge, Lt. Col. Michael Libretto, did not allow testimony about whether Sergeant Felix’s actions were responsible for the recruit’s suicide.Sergeant Felix also was convicted of ordering Lance Cpl. Ameer Bourmeche into a dryer, which then was turned on as Felix demanded, “Are you still Muslim?” Lance Corporal Bourmeche testified that he twice affirmed his faith and that Sergeant Felix and another drill instructor twice sent him for a bruising, scorching tumble inside the machine.After a third spin, Lance Corporal Bourmeche said, he feared for his life and renounced his religion. The drill instructors then let him out, he said.Sergeant Felix was found guilty as well of ordering Lance Corporal Bourmeche to simulate chopping off the head of a fellow Marine while reciting “God is great” in Arabic.The jury decided Sergeant Felix also ordered Rekan Hawez, a native of Iraqi Kurdistan, to climb into the dryer. The machine was never turned on.Sergeant Felix was convicted, too, of rousing nearly two dozen recruits from their sleep, ordering them to lie on the floor, and then walking on them along with two other drill instructors.In a closing statement on Wednesday, Navy Lt. Cmdr. Daniel Bridges, a defense lawyer, said the government unfairly fashioned contradictory witness accounts into a case against the brawny drill instructor who called all recruits “terrorist.”
Russia Scandal Befalls Two Brothers: John and Tony Podesta WASHINGTON — One is a rail-thin liberal idealist who spent his career in government, on campaigns and at think tanks. The other is an overweight pragmatist who made a fortune lobbying for all manner of liberal boogeymen.And now, in a twist with Shakespearean undertones, the two influential Washington brothers have found themselves on opposite sides of the scandals over Russian interference in the 2016 election.John D. Podesta, perhaps more than anyone except Hillary Clinton, was a victim of the Russian cyberassault on allies of her presidential campaign, of which he was the chairman. Emails stolen from his personal Gmail account were dribbled out by WikiLeaks last fall, revealing the embarrassing rifts roiling the campaign and Washington’s Democratic establishment. He has pushed hard for an aggressive investigation of Russia’s role in the election.Mr. Podesta’s older brother, Tony Podesta, has been ensnared in the investigation by Robert S. Mueller III, the special counsel, into Russia’s meddling in the race and whether it involved any associates of President Trump. The efforts by his firm, the Podesta Group, to win support for the agenda of Viktor F. Yanukovych, the Russia-aligned former president of Ukraine, were cited in an indictment handed down last month against two former campaign aides to Mr. Trump, Paul Manafort and Rick Gates, who arranged the Ukrainian lobbying work.Neither Tony Podesta nor anyone at the Podesta Group has been publicly charged in the case. But Mr. Mueller has subpoenaed the firm and its employees for documents and testimony related to their work and interviewed roughly half a dozen people about Tony Podesta’s involvement. And as the Podesta Group has withered under the scrutiny, its employees were informed in a tearful meeting on Thursday that they may stop receiving paychecks after next week, according to people in attendance.For some Democrats, there is little question over who deserves the most sympathy.“Sure, the Clinton campaign made some mistakes, but that’s not like representing a dictatorship,” said James Carville, who has known John Podesta for years through Democratic political circles. Mr. Carville said he was less acquainted with Tony Podesta, but added that “by reputation, you can’t put them in the same book. John is one of the straightest guys I know. Everybody says, ‘Can you believe that those guys are brothers?’”Mr. Trump, for his part, went after both brothers last month, lumping them together as emblematic of “the swamp” of Washington special interests against which he campaigned.In fact, the Podesta brothers, who were raised in a modest two-flat on Chicago’s northwest side by a Greek-American mother and an Italian-American father, represent very different strains of a Washington establishment now under attack from left and right.John Podesta, 68, served as a top White House aide to the last two Democratic presidents, Bill Clinton and Barack Obama, and was believed  to be in line as White House chief of staff if Mrs. Clinton had won the presidency. In between campaign and White House stints, John Podesta helped to create and run some of the leading institutions on the American left, including the Center for American Progress think tank, and provided policy and political advice to generations of Democratic politicians and operatives.Tony Podesta, 74, built one of the highest-grossing lobbying firms in Washington, signing clients across industries and ideologies — including defense contractors like Lockheed Martin, banks like Wells Fargo, drug makers like Mylan and foreign regimes like the government of the former Egyptian dictator Hosni Mubarak. Tony Podesta is known for his fund-raising — in 2016, he donated or raised nearly $900,000 for Mrs. Clinton’s campaign and the Democratic Party — as well as for a lavish lifestyle.Had Mrs. Clinton prevailed, as official Washington expected, it most likely would have cemented the legacies of both brothers — John Podesta as a key confidant to presidents and one of the most important Democratic strategists of the past century, and Tony Podesta as the go-to lobbyist for Democratic administrations. Instead, the Podestas have been drawn into the vortex of investigations and conspiracy theories that have enveloped Washington in the Trump era.Tony Podesta stepped down from his firm hours after it was obliquely referenced in the indictments of Mr. Manafort and Mr. Gates, though he had been in talks about leaving for months. It is unclear what will happen to his investment in the Podesta Group, which has been hemorrhaging clients and employees, both because of the mounting scrutiny and because businesses are looking for lobbyists with connections to the Trump administration, according to interviews and lobbying filings. Some firm partners are starting a new firm next month called Cogent Strategies, in which Tony Podesta will have no stake.Last week’s indictment did not name the Podesta Group or another firm with which it worked on the Ukraine account, Mercury Public Affairs. Instead, the indictment referred to them as “two Washington, D.C., firms” that were recruited by Mr. Manafort and Mr. Gates.While both firms disclosed the work to Congress under less-rigorous domestic lobbying rules, they did not initially register under the Foreign Agents Registration Act. The indictment alleges that was done intentionally — by routing the money through a Brussels-based nonprofit — “to minimize public disclosure of their lobbying campaign” that “was under the ultimate direction” of Mr. Yanukovych, his party and his government.Tony Podesta and his lawyers are working to navigate the issues raised by the Mueller investigation and accompanying attacks from the right. They have already demanded a retraction from the conservative news media on claims that both Podestas worked with Mr. Manafort to advance Russian interests.John Podesta, for his part, has dedicated his time since the election to trying to expose the connections between Mr. Trump, his associates and Russia.After the postelection publication of a dossier by a former British spy into those connections — which included some salacious claims — John Podesta met with Glenn Simpson, the co-founder of the firm that commissioned the opposition research, to compare notes on Russia’s involvement, according to an associate of Mr. Podesta.During the general election season, the firm’s research was funded by the Clinton campaign and the Democratic National Committee, though John Podesta has told congressional investigators that he had no knowledge of those payments. The associate said the meeting came as Mr. Simpson was considering whether, and how, his firm could continue its Russia-related Trump research. A spokeswoman for Mr. Simpson’s firm, Fusion GPS, declined to comment.John Podesta has helped raise millions of dollars from major donors with whom he has personal and financial relationships — including the San Francisco mortgage billionaire Herbert Sandler — for nonprofits fighting the Trump administration. With funding from Mr. Sandler, he helped begin a group called Democracy Forward that is suing the Trump team on a number of fronts, including at least one lawsuit intended partly to reveal whether Mr. Trump’s aides tried to influence the Russia investigation.John Podesta “could have gone into a bunker and vanished, but instead he dedicated himself to fighting this,” said Faiz Shakir, who worked for him at the Center for American Progress and serves with him on the board of Democracy Forward. “He is very driven by exacting some measure of justice for the unscrupulous form of politics that was utilized against him and his side,” said Mr. Shakir, who considers Mr. Podesta a mentor.Both brothers declined interview requests through their representatives. But John Podesta provided a written response to a question about whether he saw it as tragic — or at least ironic — that the Russia investigation for which he has been advocating has ensnared his brother.“The only tragedy is that Donald Trump is president and got there with the Russians’ help,” he said. “That’s a tragedy for the American people.”For both John and Tony Podesta, the connections with Democratic politics began at an early age. In 1970, they worked together on the Rev. Joseph D. Duffey’s antiwar Senate campaign in Connecticut, for which Tony Podesta served as a top official, and his younger brother — as well as Bill and Hillary Clinton — were volunteers.Over the next 23 years, the brothers’ paths intertwined. They wove in and out of campaigns and car-pooled together to Georgetown University’s law school, from which they both earned degrees in 1976. Tony Podesta joined the United States attorney’s office in Washington, while John Podesta went to work at the Justice Department.After a few years, the brothers left those jobs — John Podesta joining the Democratic staff of the Senate Judiciary Committee, and Tony Podesta becoming the founding president of the liberal advocacy group People for the American Way.In 1987, the brothers teamed up to create a lobbying and public relations firm called Podesta Associates, which was seen as having a liberal bearing, representing a mix of public interest groups and media companies and associations. But after Mr. Clinton won the presidency in 1992 — a campaign for which both Podestas worked — the brothers’ paths diverged once and for all. John Podesta took a job in the White House and divested his stake in the firm, which Tony Podesta pointed in a less ideological direction.By President Obama’s second year in office, domestic lobbying revenues for the Podesta Group had risen to more than $29 million, buoyed in part by the perception of access to the new administration.The brothers remained close, even as their lifestyles took different paths.Tony Podesta moved into a 7,000-square-foot house in Washington’s exclusive Kalorama neighborhood, which he had bought for $3.9 million in addition to his homes in Australia and Venice. After three years of renovations, he turned it into a fund-raising hot spot with a modern art collection and a wine cellar with thousands of bottles. His divorce from his second wife, 26 years his junior, was widely chronicled in Washington.John Podesta, who remains married to the mother of his three children, lives in a relatively modest house near American University in Northwest Washington, where his clan makes a habit of getting together for home cooked pasta.In the end, said Lanny Davis, who has known both Podestas since the Duffey campaign, the brothers have much in common.“Tony Podesta may have clients that are way to the right of him in politics,” he said, “but neither John nor Tony Podesta, no matter who their clients are, have withdrawn one inch from being liberal Democrats with progressive values.”
Emergency Manager Resigns in Puerto Rico; Army Ends Its Mission SAN JUAN — The head of Puerto Rico’s emergency management agency resigned Friday, the same day that the Army general in charge of the military’s response to the hurricane announced that his mission on the island had ended.The moves came as Puerto Rico tries to shift away from the emergency phase of its hurricane response, and just a day after a widespread power failure underscored the enormous challenges that remain. More than 2,000 people are still in shelters, and the power grid is operating at 41 percent capacity, 52 days after the storm.Lt. Gen. Jeffrey Buchanan arrived in Puerto Rico about a week after Hurricane Maria pummeled the island, in the midst of fierce criticism of the federal response. He quickly acknowledged that not enough federal troops were on the island and vowed to do more to help Puerto Rico.On Friday, he said the federal government had distributed 51 million gallons of water and 20 million meals and had tended to 5,000 sick residents.He said that the military’s missions, primarily clearing roads, attending to medical emergencies and helping restore communications, were complete. Other agencies, like the National Guard and Federal Emergency Management Agency, would continue the work. Some military officials would remain on the island to wind down operations.“FEMA is going to be here, very much for the long term and the rebuilding,” General Buchanan said. “We in the military generally don’t do that.”Shortly afterward, the government announced that Abner Gómez, the commissioner of the Puerto Rico Emergency Management Agency, had resigned.It was unclear whether Mr. Gómez’s resignation was an indication that the government had recognized a failure in its response to Hurricane Maria, or that he had simply lost influence at the agency. Mr. Gómez’s profile had diminished this year when the governor created a cabinet position over him. He had not been a visible figure since the storm and rarely appeared at news conferences.In his resignation letter, Mr. Gómez acknowledged that the recovery had largely been assigned to someone else, so he was stepping down to let his new supervisor, the secretary of public safety, name his own team.Mr. Gómez did not respond to requests for comment.On Thursday, Gov. Ricardo A. Rosselló asked his cabinet to sign undated letters of resignation. Mr. Rosselló has vowed to eliminate 100 agencies and many members of the cabinet are going to find themselves without jobs, he said.“We had an emergency phase where practically all of us were sustaining lives,” he said. “We are now entering a recovery phase,” and for that, he said, he needs a more nimble government.Oscar Ramiro, the head chef of a popular bakery in San Juan, said that Mr. Gómez was not the only official who had shown himself unable to address the destruction of Hurricane Maria. Others should also resign or be replaced, starting at the top, said Mr. Ramiro, who still has no power at his house in Rio Piedras, a San Juan neighborhood.“He’s been pretty incompetent,” he said of Mr. Gómez. “The governor entrusted him with this responsibility, which means that ultimately, the problem is the governor.”
State Department to Offer Buyouts in Effort to Cut Staff WASHINGTON — The State Department will soon offer a $25,000 buyout to diplomats and staff members who quit or take early retirements by April, officials confirmed on Friday.The decision is part of Secretary of State Rex W. Tillerson’s continuing effort to cut the ranks of diplomats and Civil Service officers despite bipartisan resistance in Congress. Mr. Tillerson’s goal is to reduce a department of nearly 25,000 full-time American employees by 8 percent, which amounts to 1,982 people.To reach that number, he has already frozen hiring, reduced promotions, asked some senior employees to perform clerical duties that are normally relegated to lower-level staff members, refused to fill many ambassadorships and senior leadership jobs, and fired top diplomats from coveted posts while offering low-level assignments in their place. Those efforts have crippled morale worldwide.Still, State Department accountants have told Mr. Tillerson that only about 1,341 people are expected to retire or quit by the end of September 2018, the date by which Mr. Tillerson has promised to complete the first round of cuts.Indeed, rumors of a buyout have reduced the number of departures expected this year. So $25,000 will be given to the first 641 employees who agree to leave by April, a representative from the State Department confirmed on Friday.For top diplomats, a $25,000 buyout — which taxes would probably reduce to about $16,000 — is not enough to change career plans, so many have already left. The number of those carrying the department’s top two ranks — equivalent to four- and three-star generals — has dropped almost in half, from 39 to 21. And nearly 20 percent of those with two-star-equivalent ranks have signaled their intention to leave in what is an unprecedented exodus, according to an accounting provided by the American Foreign Service Association.“Where is the mandate to pull the foreign service team from the field and forfeit the game to our adversaries?” Barbara Stephenson, the union’s president, asked in a letter to membership this week.Mr. Tillerson is in the middle of a departmentwide reorganization, an effort he has called his most important priority. But the staff reductions have nothing to do with that overhaul, according to those briefed on the plans.Because the buyouts are voluntary, many who take the money and leave are likely to have skills or be in jobs that Mr. Tillerson is hoping to maintain or increase in a reorganized department.Instead, the cutbacks are meant to make a down payment on the 31 percent budget cut that President Trump proposed for the department this year. That Congress rejected that suggestion and largely maintained the department’s budget has not affected Mr. Tillerson’s plans, a fact that is likely to infuriate many on Capitol Hill.“These actions are going to harm our security and our ability to lead on the global stage,” said Representative Eliot L. Engel of New York, the senior Democrat on the House Foreign Affairs Committee.In September, when the Senate Appropriations Committee unanimously approved a bill to maintain the department’s funding at prior levels, Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, issued a statement, saying, “Now is not the time for retreat, now is the time to double down on diplomacy and development.”But Mr. Trump has repeatedly indicated that he wants fewer diplomats.Asked about the many vacancies at the State Department, Mr. Trump said in an interview with Laura Ingraham of Fox News: “You know, don’t forget, I’m a businessperson and I tell my people, ‘When you don’t need to fill slots, don’t fill them.’ But we have some people that I’m not happy with there.”Pressed about critical positions like the assistant secretary of state, Mr. Trump responded in a statement that has since reverberated around the State Department. “The one that matters is me,” he said. “I’m the only one that matters because, when it comes to it, that’s what the policy is going to be.”Similarly, when President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia forced the United States in July to reduce its diplomatic personnel by 755, Mr. Trump said he was grateful.“I want to thank him because we’re trying to cut down on payroll, and as far as I’m concerned, I’m very thankful that he let go of a large number of people, because now we have a smaller payroll,” Mr. Trump told reporters at his golf club in Bedminster, N.J.Mr. Tillerson has sharply pared down the number of briefings he receives from senior diplomats as well as the number of people who normally travel with the secretary of state. As a result, Mr. Tillerson has had repeated gaffes in foreign capitals. He is also wildly unpopular in the State Department, and the president is rumored to be eager to replace him.Some employees will not be eligible for the buyouts, including many members of the security, information technology, medical and building staffs, areas in which the department is trying to hire more people or is offering bonuses for them to stay.
Clampdown on University of Michigan Fraternities After Reports of Sexual Misconduct and Alcohol Abuse Parties and pledging activities at most of University of Michigan’s fraternities have been suspended, the university said on Friday, the latest in a wave of efforts across the country to tamp down on fraternity excesses leading to sexual misconduct, alcohol and drug abuse and deaths.The student-run Interfraternity Council, which oversees 27 fraternity chapters at the flagship state university, has decreed that social events, like mixers and parties, as well as pledging activities, would be stopped indefinitely.The student newspaper, The Michigan Daily, which first reported the suspension, said that at a meeting of the council on Thursday, council leaders said they were concerned about recent events including: more than 30 hospital transports during the weekend of the Michigan-Michigan State football game; a “Champagne and Shackles” event, in which dates at a party were handcuffed to each other until they finished a bottle of champagne; allegations of drugging of fraternity members, hazing in which pledges were put in near-death situations, and sexual misconduct cases involving fraternity brothers.The action was taken out of concern for “the health and safety of our members,” Alec Mayhan, executive vice president of the Interfraternity Council, said in a statement provided by the university. “We believe that social events are a privilege, and we, as a community, have not earned this privilege at this time.”The suspension at Michigan came three days after Florida State University indefinitely suspended all activities at its fraternities and sororities after the death of a pledge, possibly due to alcohol abuse, and the arrest of a fraternity member on drug charges.Penn State University halted fraternity and sorority parties with alcohol for part of last school year after the death of a 19-year-old student in February. And Louisiana State University stopped all Greek life activities for a week in September after the death of a fraternity pledge.The decision at Michigan, coming from student leaders and not the school itself, seemed to be an effort to show that fraternities were sensitive to criticism that they have become the primary enablers of a party culture that leads to alcohol abuse and sexual assault, and to show that they could take steps to reform themselves short of having universities shut them down.Michigan’s president, Mark Schlissel, has been sharply critical of fraternity culture, saying in 2015 that though he did not aspire to get rid of fraternities, if they did not shape up, they “may naturally wither and people may want to stop joining them.”But a university spokesman, Rick Fitzgerald, said the administration had not pressured the student group into taking the action.The move was already being felt on Friday afternoon. Instead of scenes of fraternity brothers drinking and playing games on their lawns and porches, the only visible activity was found in the yard outside Theta Delta Chi, where students were selling doughnuts and apple cider to raise money for the Breast Cancer Research Fund.The suspension was a major topic of conversation at the food court in the basement of the student union, where three different groups of young men were overheard complaining about the cancellation of parties this weekend, though they declined to speak with a reporter.Henry Flynn, a 19-year-old sophomore, said he rushed a few fraternities last winter before deciding against pledging after his roommate was taken to the hospital with alcohol poisoning after a Greek event. Mr. Flynn recalled one activity where potential pledges moved from room to room participating in different drinking games, and another in which they were tested on how they answered women’s invasive questions about their sexual histories.While fraternities often speak publicly about their charitable work, Mr. Flynn heard little about that during rush. “The focus was how you fit into this community based on how much you party,” he said. “That was the vibe I got.”Another sophomore, Tiffany Liu, recalled a friend being hit on by a fraternity pledge who said that part of his hazing required him to have intercourse with a woman. Fraternities were “the main source of propagating hookup culture,” Ms. Liu said. “That’s what their parties are about.”Mr. Fitzgerald, the spokesman for the university, which has 29,000 undergraduates, said that school authorities and the local police were looking into all of the misconduct complaints.Mr. Fitzgerald said sororities at Michigan do not normally host parties at their houses, so they would not be affected by the suspension. And the decree affects only fraternities that fall under the purview of the Interfraternity Council, leaving the four predominantly African-American fraternities that are part of the National Pan-Hellenic Council free to continue hosting social events.Still, Kendall Smith, the president of one of those four fraternities, Kappa Alpha Psi, said the controversy was bad for them, too.“Obviously, women being sexually assaulted, people overdosing on drugs, hospitalizations, that’s a bad look for the university in general and it’s not a good representative of what we stand for,” said Mr. Smith, a senior.He expected the black fraternities would be under a microscope now, since any party they throw will draw more students. And the biggest football game of the year, against Ohio State, was coming up in two weeks, he noted.Mr. Fitzgerald said he expected the suspension to continue at least through the fall semester, while fraternity council leaders met with individual groups to see “where they stand as far as being able to meet the expectations.”Supporters of fraternities and sororities frequently note their role in providing social, academic, and after graduation, professional support to their members. And Mr. Fitzgerald said the administration was not planning to ban fraternities altogether. “The Greek life community has a long history and is doing a lot of good on our campus,” he said. “About 20 percent of our student body is involved in Greek life, so it’s an important part of the student experience here.”Indeed, before every football game, fraternities are always the most popular places to go, said Zane Harding, 19.“They’re just packed every time,” he said. Still, he agreed that some of their behavior had gotten out of hand. “There are a lot of things wrong with this,” he said.
Keith Schiller, Trump’s Ex-Bodyguard, Says He Turned Down Offer of Women in Moscow WASHINGTON — President Trump’s longtime bodyguard told congressional investigators this week that someone offered to send five women to Mr. Trump’s hotel room during a 2013 trip to Moscow for the annual Miss Universe pageant.But the bodyguard, Keith Schiller, said he quickly rejected the offer, and testified that he was not aware of Mr. Trump participating in any compromising activity on the trip, according to two people familiar with his testimony.Mr. Schiller spoke during a closed-door session with members of the House Intelligence Committee for nearly three hours on Tuesday. The panel is one of several on Capitol Hill investigating Russia’s efforts to interfere with the 2016 election.The 2013 trip is of particular interest to investigators because it provided the backdrop for one of the most salacious allegations in a dossier of opposition research compiled during the election claiming a broad conspiracy between the Trump campaign and the Russian government to aid Mr. Trump’s candidacy. One memo included in the file contained an unsubstantiated account of Mr. Trump engaging with prostitutes in a Moscow hotel room during that trip.Mr. Schiller, who traveled frequently with Mr. Trump, told investigators that he knew of no such activity during the trip.The offer for women came at a morning business meeting at the Ritz-Carlton in Moscow to discuss the pageant, which was being produced by a company owned by Mr. Trump. Mr. Schiller told investigators that about 15 people had been present for the meeting, including Emin Agalarov, a Russian pop star, and his father, Aras Agalarov, a business tycoon linked to the Kremlin.As Mr. Schiller sat in the back of the room, a man with a foreign accent unknown to him approached the bodyguard with the offer, he said. Mr. Schiller testified he did not treat it seriously and quickly said no thanks, according to one of the people familiar with the testimony, who requested anonymity to discuss answers that had been given behind closed doors.Mr. Schiller said he relayed the story to Mr. Trump when they were returning to his hotel room later that night. The men shared a laugh, he said.Mr. Schiller told investigators that he stood guard outside Mr. Trump’s door after he retired for the night, before eventually leaving to go to sleep himself, the person said.Details of Mr. Schiller’s testimony were earlier reported by NBC News.Stuart A. Sears, a lawyer representing Mr. Schiller, declined to comment.Scott Balber, a lawyer for Emin and Aras Agalarov, said the men were not aware that any such offer had been made to Mr. Schiller.“It is the case that my clients certainly were not involved in that and certainly are not aware that it happened,” Mr. Balber said.A former New York Police Department officer, Mr. Schiller has worked for Mr. Trump since the early 2000s, when he was hired as the head of security at Trump Tower in Manhattan. He accompanied Mr. Trump on business trips and later, crisscrossed the country with him during the presidential race. After Mr. Trump won the presidency, Mr. Schiller followed him into the White House, serving until September as the director of Oval Office operations.Though they spent considerable time asking about the Moscow trip, committee members also queried Mr. Schiller widely about his work with Mr. Trump, asking for details like where he worked in Trump Tower, how he communicated with Mr. Trump and whether he was ever asked by Mr. Trump for advice, according to a Republican official involved in the investigation.
An Insider’s Guide to Halal Takeout Richly seasoned lamb curry, chana masala and saag paneer fill the chafing dishes. Cases display confections like gulab jamun and rasgulla, sweet milk and cheese dumplings. Overhead a television broadcasts images of Bollywood stars.These features so define Pakistani and Bangladeshi restaurants in New York City that, at first glance, such places appear almost indistinguishable.But make no mistake: Everyone has a favorite.For goat pulao, Amanet Khan, a taxi driver of 25 years, goes to Lahori Chilli, on a stretch of Coney Island Avenue in Brooklyn known as Little Pakistan. The dish is also a favorite at Chandni, a floor above the Ar-Rahman mosque in Manhattan. Go a few blocks east to Haandi in Curry Hill for lamb nihari, a stew of slow-cooked shanks and bone marrow.Jackson Heights, Queens, a few drivers say, is where to get beef Bihari kebab, either at Dera or Kababish, where meat sits on a charcoal grill with spices boiling underneath.By quirk of demographics, taxi drivers will be at any of these South Asian restaurants. According to New York City officials, about 62,000 people in the five boroughs identify as Bangladeshi, and about 51,000 as Pakistani. Of the 148,168 drivers licensed by the city’s Taxi and Limousine Commission in 2015, 19,354 reported that they came from Bangladesh; 12,536 from Pakistan.Most takeout places are halal, which means that the food is prepared according to Islamic guidelines, as Pakistan and Bangladesh are Muslim-majority countries. And most are open 24/7 to accommodate drivers on different schedules.At any hour, South-Asian Americans will be gathered, eating, drinking chai, talking of family, work and politics, with the names Uber, Trump and Sharif popping up in conversations in Urdu, Bengali and English. After all, with some recipes having survived immigration to America and the bloody partition of Pakistan and India 70 years ago, politics have a way of creeping into conversation.But really, it’s all about the food.Haandi, Manhattan, midnightIt was a summer Tuesday evening at Haandi, and 20-somethings drifted in for a midnight snack of pakora. A model from Karachi, eating chicken biryani, complained of dating A.B.C.D.s — American-born confused Desis. Drivers, their cabs and cars lining Lexington Avenue outside, rotated in and out on break.Mr. Khan ate lamb karahi as he watched Geo News on the TV overhead. With disgust, he regarded the image of Nawaz Sharif, Pakistani’s former tycoon prime minister, who was ousted in July.Mr. Sharif had been under investigation after the so-called Panama Papers leaked last year, revealing that three of his children bought luxury apartments in London using offshore shell companies. Between forkfuls of lamb, Mr. Khan said, “They take money from our country, take it out of the country, live in another country, and as a people we are poor, poor, poor, poor.”Seven days a week, Mr. Khan drives his cab, from 5 p.m. to around 2 a.m. He makes $4,000 to $4,500 a month depending on the season, which is really more like $1,400 to $1,900 after he’s subtracted payments for his medallion lease and money sent to his ex-wife and three children in Lahore. This has been the arrangement for almost 15 years: them there, him here. (Though, happily, he reported a new marriage here.)Dispatching about 64,000 cars every day, Uber and other ride-hailing apps have squeezed the taxi business (more than 17,000 yellow and green cabs are on the road today). But Mr. Khan, as an old-school yellow-cab driver, said he can keep up with the competition because he intimately knows the streets, compared to drivers who use ride hailing apps, who often depend heavily on GPS.“If I’m going from downtown, uptown, then cross uptown, east to west,” he said, “I take First Avenue to uptown, then cross at 93rd Street, where there’s less traffic, and the light is open, one by one by one by one.”Lahori Chilli, Brooklyn, 3 p.m.The week before, on a bright Friday afternoon, double-parked black cars clogged Coney Island Avenue during prayer at Makki Masjid. After services, men streamed out of the mosque. Many of the younger ones did not linger, filing straight to their Uber-stamped black cars — they had children to pick up, undergrad I.T. classes to get to, likely customers in Park Slope.The older ones, some in traditional shalwar kameez and kufi caps, took their time as they walked toward restaurants lining the avenue for a late lunch.Inside Lahori Chilli sat Shakeel Baig, 40, a driver for Uber and Juno who lives in Jamaica, Queens, while he supports his wife and five children in Lahore. Eating chickpeas and yogurt, he complained that in three years, Uber has cut its fares twice — by about 20 percent in 2014, then 15 percent in 2016.“It completely affects everything,” he said. “Before I would put 60 hours, you know. I was very happy. Now I put 80 hours.”Dera and Kababish, Queens, 8 p.m.The three-quarters of the tables at Dera were full on a recent rainy Friday night, with families coaxing their children to eat more beef nihari, another forkful of chicken biryani.Faisal Muhammad, 32, an auditor who lives in Manhattan, and Nasra Jahir, an Indian flight attendant, were there on a first date. They met through Shaadi.com, an Indian matchmaking website where profiles are often perused by singles and their parents alike.Asked what caught his eye about Ms. Jahir, Mr. Muhammad said: “I thought she was beautiful. And she is.”Mohammad Saif Ullah, 50, who also owns another Dera in Curry Hill (Lexington Avenue between 27th and 28th Streets), bought this one in 2004. He arrived in New York seeking political asylum from Pakistan in 1991, after a conservative Muslim party won power. His sapphire ring and rose-gold watch are remnants of his profession during his early years in New York — a jeweler. He didn’t cook then, or now, but that didn’t make him doubt his ability to run restaurants. “I know the taste,” he said.Across the street, mostly men entered and left the tiny takeout spot Kababish. Some were rushing food home to their families, while others ate kebabs, like the finely minced gola beef, on the corner.A few months before, Fatima Kamil, a 23-year-old graduate of Penn State, inherited Kababish from her father, Muhammad Tahir, who remains her consigliere, teaching her the ins and outs of the family business. “I always wanted to be a businesswoman,” said Ms. Kamil. Now she was getting her shot.There is, however, one role that Mr. Tahir has not relinquished: guardian of the secret recipe for the garam masala. The spice mix is kept in a large tin canister, and Mr. Tahir doles out its contents to employees.“If I give it to my chefs,” he said of the garam masala, “they’ll start their own and compete with me here.”The recipe comes from his grandfather, who had owned a restaurant and hotel in Mumbai. His family had lived in New Delhi, but moved to Lahore after Britain granted independence to India and Pakistan in 1947.That history, though, was far from the mind of Kamran Nadir, 29, as he picked up his order that night.“I’m taking my kebab, going home, getting dressed and then coming back to the city,” he said. “I have parties to attend.”
Road Rage, Then a Shot. For a Police Officer, It is Called Self-Defense Over the course of two days in early July of last year, three black men, each of them under 40, were killed by police officers in different parts of the country — Alton Sterling in Baton Rouge, La.; Philando Castile, outside of St. Paul, and Delrawn Small, in a case that drew far less national attention, in the Cypress Hills section of Brooklyn.Video captured aspects of the shootings in all three instances, but in none of them were the harrowing images sufficient to render the sort of justice that activists and so many who mourned the dead had been seeking. In June, federal prosecutors involved in the Sterling investigation announced that there was inadequate evidence to bring civil rights charges against the officers responsible for the killing. Although the millions who watch these videos might regard them as overwhelming confirmation of abuse, again and again the “proof” is determined to be iffy. The Sterling case echoed that of Ramarley Graham, to cite just one example, shot at his home in the Bronx by a white police officer who ultimately faced no federal civil rights charges either (and no trial in state court after an indictment for manslaughter was thrown out because of prosecutorial error).Over the summer, the police officer who shot Mr. Castile was acquitted of all criminal charges, and this past week, after three days of deliberation, a Brooklyn jury cleared Wayne Isaacs of murder and manslaughter charges in the death of Mr. Small, who had been on his way home from a barbecue with his girlfriend, her teenage daughter and the couple’s new baby when he was killed.Of all the deaths that have distinguished and propelled the Black Lives Matter movement, perhaps no other offers more powerful illustration of the dangerously broad latitude we give police officers to make claims of self-defense when they gun down civilians. As Mr. Small’s girlfriend, Zaquanna Albert, testified during the trial, Mr. Isaacs, an off-duty police officer in an unmarked car, had twice cut them off as they were traveling down Atlantic Avenue in the far left lane, after a long afternoon and evening of celebrating the July 4 holiday.Driving with a baby in the car is a fraught enterprise under any circumstance, and Mr. Small was perhaps understandably undone by a maneuver that could have landed his family in an accident. He had a long history as a caretaker. His mother died of AIDS when she was 29, Mr. Small’s sister, Victoria Davis, told me during a break in the trial one afternoon, and he had tried to protect his younger siblings from a horrible foster-care situation. He had two older children with two other women, Sharon Seward and Monique Parker, both of whom remained close to Mr. Small and attended the trial proceedings. Mr. Small had been a longtime father figure to another child of Ms. Parker’s.During the trial, when images of Mr. Small’s bloodied body were shown in the courtroom, the women in his life began to sob, and the judge ordered a brief recess. A video that had gone into circulation not long after Mr. Small was killed showed him approaching Mr. Isaac’s car from the driver’s side and then almost immediately getting shot and falling to the ground. Mr. Isaacs, who was represented by Stephen C. Worth, a lawyer who has made his name defending police officers who have killed civilians, said that Mr. Small had punched Mr. Isaacs through an open car window, something the video did not indicate.But even if Mr. Small, who was unarmed, did throw a punch, it is hard to see how that could have possibly warranted grabbing a semiautomatic handgun and shooting him three times. If two men in a bar got into a fight over a Giants game and one punched the other causing him to draw a pistol and shoot his adversary, the shooter would struggle with a self-defense claim — the law in New York requires the use of parallel force. Lethal force can be justified in cases in which there is a reasonable perception of deadly or extremely violent threat — a punch in the jaw would presumably fail to pass the test.Police officers do face a different standard when it comes to retreating from potentially dangerous situations, but the judge charged the jury to think about Mr. Isaacs as no different from any other driver.Earlier this year in Oklahoma, which unlike New York has a stand-your-ground law, an appeals court upheld the murder conviction of a man who shot and killed another in a parking lot following an episode of road rage involving a high-speed car chase. Like Mr. Small, the victim got out of his pickup truck and made his way toward the assailant, who shot him from inside the car. In Mr. Isaacs’ case, the prosecutors from the state attorney general’s office argued that instead of shooting at a man he feared — however rationally or irrationally — might kill him, he could have simply rolled up his window and driven away, making a turn off Atlantic Avenue. As Ms. Davis, Mr. Small’s sister, put it when I spoke with her, “Wayne Isaacs had many choices and he chose to kill.”The jury, mixed demographically both in age and race, saw things differently. Mr. Isaacs himself is black and he was supported in the courtroom by a row of white men in blue and white jackets who were representing the Patrolmen’s Benevolent Association. The complex racial dynamics may have had something to do with the outcome or absolutely nothing to do with it. In any event, the jurors saw Mr. Isaacs not as an ordinary man on the way home from work but as a cop — and they afforded him all the privileges.
How Stephen J. Dubner, of ‘Freakonomics’ and ‘Tell Me Something I Don’t Know,’ Spends His Sundays Stephen J. Dubner, the co-author of the best-selling book “Freakonomics,” is also the host of the public radio show “Freakonomics Radio” as well as the podcast “Tell Me Something I Don’t Know.” The latter, a brainy game show, has a dedicated fact checker, and features guests who discuss their knowledge of niche subjects like the origin of seltzer or robotic fish. Mr. Dubner, 54, lives on the Upper West Side with his wife, Ellen Binder (“She was going to hyphenate her name when we got married, but we decided Binder-Dubner sounded too much like ‘been there, done that,’” Mr. Dubner said); their two children, Solomon, 17, and Anya, 15; and the family Havanese, Fifi.BREAK OF DAWN I like to sleep in a little bit, so I’ll get up at 6 or 6:30. During the week I’m up at 5. I grew up on a farm, so I like the quiet predawn. I’ll go out and let the dog off the leash in Central Park, when you can do that. Then I try to make a big breakfast right around the time everyone is waking up. I find the smell of bacon is the world’s best alarm clock. And once in a while, if I know nobody’s going to be up and around, I’ll go play golf at Saint Andrew’s Golf Club in Hastings-on-Hudson. I love playing alone. And it’s fast, so I’d usually be home by 9:30 or 10.TEEN SUPPORT From there, the way the day unfolds depends on what the rest of the family is doing. The thing I try most not to do is to have a routine. What I mean by that is that with kids who are teenagers, they have a lot going on. They have homework, and they’re preparing for the SAT, and I’ve been working a lot during the week, so I try to be around for them. They may want to use me a lot, or they may want to use me zero.THE BEAUTIFUL GAME But there are different components of things I might do on a Sunday. For instance, my son is a soccer fanatic. We support FC Barcelona, the Barcelona football club. A few years ago a chapter of their fan club started in New York, and I think they’re the biggest fan club outside of Catalonia or Barcelona. So they’ll have events sometimes on Sunday, and the two of us will go down to this club in Chelsea called Smithfield Hall. We’ll go down there and drink beers — he doesn’t, I do — and that’s a good Sunday, if we can spend a few hours with Penya FC Barcelona. I guess “penya” means “club” or “fan,” I don’t even know. Sunday is also when my son and I record our soccer podcast, called “Footy for Two.” It’s basically him espousing his passion and educating me at the same time.EATING ADVENTURES With my daughter I’m really just trying to be ready to do whatever feels good. On a dream Sunday we’ll go shopping for food and spend the whole afternoon cooking dinner. There’s a really good farmers’ market right out the door on Columbus Avenue, and what we make may depend on what they’re selling. We usually try every time to eat something weird and exotic one of us has never eaten before. A couple of weeks ago, that was star fruit, because the kids had never had it. Half the family is into eating meats that aren’t typical meats. That’s the men. The women are much more into eating known and unknown vegetables. But that works out, too.TICK, TICK, TICK Another aspiration is for all four of us to watch “60 Minutes” on Sunday night. Even though the show handles heavy, serious topics, it somehow bridges the gap. It’s TV, so it’s very accessible, and a nice way to get the kids thinking about politics a little bit more.ALL IN THE FAMILY I try to contact one of my siblings, usually by phone. I’m the youngest of eight, and it’s hard to be in touch with everyone all the time, so I do a rotation. It’s a very peace-inducing connection for me. Family is easily the most important component of my life. To me there’s no substitute for that emotional connection. The call with my siblings is like putting a bow on the beginning of the week: knowing you’re all about to get sent out as these little paper boats on some rocky sea into the world, but you’re buffeted all around by family. And hopefully that strength will sustain you.
Older People Play Dodgeball, Too: ‘We Are Animals’ There was a lot of whooping and hollering as a group of exuberant students gathered for recess time at Asphalt Green on the Upper East Side. They were playing a game called “popcorn.”“Listen up everyone,” yelled one of the instructors, Zack Cruz, to quiet the noise. “We are going to throw the ball in the air, clap one time, catch it, and then pass it to your neighbor. Everyone ready to go? Say yes!”One student crouched down. “We can do this,” she said.But the student was not 8; she was probably in her 80s. Most of the popcorn players that day were retirement age, or older.Since the mid-1980s, Asphalt Green has specialized in creating athletic programs for children. One of the biggest initiatives at the nonprofit is sending coaches into New York City schools to play active games with over 28,000 children at recess.This year, however, Asphalt Green trainers decided to apply their expertise to older generations, developing a class called Skills in Motion, which features adult versions of playground games. Older people “are just a different type of kid,” said Mr. Cruz. “You have your young kids, and you have your big kids. They all want to be free and silly.”Over the next hour, the group mastered the game, adding more balls, and more complexity, to the mix. They split into teams and played volleyball with colorful balloons. They formed a circle by holding hands and passed around a hula hoop without letting go, using only their bodies. They beat rhythm sticks in the air, dancing to their favorite songs from the ’60s through the ’80s.They also played versions of dodgeball, tag and fireball, which required rolling a ball around a circle using their hands as paddles.“When I tell my friends I’m going to a 60-plus class, they think I’m sitting in a chair, stretching,” said Lois Siegel, 79. “But we are animals. We fight for that balloon or ball. I feel like a kid again.”The program is currently being tried out in five locations across the city: both Asphalt Green campuses (on the Upper East Side and in Battery Park City), the Carter Burden Roosevelt Island Senior Center, and at two Union Settlements in East Harlem. Right now there are about 70 participants. Asphalt Green is hoping to make the program available to thousands more next year.Instructors say they are constantly surprised by their students’ competitiveness and enthusiasm for moving in more strenuous and creative ways. “Earlier we had them all go down to the ground, and one of them was starting to bear crawl,” said Samantha Frazier, one of the coaches. “That person didn’t even want to bend down at first, and there she goes.”That’s exactly the idea. The class was created to challenge older people to move in ways that will preserve their strength and coordination in the future. All the activities deliberately test balance, so participants can learn how to readjust their bodies and keep two feet on the ground.“If someone throws a ball, you don’t know where it is going to go, so you have to react,” said David Ludwig, Asphalt Green’s director of community programs.“We want to show that the floor is not your enemy,” said Marcy Simon, manager of senior fitness programs. “You have to know how to get up from the floor without hurting yourself.”Preventing older people from falling, Mr. Ludwig said, is no small feat. According to the New York State Department of Health, the annual cost of hospitalizations because of falls is around $1.7 billion. On top of that, 60 percent of hospitalizations lead to stays in nursing homes or rehabilitative centers, which compounds costs even more.“I’ve never fallen, thank God,” said Jennie Lorenzana, 74, who lives on the Upper East Side. “But I take the class because it makes me feel more confident. The hour goes by very fast — too fast.”That said, balloon volleyball shouldn’t be the only prevention method for people, experts say. “Workout classes alone are not the best way to prevent falls,” said Kathleen Cameron, the senior director of the Center for Healthy Aging at the National Council on Aging. “Other factors include reviewing your medications, making your home safe, getting your eyes and ears checked regularly, and talking with your doctor and family.”Ms. Cameron added that it’s too soon to tell whether the Asphalt Green program, still in its pilot phase, will produce quantifiable results. But the nonprofit is trying to measure what it can by partnering with a team at the nearby Hospital for Special Surgery, which specializes in orthopedics, to survey and collect data on participants throughout the program’s 20-week session.Participants do not need scientific data, however, to enjoy a more robust social life. Indeed, playground games seem to have the same advantage for schoolchildren looking to make friends as they do for the 60-plus crowd.Ms. Siegel is learning Spanish from some of her new friends, who teach her a new word every time she sees them. “I see them and wave and say, ‘Buenos Dias,’” said Ms. Siegel, who runs into her workout buddies, she explained, at local places like the Dollar Tree on 101st Street. “This class has opened so many doors to me.”
A Diner for Regulars (Tourists Welcome Too) Hugh Carragher was sitting at the counter of the Court Square Diner, where the tentacles of the 7, G, E and M lines converge in Long Island City, Queens. He has been coming to the diner twice daily for 55 years. He’s 80 and retired. It was morning, so he was eating a bowl of Raisin Bran.“This is like another home for me,” he said, adding that he walks from his apartment in Woodside, a couple of miles away.There was no hurry to finish his breakfast. He let his cereal get as soggy as the rainy day.The Court Square Diner is home to a wide cross-section of customers: regulars like Mr. Carragher, tourists from neighboring hotels, visitors to MoMA PS 1, people on jury duty and CUNY law school students and faculty.“I know everybody, and they all know me,” said Gary FitzGerald, a woodworker who has lived in the neighborhood for seven years. A lifelong diner aficionado, he, too, has been a daily breakfast and dinner counter customer. “I haven’t cooked a meal since October 1986,” he said. “This 56-year-old body is diner built.”The staff starts setting out his order before he sits down. “It’s nice to know that there’s still a place where the term ‘regular coffee’ means something,” he said. (In Queens, it’s milk and two sugars.)The diner, which dates to 1946, has had only three owners. Steve Kanellos and Nick Kanellos, brothers who know many of their customers by name, took it over in 1991.A couple of years later, they renovated the exterior, choosing its retro chrome and cranberry facade.“There’s no other place around here that’s open 24 hours a day,” Steve Kanellos said. “And there are not many places to buy groceries here, so people come in to ask to borrow a lemon or some garlic.”Tamas Prencsok and his mother, Susan Vundele, tourists from Hungary, stopped in because the diner was near their Airbnb apartment.“We see these diners at home only in the movies,” he said.It was their last day in New York City, and they were sorry they hadn’t discovered the Court Square sooner.A couple of booths over, Carolyn Ismach was thinking much the same thing. Ms. Ismach, 32, is a speech therapist who lives in Long Island City, only two subway stops away, but this was the first time she’s been to the diner.“I’ve been wanting to try it because diners have the best food,” she said as she finished her platter of eggs, bacon, home fries and toast. “I’ll be back.”While Mr. Carragher was paying his bill — $3.95 for the Raisin Bran and $2.50 for a glass of cranberry juice — another regular, Sam Yazdi, sat down next to him and ordered his standard breakfast: egg whites, bacon, French toast, orange juice and coffee.Mr. Yazdi is a 27-year-old graduate student in real estate finance at New York University who lives across the street. “I’m friends with everyone who works here,” he said. “I even joined their weekly fantasy football league.”For him, the diner, which seats 108, is a cozy place to get comfort food. Which is ideal for a competitive bodybuilder like Mr. Yazdi, who consumes 4,000 calories a day, at least 1,000 of them at the diner.“I eat five meals, and I come here every morning,” he said. “I’m also here once a week for the dinner specials. I like the leg of lamb.”When Mr. Carragher returns later that evening, he might well run into Mr. Yazdi and Mr. FitzGerald. And that may be the point.
Where the Dogs Are It is surely one of New York’s grandest sights, if you are a dog: Prospect Park on a sunny fall morning.There, during off-leash hours, the linked fields of Long Meadow transform into a canine fantasia. Acres and acres of green grass abound, along with hills and grass and trees and grass and, off in the distance, more grass.And dogs, of course — hundreds of them, freed from their fuddy-duddy humans, playing chase or clumped together in growly play-scrums or taking off on wild-eyed sprints, tongues waving like pennants. There are more tennis balls flying than in the early rounds of the U.S. Open. The butt-sniffing opportunities are nearly infinite.What dog wouldn’t love this?Ours, it turns out. Lemon is a Shih Tzu mix with many fine qualities, but courage is not one of them. When we approach the open fields during off-leash hours, her 16-pound body tenses visibly. The slightest foray onto the grass prompts a frantic scamper back to the asphalt.Dogs are permitted off-leash in New York City parks from sunrise to 9 a.m. and from 9 p.m. to 1 a.m., and only in designated areas. The rules were codified by the Parks Department in 2007; since then, off-leash time in Prospect Park has only grown in popularity, a trend that mirrors the resurgence of the park as a whole in recent decades. The park counted over 10 million visits in 2016, according to the Prospect Park Alliance, up from between 1 and 2 million in 1987, the year the alliance was founded.Millions of more human visits, of course, usually means lots more dogs. Other pet-related data would seem to support this: over a 10-year period ending in 2015, for instance, Brooklyn saw a 200-plus increase in the number of veterinarians in the borough, according to a report by the New York City Economic Development Corporation.“We’re seeing more people coming to off-leash hours for sure,” said Sue Donoghue, president of the alliance, whose springer spaniel, Dwayne, is a Long Meadow regular.The alliance works with groups like Fido in Prospect Park, an organization that promotes safe and responsible dog ownership, encouraging owners to adhere to the off-leash rules. It is an ongoing challenge: New York is a spirit-of-the-law town, and in Prospect Park one can observe dogs being let off-leash any time of day, almost anywhere four legs can travel — at least until a Parks Department vehicle prowls by. (Fines begin at $100.)Lemon’s refusal to join the off-leash circus stems, as far as my wife and I can tell, from a single traumatic puppyhood experience, or as we ruefully call it, “The Day That One Dog Chased Her.” So the three of us watch from the footpaths while the other dogs frolic.On a given morning you can see every kind of dog Brooklyn has to offer: the purebreds and the rescue mutts and the in-betweeners, fluffypoos and shaggydoodles whose DNA is a designer cocktail of cute.They come in all sizes. Maximus, an imposing but sweet-natured mastiff, is a frequent visitor. His owner, Jonathan Poe of Park Slope, calls Maximus his “125-pound lap dog.”Less cumbersome are two poodles named Coco and Heather (nattily dressed, when I met them, in a red sweater and pink down vest, respectively) who make the trip to Prospect Park in carriers toted by their owner, Wendy Taylor, of Bedford-Stuyvesant.Others travel much farther: Ann Cipolla of Locust Valley, N.Y., drives to Brooklyn almost every weekend from April to October with Gio, a Lagotto Romagnolo. The breed is known as the official Italian truffle-hunting dog, said Ms. Cipolla, though, during our brief encounter, Gio was more concerned with chasing bugs.Nothing wrong with that. Off-leash hours is the perfect venue for self-expression — for most dogs, at least. A black Labrador and a pit bull do a circle dance, their mouths clamped on the same blue ball, like a high school party game. A beagle rolls down a hill, ears first. A pug runs with a rocking horse gait after a pack of bigger dogs, trying to keep up.Elsewhere a couple of rust-colored pointers have treed something, presumably a squirrel. A long-haired mutt emerges from a muddy bog looking like Day 3 at Woodstock. Not to worry: nearby there is a fenced-in pond to splash around in, the newly renovated Dog Beach.The scene reached a peak on a Saturday morning in October, when Fido held its monthly meet-and-greet, called Coffee Bark. Dozens of dogs and their owners congregated near the picnic house for coffee and bagels and dog mingling, while the off-leash fray carried on in the fields below.At 8 a.m. a pastor arrived to administer the Blessing of the Dogs, an annual Coffee Bark event timed to the Feast of St. Francis of Assisi; the pastor offered a short benediction and sprinkled holy water from a small bottle over the heads of the gathered pets.(Another Coffee Bark tradition, “Bark the Herald Angels Sing,” featuring dog-themed Christmas and Hanukkah songs, is scheduled for the first Saturday in December.)Lemon arrived a short while after the blessing. She was predictably nervous among the other dogs, her head on a swivel, tail pointing straight down, but for once she did not drag us away. Maybe it was the scent of holy water lingering in the air, but she appeared to have had a revelation.Lo, there was a man handing out name-brand doggy treats — blessings aside, Coffee Bark is not immune to product placement. As Lemon chomped on her treat, my wife discreetly unhooked the leash from her harness and suddenly, our squeamish Shih Tzu was officially participating in off-leash hours.It was hard to tell if Lemon was enjoying herself; she was too distracted by the treats. She had learned the trick wallflower humans have always known, which is to hang out by the food table.Later we walked down to the field, where, for a few fleeting minutes Lemon sat bravely in the grass, untethered and undaunted by the furry maelstrom around her. She even consented to a certain amount of butt-sniffing from a persistent and amorous Chihuahua.But the Chihuahua had no treat to offer save for its affections, and Lemon soon trotted back to the safety of the asphalt.We’ll have to take this off-leash thing in puppy-steps.
Alcohol Derailed His Life. Now He Drives Barflies Home. Carlos Nin stays awake well into the night, keeping the same late hours he had as an alcoholic. His evenings are spent in the familiar company of barflies, revelers and party seekers. Except Mr. Nin is not their companion. He is their ride.As an Uber driver in New York City, he frequently chauffeurs intoxicated customers. He says he does not feel tugs of jealousy or temptation being around such clients. If anything, he said, he feels remorse.“Why couldn’t I do that when I was younger?” Mr. Nin said recently. “Just go out, have a few drinks.”Mr. Nin, 55, has been sober for almost 19 months. He said he hoped his third stint in a rehabilitation program would be his last.The addiction took hold in his 20s, when he was working in the restaurant industry. It was so easy after a shift, Mr. Nin said, to let off steam with co-workers over cocktails. His drinking, often coupled with cocaine use, worsened as the years went on, costing him jobs, a home and his marriage.“When you have to drink before you go out to drink, I knew I had kind of a problem,” Mr. Nin said. “I thought I always could control it.”In 2015, after Mr. Nin finished his second alcohol-treatment program, he found a job as a valet at a hospital parking garage, confident that he had conquered his demons.But a Friday night trip to the Empire City Casino in Yonkers brought an abrupt end to 17 months of sobriety.“I was bored,” Mr. Nin recalled. “That’s one of my things. I want to drink more when I’m bored.”In a bid to fight his impulses, he ordered a nonalcoholic beer for $9. Then he had a second. It seemed foolish, he said, to spend so much money for drinks and not even feel a buzz. When Mr. Nin returned from the casino, he stopped at a bodega and bought two six-packs of Presidente beer. So began his backslide.“When I started going downhill, I had to have a drink or two just to go to work,” Mr. Nin said.Before long, he was fired from his valet job. That moment prompted some overdue self-reflection. The ruts he continually found himself in were unacceptable for a man in his 50s, Mr. Nin said.In March 2016, he entered a five-day detox program, followed by 21 days of rehabilitation. Then he went to Pride Site, a long-term inpatient rehabilitation program in Manhattan that offers addicts a range of support services as they work on their recovery.There, Mr. Nin learned about the Association of Community Employment Programs, a nonprofit that helps homeless people and ex-convicts get back on their feet. He gave up the room he was renting when he entered rehabilitation. The agency is a partner of Community Service Society, one of the eight organizations supported by The New York Times Neediest Cases Fund.As he re-evaluated his life, he set his sights on earning a living as an Uber driver. In February, he enrolled in classes at LaGuardia Community College to acquire his license with the city’s Taxi and Limousine Commission. Community Service Society used $31 from the fund to buy Mr. Nin a weekly MetroCard so he could attend those classes.Six days a week, Mr. Nin sits behind the wheel of a rental car, the cost of which is split with a partner, shuttling people to destinations across the city. By day, he works at a parking garage. Friends and relatives have cautioned him about working too much. But Mr. Nin says his packed schedule is strategic: The long hours are necessary to earn a living wage, and they keep him out of trouble. The consequences of having too much time on his hands can be dire.When Mr. Nin does find himself unoccupied, usually on his day off, he visits friends or shares a meal with relatives.Focusing on his health and his newfound sobriety, Mr. Nin has set several goals for himself, but motivation does not always come easy. He hopes to join a gym, or at least start doing 20 push-ups a day. He also wants to begin a running routine, or at least start walking a bit more. And he wants to find a sponsor, or at least resume regularly attending Alcoholics Anonymous meetings. A few times, Mr. Nin said, he has pulled up to a meeting, only to drive away to pick up a fare.“I know I’m making excuses,” he said, adding that he wants to address his procrastination.Mr. Nin receives monthly injections to keep urges for alcohol in check. He also sees a therapist regularly. This is the longest time that he has been sober since he can remember, he said.“I know I just have to keep on doing the things I’ve been doing,” Mr. Nin said.He says he now has no desire to drink. And he knows he will never be able to just have one drink and stop. Should he find himself tempted, Mr. Nin said, he has promised to call his sister.After months of putting it off, Mr. Nin attended an Alcohol Anonymous meeting last month in the Washington Heights section of Manhattan, where he lives. He had expected it to be welcoming and possibly to see some friendly faces. Instead, he felt out of place and said very little. He has been to only two other meetings since.“I know I have to be better about that,” he said. “And I will.”
Does It Make Sense to Rent Out a House Rather Than Sell It? Q. I own a house in Maplewood, N.J., and am wondering: Does it ever make sense to rent out your house rather than sell it? Are there any advantages to renting? Is there a rule of thumb to decide if it’s worth it financially? A. Before you crunch numbers, decide if you want to be a landlord. Are you prepared to take a call at 3 a.m. when the heat fails during a blizzard in January? If the dishwasher won’t work properly, you will be expected to fix the problem immediately. If the rent is late (or does not arrive) you will have to chase the tenant for the money, and maybe even take the case to housing court.“Being a landlord isn’t all that it’s cracked up to be,” said Jonathan J. Miller, the president of Miller Samuel Real Estate Appraisers and Consultants in Manhattan.Generally, renters do not maintain homes the way owners do. Consider the finicky dishwasher: If you own the house and the dishwasher is on its last legs, you might hold out until you can afford a new stainless steel model that matches the newer refrigerator. But a tenant will expect a functioning dishwasher pronto, and so, chances are, you will swap out the aging one with a cheap white model. Come time to sell the house, the overall condition of your kitchen has diminished.“I’ve had people who’ve rented their homes and they come back and it’s never the house they left,” said Allison Maguire, a sales associate for Halstead in Montclair, N.J. “No one takes care of a rental as if it’s their true home.”To make your decision, research the rental market, as its fluctuations are not necessarily tied to the sales market. With the help of a broker, estimate how much rent you could fetch: Would it be enough to cover the mortgage and taxes? Consider other expenses, too, like landscaping services, and insurance. Ask your accountant about tax implications. Factor in vacancies and repairs. You may need to hire a property manager if, for example, you move out of the area.Tally your estimated profit for the number of years you anticipate renting out the house. Then compare that figure with the cash you would walk away with should you sell your house today. Is the potential payoff worth the headache of being a landlord? It might be. But being a landlord is a job, and you have to decide if it is one you want. With “a long-term hold, generally, you can come out ahead,” Mr. Miller said. “But people don’t factor in the hassle.”
The Wing, a Chic Women’s Club, Is Going Wide From the doorstep of 52 Mercer Street in SoHo on a recent Thursday night, a line of women mostly in their 20s and 30s, exuding anticipation, snaked halfway around the next block. A man asked what they were waiting for as he walked by. No one seemed to notice him and no one answered. What business was it of his anyway?Upstairs from iPadded list checkers, on the fifth floor, was the 10,000-square-foot second location of the Wing, a women-only club and co-working space in New York City that a year into its founding is poised to take across the country its particular brand of Instagrammable feminism: mindful of history, striving for diversity and sponsored by Chanel.The club now has more than 1,500 members, many of whom are paying $3,000 annually for access to the Wing’s locations, which by March will include Brooklyn and Washington, D.C. Los Angeles and San Francisco are likely next. Next week, like Goop before it, the Wing will offer the first edition of a print magazine, No Man’s Land, which will be sold at Barnes & Noble and newsstands. “It is more than a members’ pamphlet,” said Deidre Dyer, the magazine’s executive editor. “We wanted it to be meaty and substantial.”As shared professional and social spaces increasingly supplant the traditional office, female-dedicated organizations have thrived. Though there is not (yet?) a SheWork, there is Shecosystem in Toronto and Hera Hub, which has three locations in the San Diego area as well as one each in Washington, D.C., Phoenix and Uppsala, Sweden. In St. Louis, there is Rise Collaborative Workspace.But the Wing has stood out because of its glamorous founders, Audrey Gelman and Lauren Kassan, both 30, who have cultivated a circle of social-media celebrities that includes the writer, editor and actress Tavi Gevinson, Jessica Williams (formerly of “The Daily Show”) and the transgender actress and Gucci model Hari Nef, who appears on the cover of No Man’s Land. (The profile of Ms. Nef was edited by a New York Times Magazine staff editor who is also a Wing member.)“We have a lot of members who are transgender, who are trans women,” Ms. Gelman said; they include Chelsea Manning.Ms. Gevinson, also featured in No Man’s Land, was initially reluctant to join the Wing. “I work from home, and that’s how I can almost justify my rent,” she said. Then she went to visit the first club, which opened in the Flatiron district in October 2016: awash in millennial pink, with softly lit desks for working, a beauty room for primping, a snack bar with coffees and organic granola, plenty of art, a lactation room and a large library of color-organized books written by and about women.“The look of it is out of my dreams,” Ms. Gevinson said. “It’s crazy that that place exists in real life. I joined right away.”Over the course of 18 months, the club raised more than $10 million from investors, most recently from a group led by Tony Florence, a general partner at the venture capital firm NEA. He also backs Goop, the luxury shopping site Moda Operandi and Casper, the mattress company. As a man, he has been allowed to visit the Wing only when members are not present.”My ability to understand the market opportunity and the need for this kind of business extends beyond man or woman,” Mr. Florence said of his involvement. “It’s a very attractive financial model.”What remains to be seen is what kind of business the bigger Wing might be: a locus of a mediacentric feminist movement, like Ms. in the 1970s, or a mass-scaled temple of “exclusivity,” like Soho House, if Soho House wrapped itself in a marketing banner of she-power.Ms. Gelman, a former political press representative who worked on the 2013 campaign of the New York City comptroller Scott Stringer, helped inspire the character Marnie on the television show “Girls,” created by Lena Dunham. Native Manhattanites who met in adolescence through Ms. Gelman’s mother, who was Ms. Dunham’s therapist, they became close friends at Oberlin College and were avidly covered by the press as their stars rose together in young adulthood.Ms. Gelman appeared on “Girls” several times as Audrey, Marnie’s nemesis. Her romance with the fashion photographer Terry Richardson was well documented. Vanity Fair put her on its best-dressed list. Vogue covered her wedding to Ilan Zechory, a founder of Genius, the music website (Ms. Dunham was a bridesmaid).She got the idea for her current venture after getting a job at the political consulting firm SKDKnickerbocker, which has offices in SoHo and Washington. Commuting frequently from her home in Brooklyn, Ms. Gelman longed for a place where she could change her clothes, take a shower or chill between meetings. She thought it might be called Refresh.But “Refresh is such a bad name,” she said last week, sitting at a round marble table in a pink conference room with Ms. Kassan; their partnership began at the suggestion of Ms. Kassan’s husband. “It sounds like a vaginal douche product.”“I think it might be,” said Ms. Kassan, who previously worked in boutique fitness, as the director of business development for ClassPass and for the studio company SLT. Experienced in operations and community management, she is the “back of the house” partner to Ms. Gelman’s frontwoman. Earlier investors included Julie Rice and Elizabeth Cutler, who founded SoulCycle, and Susan Lyne, the managing partner of BBG Ventures, formerly of Gilt Groupe and Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia.“We like Audrey and we liked Audrey’s conviction that women wanted to be with other women, in a safe place that was also beautiful,” Ms. Lyne said in a phone interview. “Audrey said, ‘I’ve changed in a Starbucks bathroom one too many times.’”By the spring of 2016, they found a 3,500-square-foot space on the 12th floor of a building on East 20th Street to rent, and hired an all-female team — Alda Ly, an architect, and Chiara de Rege and Hilary Koyfman, interior designers — to realize their vision. Ms. Koyfman described the look of the Wing to Domino magazine as “kind of like ‘Mad Men’ — without the men.” The Wing also began to work on branding with a women-only design team from Pentagram. Ms. Gelman took charge of social-media marketing. (“We’re a coven, not a sorority” is how she describes the Wing on Instagram.)For its founding membership of 200 women, Ms. Gelman and Ms. Kassan tapped their networks: media professionals, entrepreneurs and artists, sometimes bartering membership, which then cost $2,100 a year, for services. There was an immediate waiting list.When the club opened, the Wingers, like many women around the country, were anticipating a historic election of the first female president of the United States. When that didn’t happen, the founders said, the space took on new urgency.“We had the expectation that we would have the first women president and it would be the golden age of feminism and women get to have rooms like these as a result of that momentum,” Ms. Gelman said. “Very quickly overnight it went to feeling a little protective.”Ms. Kassan and Ms. Gelman said they began hearing from their members that along with previously planned offerings like lessons in flower arrangement, breakfasts themed to signs of the zodiac and panels on news topics, they were interested in programming and events that focused on women’s rights and politics. And so the founders scheduled events like “Workshop on Anxiety & Depression in a Post-Trump World,” “A Night of Interfaith Sisterhood for Jews and Muslims” and “A Conversation With Senator Kirsten Gillibrand,” all of which were well attended.They organized buses to take members to and from the Women’s March in Washington, where the pink hats fortuitously coordinated with the de Rege-Koyfman color scheme.A few months after the Wing opened, “Girls” included a plotline featuring a women-only club in New York. In Ms. Dunham’s telling, the club was called Wemun (“Women Entrepreneurs Meet Up Now”) and one of the women running a meeting there said, “Whether it’s how to rock a romper at a work event or who you should be voting for, a Wemun woman is the person to ask.”This episode was sent to critics and writers before it aired. After The Cut published an article, “Did Lena Dunham Shade the Wing on ‘Girls?’” Ms. Dunham told the reporter that any resemblance to the Wing or Ms. Gelman was accidental and she trimmed the scene.To two entrepreneurs trying to make a business out of supporting women’s careers, though, the joke seemed to have landed with a thud. Ms. Gelman stopped following Ms. Dunham on Instagram for months, until this week. (“Friends fight, friends make up, life is long,” Ms. Gelman said.)They took less personally a plotline this season on “Younger,” in which the main characters badly want membership to The Nest, a women-only club.“It’s like a ‘Sex and the City’ of today,” Ms. Kassan said of “Younger,” “and it’s like we were a pretend thing on ‘Sex and the City,’ which is awesome.”Back in reality, the around-the-block line in SoHo comprised women who had just been named members, allowed into the new space before existing members.The initiates grouped around tarot-card readers, political/feminist slogan button-making stations, a potion-making table and a booth for voter registration. There was food, wine and massive Rice Krispie treats in the shape of the Wing’s W logo. The scene had all the awkward excitement of a new-student mixer at a women’s college.Mandi Nyambi, 24, sat on a couch by herself. Ms. Nyambi, who works for a digital platform, is one of those who will pay $3,000 per year for access to all the clubs. “If I tried to get a co-working space elsewhere, it would cost about the same and I would miss out on the value proposition of the wealth of having this network of other women,” she said. She is hoping that after the parties finish, the Wing truly will be a place for work and serious connection. “I’m a little overwhelmed,” she said.Margit Detweiler, a 50-year-old new member, was standing back, beholding the crowd. She joined the Wing, she said, because she lives in Brooklyn and needs “a pit stop” in Manhattan. “How often are you in a space like this with all women?” said Ms. Detweiler, the founder of the TueNight, an online magazine and live events company for women over 40. “The energy is palpable.” (The Wing’s founders say they are trying to increase non-millennial membership.)Ms. Gelman and Ms. Kassan were milling about the party and greeting new members. Ms. Gelman was carrying a Red Bull and iPhone. Ms. Kassan was carrying in utero her first child, due in January. It had been a long week of 18-hour-on-their-feet work days leading up to the opening. They didn’t even have time to go home to get ready for the party; they had primped, naturally, in the Wing’s beauty room filled with Chanel products.Brands are now paying the club for marketing access to members. Earlier this fall, each member received a big bottle of Chanel perfume in the mail. Hulu sponsored a “Handmaid’s Tale” event at the Flatiron club, for which Margaret Atwood, the book’s author, made a special video.Thanks in part to such enticements, some members hardly ever leave. Scarlett Curtis, 22, is the Gen-Z columnist for The Sunday Times of London and a student at New York University. She learned about the Wing after following Ms. Gelman on Instagram. Her parents paid for the first six months, and she says she pays the dues herself now.Ms. Curtis is so frequently at the Wing that when she complains to her father that she doesn’t have a boyfriend, he says, “Stop hanging out at the Wing all the time.” He’s just jealous that he can’t visit the space, Ms. Curtis said, remembering with amusement the day a male plumber visited and an employee charged with community-building “told every member there was a man coming into the space.”Ms. Gelman and Ms. Kassan say they try to hire and commission women for every service the company needs, but that sometimes it’s most important to look beyond gender.“Our electrician isn’t a woman,” Ms. Kassan said in the conference room.Ms. Gelman said, “It’s also one of those things where it has to work as a business.”As at a gym, Ms. Kassan pays particular attention to usage patterns of members to track what members of what professions and ages come to the space at what time. She and Ms. Gelman then consider who might fill in the gaps (they would like to have more members who are doctors, for example), as well as demographics including religion, race, sexual orientation and gender identification, among others. Internally, they refer to the process as “minority-led membership.”“We do ask members to send us one social media profile just so we can understand more about them,” Ms. Gelman said.Raven Stralow, 33, works with addicts and their families, and she also owns with her husband a farm in upstate New York. She was having many meetings in Manhattan and began to comparison-shop co-working spaces. She looked at Ludlow House but thought the people looked too conspicuously hip. She looked into WeWork but didn’t like the culture of drinking she heard about. She saw the Wing on Instagram and applied, thinking she wouldn’t get in. “I don’t have a ton of Instagram followers, I don’t have a curated anything,” Ms. Stralow said.But she was accepted quickly, and has felt very comfortable there. “I’m a woman of color and I wear my hair natural,” she said. The beauty room at the Wing includes products and combs that suit her hair. “There always seems to be an effort of inclusion,” she said.There are challenges to this effort. Along with the membership fees, there are charges of $30 per hour for semiprivate work rooms and for the snack bar’s food, coffee and wine (no outside food is allowed inside). This limits the economic diversity of membership.Ms. Kassan and Ms. Gelman are sensitive to criticism of elitism and said they plan to announce a scholarship program next year. “It was never my goal to go into business to begin with and certainly not to go into business to create a product for the uber-wealthy, and I don’t think it is,” Ms. Gelman said.The Wing is also in the interesting position of marketing a women-only company at a moment when the progressive forces in American culture are pushing for a less binary, more fluid interpretation of gender, as evinced by Ms. Nef’s presence on the cover of No Man’s Land.If a person applied for membership who looked like a man but said he identified as a woman, Ms. Gelman said they would likely check out the person’s social media feeds and look for other indications of the person “living as a woman,” she said. They have looked to women’s colleges for guidance on how to construct their policies. Barnard College, for example, stipulates that it “will consider for admission those applicants who consistently live and identify as women.”But it is a staple of such colleges’ English curriculums, Virginia Woolf, whose guiding specter still hovers over the enterprise. “We still believe women deserve spaces of their own,” Ms. Gelman said.
They Quietly Left the Church, but the Sexual Abuse Continued After leaving active ministry in 2002 as a priest in Brooklyn, Stephen Placa got his pilot’s license and founded a flight school in Ronkonkoma, Long Island, the Heritage Flight Academy. Seven years later, he was convicted in Suffolk County of the sexual abuse of two boys, ages 8 and 10.In 1987, the Rev. Thomas O. Morrow went on an indefinite leave of absence from the Diocese of Brooklyn and began working as a psychologist in Forest Hills. He was still officially a priest when he was indicted in 1996 on charges that he sodomized a 15-year-old boy he was hired to counsel, took nude photographs of him and gave him crack to smoke. The diocese said at the time it had never gotten any complaints of abuse. Eventually, it defrocked him.The two men are among the eight priests who the Roman Catholic Diocese of Brooklyn revealed on Thursday had been laicized, or defrocked, by the Vatican for the sexual abuse of children since 2002. Of those eight, four went on to be arrested and convicted on child sex abuse charges after they left active ministry in Brooklyn. The other four do not appear to have been arrested, though whether they reoffended is unknown.The public disclosure of eight of the likely dozens of priests who have sexually abused children in the Brooklyn diocese over the decades was met with a mixture of praise and frustration from victims and their advocates on Friday. While they were gratified that the disclosures would probably protect additional children, they noted that this was nowhere near a full accounting of clergy sex abuse in the diocese.“I’m encouraged by the release of eight names — I do think it’s good,” said Michael Reck, a lawyer who is representing two of the victims of Romano J. Ferraro, among the eight former priests named on Thursday. “But this is a trickle compared to the flood that they are holding back.”Carolyn Erstad, a spokeswoman for the diocese, said Friday that it had chosen to release the names of living priests who had been formally defrocked by the Vatican because they could still be a danger to children. She said it was not releasing the names of dead priests who had been defrocked because they were no longer a threat.She did not address why the diocese was withholding the names of abusers who had been named by victims in successful abuse settlements, but who had not been formally laicized. Not all abusive priests are laicized; that process at the Vatican is long and does not always result in the loss of a clerical state.“This is about releasing the names of people who may have access to children,” she said, adding that the diocese anticipated more names would added to the list next week.She noted that the diocese now routinely shares all allegations of abuse with law enforcement, and that it had done so since 2002, when reforms were passed nationally in the Roman Catholic Church to protect children. Before that, it was common to withhold allegations of abuse from law enforcement. She also noted that the diocese had previously publicly acknowledged substantiated allegations against priests.Of the eight men named Thursday, the most notorious was Mr. Ferraro, who is believed to have been one of the most prolific priest pedophiles on the Eastern Seaboard, and one of whom the most is known.His past in the church was divulged by the Diocese of Brooklyn, which, after a four-year battle, was required to disclose some 1,200 pages of information from his personnel file for a civil suit in Miami relating to his abuse of a boy in Key West in 1969. The papers show that church officials in Brooklyn knew as early as 1973 that he had abused boys, and that they helped him to get jobs in other dioceses around the country when they no longer wanted him in Brooklyn. He was said to have revealed his attraction to young boys in the seminary.In 1981, Anthony Bevilacqua, then a high-ranking Brooklyn chancery official, who later became the cardinal archbishop of Philadelphia, facilitated Mr. Ferraro’s move to a Missouri parish, where he was later accused of molesting children. He also allegedly abused boys in the dioceses of Rockville Centre and Metuchen, N.J.He was formally removed from ministry in 1988, and in 2004, was convicted of child sexual assault for raping a Massachusetts boy in the 1970s. He is now serving a life sentence in a medium-security prison in Bridgewater, Mass. Throughout his career, from 1960 to 1988, he was officially a priest of the Diocese of Brooklyn.Although the diocese identified the eight former priests, it is impossible to know in most of the cases when the diocese knew about the abuse and what it did about it. The church’s brief statement only says what years they served as active priests, and not when the laicizations took place, or when the first allegations came in.Of the priests, several had never been publicly named as sex abusers, including James Lara, who lost his job as a professor at Arizona State University on Thursday after his name was posted.Charles M. Mangini went on to live in Old Bridge, N.J. after his removal from ministry in 1993. Reached at home on Thursday, the 79-year-old affirmed in a cheery voice that he had been a priest in Brooklyn. He quickly changed his tone when told why the diocese had just posted his name.Christopher Lee Coleman, now 61, who was removed from ministry in 2011, still maintains a Facebook page, and a LinkedIn page that makes it seem as if he is a priest. “I live a vowed life. Ordained 21 May 1994, Roman Catholic Diocese of Brooklyn,” it says.The LinkedIn page says he got a doctorate in sociology from the CUNY Graduate Center, and since 2013 he has been a hermit and counselor, at the Hermitage of Peace. His address is given as the Queen of All Saints Church in Fort Greene, Brooklyn.Anthony Hughes, 42, a clergy sex abuse victim from the diocese who regularly participates in activities it holds for abuse survivors, said Friday that it was a “fabulous idea” that the names were being released, and that he hoped there would be more. When told that the diocese was not planning on releasing the names of deceased priests, he then volunteered the name of the deceased priest who abused him.“Father Robert Titone,” he said, “at  St. Anthony - St. Alphonsus in Greenpoint, Brooklyn.” Mr. Hughes, who recently received a settlement for the abuse, said he was 11 when the abuse started and from a poor family. He recalled the priest as generous. “He was the greatest thing since sliced bread,” Mr. Hughes said, “and then the sickness came out in him.”
Woman Charged in Deadly Fire Said She Was Angry Over Trash, Officials Said A woman accused of starting a fire that killed two people in her Brooklyn apartment building this week told detectives she lit the fire because she was angry that garbage had been left in the hallway, officials said.The woman, Joanna Mei, 22, was charged on Friday with two counts of murder and one count of arson. Detectives had been questioning her at the 68th Precinct station house in Bay Ridge, and a law enforcement official said they were still trying to develop a clear picture of her motive since she walked into the precinct station house a day earlier.She had not appeared in court by early Friday evening. Her lawyer, Peter Kolp, said in a statement, “Our deepest sympathies for loss of life in this tragic incident. We need to conduct our own investigation and look forward to our client’s day in court.”Minutes before 7 a.m. on Thursday, fire ripped through a three-story building with five apartments at 6709 11th Ave., in the Dyker Heights neighborhood. Security-camera footage from next door shows a girl in pajamas acting agitated on the sidewalk at 6:55 a.m. Moments later, a small crowd had gathered, including a man who sprinted over and waved frantically in a downward motion, apparently at people on the building’s upper floors.By 7:01 a.m., firefighters had hoisted a ladder. The firefighters arrived within three minutes of receiving the call, said James E. Leonard, the Fire Department’s chief of department, but flames shot up from the first floor and filled the brick building.Investigators later found a husband and wife dead in a third-floor apartment. The police identified them as Feng Xu, 56, and her husband, Xi Huang, 58.Four other people — a 31-year-old man, a 30-year-old woman, a 4-year-old girl and a 3-month-old boy — were taken to Maimonides Medical Center in stable condition with smoke inhalation, the police said.Three firefighters were also treated for injuries, including one who had sustained burns, officials said. They had been released from the hospital by Friday afternoon.The Fire Department said there was no evidence of working smoke detectors in the building. On the ground floor is a nail salon, and beside it is a door leading to the apartments above.Fire marshals sent a dog to scour the building for evidence of an accelerant that may have been used to start the blaze. The marshals determined the fire was deliberately set in and around garbage in the building’s first-floor hallway, a city official said.Detectives were still working to piece together Ms. Mei’s past and understand her motive, the law enforcement official said.Kevin Wu, the owner of a cellphone store next door, whose security camera captured the commotion as the fire began, said most residents, including the couple who died, hailed from the Chinese city of Taishan in the Guangdong province.Mr. Wu described Mr. Huang as a slight man who had lived there for a little under a year. He did not know the man’s wife. Mr. Wu said he often saw Mr. Huang pacing the sidewalk and talking on his cellphone, and he added that Mr. Huang paid his cellphone bill earlier this week in the store.“Nice man,” Mr. Wu said.A charred door lay on the sidewalk in front of the building on Friday afternoon, resting on a mangled, partly melted baby stroller. Police tape and a police car cordoned off the front of the building.Through smashed-out windows on the third floor, a pumpkin-colored pinwheel could be seen spinning beside a metal shelf that held a box of Legos.
Feminism’s A-List Attends Kate Millett’s Memorial in New York Like so many rousing military celebrations, Kate Millett’s memorial service began with bagpipes.The veterans of second-wave feminism had turned out by the hundreds, foot soldiers and commanders alike, including Gloria Steinem and Letty Cottin Pogrebin, both of whom wore leather pants, revolutionary-style. (“We didn’t coordinate that,” Ms. Pogrebin said.) Cynthia MacAdams, the photographer known for her 1977 book, “Emergence,” a collection of portraits of the era’s feminists and other heroes — Patti Smith, Lily Tomlin and Ms. Steinem — wore a voluminous orange silk scarf that looked like a military sash. Her rendition of Dylan Thomas’s “Do Not Go Gentle Into That Good Night,” was an anguished dirge to her late friend.Phyllis Chesler, the activist and author, should have worn a cast, because she’d broken her leg. Instead, she brought a walker and a cane. She ended her reflections by reading from the St. Crispin’s Day speech from “Henry V,” recast with feminine pronouns: “We few, we happy few, we band of sisters,” and so on.Ms. Millett died Sept. 6 in Paris, a week before her 83rd birthday, with Sophie Keir, her spouse and partner of 39 years, by her side. The memorial was held Thursday afternoon at the Fourth Universalist Society, a Unitarian church on Central Park West.Before the service, friends and family traded war stories. Barbara Love, the lesbian activist, remembered a protest 50 years ago when she, Ms. Millett and others demonstrated against The New York Times and its gender-segregated want ads. And Ms. Love recalled, hilariously, the many actions Ms. Millett attended with a toilet. “It was arrested several times,” said Ms. Love of the toilet, though not at one famous demonstration in front of the Colgate-Palmolive offices on Park Avenue, when Ms. Millett and others dumped soap flakes into it to protest the company’s treatment of women on the assembly line.Ms. Millett’s final demonstration was the women’s march last January in New York City, Ms. Love said. She attended in her wheelchair, holding a sign with her name on it. The police opened the barricades for her, and the march’s organizers led her to the front of the line, where demonstrators approached Ms. Millett to pay their respects and give thanks. “Even the police knew who she was,” Ms. Love said. It was a fitting tribute to the woman who some have called the most famous feminist you’ve never heard of.Ms. Millett was the Oxford-educated author of “Sexual Politics,” her doctoral thesis for Columbia University that became a global sensation when it was published in 1970. Its rigorous analysis of gender dynamics in literature and history revealed a deep-rooted pattern of male discrimination that pointed out women’s conditioning to their second-class status.As Judith Shulevitz wrote recently in The New York Review of Books, Ms. Millett all but invented feminist literary criticism. “Sex Pol,” as Ms. Millett called it, would land her on the cover of Time magazine, which proclaimed her the Mao Zedong of the woman’s movement, though as many recalled Thursday, Ms. Millett was uneasy with fame. Her discomfort was not just because she was extremely shy and suffered from manic-depression, but because she anticipated, rightly, the fury that would greet her scholarship.But it was still a game changer. “It made me a feminist,” said Ms. Pogrebin, adding that her first book, “How to Make it in a Man’s World,” and “Sexual Politics,” were published the same year by the same publisher, Doubleday, and that the two women shared an editor, Betty Prashker.“Betty gave me Kate’s manuscript,” Ms. Pogrebin said, “and after reading it, I wanted to toss mine in the trash. I felt like I was capitulating to the patriarchy, and Kate was arguing for revolution. ‘Sexual Politics’ was my epiphany.”Ms. Steinem began her reflections by reading a note from Catharine A. MacKinnon, the feminist activist and legal scholar who argued persuasively that sexual harassment was a title IX issue, and who wrote the introduction to last year’s reprint of “Sexual Politics” by Columbia University Press. Quoting Ms. MacKinnon, Ms. Steinem declared that Ms. Millett “conceived the critique of sexuality as male-dominated from the bedroom to the boardroom to the potted plant.”Then Ms. Steinem paused and looked out at the crowd. “Don’t you kind of wish we could read Kate on Harvey Weinstein?” she said, to loud applause and laughter from a group clearly familiar with the producer’s alleged emissions into a potted plant.The speakers recalled Ms. Millett’s upstate New York farm, otherwise known as The Farm, which she conceived as a utopian women’s arts colony, and where bare-breasted women grew Christmas trees that Ms. Millett would sell on the Bowery each December. In the early days, said Linda Clarke, an old friend, neighbors would complain about the nudity and call the police, until Ms. Millett won them over.On the farm, Ms. Clarke said, Ms. Millett was finally the president of her own university, a reference to Ms. Millett’s frustration at not being able to hold on to an academic post. (In 1968 she was fired from her teaching position at Barnard College for her role in the student protests there.)The nine female speakers, including Yoko Ono, who spoke from a wheelchair, recalled Ms. Millett’s Dadaist artwork (chairs with human arms and legs; stools wearing shoes; giant vulvas) and her proud bohemianism — what Eleanor Pam, the president of the Veteran Feminists of America, called her reverse elitism.“She was probably the only person in the world who believed that being evicted from the Bowery was a step down,” Ms. Pam said.The actor Kathleen Turner was a stand-in for both Hillary Clinton and Robin Morgan, the author and activist. In her distinctive, throaty bass, Ms. Turner read a short letter from Mrs. Clinton, and a stirring recollection from Ms. Morgan. In one war story, Ms. Morgan described a party thrown in Ms. Millett’s Bowery loft to pay for the legal fees of women who had been arrested at a Miss America pageant protest in Atlantic City in 1968. So many people showed up, the floor buckled. As a result, most of the money raised that night went to shoring up the building, rather than to the lawyers it was destined for.More seriously, Ms. Turner said, “A feminist generation is marching again, this time into shadow. Another generation will march into the sun.”In between speeches, the folk singer and activist Holly Near led the audience in familiar protest anthems from back in the day, including “Bread and Roses,” from the poem about striking female mill workers, and Ms. Near’s own, “Singing for Our Lives,” which she wrote after Harvey Milk was murdered. Everyone seemed to know the words. Ms. Ono joined hands with Ms. Keir and Ms. Chesler.“I wouldn’t have missed this revolution,” Ms. Chesler said, “not for love or money.”
Upper West Side School Zones Changed, but Not All Parents Went Along The mayor has held it up as an example of what the city needs to do  to desegregate its public schools: A year ago, a local education council redrew the boundaries of 11 elementary school zones on Manhattan’s Upper West Side in an effort to reduce overcrowding and, it hoped, chip away at the stark racial and economic disparities that separated several neighboring schools.A year later, with data available on the first class of kindergartners enrolled, the results of the rezoning are mixed.The three schools most affected by the rezoning were Public School 191, P.S. 199 and P.S. 452. For years, P.S. 191 had served a housing project, Amsterdam Houses, and its students were largely poor, black and Hispanic. P.S. 199, considered by many wealthy families to be one of the most desirable schools in Manhattan, was largely white and increasingly overcrowded. P.S. 452, which opened in 2010, had similar demographics as P.S. 199.In a complex dance, the catchment areas of all three schools were redrawn and two of the schools moved. P.S. 191, formerly on West 61st Street, moved to a newly constructed building a block to the west, and P.S. 452 was moved from West 77th Street, where it shared a building with two other schools, to P.S. 191’s previous building. In the process, Amsterdam Houses was divided among the three schools’ zones, resulting in each zone being significantly more diverse. The hope was that P.S. 199 and P.S. 452 would gain more low-income students, and P.S. 191, with a fresh start in a new building, would attract more upper-middle-class and wealthy families.Of the three schools, P.S. 452 seems to have changed the most in terms of its demographics. This year’s kindergarten class is 51 percent white; last year, it was 68 percent white. This year, 15 of 61 kindergartners are Hispanic, compared to fewer than 10 of the 66 kindergartners last year. When the numbers are that small, the Education Department does not release the precise figure. Fewer than 10 black students attended kindergarten in either year.The number of low-income students in kindergarten at P.S. 452, as measured by the department’s formula, also increased: This year, 14 kindergarten students are poor compared to fewer than 10 last year.At P.S. 191, the results are not as clear. This year’s kindergarten class increased to 50 students from 34 last year. Increasing enrollment at P.S. 191 was one of the goals of the rezoning.Whether the racial makeup in kindergarten changed, however, is difficult to know, with the number of white and Asian students so small both this year and last that the department withheld the data. The percentage of kindergarten students classified as low income, however, decreased to 74 percent this year from 82 percent last year.Of the three schools, P.S. 199 appears to have seen the least amount of change. The rezoning shrank P.S. 199’s zone, and this year’s kindergarten class, at 110 students, is smaller than last year’s, at 135. But this year’s class is also whiter than last year’s group: 67 percent white compared to 61 percent. The total percentage of black and Hispanic students in kindergarten decreased to 10 from 14 last year. The number of low-income students increased, but by how much is unknown because the number last year was fewer than 10 and was therefore withheld.Mark Gonsalves owns an apartment at 165 West End Avenue, in a building that was shifted in the rezoning from P.S. 199 to P.S. 191. He has a son who was entering kindergarten this year, who has some learning disabilities. He said that after looking at both schools and consulting various experts, he decided that P.S. 199 was a better fit for his son. He said he was also concerned by the imbalance in the amount of money raised by P.S. 199’s parent teacher association — nearly $800,000 in the 2015-16 school year — and P.S. 191’s, which the department had no plan to address.“The superintendent basically said that the schools would be separate and unequal, and that did not jive well with me,” Mr. Gonsalves said.In the end, he moved his family into a rental apartment in the new zone of P.S. 199, where his son now attends kindergarten.Andrew Chu’s family was also rezoned from P.S. 199 to P.S. 191. He had enrolled his son in prekindergarten at P.S. 191 last year, and he and his wife decided to stick with the school this year. Mr. Chu joined the school leadership team and has been active in trying to recruit other parents to the school. He and other parents have helped organize a coding workshop for this year’s third, seventh and eighth graders, financed by the local City Council member, Helen Rosenthal. He said that parents have also raised money in the hope of hiring a Mandarin teacher next year for prekindergarten and kindergarten, with the goal of offering the language to an additional grade each year.“Demographically, if you look at our school versus 452 and 199, I think there’s still a pretty disparate difference,” he said. But he said he thought that new programs, like Mandarin and the coding classes, would appeal to parents.Recruitment is “literally family by family,” he said, adding, “I think we’re going to build more momentum going into this year and into the next.”Clara Hemphill, the editor of Insideschools.org at The New School’s Center for New York City Affairs, said she thought the lack of change in demographics at P.S. 199 suggested that some parents from Amsterdam Houses who were rezoned to P.S. 199 might be choosing instead to send their children to P.S. 191, where most of their neighbors’ children go to school.“Just as it can be intimidating to be the only white child in a class, it can also be intimidating to be the only child of color in a class,” she said. “If this is going to work, both sides have to really think hard about how to make everybody feel welcome.”
Manhattan Prosecutors Subpoena Weinstein Company Records Manhattan prosecutors investigating sexual assault allegations against Harvey Weinstein have subpoenaed a wide range of records from the producer’s former company, as well as two law firms that represented him or his company, two people with knowledge of the matter said Friday.The subpoenas indicate a significant broadening of the criminal inquiry, which prosecutors and the police made public last week after Vanity Fair reported allegations by the actress Paz de la Huerta that she had been raped by Mr. Weinstein.The prosecutor listed on the subpoenas is Christopher Conroy, the chief of the major economic crimes bureau in the office of the Manhattan district attorney, Cyrus R. Vance Jr., a sign that the investigation is expanding to look for evidence of fraud or other financial crimes by Mr. Weinstein or others.The two people who described the subpoenas spoke on the condition of anonymity.The records sought from Mr. Weinstein’s former production company include legal settlements with women who accused him of sexual misconduct, payroll records and any other documents reflecting who has received funds and who has been dismissed, one of the people said. Mr. Weinstein’s personnel file was also sought.The prosecutors also are seeking records from the law firms Morvillo Abramowitz Grand Iason & Anello and Boies Schiller Flexner, the people said.The Morvillo firm represented Mr. Weinstein in connection with accusations in 2015 that he had sexually assaulted an Italian model. Mr. Vance’s office brought no charges in that case, a decision for which he has come under fire. Mr. Vance has said he did not believe his prosecutors could prove that a crime occurred, while police officials have said an arrest should have been made.Boies Schiller Flexner represented the production company, The Weinstein Company, in connection with several matters, including signing a contract with an investigative firm that was hired to try to block The New York Times from publishing a news story about Mr. Weinstein’s sexual misconduct with women.David Boies, the chairman of the firm, has said he was aware of four of as many as a dozen settlements with women who had accused Mr. Weinstein of sexual misconduct, and was personally involved with one. Benjamin Brafman, one of Mr. Weinstein’s lawyers, declined to comment. Elkan Abramowitz, a partner at the Morvillo firm who represented Mr. Weinstein in the 2015 investigation, declined to comment. Mr. Boies could not immediately be reached for comment.Joan Vollero, a spokeswoman for the district attorney’s office, declined to comment.The New York Police Department has cast a wide net in its investigation of Mr. Weinstein, which began in the days after The Times and The New Yorker detailed his long history of allegations of sexual harassment and sexual assault of women in reports early last month.The reports led to a deluge of tips to the police in New York and London about other episodes. The police in London and Los Angeles are investigating sexual assault allegations against Mr. Weinstein. Federal prosecutors in Manhattan are also conducting a separate investigation into transactions arranged by Mr. Weinstein involving $600,000 raised at an AIDS charity auction, people with knowledge of the matter have said.Ms. de la Huerta’s complaint made Mr. Weinstein the focus of sex crimes investigators in New York.In recent days, Ms. de la Huerta, an actress known for her work on the HBO drama “Boardwalk Empire,” told detectives that Mr. Weinstein had raped her in her TriBeCa apartment on two occasions in 2010. The first time, she said, the movie producer had given her a ride home after meeting her and asked to have a nightcap in her apartment. Then he overpowered her, saying, “I know you’re ready to become a real actress.”The second time, according to her account, Mr. Weinstein ignored her pleas on the telephone to leave her alone and was waiting in her lobby when she arrived home one night. After persuading her to let him into her apartment, he raped her, according to her account.Mr. Weinstein’s lawyers have denied the allegations.Robert K. Boyce, the chief of detectives in the New York Police Department, has said Ms. de la Huerta “put forth a credible and detailed narrative.”But investigators say the case presents hurdles because it is seven years old and Ms. de la Huerta did not report the alleged rapes to the police at the time.
Karl Katz, Museum Director in New York and Israel, Dies at 88 Karl Katz, who was so entranced by an art history lecture in college that he went on to become a founding curator of the Israel Museum, convey the Metropolitan Museum of Art’s vast collection to wider audiences by video, and play a key role in finding a home for the International Center of Photography, died on Wednesday in Manhattan. He was 88.His son, Jonathan, said the cause was congestive heart failure.Mr. Katz also ran the Jewish Museum in Manhattan; founded and directed Muse Film and Television, a nonprofit producer of films about art; and, as a consultant, helped plan the Museum of the Jewish Diaspora in Tel Aviv, the Museum of Tolerance in Los Angeles, the Hans Christian Andersen Museum in Copenhagen, the Kiasma Museum of Contemporary Art in Helsinki and the P. T. Barnum Museum in Bridgeport, Conn.From 1971 to 1980, Mr. Katz was chairman for special projects  at the Met, where he founded the office of film and television, which he directed from 1980 to 1991 and which commissioned nearly 50 films by outside filmmakers.They included “Metropolitan Cats” (1984), a feature about the depiction of cats from ancient Egypt to 19th-century Paris, and “Don’t Eat the Pictures” (1983), a collaboration between the museum and the producers of “Sesame Street” in which Cookie Monster has to be restrained from gobbling up the apples in a Cézanne still life.“It became clear to me after 10 years of mounting exhibitions how much time, effort and money was sunk into them for a short-lived result,” Mr. Katz told The New York Times in 1984.Typically, he said, after such investments, the only legacy of those exhibitions was a catalog.“The most logical extension of this fleeting experience,” he said, “is a film, with a long shelf life and a huge audience.”Mr. Katz had not considered himself a serious student in high school and entered college contemplating a career in journalism or theater.He appeared in plays while in college and performed sock-puppet shows for children on weekends, but abandoned thoughts of a theatrical career after he was found to have a minor speech impediment and had what he described, without elaborating, as “an unfortunate onstage experience” while performing in an Ibsen play.His epiphany was a 90-minute standing-room-only lecture without notes at Columbia by the art historian Meyer Schapiro in which “connections were made like so many synapses firing — everything from psychoanalysis and religion to politics and semiotics,” Mr. Katz wrote in his autobiography, “The Exhibitionist: Living Museums, Loving Museums” (2016).“Those 90 minutes sealed the deal,” he wrote. “I would study art history and archaeology.”Karl L. Katz — his son said the middle initial did not stand for anything — was born on Oct. 22, 1929, in Brooklyn to Maurice Katz, a salesman, and the former Rose Leibovitz, both of whom were active in Jewish and Zionist causes.A yeshiva student, he graduated from Midwood High School in Brooklyn and was muddling his way through Long Island University when his older brother suggested he transfer to Columbia’s School of General Studies, which had been reorganized into an undergraduate college after World War II to accommodate returning veterans.He earned a bachelor’s degree in art history and Semitic studies and a master’s in fine arts and archaeology at Columbia. He completed his doctoral thesis in early Hebrew manuscripts from Yemen but never fulfilled the language requirement for his doctorate; he said he could not bring himself to learn German so soon after the Holocaust.In addition to his son, Mr. Katz, who lived in Manhattan, is survived by his wife, the former Elizabeth Segal, whom he married in 1978, and his brother, Elihu.Mr. Katz began his career when he was recruited in 1953 as an educator at the Met during the exhibition “From the Land of the Bible.” He then went to Israel as an archaeologist and was hired as curator of the National Bezalel Museum, the forerunner to the Israel Museum, on which he collaborated with Teddy Kollek, the mayor of Jerusalem.After 13 years in Israel, he returned to New York in 1969 to become director of the Jewish Museum, where he sought to reconcile its liturgical agenda with more contemporary art.He left in 1971 to rejoin the Met as chairman for special projects, a job he held until 1980. He then directed the museum’s office of film and television until 1991, when he founded Muse.Among the documentaries that company has produced are “Degenerate Art” (1993), about an exhibition commissioned by Hitler to denigrate modern art; “Ai Weiwei: Never Sorry” (2012), about the Chinese artist and activist; and “Herb & Dorothy” (2008), about the art collectors Herbert and Dorothy Vogel.In the early 1970s, after the Jewish Museum presented an exhibition curated by the photographer Cornell Capa, Mr. Katz persuaded Mr. Capa that his International Center for Photography needed a museum to house its collection. It opened in 1974 in a former mansion on Fifth Avenue.Asked in 1997 by The Times to draw on his many professional incarnations to define art, Mr. Katz replied: “People look at art as if it were a checklist; the label is sometimes more important than the work of art.“My sense is that looking at art is like having a conversation,” he continued. “If it’s not visual and it’s not visceral and it’s not communicative, it’s not a work of art.”
After a Nominator Is Denied Access, ‘1984’ Is Ineligible for Tonys This year’s Broadway production of “1984” will be ineligible for Tony Awards because the production refused to allow the journalist Jose Antonio Vargas, who is a member of the nominating committee, to see the play.The play’s lead producer, Scott Rudin, did not explain why Mr. Vargas was denied access, and neither Mr. Rudin nor Mr. Vargas immediately offered any comment. Another lead producer, Sonia Friedman, said, “I don’t have a comment on the matter other than I am disappointed with the outcome.”The Tony Awards administration committee made the unusual decision to disqualify “1984” during a meeting on Thursday. The awards rules require that producers invite all members of the Tony nominating committee — there are currently 49 — to a performance.“It was determined that not all elements of the required eligibility were fulfilled,” the awards administrators said in a statement Friday. “Both the production and the committee have discussed the matter in private. While all parties involved do not necessarily agree on the outcome, all parties agree that the issue was handled properly.”A Tonys spokeswoman would not confirm that Mr. Vargas was denied access to the play, but several theater industry leaders confirmed that he was the excluded nominator. Last season, his first as a Tony nominator, he recused himself from voting.Mr. Vargas is a prominent immigration-rights advocate who in 2011, writing for The New York Times Magazine, acknowledged that he is an undocumented immigrant.In 2010, he wrote critically about “The Social Network,” a movie about the founding of Facebook co-produced by Mr. Rudin.A spokesman for Mr. Rudin denied that the article — which described the movie as “a simplistic take on a complex character masquerading as an important film” — had anything to do with Mr. Vargas being denied access to see “1984,” but declined to offer further explanation.The play, adapted and directed by Robert Icke and Duncan Macmillan from the novel by George Orwell, ran from May 18 to Oct. 8. Its cast included Tom Sturridge, Olivia Wilde and Reed Birney, a Tony winner for “The Humans.”The show cost $4 million to mount, according to documents on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. It opened to mixed reviews, and grossed $6.9 million over 21 weeks, playing to audiences that ranged from 57 percent to 90 percent full. In total, it was seen by 112,232 people, according to the Broadway League.
As Democrats Celebrate Wins, Queens Republicans Close In on an Upset Amid a Democratic electoral wave that swept through New York and beyond on Tuesday, one incumbent Democrat in a restive corner of residential Queens found herself cast ashore.Elizabeth S. Crowley, a two-term City Council member who descends from a powerful Queens political family, remains locked in the city’s only contest that is still too close to call. The race, which may not be decided until next week at the earliest, was an outlier for both its uncertainty and the raw emotions that it brought to the fore.Several dynamics propelled Ms. Crowley’s Republican opponent, Robert F. Holden, a longstanding civic association leader and city college professor, to the verge of an upset victory: anger over the city housing homeless in neighborhood hotels; fear that the eventual closing of Rikers Island would mean a local jail; and a virulent dislike of Mayor Bill de Blasio.To complicate matters, Mr. Holden is actually a registered Democrat.As of Thursday, with unofficial results still showing Mr. Holden up by 133 votes out of more than 20,000 cast, neither side had declared victory. Hundreds of absentee and paper ballots could swing the vote and could not be counted until next week.“The more paper ballots are out there, the more optimistic I am,” Ms. Crowley said in a telephone interview on Thursday.Mr. Holden, 66, a lifelong Democrat who said he had long ago voted for George McGovern and more recently for Bernie Sanders, first challenged Ms. Crowley in the Democratic primary in September.It was the first political race for Mr. Holden, a centrist, even conservative politician of an older Democratic sort. He channeled anger at Mr. de Blasio that was present in many neighborhoods, especially among white residents in less dense areas of the city, and seized upon local discontent over homeless policy that helped lead to the ouster of a long-serving state assemblywoman, Margaret Markey, in a Democratic primary in 2016.“He’s very unpopular; I didn’t have to do a poll to find out,” Mr. Holden said of the mayor. “I’m conservative on some issues, progressive on others,” he said, adding that his resistance to housing homeless in local hotels and a new shelter that the city “tried to shove down our throats” animated his desire to get into the race.Mr. de Blasio, when asked of Mr. Holden during a postelection news conference on Wednesday, said he did not “understand Democrats who run as Republicans.”“If you can run as a Republican in Donald Trump’s America, you just bought the whole label,” the mayor said. “I don’t know the guy, I’ll try and work with him, but he just signed up for something very troubling in my book.”Told of Mr. de Blasio’s comments, Mr. Holden said, “I’ve spoken to him many times and yet he wants to label me a Trump supporter.” Mr. Holden, the head of the Juniper Park Civic Association and community board member, said the two had spoken when Mr. de Blasio was public advocate.“He labels you,” he said. “I go for the best candidate. Nobody can tell you that Hillary Clinton was a better candidate than Bernie Sanders.”Council District 30 borders Brooklyn to the south and includes the neighborhoods of Maspeth, Glendale, Middle Village, Ridgewood, Woodside and Woodhaven — mostly middle class enclaves of single family homes and small apartment buildings that are more white and conservative than surrounding areas.Ms. Crowley broke what had been a long Republican hold when she first won her Council seat in 2008. She kept it in 2013. On the Council, she has been active on criminal justice reform, particularly on Rikers Island, and supportive of the idea of closing the facility — a stance that caused her problems in the campaign.“I think it was the scare tactics in the end,” she said. “That I want to put a jail in the community, and that I didn’t fight de Blasio hard enough with the homeless shelter. Or that I wasn’t independent, which is completely untrue.”Ms. Crowley benefited from party support during her race: Her cousin, Representative Joseph Crowley, is the powerful Democratic leader in Queens; her parents both served in the City Council. If she were to lose, it would be the second time that the vaunted Queens machine — seen as influential in the looming fight over who will become City Council speaker — failed to defend an incumbent in the area.“I really believe Liz did everything she could possibly do to win this race but the headwinds that she was flying against were too strong,” said Councilman Rory Lancman, a fellow Queens Democrat whose own staff helped on Ms. Crowley’s campaign.Ms. Crowley outpolled the mayor in the district on Election Day by more than 15 percent, according to her campaign.After Mr. Holden lost the primary, county Republican leaders decided to offer him their vacant line. He already had a spot on the lines for the Reform and Conservative Parties, an indication that his views were not shared by most Democratic candidates in the city.“He has a very moderate to conservative view of things,” said Joann Ariola, the new head of the Queens County Republican Party. “Bob Holden has a long history with the Republican Party in supporting Republican candidates,” she added. “He saw how the district was turning to the negative.”Eric Ulrich, a Republican councilman in Queens who prevailed in his election Tuesday despite facing a Democratic challenger backed by Ms. Crowley, said Mr. Holden’s strength could have easily been foreseen, and he did not have kind words for the incumbent.“She will not be missed by many people on the City Council,” Mr. Ulrich said. “She was not a force to be reckoned with. I think she was very ineffective. She rubbed people the wrong way.”When told of Mr. Ulrich’s comments, Ms. Crowley said, “It’s unfortunate that Eric thinks that way. I had a ton of support from my colleagues who are still holding out hope that we’re going to pull this off.”
Remembering the ‘Lost Battalion,’ 99 Years Later The actor Stephen Lang knew where he was going as he threaded his way through Central Park. He was not lost, and neither was the World War I Army unit he was talking about, the unit that became known as the “lost battalion,” the 77th Division of the 307th Infantry.What is lost now — lost from public consciousness, anyway — is an awareness of the lost battalion’s against-all-odds battle 99 years ago. Mr. Lang is working on rebuilding that awareness, one performance at a time.The lost battalion — outnumbered, outmaneuvered and outguessed — was cut off from other American forces along the Western Front. It was also hit by friendly fire and stunned by German flamethrowers. A captain was so badly wounded he leaned on rifles as crutches as he continued to give orders to the single surviving machine-gunner.The casualties were almost unfathomable: By the time reinforcements finally arrived, 107 soldiers had been killed, 190 were wounded and 63 were missing. Little more than a third of the unit, 194 of the original 554 soldiers, escaped unhurt.The commander was awarded the Medal of Honor, and that intrigued Mr. Lang because of his own professional past: In the early 2000s, he adapted oral histories of Medal of Honor recipients from the book “Beyond Glory.” He performed the show at military installations and Off Broadway, among other places.Mr. Lang said he began thinking about a piece about World War I “because that’s where the criteria for the medal began to solidify, and it was a war I didn’t know much about.”Rounding a corner and stepping into the World War I Memorial Grove in the park, Mr. Lang said the story of the lost battalion was more complicated than the numbers suggested. He maintained, for example, that the lost battalion’s commander never said the words that made him and his men famous.Mr. Lang, a Tony-nominated actor who starred in James Cameron’s film “Avatar,” knows all this because he adapted the story of the lost battalion as “His Dark Land,” a show that he will perform at Symphony Space at 7:30 p.m. on Saturday, the anniversary of the holiday that began as Armistice Day marking the end of World War I. The actor James Naughton will play Damon Runyon, the quintessential New York reporter-turned-foreign correspondent who, in Mr. Lang’s script, asks about the commander’s memorable line.“I contend he was given the Medal of Honor for words he never said, that he got tired of denying,” Mr. Lang said.The words were “go to hell.” The commander was Charles W. Whittlesey, a lawyer in his early 30s who was sent to France in September 1917.Thirteen months later, the 307th was ordered to break through the German lines as part of a huge and carefully planned American offensive. One account of the operation reported that “this was to be General John J. Pershing’s all-out effort to show the world that his United States First Army could win the war before Christmas.”Whittlesey was in charge of what Harold Holzer, the director of the Roosevelt House Public Policy Institute at Hunter College, called a unit of “unruly polyglot New Yorkers of Chinese, Italian, Irish and Jewish extraction, all of whom Whittlesey championed.” “His Dark Land” was performed at the Roosevelt House on Wednesday.“The night before they mustered out, they drank and brawled on the street,” said Mr. Holzer, who will introduce the “His Dark Land” on Saturday, “and then they cohered.”And once the war was over, they were remembered — at first.The memorial grove began with a single oak in 1921, according to the Central Park Conservancy. By the mid-1930s, 26 trees had been planted in the area. Sixteen represented each company in the 307th Regiment, from which the lost battalion was drawn. The other trees were dedicated to soldiers who had belonged to the fraternal organization Knights of Pythias.The conservancy said the grove was vandalized in 1960, and 11 of the commemorative plaques by the trees disappeared. The Pythians replaced them with a single monument in 1961.Hurricane Sandy did more damage in 2012, pounding eight trees so badly that they had to be taken out. More recently, the paths and the infrastructure around the memorial — the irrigation and drainage systems and the lighting — were rebuilt.This was the setting on Monday as Mr. Lang described the encounter popularized with the “go to hell” remark.The Germans had sent an American soldier whom they had captured, a private named Lowell Hollingshead, with a message offering to end the carnage if Whittlesey would surrender. The newspapers, Mr. Lang maintains, supplied the rather colorful language for “no.”In fact, Mr. Lang said, Whittlesey never replied to the Germans.What Whittlesey said as he considered the Germans’ message was not recorded, but Mr. Lang asserted that “go to hell” did not sound like him. When American artillery fire rained down on Whittlesey’s unit because the coordinates had been jumbled, Whittlesey sent a message that included two sentences that were prolix where “go to hell” was punchy: “Our artillery is dropping a barrage directly on us. For heaven’s sake stop it.”After the war, Whittlesey was a pallbearer at the dedication of the new Tomb of the Unknown Soldier at Arlington National Cemetery on Armistice Day. By some accounts, Whittlesey seemed uncomfortable that day. Two weeks later, on Thanksgiving Day, he boarded a ship for Havana.After dinner, he excused himself and apparently jumped overboard. He was never seen again; his body was never found.“They called it ‘battle fatigue’ in those days,” Mr. Lang said.
Radhika Jones, a Times Books Editor, Said to Be Next Vanity Fair Editor In a dramatic changing of the guard, Radhika Jones, the editorial director of the books department at The New York Times and a former top editor at Time magazine, is expected to be named the next editor of Vanity Fair, according to two people with knowledge of the decision.Condé Nast, which publishes Vanity Fair, plans to make the announcement as soon as Monday.Ms. Jones, 44, will succeed the 68-year-old Graydon Carter, who said in September that he was stepping down from the glossy general-interest magazine after a 25-year run at its helm.A spokeswoman for Condé Nast declined to comment. The Times also declined to comment.In anointing Ms. Jones, who holds degrees from Harvard College and Columbia University, Vanity Fair has placed its future in the hands of a woman — the first since Tina Brown served as the magazine’s editor from 1984 until 1992 — who has cultivated the kind of sophistication and prestige that Condé Nast has long valued.Mr. Carter’s announcement two months ago set off a race to inherit his throne and ignited speculation across the media industry. In a magazine business that has lost much of its luster in recent years, Vanity Fair has largely retained its glow, and its editorship remains one of the most coveted in the business.Robert Sauerberg, the chief executive of Condé Nast, and Anna Wintour, the editor-in-chief of Vogue and Condé Nast’s artistic director, oversaw the search. David Remnick, the editor of The New Yorker, also played a significant role in selecting Mr. Carter’s successor. Mr. Carter was not involved in the decision-making process.With the selection of Ms. Jones, Condé Nast has made clear that it still respects print, even as it looks to a digital future less tied to its magazines. Before joining the books desk at The Times last year, Ms. Jones was deputy managing editor at Time magazine, where she oversaw the Time 100 issue. At the Paris Review, the literary magazine known for its Writers at Work interviews, she was a managing editor. She has also worked at Grand Street, Artforum and The Moscow Times.Her deep familiarity with celebrity, journalism, art and publishing were probably big draws for Condé Nast, whose editors are often expected to mingle among influential people in the disparate spheres covered by their publications.While at Vanity Fair, Mr. Carter became a celebrity in his own right, wielding his influence beyond the world of print magazines. A party host, restaurateur and film producer, he became a known figure in Washington, New York and Hollywood. Under his leadership, Vanity Fair’s annual post-Oscar party became a big, glittering affair attended by almost everyone who won a statuette. It also served as a major advertisement for the brand.But the state of the magazine industry has changed dramatically since Mr. Carter became Vanity Fair’s editor in the summer of 1992, and its financial challenges have not spared Condé Nast. The company, which expects to bring in $100 million less in revenue this year than it did in 2016, has slashed the budgets at its titles and is in the middle of laying off 80 employees. Earlier this month, it said it was reducing the print frequency of titles like GQ and Glamour and shutting the print edition of Teen Vogue completely.Whereas magazine editors of yore could swan about the city in Town Cars and take long martini lunches, they must now devise ways for magazines to survive in a fraught climate. Instead of devoting much of their working hours to holding the hands of temperamental writers or overseeing the designs of print pages, they now help organize gatherings and coordinate video production.In this time of industry-wide belt-tightening, the curtains seem to be drawing on the age of the celebrity editor, who commanded seven-figure salaries and generous expense accounts.Other top candidates for the job included Janice Min, who breathed life into Us Weekly and The Hollywood Reporter; Anne Fulenwider, the editor in chief of Marie Claire; Andrew Ross Sorkin, a columnist and editor at The Times, and the founder of its DealBook franchise; and Mike Hogan, the digital director of Vanity Fair.
After 20 Years of Financial Turmoil, a Columnist’s Last Shot For the past 20 years or so, as a business columnist for The New York Times, I’ve had a front-row seat for bull and bear markets, scandals, crises and management mischief.But I am leaving The Times, and this is my last shot at Fair Game. So it seems a fitting moment to look back at what’s changed and what hasn’t in the financial world, for better or worse.In addition to a string of garden-variety banking and business scandals, four seismic financial events occurred during my time as a columnist: the collapse of the Long-Term Capital Management hedge fund in 1998, the bursting of the dot-com bubble in 2000, the accounting scandals of Enron in 2001 and WorldCom in 2002, and the mother of them all — the mortgage debacle — in 2008. That one brought world economies to the precipice and wiped out Lehman Brothers and a raft of troubled banks.That many episodes of financial tumult in two decades seem like a lot.Some of this turmoil has generated positive change. Accounting scandals, for example, have been much rarer since Enron and WorldCom shook the financial markets. One reason: a 2002 federal law, known as Sarbanes-Oxley, requiring top executives to attest to the accuracy of their companies’ financial statements.“Sarbanes-Oxley came into effect 15 years ago, and there have been fewer accounting scandals and more accountability,” said Jack Ciesielski, founder of R. G. Associates and publisher of The Analyst’s Accounting Observer, an accounting research service. “Those accounting scandals were a crisis we should be thankful for; we got through it, a law was passed, and it works.”It’s too bad that the mortgage crisis six years later didn’t result in heightened accountability.Here’s another sign of progress: Believe it or not, corporate directors are more active in their oversight than they used to be. Egregious board practices and chummy appointments are less common.Nell Minow is a corporate governance expert and vice chairwoman at ValueEdge Advisors, a firm that guides institutional shareholders on reducing risk in their portfolios. She has been rattling cages in the governance field since the mid-1980s and says she’s seen a definite improvement in boardroom makeup and practices.“When I started in this field, O. J. Simpson was on five boards, including the audit committee of Infinity Broadcasting,” she recalled in an interview. “And at another company, the C.E.O.’s father was on the compensation committee. We’ve come a long way.”That’s not to say that problems arising from sleepy and clubby boards have been eradicated. “Exhibit A is executive compensation,” Ms. Minow said. “The first C.E.O. pay package I ever complained about was $11 million. The very fact that that has gone completely berserk shows that boards are still a long way from where they should be.”A case in point: Thomas M. Rutledge, the head of Charter Communications, who received $98 million in 2016, according to Equilar, a compensation analytics company. Yes, he’s an outlier, but the average chief executive compensation at 200 large public companies last year was almost $20 million, Equilar said.Something else that hasn’t changed over the decades is analyst and investor reliance on companies’ creative earnings calculations. These figures, which do not conform to generally accepted accounting practices, typically exclude costs that companies incur in their operations. Such costs include stock awards given to executives and employees and merger expenses. Excluding them makes a company’s results look more dazzling than they otherwise would.Inventive earnings calculations, while more prevalent today, were very popular in the lead-up to the dot-com crash. Back then, analysts valued companies based on imaginative, nonfinancial metrics like the number of page views a retail website received or the percentage of “engaged shoppers” visiting a site. That didn’t end well, even for many companies that had exhibited highly engaged shoppers and millions of views.“I find it ironic that GAAP is much better than it has been for a long time, but analysts have more disdain for it,” Mr. Ciesielski said, referring to generally accepted accounting principles. “They blindly accept the methodology that management gives them. Folks prefer darkness, I guess.”To be sure, embracing management’s preferred financial figures isn’t as perilous when stock prices are rocketing. Bull markets cover a multitude of sins, after all. But as the dot-com episode showed, genuine earnings growth — the kind companies can take to the bank — becomes a crucial underpinning when share prices turn down. That’s not true with financial metrics that can only be characterized as “earnings before the bad stuff.”My search for truths on Wall Street and elsewhere over the years has sometimes raised hackles. That’s to the good. It wasn’t my job to be part of a company’s spin machine.But responses from my subjects could get a little kooky. A favorite example occurred in the early 2000s, and it involved a major Wall Street firm.I had written about an arbitration case that an investor client had brought against the firm. The firm prevailed in the matter, and the general counsel convened a dinner to celebrate.In a phone conversation, the firm’s general counsel told me that the menu for the dinner had featured a photograph of me, placed inside a red circle with a slash though it. The general counsel told me how he had scoured the web for just the right picture. The menu garnered lots of laughs from the attendees, he added.I never did find out what that celebration cost the firm’s shareholders.Incidents like that, however, were relatively rare. And they were far outweighed by the appreciation that readers expressed.“You must continue your work of skewering people and customs in our capitalist society that abuse the process,” a reader in Jackson, Miss., wrote in 2001. Others expressed thanks for my being “a good and consistent questioner,” for writing for the “financially illiterate,” for pushing to make the rules for investing fair and firm.And I loved receiving a Christmas card from a reader in Maryland a couple of years ago that simply said: “Thank you for telling truth!”Believe me, it has been my privilege.
Men at Work Wonder if They Overstepped With Women, Too SAN FRANCISCO — It has been a confusing season for America’s working men, as the conversation around workplace harassment reveals it to be a nationwide epidemic — and many men wonder if they were involved or ignored the signs.Consider Owen Cunningham, a director at San Francisco’s KBM-Hogue design firm. When he looks toward the annual corporate holiday party these days, he shudders.“Cancel the holiday party,” said Mr. Cunningham, 37, adding that he means just until it has been figured out how men and women should interact. He said he considered himself progressive on gender issues but was thinking more about the behavior he had seen in the past: “What flirting is O.K.? Was I ever taking advantage of any meager power I had? You start to wonder.”Across white-collar workplaces, rank-and-file men are awakening to the prevalence of sexual harassment and assault after high-profile cases including those of Harvey Weinstein, Mark Halperin and Louis C.K. Those cases helped inspire the #MeToo campaign, in which thousands of women have posted about their own harassment experiences on social media. Now many men who like to think they treat women as equals in the workplace are starting to look back at their own behavior and are wondering if they, too, have overstepped at work — in overt or subtle ways that would get them included in a #MeToo post.“I don’t think I’ve done anything wrong,” said Nick Matthews, 42, who works at PwC, formerly PricewaterhouseCoopers, and lives in San Francisco. “But has anything I’ve done been interpreted another way?”In response, some men are forming all-male text groups at companies or in their industries to brainstorm on harassment issues. Some said they planned to be a lot more careful in interacting with women because they felt that the line between friendliness and sexual harassment was too easy to cross. Others are struggling to reconcile how these behaviors could happen even among men who believe in equal rights.Joel Milton, 30, an entrepreneur in Denver with Baker Technologies, a platform for cannabis dispensaries, said he had recently decided to be more careful about corporate offsites after seeing the swell of #MeToo claims.“When I hear someone on my team is having a pool party, now I’ll say, ‘Hey, maybe no managers should be there,’” Mr. Milton said, relaying the type of information likely to be covered in many companies’ employment manuals.He added that harassment was not something he had thought much about before, but that he was considering his own behavior more. “Like, did I ever do anything?” he said.Many companies have long mandated anti-harassment training to educate men and women about the issue. But in a report last year, the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission found that much of that training was ineffective and that workplace harassment was widely underreported.Jonathan Segal, a lawyer who was on the commission’s harassment task force, said he was now fielding odd questions from men about how to behave at work. At a fund-raiser last month in Palm Beach, Fla., some men asked him if it was permissible to hug a woman and where the boundaries should be drawn.Mr. Segal said he had explained to the men that the context mattered and that pretending there was a gray zone between collegial friendliness and sexual assault was absurd. For instance, he told them, hugging an old friend is very different from going up behind a co-worker while she was at a desk typing.“If someone can’t understand that, then maybe they just shouldn’t be hugging,” he said.Mr. Segal, who runs anti-harassment training, is now expanding part of the program called Safe Mentoring, which teaches men how to mentor younger women without harassing them. At a recent session, a male supervisor talked about having an extra ticket to a sporting event and feeling he could invite only a male colleague; Mr. Segal went over how to invite a female colleague without sexually harassing her.“The answer to harassment cannot be avoiding women,” he said.Still, some workers said they were starting to follow “the Pence rule,” which was formerly known as the Billy Graham rule, after the evangelical preacher, but is now named for Vice President Mike Pence. Mr. Pence has said he does not eat alone with women who are not his wife or attend an event without her if alcohol will be served.A conservative writer, Sean Davis, wrote that a lot of men in media should have effectively been heeding the Pence rule all along. He said he had always followed it and that coastal, liberal America was finally waking up to how useful avoiding private meetings with women could be. The former White House adviser Sebastian Gorka also made this argument.“What we’re seeing now is men are backing away from the role that we try to encourage them to play, which is actively mentoring and sponsoring women in the workplace,” said Al Harris, who has been running workplace equality programs and writing on the topic from Chicago with his partner, Andie Kramer, for many years. “There’s apprehension on the part of men that they’re going to be falsely accused of sexual harassment.”Not everyone is practicing avoidance. Some men said the best route is to ask female co-workers directly if they feel harassed. Pat Lencioni, the founder of the Table Group in Lafayette, Calif., which does executive coaching for companies around issues like diversity, said he was doing just that and had asked the women at his office if they worried about harassment.“I came into the office and said, ‘Hey, guys, I’ve got a question for you: This sexual harassment stuff, all these things, do you guys ever worry it’s going to happen here?’” Mr. Lencioni, 52, recalled. “And they were like: ‘No, because we know you. We know who you are.’”He said he thought this approach could be adopted more broadly.Other men said they had not talked about workplace harassment with anyone because they already knew what they needed to know. “This is a liberal town,” said Philip Rontell, a real estate agent in Walnut Creek, Calif., who added that he supported the #MeToo campaign. “We all already know this stuff.”When men do want to talk about workplace harassment, some said, they don’t know where to go. “I just don’t know where those conversations are allowed to be had,” said Ryan Ellis, 33, a sales manager for an e-commerce company in Santa Monica, Calif.Austin Gilbert, a recruiter in San Francisco for the company Gametime, said his industry had also had to deal with men talking in online chat rooms at work, which he said could “bury” and hide toxic comments. His company has closed several “high school in-group” type of exclusionary work chats over the years, but he worries about more.“We have a policy of telling employees that we’re free to review all electronic communications,” Mr. Gilbert, 31, said. “But that’s typically not anyone’s job responsibility in a small company.” With women empowered to call out inappropriate behavior, some companies predict that boozy after-work events for the holidays could be combustible this year. While many companies used to have the parties on Thursday or Friday evenings, some are moving them to late Monday or Tuesday afternoons, said Sarah Freedman, the vice president of operations for 23 Layers, an event planner in New York whose clients include Google and West Elm.Open bars are being replaced with game zones. One client recently asked for an extremely watered-down “John Daly” to be the party’s signature drink, which Ms. Freeman found strange but probably wise.After-work events are “the front line” when it comes to harassment, and companies want “more safety precautions” now, she said.
Are Honey Nut Cheerios Healthy? We Look Inside the Box I had a bowl of Honey Nut Cheerios recently. It’d been awhile. Regular Cheerios are more my thing. But sometimes I finish my box faster than my kids do and find myself straying to their side of the cupboard.Honey Nut is America’s best-selling breakfast cereal, and by a comfortable margin. Roughly 151 million boxes and other containers of various sizes were sold over the past year, well ahead of the second best-selling breakfast cereal, Frosted Flakes, according to IRI, a Chicago based market research firm.I had no idea. The only thing I could think about when I ate it again for the first time in years was how incredibly sweet it is. I looked at the back of the box and could see why. Three of the top six ingredients are sweeteners: sugar, brown sugar and honey.Previously, I assumed Honey Nut Cheerios was a slightly sweeter Cheerios, but you learn things when you finally get around to reading the back of the box. It actually has about nine times as much sugar as plain Cheerios, per serving. An Environmental Working Group analysis of a number of popular cereals — a report that linked sugary cereals to the “nation’s childhood obesity epidemic” — put Honey Nut Cheerios’s sugar content second only to Fruity Pebbles. The same group found that one cup of the cereal had more sugar than three Chips Ahoy! cookies.I asked General Mills about this, over a period of several days. They did not come to the phone, but responded with a series of communiqués.“You mentioned that three of the top six ingredients in Honey Nut Cheerios are sugar, brown sugar and honey,” Mike Siemienas, a spokesman for the company, wrote in a statement. “What you didn’t mention is that the number one ingredient is oats. To be so singularly focused on one ingredient — sugar — is irresponsible and doesn’t help consumers look at the total nutrition offered.”Honey Nut Cheerios debuted in 1979. The cereal’s forebear, Cheerios, originally called Cheerioats, was born in 1941 and has a more favorable nutrition profile. The plain version is low in sugar, “and you’re getting some oat fiber that can help lower your cholesterol modestly,” said Bonnie Liebman, director of nutrition at the Center for Science in the Public Interest.Unfortunately, that makes the contrast with its spinoffs difficult. Those include far more sugary options like Pumpkin Spice Cheerios and Apple Cinnamon Cheerios. The newest offering, Chocolate Peanut Butter Cheerios, has what looks like sugar flakes on it, but it actually has a lower sugar content than Honey Nut Cheerios.“The company has capitalized on the good name of the original,” Ms. Liebman said. “We’ve been saying for years that Honey Nut Cheerios has more sugar than honey and more salt than nuts, in fact it’s got no nuts at all, it’s just got almond flavor.”The center has quarreled with General Mills before. It sued the company over health claims made about another Cheerios offshoot, Cheerios Protein.General Mills refers to cereals like Honey Nut Cheerios as “presweetened” — putting the sugar, brown sugar and honey into your cereal so you don’t have to. Back in 2009, the company made news by announcing an initiative had already been underway to drop the sugar figure into single digits in such cereals marketed to children. In the last decade or so, Honey Nut Cheerios has fallen to nine grams of sugars per serving, from 11. Or so it seems.I undertook a review of highly sensitive corporate documents. And by that, I mean I looked at pictures of old cereal boxes on eBay, because apparently there’s a market for vintage, flattened cereal boxes. I found a box from 2003 that showed the serving size of Honey Nut Cheerios to be one cup, weighing 30 grams and having 11 grams of sugars. Today, a serving is three-quarters of a cup, and just 28 grams, with nine grams of sugars.The serving size of regular Cheerios remains one cup. If Honey Nut Cheerios still had a one cup serving size, the sugar content would be in the double digits.General Mills said little about what had happened, or when.“There are several reasons that changes in serving size may occur including recipe improvements that may change the density of the cereal or regulation changes,” Mr. Siemienas wrote.Serving sizes are regulated by the Food and Drug Administration, and can change if a cereal’s density changes. It appears that at some point in the last 10 or 15 years, General Mills tweaked the ingredients of Honey Nut Cheerios in a way that lowered the overall weight per serving, which had the effect of helping lower the stated sugar content. It has not been all smoke and mirrors; the percentage of sugar has decreased slightly as well, though rounding makes it difficult to say by how much.“They’ve tested and tested and tested to try to find out how much sugar they can take out without it affecting sales,” said Marion Nestle, an emerita professor of nutrition and food studies at New York University. “They must surely be at the cut point.”She said “you really want” kids “eating a whole grain, higher fiber cereal.”Speaking for myself, I eat a lot more cereal than three-quarters of a cup. I poured that amount into a bowl. It looked sad. And small. It was an appetizer’s worth of Cheerios.Don’t worry, General Mills. I’ll continue to eat Cheerios. But I had to have a difficult conversation with a 12-year-old recently. I broke the news that Honey Nut would not be returning to the cupboard. We’d be sticking with regular Cheerios.“Can I just pour honey on it?” he asked.He was joking. I think.
Forming a Picture of the New Philanthropist What makes a philanthropist? The attributes are many, a new study shows.Gordon Gund, whose investment firm has owned several sports teams, was blind by age 30. Now 78, Mr. Gund has spent the last four decades raising money for research to stop or reverse degenerative forms of blindness. And he finally seems to be close to fulfilling his dream.Judy Jordan, 56, created a well-known California winemaker, J Vineyards & Winery. After selling it to a large wine producer a few years ago, she started a new winery, but this time, she is using the business to help the agricultural families that worked to make her successful.Sapphira Goradia, 34, is the executive director and sole employee of her parents’ charitable entity, the Vijay and Marie Goradia Foundation. She is focused on making grants to educational and health organizations in India and determined to measure their impact.The three are as different in interests as they are in age, but all are philanthropists. Which raises the question: Is there a way to gauge the choices, motivations and influences of a philanthropist?The Philanthropy Workshop, an educational and networking organization, undertook a yearlong study to determine what a high-net-worth philanthropist looks like. Its report, to be released on Tuesday, is called “Going Beyond Giving: Perspectives on the Philanthropic Practices of High and Ultra-High Net Worth Donors.” The data the group collected is robust, but what it really revealed was how hard it is to put such a diverse group into easily understandable boxes.“There is a tendency to see if we can segment out philanthropists based on age, gender, level of experience, and see that they might behave differently,” said Tracy Mack Parker, a senior adviser at the Philanthropy Workshop. “Our learning from this survey is that in many ways, no, you can’t necessarily put them into distinct buckets: This is the next generation and this is how they operate, or this is inherited wealth and this is how they operate, or this is entrepreneurs and this is how they operate.”Nearly 80 percent of the survey respondents had a net worth greater than $10 million, and a quarter had more than $100 million. Rachel Cardone, a philanthropic consultant and one of the report’s authors, said one common thread in people’s philanthropic approaches was how they thought about what they were doing before they became philanthropists.“It was more your mind-set going into philanthropy,” Ms. Cardone said. “If you had a view of philanthropy like, ‘Oh, this is similar to what I do in my regular day job, and I’m going to apply it to social impact,’ there was a more natural fit and comfort to talk about it.”But most philanthropists struggle to identify themselves as wealthy.“You think of a philanthropist as the Rockefellers or the Carnegies,” Ms. Goradia said. “I don’t actually think of myself as a philanthropist, because it’s not my capital I’m deploying. And I don’t really think of my parents as philanthropists, either. It’s paying it forward.”Ms. Goradia’s family foundation, whose assets come from her father’s plastics and petrochemical business, gave out $2 million last year.“Let’s be clear: It’s downright strange,” said William Perrin, who is a trustee of several foundations and whose wife is an heiress to the Sainsbury supermarket fortune in Britain. “There is nothing normal about being a philanthropist. It’s not a conversation you can have down at the pub with your friends.”His wife, Fran Perrin, whose family is one of the most philanthropic in Britain, said she grew up in a philanthropic family, so she felt comfortable around the term. But comfort did not equate to competency when she received her inheritance outright at age 18.“I never had a clue how to do it,” said Ms. Perrin, 39. “I stumbled around for a few years, not knowing how to tackle it.”She had the infrastructure of her family’s foundations, now totaling 18, but it wasn’t until she was 31 that she took a course offered by the Philanthropy Workshop, which helped her think differently about giving.“I stopped making all grants for a year and said I wasn’t going to do any more until I know what I’m doing,” she said.That feeling of unease around giving is fairly common. Ms. Jordan, who bought her first vineyard at age 27 with the help of her father, the winemaker Tom Jordan, said she had been focused on running her business and raising her children until she sold J Vineyards to E. & J. Gallo in 2015.Ms. Jordan said her early mistakes had been those of omission. “When I was running J, I gave to all sorts of programs,” she said. “But I didn’t know the right questions to ask.”This lack of guidance has lent itself to another common thread: More than two-thirds of people in the report said they sought out philanthropic education, through formal programs, peer networks or conferences.They were not always confident on the how, but these wealthy donors knew the why of their large-scale giving: They were motivated by a cause close to them but also one they felt could make a difference.Larry Leibowitz, a former chief operating officer of NYSE Euronext, gives to animal welfare and women’s rights organizations, but his Wall Street background led him to ask how he could supply better information to other philanthropists.“I figured if I could make that space an inch more efficient, I could make a difference,” Mr. Leibowitz said.After working on the issue alone, he teamed up with Jeff Raikes, the former chief executive of the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation, and backed Giving Compass, which aims to be a clearinghouse for information on various causes.“A lot of this is, how do you fit your personal preferences to charity like the rest of your life?” he said. Philanthropy is “just a very murky area because it’s inefficient, there isn’t good information and people are embarrassed to ask questions.”Philanthropists like to talk about the “impact” of their giving and how to measure it. But unless you’re delivering something quantifiable — like vaccines or bed nets — measuring impact can be difficult without the staff of a large foundation.Matthew Bowcock, who made his fortune with technology focused on security, said he gave specifically to achieve impact through grants to arts organizations, including those working in disadvantaged neighborhoods and prisons. But he defines that word in his own way.“You take a local group that you can support, say, a disability support group that needs $10,000 a year,” Mr. Bowcock said. “It’s going to have an impact on quality of life, but it’s not going to be sustainable. But from a compassionate point of view, it’s important to do.”Not every philanthropist focuses on impact, though. Ms. Perrin said she shied away from asking grant recipients in the developing world for too much information, preferring to spend time listening to them.“Everyone is obsessed with impact,” she said. “Charities are struggling to get this information. It’s about caring how the charity is doing it.”And impact can take a long time to appear. Mr. Gund has been waiting 46 years for his initial philanthropic grants to find treatments for genetic blindness to pay off. In 1971, he helped create what is now the Foundation Fighting Blindness, helping to hire a board of experts and raise $725 million over the years.Now, Spark Therapeutics, which the foundation has backed, is on the verge of winning approval for Luxturna, the first gene therapy treatment for inherited blindness.“Of the things that motivate me the most or make me the most proud, it’s the investment of my time,” Mr. Gund said. “My money, I’m happy about that and pleased that I’ve had the ability to do that. But it’s really having worked with a lot of dedicated people to bring it to this point.”
How to Win the Battle of the Sexes Over Pay (Hint: It Isn’t Simple.) When Billie Jean King won the United States Open singles tennis title in 1972, her reward was a meager $10,000. Ilie Năstase, her male counterpart, won $25,000.Ms. King fought hard for equal rights and, on the tennis court, she won. By 1973, men and women received the same prizes at the Open. That still can’t be said of all tennis tournaments, but despite some ill-natured male grousing recently, equal pay is still the rule at the United States Open, at least.That is not the reality in the overall labor market, however, where women still earn less than men and there is considerable confusion about the reasons for the gender earnings gap — and about what can be done to eliminate it.Fighting to eradicate discriminatory employment practices is absolutely needed, of course. I’ve spent many years studying this subject, and my research shows that unequal treatment in hiring and in the work setting is real and may be reflected in unequal pay.Yet it is also true that the time demands of many jobs can explain much of the pay difference, a finding that has sobering implications. Eliminating the gender earnings gap will require changes in millions of households and thousands of individual workplaces.Even defining the gender earnings gap isn’t simple: It cannot be reduced to a single number, though it often is expressed that way. According to a commonly used measure adopted by the United States Census Bureau, women in 2016 earned 81 cents for each dollar earned by men, both working full-time.This definition focuses on the annual income of the individual at the median — or middle — of the income distribution for men and for women. Another valid option is to focus on mean, or average, earnings. Measured that way, the earnings gap is even greater. And there are many other measures.The gap is larger among more educated people, for example, and varies according to occupation, often in big ways. Among college graduates, it is far larger in business, finance and legal careers than in science and technology jobs. In health care, it is larger when self-employment is high (think dentists) and much lower when professionals are mainly employees (think pharmacists).What’s more, the gap is a statistic that changes during the life of a worker. Typically, it’s small when formal education ends and employment begins, and it increases with age. More to the point, it increases when women marry and when they begin bearing children.Using the data that shows women earn 81 cents for each dollar earned by men, when the careers of recent college graduates start, the gap is much smaller: 92 cents for each male dollar. By the time college-educated women are 40 years old, they earn 73 cents.Similar patterns appear using data for women and men who have earned master’s degrees in business administration. Immediately after graduation, women earn 92 cents for each male dollar. A decade later they earn only 57 cents.Correcting for time off and hours of work reduces the difference in the earnings between men and women but doesn’t eliminate it.On the face of it, that looks like proof of disparate treatment. It may seem understandable that when a man works more hours than a woman, he earns more. But why should his compensation per hour be greater, given the same qualifications? But once again, the problem isn’t simple.The data shows that women disproportionately seek jobs — including full-time jobs — that are more likely to mesh with family responsibilities, which, for the most part, are still greater for women than for men. So, the research shows, women tend to prefer jobs that offer flexibility: the ability to shift hours of work and rearrange shifts to accommodate emergencies at home.Such jobs tend to be more predictable, with fewer on-call hours and less exposure to weekend and evening obligations. These advantages have a negative consequence: lower earnings per hour, even when the number of hours worked is the same.Is that unfair? Maybe. But it isn’t always an open-and-shut case. Companies point out that flexibility is often expensive — more so in some jobs than others.Certain job characteristics have a big impact on the gender earnings gap. I have looked closely at these issues, including the extent to which workers are:■ Subject to strict deadlines and time pressure■ Expected to be in direct contact with other workers or clients■ Instructed to develop cooperative working relationships■ Assigned to work on highly specific projects■ Unable to independently determine their tasks and goalsOccupations with a lower level of these characteristics (like jobs in science and technology) show smaller gaps, corrected for hours of work. Occupations with a higher level (like those in finance and law) have greater gaps. Men’s earnings tend to surge when there are fewer substitutes for a given worker, when the job must be done in teams and when clients demand specific lawyers, accountants, consultants and financial advisers. Such differences can account for about half the gender earnings gap.These findings provide more nuance in explaining why the gap widens with age and why it is greater for women with children. Whatever changes have already taken place in American society, the duty of caring for children — and for other family members — still weighs more heavily on women. And if you thought that moving to a more family-friendly nation would eliminate the gap, think again. In several nations, including Sweden and Denmark, a “motherhood penalty” in earnings exists, even though these nations have generous family policies, including paid family leave and subsidized child care.Such considerations bring us to a very sensitive area: domestic arrangements at home, especially among couples with children. These are personal questions. In theory, gender earnings equality is possible when both parents take off the same amount of time and enjoy the same flexibility at work.Yet this isn’t easy to accomplish in the world, as it exists now: Individual families that make such choices may incur high costs. From a classic economic standpoint, if one spouse or partner can earn more by working less flexible hours, as a family, the couple would earn more money by having that parent in that job, while the other partner accepts the more flexible one. A man can certainly be the more flexible member of this household — though he typically is not. Such decisions need to be made couple by couple.Reorganizing the workplace — a complicated undertaking — would help diminish the gap. It would also be narrowed if the burdens of family life were shouldered more equitably.In sum, the gap is mainly the upshot of two separate but related forces: workplaces that pay more per hour to those who work longer and more uncertain hours, and households in which women have assumed disproportionately large responsibilities.Equality on this court requires a level playing field at home and in the market. There are many battles ahead. Unfortunately, they need to be fought at several levels.
California Looks at Republican Tax Measures and Sees Payback SAN FRANCISCO — The tax plan hurtling through Congress is a fast-moving blur of cuts and increases designed to keep Republicans on track to pass a bill without Democratic votes. But here in California, where several prized deductions are at risk of being eliminated, people suspect there is a greater design at play.“It really does feel like they said, ‘What can we do to California?’” said Sam Moss, executive director of Mission Housing, an affordable-housing developer in San Francisco.Mr. Moss is worried about the threat to an array of tax credits and tax-exempt bonds that are widely used to build low-cost housing in a state with a severe housing shortage.And it’s not only the housing incentives. The tax bills are filled with measures that Democrats, and some Republicans, say would have a disproportionate and damaging impact on an overwhelmingly Democratic state that has portrayed itself as the center of resistance to President Trump.In the sharpest example, state officials estimated that over six million California taxpayers — one of every three — take a deduction for state and local taxes. That is one of the main deductions Republicans are moving to eliminate or severely restrict. The bills would also put a ceiling on a deduction for mortgage interest used by more than four million California taxpayers, according to the State Department of Finance.The bills would phase out the ability to deduct personal casualty losses from wildfires and earthquakes — a constant threat in vast parts of the state — but keep the deduction for damage from hurricanes and floods like those in Florida and Texas this year.“I would like to think that this isn’t directly aimed at California, but it’s hard not to think that Congress has their sights set on the Golden State,” said State Senator Mike McGuire, a Democrat whose district includes areas ravaged by the recent wildfires in the north. “No matter if it’s an earthquake, a wildfire or a hurricane, families should be able to deduct the damage.”California is overwhelmingly Democratic. Hillary Clinton outpolled Mr. Trump by nearly four million votes here, and Democrats control both houses of the Legislature. Party leaders have been at the forefront of denouncing Mr. Trump’s policies on issues from the environment to health care.There has long been concern here that the state’s confrontational stance toward the Trump administration could invite retribution from Washington.Gov. Jerry Brown, a Democrat, said in an interview that the rush by Republicans to pass a bill made it impossible to judge how much the legislation could hurt the state.“I can’t penetrate the inner motivations of the Republican leadership,” Mr. Brown said. “But I will say there is something very odd about their rushing this very gigantic tax proposal through Congress without serious transparency or debate. They are doing so primarily, it seems, to reward their corporate donors.”“I don’t like this way to govern in a democracy,” he said.Representative Darrell Issa, whose San Diego County district is among the most vulnerable Republican seats in the state, said he would oppose the bill.“I cannot endorse changes that may make the tremendous burden felt by California taxpayers even worse,” he said. “Tax reform should lower taxes for all taxpayers — regardless of where they live.”But so far, Mr. Issa’s opposition appears singular within the state’s Republican delegation, at least among those who will offer comment. Representative Kevin McCarthy, the majority leader, who represents a Central Valley district, strongly backed the effort. He said other parts of the bill — such as increasing the standard deduction and eliminating the alternative minimum tax — would help California taxpayers who were, he said, saddled with high state taxes.State Senator Jeff Stone, a Republican, also endorsed the effort, saying it would bring welcome relief to California taxpayers.“The Democrats keep raising taxes in California,” he said. “It’s about time the federal government stops letting them off the hook by giving them cover with an overly complicated federal tax system.”On the Democratic side, Anthony Rendon, the Assembly speaker, called the bill “anti-California,” and said he was surprised that so few California Republicans had spoken against it, especially in contrast to Republicans in other states, like New York, that would also be hurt.“It’s to a large extent political suicide for a lot of these folks,” he said, “and they don’t seem to care.”Like everything in the tax measure, affordable-housing credits are a moving target. The House version eliminated a lot of things, and the Senate version restored some of them. But as Republican legislators shape a bill that delivers a big cut in corporate taxes while remaining within deficit limits that allow a party-line vote, the houses have consistently looked at reducing credits and deductions whose ripple effects would be minimal in most of the country but profound for taxpayers who live, generally, in Democratic states.For instance, both the House and Senate bills either reduce or repeal the deduction for state income, sales and property taxes. California’s top personal income-tax rate is the nation’s highest.The House bill lowered the limit on the mortgage-interest deduction for new home purchases from $1 million in debt to $500,000. That move would affect fewer than 3 percent of mortgage holders nationally, and there are only four metropolitan areas in the United States where more than half of the homes are priced above $500,000. All four are in California. (The Senate bill keeps the limit at $1 million.)Also, no state benefits more from itemized deductions, which the bills limit, and in many cases discourage, by increasing the standard deduction. Economic models suggest that the bulk of the millions of families that would face tax increases under the legislation itemize their deductions.More than a third of Californians itemize their deductions, according to data compiled by the Pew Charitable Trusts; the average benefit from those deductions was nearly $37,000 in 2015.California is not the only state whose voters would lose deductions from the tax bill. According to an analysis by the Tax Foundation, an independent think tank, six states — California, New York, New Jersey, Illinois, Texas and Pennsylvania — claim more than half of the total amount deducted for state and local taxes.
Alibaba’s Singles Day Sales Hit New Record of $25.3 Billion Singles Day — the frenzied annual celebration of consumption and commerce that is China’s much larger version of Black Friday — began as a protest of sorts against Valentine’s Day, propelled by college students in the 1990s.The event’s date, written numerically as 11/11, was associated with unattached singles, known as “bare sticks.”This year’s shopping festival entered new territory, blazing past $1 billion within two minutes of the holiday, starting at midnight on Saturday. By the end of the day, sales had hit a new record of $25.3 billion, more than 40 percent higher than sales on Singles Day 2016.Singles Day is now inextricably linked with Alibaba, the Chinese e-commerce leviathan that in recent years has turned the holiday into an online — and occasionally brick-and-mortar — mercantile extravaganza. It routinely eclipses Amazon’s yearly Prime Day promotional event.In July, Prime Day generated an estimated $1 billion in revenue during its 30-hour sale window, resulting in what Amazon called its “biggest day ever.”The event has evolved into a cultural phenomenon. On Friday night, Alibaba hosted a lavish gala in Shanghai, directed by one of the producers behind the 2016 Academy Awards. Celebrities such as Nicole Kidman, Pharrell Williams and Maria Sharapova helped count down the moments before the 60,000 participating global brands released their Singles Day deals to shoppers.One offer, from the Chongqing-based online alcohol brand Jiang Xiao Bai, allowed 33 fast-moving customers to make a single payment of 11,111 yuan, or $1,673, for a lifetime supply of a grain liquor known as baijiu.Singles Day, which is largely powered through Alibaba’s Tmall marketplace, was a test of the company’s logistics network. The company promised delivery within an hour for certain products and, in advance of the shopping festival, converted nearly 100,000 stores across China into “smart stores” capable of processing payment using facial recognition and other advanced technologies.
Farhad and Mike’s Week in Tech: Get Ready for Robot Cars Each Friday, Farhad Manjoo and Mike Isaac, technology reporters at The New York Times, review the week’s news, offering analysis and maybe a joke or two about the most important developments in the tech industry. Want this newsletter in your inbox? Sign up here.Mike: Howdy, Farhad! It’s the week after Halloween, which means I’ve got Christmas music on repeat in my head, but I’m trying my hardest to tune it out by thinking of other terrible songs. I never knew I could mash up Burl Ives and Skrillex so seamlessly!Farhad: Wow, Mike, I had no idea you were so festive. I pictured you spending the holidays scowling at the tree, listening to nothing but 1990s grunge.Mike: No, that’s how I spend Easter.Mike: Anyway, let’s start with Waymo, the oddly named self-driving car offshoot that was spun out of Google, which is owned by Alphabet. (Ugh, what a mouthful.) Waymo had a milestone this week: The company has started testing self-driving cars on public roads in Arizona without human drivers behind the wheel, a significant milestone in the world of autonomous vehicles.Typically, self-driving cars have an engineer or some such person sitting in the driver’s seat with hands hovering above the wheel, ready to take over at a moment’s notice in case something goes wrong. That’s how it was when I “drove” Uber’s self-driving car last year, and that’s pretty much the case for all other autonomous vehicles being tested on public roads.So even though it’s only happening in Arizona, this is a big deal. Waymo is clearly leading the pack in the race to produce self-driving cars, which makes sense because of Google’s multiyear head start in the space.Would you be comfortable being carted around in a self-driving car? I was, but perhaps I’m just used to it since it’s one of the main topics I write about.Farhad: Because I live right near Waymo’s headquarters, this is all old hat for me. I see the company’s cars — including the old panda-shaped ones that lack a steering wheel — every morning during my commute. I’d have no problem riding in one, but I hope Arizonans know that it’s very annoying to share the road with these robot cars.They’re slow! They follow the speed limit, they take ages changing lanes and they have a frustrating habit of obeying every single rule of the road. Ugh, live a little, robot car — STOP is just a suggestion, not some kind of law.Mike: Yes, well, don’t throw away your driver’s license quite yet. Or maybe do.Mike: Moving on, a bigger piece of telecom and media news. This week, our DealBook team scooped that the Department of Justice under the Trump administration is pushing Time Warner and AT&T to sell off Turner Broadcasting Company, which owns CNN, or DirecTV as a condition of a negotiated merger that has long been in the works.It’s a huge ask, and hard to see how it’s not politically motivated. As we all well know, President Trump is no fan of CNN. Also, I’m curious to know what legal grounds the D.O.J. would use to block a merger of this size.Farhad: The move makes for complicated politics. On the one hand, many liberals who are growing wary of ever-larger corporations might agree with the federal government putting stringent conditions on this deal. And yet it’s hard to tell if these conditions are legitimate, or if they’re being imposed to please a president who has repeatedly vowed to go after businesses that haven’t toed his line.I wonder how this sort of thing affects liberals’ efforts to police big tech. In a speech this week, Senator Al Franken called for greater regulations on tech giants. Trump has suggested some affinity for that stance; during the campaign, Trump often said that The Washington Post, which is owned by Amazon’s C.E.O., Jeff Bezos, was covering him critically because Amazon was worried that Trump would start antitrust proceedings against the company.Now, imagine if something like that happens — would the left cheer Trump, or would they side with Amazon? I truly wonder.Mike: Right, well, we all saw how well the last huge Time Warner merger went, so let’s hope this one goes better!Oh, I wanted to note a fantastic story from The New York Times Magazine this week, basically on the opacity of Facebook’s algorithms and how its advertising can be so effective at targeting small groups of users that some start-ups are spending all their cash there and nowhere else. It’s like Russia and the 2016 election, but for brands!Farhad: Speaking of Facebook, there was a startling admission this week by Sean Parker, the Napster co-founder and former Facebook executive (played by Justin Timberlake in “The Social Network”). In an interview with Axios’s Mike Allen, Parker said that he’d become a “conscientious objector” on social media, which he said had been built to addict us all.“It probably interferes with productivity in weird ways,” he said. “God only knows what it’s doing to our children’s brains.”Watch for more of this. More and more people both in and out of Silicon Valley are worried about the long-term psychological effects of our digital age. I worry about you especially, Mike.Mike: Too busy looking at Twitter.Actually, the last thing I wanted to note: Will.i.am, the hip-hop artist and self-styled tech evangelist, has raised another $100 million in venture capital. He started on wearables and gadgets, and has pivoted to work on chatbots and devices like Amazon’s Alexa and Google Home.So what do you think? Is Will.i.am the next Steve Jobs? Does raising venture capital actually require anything more than a hodgepodge of vague ideas and a series of pivots? What even is capitalism anymore?Farhad: I really don’t get it. We live in a world where anyone who’s made it constantly gets showered with more and more money regardless of whether they’re doing anything useful. Mike, when do we get to cash in?Mike: Never. Anyway, see you next week!Farhad: Bye!Farhad Manjoo writes a weekly technology column called State of the Art. Mike Isaac covers Facebook, Uber and Twitter. You can follow them on Twitter here: @fmanjoo and @MikeIsaac
Fashion’s Interest in Alternative Fabrics Keeps Growing High-end fashion and sportswear brands are taking a growing interest in recycled and alternative fabrics made from unusual materials like mushrooms, oranges and even proteins inspired by spider-web DNA — but not just out of concern for the environment. They are recognizing that these cool materials of tomorrow could be something people want to buy today.Over the next 12 months, brands are expected to announce partnerships with businesses that have figured out ways to make leather without cows, silk without worms, fur without animals and fabrics from recycled waste. Already this year, Salvatore Ferragamo has been selling scarves made of  orange fibers while Stella McCartney produced two outfits made with the spider-inspired silk.Ms. McCartney, a vegan designer who was a relatively lone fashion voice in the field of sustainable fabrics until recent years, provided a golden dress of the laboratory-made silk for the Museum of Modern Art’s exhibition “Item: Is Fashion Modern?” She also presented a chocolate-brown bodysuit and trousers backstage at her spring 2018 show last month during Paris Fashion Week.“They have not completely perfected it but it is a silk; it is literally a silk but it is a slightly different texture than the silk we normally use,” said Claire Bergkamp, head of sustainability and ethical trade at the Stella McCartney brand, adding that it had not finished testing the fiber for all of its possible applications. She said the brand, which has signed a long-term partnership agreement with Bolt Threads, the California company that developed the Microsilk material, expected to start selling clothing made with it in the next year or two.As with any new technology at an early stage of development, initial production of such fabrics continues to be limited and the finished products, costly. Bolt, for example, introduced a lottery in March to sell its first spider-inspired silk neckties, at $314 each.And that is before the work of private and public scientific research institutions are taken into account.Silk produced in a laboratory, for example, would not exist without the breakthroughs of the last 30 years that have enabled scientists to perfect ways to edit and replicate the DNA of living organisms.After studying spiders’ DNA and their webs, Bolt Threads’ engineers developed similar proteins that are injected into yeast and sugar and then subjected to a proprietary fermentation process. The resulting liquid silk is turned into a fiber through a wet-spinning process that creates strands that then can be knitted into fabric.Rivals, which are using similar technology but different production methods, have not produced marketable products yet either. The Japanese company Spiber has an agreement with the North Face, the American activewear company (in 2016, they developed a Moon Parka prototype). And AMSilk, a German company, has partnered with Adidas on products that they will not identify but say are expected to go on sale next year.Adidas, however, s producing sneakers made with plastics recovered from beaches and oceanfront communities, part of a product line developed through its partnership with the activist anti-plastic group Parley for the Oceans. (Ms. McCartney, an Adidas collaborator, provided some of the designs.)Recycled fruit waste is another promising substance for the creation of alternative fabrics. The Italian company Orange Fiber provided the material for Ferragamo’s capsule scarf collection. Ananas Anam, based at the Royal College of Art in London, uses pineapple leaf fibers to create a nonwoven leatherlike material called Piñatex and brands like Edun, the sustainable fashion label owned by LVMH Moët Hennessy Louis Vuitton, are creating items from it.And mycelium, the rootlike fiber of mushrooms, is being processed as a leather substitute by MycoWorks, a San Francisco start-up. But some specialists say the material, which looks like suede, needs to be tested for durability.In addition to bio-fabricated materials, the Stella McCartney brand and its founding partner, the luxury group Kering, are investing in ways to recycle fashion items and use fewer resources, such as water. Ms. McCartney’s Falabella Go bags are made of recycled polyester and Econyl, a nylon produced from recycled fishing nets, carpets and other such waste, manufactured by the Italian company Aquafil.In recent years, several venture capital firms have supported the development of alternative fabrics, especially when biofuels, including corn and algae, failed to live up to their initial promise.One of the latest and most high-profile investors is the Russian entrepreneur Miroslava Duma, founder of the fashion and lifestyle website Buro 24/7.In May, Ms. Duma introduced Fashion Tech Lab, a venture that funds and develops new technologies in sustainable fashion and wearable technologies. It has $50 million in funding and the advisory services of Carmen Busquets, the e-commerce investor, and Diane von Furstenberg. Orange Fiber and Vitro Labs, a company that is developing lab-grown variations of fur and leather from stem cells, were among the organization’s initial beneficiaries.Suzanne Lee, who has almost 20 years of experience in fashion technology, said, “It feels like there has not been as much innovation in terms of new materials as in the past five years, with sustainability being the main driver.” She is now chief creative officer at Modern Meadow, a New Jersey-based company that specializes in laboratory-grown bio-fabricated leather materials.Ms. Lee said that, just as shortages after World War II drove the development of fossil fuel-based materials like Lycra and polyester, the prospect of limits on natural fibers and leather are pushing the fashion industry to find alternatives.Modern Meadow has developed a yeast that, when mixed with sugar, produces a collagen that then is purified, processed and tanned to create material with a look and feel similar to that of leather.The company said that it was planning to unveil its first commercial product next year and that it had partnered with one major luxury player, which it declined to reveal now.But, reflecting its luxury ambitions, the company has retained the advisory services of three fashion veterans: Mimma Viglezio, formerly the executive vice president of global communications at Gucci Group; François Kress, who left the chief executive position at Carolina Herrera in January; and Anna Bakst, formerly group president of shoes and accessories at Michael Kors.Similarly, some of fashion’s historic houses are pioneering in the field.Chanel, known for putting a healthy dose of pressure on suppliers to create new yarns and fabrics every season, has been working with paper yarns and is researching the use of 3-D printing for ready-to-wear clothing.The house, in what it said was a first, presented suits at its fall 2015 couture show that were made of material produced by a 3-D printer from sintered, or compressed, powder and then embellished with embroidery and braid by Lesage, one of Chanel’s métiers d’art houses.“Karl Lagerfeld says we should do things that are unimaginable,” said Hubert Barrère, the creative director at Lesage. “Creativity is about being in tune with your time.”
I Won the Lottery and I Need Help. No, Really! Winning the lottery can be a bolt of amazing luck. But whether the luck lasts depends on whether lottery winners fritter away their unexpected largess or manage to achieve financial security.When Alcario and Carmen Castellano won $141 million in California more than a decade ago, they were fortunate enough to have a financial professional in the family to advise them. And one thing they learned early was to say no, said Mr. Castellano, now 83.People were constantly calling their San Jose home after they won in 2001, and many even knocked on their door, trying to persuade them to lend or give money. Mr. Castellano said that not long ago, an acquaintance asked for a personal loan. “That’s not our goal,” he quickly told the person. “We don’t do that.”Within months of winning, the couple had to buy a more secluded house because they did not feel safe. He said, joking, that it was also “because the Jaguar I gave my wife would have looked out of place in our old neighborhood.”The couple did spend on some indulgences, like new cars, but quickly set their spending priority, which was giving to Latino community organizations.Winners can display joyful exuberance at first, but then they often must deal with unanticipated stress. The psychologist Stephen Goldbart coined a phrase — sudden wealth syndrome — to describe symptoms, which include feeling isolated from friends, guilt over good fortune and extreme fear of losing newly gained money.Prize winners face adjustments when their financial status shifts radically. Extravagant spending, bad investments and other perils facing lottery winners are common enough that most state lotteries take pains to advise winners to seek out professional accounting and financial advice.“Nobody teaches you what to do with a large amount of money,” said John Hagerty, a spokesman for the Virginia Lottery. “We give those who win $100,000 and up a video and a packet of information to help them prepare for their new financial lives.”Michelle and Robert Sutherland of Oregon, who won $7 million in the state’s lottery last June, had lost a large portion of their retirement savings in the 2008 economic meltdown, then lost more money later when they opened a restaurant. The local economy stalled and they had to close the business.The couple took their lottery winnings in a lump sum and turned to a financial adviser they knew. They bought a “nice, comfortable house but not a mansion” outside Springfield, Ore., said Ms. Sutherland, 54. “To have that title in your hands is an amazing feeling.”She said that they had been able to spend some money on their family, and to set up substantial college funds for their three grandchildren.“It is very easy to fall into buying everyone the things they want,” she said, “but we want to keep it the way it’s been.”Winners say there is no plan that works for everyone.“There is no one way when you win,” said Amanda Spiller, 32, who claimed a $1 million Virginia Lottery prize in September 2015. Her 7-year-old daughter wanted to buy a helicopter and a yacht, Ms. Spiller said with a laugh, but “I put my foot down.”Ms. Spiller, who is self-employed, relied on a local accountant for advice and took a lump sum, which was about $688,000 before taxes. She paid off some student loans, invested in a mutual fund and began to nurture some of her passions. One is her website Stop Eating Like a Jerk, which features videos on topics like how to make better food choices.“I definitely have a better quality of life now,” she said. “I’d never been on an airplane so I’ve done a lot of traveling and taken my daughter places she was never able to go.”And she has not given up on the idea of winning again, she added. “I’m still playing the lottery every week. I won $2,000 last year, and I’m sure I’m going to win again so I invest about $30 every week.”Major prize winners like the Castellanos distribute some of their good fortune through foundations. The couple had volunteered in local Latino organizations before their win, and 16 years ago they set up the Castellano Family Foundation. For several years, Ms. Castellano, 78, who had worked as an administrative secretary for more than three decades at nearby San Jose City College, read and evaluated every application for funding.“I was making a list of organizations as soon as Al told me we had won,” she said. “By that December, I wrote the first foundation check.”The couple learned more about philanthropy by attending conferences, consulting with major donors and hiring a consultant. Their foundation focuses on arts and education groups, as well as on leadership and diversity issues.“It’s not to say that we don’t have fun,” she said. “We had a grand celebration on our 50th wedding anniversary. When we won, we had the means to help others, but it hasn’t changed us.“We still have the same friends,” she continued. “The foundation has helped us to develop our spending ideas, and develop an intuition about how to handle people that we don’t know.”Michael Moriarty, 56, a semiretired bartender from the Bronx, said he was using his windfall to “build my little kingdom.” He won $7 million this year from a New York scratch-off ticket, and he bought property in the Florida Keys for his family — he has three daughters — and to rent.“I love Florida because it’s a laid-back way of life, and I wanted something that could be an investment and also used by the family,” he said. “And I think it’s a good investment to own property.”He gave $100,000 to his local Boys & Girls Club, where his brother is president, and treated his daughters to gifts, noting that they “have gotten their fill of wants, not needs.” He still routinely puts flowers on his mother’s grave and bought himself a new Jeep, a new Harley-Davidson and a modestly priced boat as well as two fishing reels.“People say you don’t have to worry about money,” he said. “Well, that’s all I worry about now.”
Hasbro Said to Make Bid for Toy Rival Mattel Hasbro has made a bid to acquire its chief rival Mattel, according to people briefed on the discussions, a move that would further consolidate the world’s toy industry.Hasbro made the takeover approach in recent months, these people said, as Mattel has struggled to revive some of its faded brands. It was unclear whether Hasbro had offered any terms for a deal or whether any further discussions had taken place, said the people, who insisted on anonymity because the talks were private.The toy world, like the broader retail industry, has been upended by the surge of e-commerce and the intensifying battle to grab the attention of children, who are spending more time playing on tablets and smartphones.It is not the first time the two toy giants have been involved in a potential takeover. More than two decades ago, Mattel sought to take over Hasbro, but Hasbro rejected that hostile bid, saying the merger would never pass antitrust hurdles. Regulatory issues could also be a factor in any future combination of the two companies, which are the industry’s dominant toymakers.For much of this year, there has been talk across the toy industry about a possible tie-up between the two companies. Mattel’s stock has fallen 52 percent over the past year, and its market value is now about $5 billion.Hasbro shares have increased 8 percent from a year ago, bringing its market value to $11.4 billion.Representatives of Hasbro and Mattel declined to comment on the takeover approach, which was first reported Friday night by The Wall Street Journal.The bankruptcy filing by Toys “R” Us in September also pummeled toy suppliers like Mattel. Toys “R” Us owes Mattel at least $135 million, according to court documents, more than twice as much as it owes Hasbro.Last month, Mattel said the bankruptcy weighed on its third-quarter results. The company’s sales fell 13 percent from a year ago. Mattel’s chief executive, Margo Georgiadis, called the results “clearly disappointing” and suspended the company’s quarterly dividend.Despite the recent financial pressure, Mattel still produces valuable toy brands like Hot Wheels and Fisher-Price, which industry analysts say make it ripe for a takeover by Hasbro.This month, Hasbro announced that it had sealed an exclusive deal with Paramount Pictures to collaborate on producing films based on Hasbro brands. The two companies have already collaborated on movies based on the toys G.I. Joe and Transformers.
To Dodge Jerry Jones, Other Owners Speed Up Roger Goodell’s Contract The N.F.L. owners negotiating a contract extension for the league commissioner, Roger Goodell, are accelerating their work, according to several people familiar with the matter, to quell an insurgent, unusually public threat by Jerry Jones, the Dallas Cowboys’ owner, to scuttle the deal.The owners, who agreed in May to extend the commissioner’s contract, are pushing to complete the terms in a matter of weeks to end the public battle with Jones, who began a campaign to undermine the extension after the commissioner suspended a star running back on the Cowboys over a domestic violence accusation.The committee of owners negotiating the contract is meeting on Monday to discuss, among other things, when to finish the extension so it is no longer a political volleyball. Some owners on the committee want the extension completed in a couple of weeks, while some say it can wait until the next owners’ meeting in mid-December.Jones, a powerful owner who has increasingly tried to influence league matters, has emerged as an erratic insurgent among owners who prize order and typically settle differences amicably behind closed doors.Owners were already unsettled by the tumult over players protesting racism by kneeling during the national anthem and a slew of injuries to star players, not to mention a slip in television ratings.People familiar with the contract negotiations, who spoke on condition of anonymity because they involve internal league matters, said the package was 80 percent to 90 percent completed, with only a handful of minor details yet to be finished.As a nonvoting member of the compensation committee, Jones, though, continued to lobby the committee working on the pay package.Last week, The New York Times reported that he told the six owners on the committee that he had hired the lawyer David Boies and was prepared to take legal action against them and the league if they did not change Goodell’s deal.Jones has insisted that Goodell’s deal needs to be restructured to account for the poor way he has navigated the league through recent turmoil, and that more of his pay should be performance-based bonuses. After Jones threatened to sue the members of the committee — which includes the owners of the Chiefs, the Falcons, the Giants, the Patriots, the Steelers and the Texans — he was removed as a nonvoting member.Jones was fully aware of, and in agreement with, the committee’s efforts to restructure the contract, according to people familiar with the committee’s work. On Aug. 9, Goodell traveled from his summer home in Maine to New York to meet with the compensation committee at Patroon, a restaurant a few blocks from the league’s headquarters in Midtown Manhattan.The mood was comfortable. Two of the owners, Robert K. Kraft of the New England Patriots and Arthur Blank of the Atlanta Falcons, joked about how, when they walked to the restaurant together, fans had stopped them to say they were surprised that they were together after their teams faced off in the Super Bowl in February.In a private room, the owners discussed the structure of Goodell’s new deal and some of the finer points the commissioner wanted added. Jones was not in New York, but was listening on a speaker phone. “We got to a good place that night,” one person involved in the dinner said. “Jerry was on board with all of it.”Two days later, everything changed when Goodell suspended the Cowboys’ star running back, Ezekiel Elliott, for six games based on an accusation of domestic violence by his former girlfriend. In addition to railing against the decision and questioning the way the commissioner and his staff handled the investigation, Jones began to lobby the compensation committee and other owners to pause and alter Goodell’s new pay deal.On his radio show on Friday, Jones denied that his effort to block the contract extension had anything to do with Elliott, saying it was all about Goodell’s performance lately.In October, when all 32 owners met in New York, Blank, the chairman of the committee, briefed them on the structure of the deal. There was little opposition. But several weeks ago, Jones held a conference call with more than a dozen owners not on the compensation committee to discuss Goodell’s extension.When that failed to turn the tide against the extension, Jones spoke on a conference call last week with the compensation committee and threatened to take legal action. Stunned, the committee took the extraordinary step of removing Jones from the committee, and lawyers have since handled communication between the committee and Jones.Jones’s threat now appears to have galvanized the committee and Goodell to conclude the last few items in the new contract. Goodell is currently paid around $30 million a year, including a set of rolling bonuses that in effect make most of his compensation guaranteed.In his new package, Goodell would receive roughly the same amount, but only if certain performance targets were met.After the owners voted unanimously in May to extend Goodell’s contract for five more years, the compensation committee created a new structure in which 88 percent of the commissioner’s compensation would be based on an array of metrics tied to the league’s financial performance. Many of those metrics would be overseen by other owners on other committees, broadening the number of people who would decide how much the commissioner would make.Goodell, who has sought to defuse the controversy over players protesting racism by kneeling during the national anthem, has devoted more time in recent days to working out the final details so this controversy, too, might subside.
Venezuelan Debt Crisis Widens, With Power Company in Default Venezuela showed new signs of a financial unraveling on Friday, as the state electricity company was declared in default.The announcement of the country’s first bond default came three days before the government was to begin talks with investors to refinance and restructure more than half of its $120 billion in debt.“This is the first drizzle in a huge thunderstorm,” said Jose L. Valera, an international energy lawyer in the Houston office of the Mayer Brown law firm. “The whole country of Venezuela is bankrupt.”The electricity company, Corpoelec, based in Caracas, was unable to make a $28 million payment on a $650 million bond. The bond was originally issued by Electricidad de Caracas before it was nationalized as a Corpoelec subsidiary a decade ago.The default was announced in a notice by Wilmington Trust after bondholders complained that they had not received payment on a coupon that was due on Oct. 10 but had a grace period that ended on Thursday.Venezuela and its state-owned enterprises — including the oil company Petróleos de Venezuela, known as Pdvsa — have missed roughly $350 million in interest payments over the last month. The grace period on many of them will end in the next few days.“There are going to be so many different debtors from the sovereign to these different state-owned companies,” Mr. Valera said, “and they are all going to be defaulting at the same time.”President Nicolás Maduro announced last week that the government would refinance and restructure $63 billion in bonds, and invited investors to meet with a government committee led by his vice president. It is uncertain how many investors will take part, since United States sanctions restrict any negotiation or purchases of new bonds by American-regulated financial institutions.Monday could be a decisive day in Venezuela’s credit crisis.While President Maduro’s committee will offer restructuring proposals, the International Swaps and Derivatives Association, a panel formed by the derivatives industry, will meet to discuss the Venezuelan debt situation.The panel will discuss whether late and partial payments of $1.2 billion due last week from Pdvsa constituted a “credit event” that could prompt bondholders to organize to seek payment. The creditors could pursue legal action to confiscate Venezuelan assets abroad, such as oil tankers or even refineries owned by the Pdvsa subsidiary Citgo.
Review: Two Contrasting Views of Silicon Valley’s Influence The pervasive influence of Silicon Valley on our economy, culture and politics is a subject worthy of close study. Two important new books released this week offer startlingly different approaches and conclusions on these complex issues. The contrasting epigraphs that begin the works perfectly reflect their respective perspectives.Noam Cohen, a former New York Times columnist, opens his polemic, “The Know-It-Alls: The Rise of Silicon Valley as a Political Powerhouse and Social Wrecking Ball” (New Press), with a quote from “The Wizard of Oz.” For Mr. Cohen, “the self-proclaimed geniuses claiming to serve mankind” who dominate the digital economy are far more dangerous than the benevolent Wizard because of the overwhelming “collateral damage” wrought as “these leaders pursue their dreams by centralizing our relationships — personal, economic, political.” As an antidote to this clear and present danger, above all “The Know-It-Alls” seeks to “demystify the origins of the harsh market-based values being pumped out by Silicon Valley, which can seem irresistible.” In Mr. Cohen’s telling, the historic ground zero for the pernicious ideology that has fueled the undue influence of the tech elite is Stanford University.Another former New York Times columnist, Leslie Berlin, has become the project historian for the Silicon Valley Archives at Stanford. Her book, “Troublemakers: Silicon Valley’s Coming of Age” (Simon & Schuster) opens with the advertising copy from the iconic 1997 Apple commercial that perfectly captures Silicon Valley’s conception of itself. “Here’s to the crazy ones. The misfits. The rebels. The troublemakers,” it begins before concluding, “Because the people who are crazy enough to think they can change the world are the ones who do.”To be fair, the conflict in visions is less stark than it seems because the two authors are focused on different time periods. “Troublemakers” covers “the generational handoff” that happened between the late 1960s and the early ’80s “as pioneers of the semiconductor industry passed the baton to younger up-and-comers.” Mr. Cohen’s ire primarily targets those “who helped nurture the World Wide Web to prosperity in the 1990s before turning to investing.”One does not have to be sympathetic to a more benign view of the technology industry to appreciate Ms. Berlin’s deeply researched and dramatic narrative of Silicon Valley’s early years in “Troublemakers.” To tell this story, she selects seven lesser-known but influential figures to follow closely throughout that period. These include the first woman to take a technology company public, the first chairman of Apple, and a man who played critical roles in government to create the internet and in industry to commercialize it through the personal computer. Their names will most likely be unfamiliar, but their meticulously told stories permit the reader to gain a nuanced understanding of the emergence of the broader technology ecosystem that has enabled Silicon Valley to thrive.Nuance is not a word that comes to mind in reading Mr. Cohen’s attack on Silicon Valley’s powers that be. The first two chapters are devoted to key figures in the history of Stanford’s administration and computer science department, emphasizing both the university’s willingness to trade off academic rigor for financial gain and its institutional sympathy for eugenics in the early 1900s and, more recently, extreme libertarianism. These underlying themes, in Mr. Cohen’s view, underpin “the Stanford model of integrating the hacker and the entrepreneur.” This model is reflected in staking William Hewlett and David Packard in the 1930s, establishing the Stanford Industrial Park in the 1950s and obtaining a $336 million payout from Google stock in return for granting the exclusive PageRank license.It is this unholy alliance between hacker and entrepreneur values that Mr. Cohen rails against for the balance of the book. Although he pauses for a handful of pages to speak about Microsoft — “If the Know-It-Alls’ values represent a merger of a hacker’s radical individualism and an entrepreneur’s greed, then only one man can be considered their forefather: Bill Gates” — he believes that the negative ramifications “only fully flourished with the widespread adoption of the World Wide Web starting in the late 1990s.” And so beginning with Marc Andreessen, who developed the first commercialized web browser, Netscape Navigator, “The Know-It-Alls” proceeds to attack the character of just about every boldfaced name among tech billionaires. All are found guilty of either always promoting the insidious tech dogma that places no constraints on their ability to disrupt the status quo for their own financial gain or — as in the case of the once idealistic founders of Google and Facebook — having along the way been “seduced by the power and money offered by venture capitalists.”The history that underpins that overarching thesis feels both selective and less than rigorous. Niels Reimers, the founder of Stanford’s Office of Technology Licensing and one of the seven key industry figures profiled in detail in “Troublemakers,” is not even mentioned in “The-Know-It-Alls.” Given the complex negotiations required to secure university approval, this seems like a significant oversight for a book whose thesis hinges in part on Stanford’s supposed unthinking commercialism. And statements like computer science was “still something of an obscure discipline in the late 1980s” just don’t hold up to scrutiny. By 1990, there were almost 800 computer science degree programs offered at colleges and universities, enrolling tens of thousands of students.Although Mr. Cohen has identified legitimately disturbing aspects of the tech culture, he becomes repetitive, and his tone is unnecessarily conspiratorial. He also ignores when the facts contradict his assertions. Mr. Cohen complains about the “PayPal mafia,” former employees who “provided each other with cash, counsel and contacts.” Mr. Cohen finds “something jarring about a group of self-styled survival of the fittest free marketeers committing to a strategy of collective risk and mutual support.”When the Wikipedia founder Jimmy Wales is profiled as a contrast to the libertarian fanaticism and raw commercialism of the Know-It-Alls, his inability to raise funding is used to reinforce this point: “Wales and his partners had no rich friends to lean on in tough times.” The narrative makes clear, however, that his problem was a flawed business model, not his lack of access to the PayPal mafia or other venture investors. Similarly, Mr. Cohen does not directly confront the irony that the story of Wikipedia’s ultimate success was made possible only by its free-riding on Google’s powerful — but in his view morally suspect — search engine.The tech industry has earned a takedown book that documents its self-interested justifications for any number of policies that are clearly not in the public interest. Its track record on matters including cybersecurity, gender equality and privacy is shameful. The brief profiles of “The Know-It Alls,” sprinkled with gratuitous ad hominem observations (for example, Mr. Cohen writes that PayPal is responsible for “releasing into the wild a self-satisfied Peter Thiel, a one-man wrecking crew who has been sowing chaos through American society up to this very day”), do not get the job done.Given the profound impact on our lives of the technology industry and the apparent flaws in its current culture, both books leave the reader wondering where to go from here. “The Know-It-Alls” suggests that “Europe provides a model” relying on extensive regulation but, given the absence of any European tech giants of note, this seems like throwing the baby out with the bath water. Although the compelling history in “Troublemakers” provides a number of tantalizing clues as to where things got off track, this is not the focus of the book. Ms. Berlin does not whitewash the aspects of even the valley’s early years that foreshadow the more profound cultural issues to emerge in the industry’s middle age, writing, “It takes a certain kind of audacity to think you can launch a company, much less invent an industry — and audacity often veers into arrogance.” But she doesn’t go out of her way to explore their implications, either.When the founding of Fairchild Semiconductor is discussed, William Shockley is mentioned in passing, but Ms. Berlin notes that he “had not yet fully descended into the paranoia and eugenic fervor that would later mar his reputation.” In fact, his paranoia and abusiveness at least were already well known and, given that these qualities have been recurring contemporary industry themes, would have been worth examining.Similarly, when it’s noted that a key to the venture capitalist Don Valentine’s success was his willingness to overlook “deviant” behavior, some discussion of the downside of letting the hacker culture run wild might have made sense.Silicon Valley’s history is still being written. Both of these books are important reminders that whether or not it is ultimately a story with a happy ending will be a function of our collective willingness to closely examine the sector’s origins to better understand not only the sources of innovation but how the most destructive aspects of the culture were allowed to fester for so long.
For Student Borrowers, Time to Start Repaying Loans Along with holiday cards from friends and family members, recent college graduates will probably receive notices from their student loan servicers in the mail in coming weeks.Most student loans have grace periods — spans of time after graduation before repayment must begin — of six months. So for students who graduated in the spring, it is time to start repaying the debt.Nationally, student debt totaled $1.34 trillion at midyear, according to the Federal Reserve Bank of New York. The average debt per borrower in 2016 ranged from a low of $20,000 in Utah to more than $36,000 in New Hampshire, according to the nonprofit Project on Student Debt.Spring graduates typically get notices from a loan servicer — the company that processes payments and manages a student’s loans — the following November, with payments beginning in December. (Happy Holidays!)The letter from the servicer should include details like the payment amount, the due date and where to send the check or make payments online.If you have not received any sort of notice by now, it is best to contact your loan servicer, said Diane Cheng, associate research director at the Institute for College Access and Success, a nonprofit organization. It is up to you to keep your servicer apprised of your whereabouts, she said. Even if you have not received an official notice, you are still responsible for repaying the loan.If you don’t know who your servicer is, you can check the National Student Loan Data System to find out which company handles the loans you borrowed from the federal government. (You probably already have a Federal Student Aid ID, but if not, you will need to create one to log on and check your loans.)Loans from banks or other private lenders, rather than the federal government, are not tracked in the federal database. You may be able to find them by checking your credit report. Or you can contact the financial aid office at your alma mater, said Persis Yu, director of the Student Loan Borrower Assistance Project at the National Consumer Law Center.Unless you tell your servicer otherwise, you will be enrolled in a standard 10-year repayment plan. If you are worried that you cannot afford the payments, the federal government has programs offering more affordable monthly payments. Details are available from the Department of Education and  the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau.The Department of Education’s tool for estimating repayment can help you compare what your payments would be under the different options. Users should contact their loan servicer directly, however, to confirm eligibility for the various options, Ms. Cheng said.Recently, questions have been raised about the federal government’s Public Service Loan Forgiveness program, which is intended to allow people working in teaching, nonprofit, social services or other government jobs to have their loans canceled after 10 years. Some borrowers, particularly those who joined the program soon after it was enacted a decade ago, are finding that loans they thought would be forgiven might not be, because of complex requirements.But the program remains an option for current borrowers, as long as they have the correct type of jobs, loans and payment plans to qualify. “Certainly there are reasons to be cautious,” said Adam Minsky, a lawyer specializing in student loans, “but the program is still very much in existence.”Ms. Cheng advises borrowers to submit a certification form, provided by the Department of Education, to document that they are employed at a qualified job and that their payments are being properly credited, so that they remain on track to have their debt forgiven.Here are some questions and answers about repaying student loans:Are grace periods the same for all loans?One type of federal loan, known as a Perkins loan, has a nine-month grace period. And some loans, like federal PLUS loans made to parents, have no grace period. Repayment typically starts as soon as funds are distributed.Grace periods for private loans may vary, but six-month grace periods are typical, said Martha Holler, a spokeswoman for the private student loan lender Sallie Mae. The company’s website offers suggestions for organizing your loan documents to help ensure that you keep up with payments. One recommendation: Create a spreadsheet listing your loans and contact information for your servicers.What if I have a complaint about my student loan servicer?You can file a complaint with the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau or the Department of Education.Are there any discounts available for my loan payments?Typically, you can knock a quarter of a percentage point — 0.25 percent — off your monthly payment, for both federal and private loans, if you agree to have the money automatically debited from your bank account.
Russia Warns of Crackdown on U.S. Media, Including CNN In the latest round of tit-for-tat sparring between the United States and Russia, the authorities in Moscow warned on Friday of a coming crackdown on American media outlets that operate in Russia, including CNN.The move was explicitly intended as retaliation for an apparent American censure of RT, the state-run news organization formerly known as Russia Today, which American intelligence sources have accused of being used as a propaganda outlet.Officials in President Vladimir V. Putin’s government said CNN, along with the federally funded Voice of America and Radio Liberty, might be designated as foreign agents, essentially identifying them as hostile intelligence outfits.In the United States, the designation of foreign agent is typically assigned to foreign lobbying groups. Russia’s suggestion that it might assign the label to foreign news organizations like CNN — potentially restricting their distribution and operation — was likely to raise alarm bells among press freedom groups.On Thursday, RT agreed to register with the Justice Department as a foreign agent in the United States, despite vehement objections from the network’s leadership. Representatives of RT have denied that the Russian authorities dictate its coverage. In addition, the Russian authorities had previously warned that any American censure of RT would be met with a response.Tensions in the international media sphere are rising at a time when ties between the Russian authorities and the Trump campaign are the subject of an investigation by the special counsel Robert S. Mueller III.During the 2016 presidential campaign, RT frequently portrayed the United States as a nation in disarray, often in sensational YouTube videos that racked up millions of views. The RT network was cited in an intelligence dossier about potential foreign intrusions in the election.On Friday, President Trump and Mr. Putin both attended the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation forum in Danang, Vietnam. The men did not hold formal talks, but they shook hands and exchanged greetings before posing for a photograph at the forum’s gala dinner.It remained unclear on Friday whether Russia’s talk of a crackdown posed an imminent threat to the operations of American news outlets there, or was saber rattling. Some Russian officials see CNN’s international network as a useful vehicle to reach foreign audiences.The American authorities have not publicly acknowledged a request that RT register as a foreign agent. But in a defiant statement on Thursday, RT’s editor in chief, Margarita Simonyan, denounced the Justice Department and said her network would register to avoid a freezing of its bank accounts and disclosure of personal information about employees.“The demand is discriminative; it contradicts both the democracy and freedom of speech principles,” Ms. Simonyan wrote on RT’s website. “It deprives us of fair competition with other international channels, which are not registered as foreign agents.”Ms. Simonyan said she planned to sue the Justice Department over the matter.During the presidential race, RT’s American cable network attracted about eight million viewers a week, and it assigned reporters to cover the major party conventions and campaign rallies. Among its on-air personalities were American TV veterans like Larry King and Ed Schultz.RT had particular influence on YouTube, where its 2.2 million subscribers rivaled the totals for major American news outlets.The Russian minister of communications, Nikolai Nikoforov, said this week that the treatment of RT in the United States was the result of an undeserved animosity toward Russian interests.“It is yet another manifestation of the general anti-Russian hysteria” in the United States, Mr. Nikoforov told journalists, “rather than of a constructive legal dialogue.”The Justice Department and CNN declined to comment.Amanda Bennett, the director of Voice of America, said in a statement: “The Voice of America is an independent news source required by law to be accurate, objective and comprehensive. We will not speculate on any steps foreign governments might take with regard to our journalistic work.”
Court Blocks Berkshire Museum’s Sale of Rockwell Works and Other Art The Massachusetts Appeals Court on Friday blocked a much-anticipated auction next week of art from the Berkshire Museum, including two paintings by Norman Rockwell.Those works — including one titled “Shuffleton’s Barbershop,” with an estimated price of $20 million to $30 million — are among seven from the Pittsfield, Mass., museum that were scheduled to be offered for sale Monday by Sotheby’s in New York in an effort to raise money the museum considers essential to its survival.The sale had been opposed by two groups of plaintiffs, including Rockwell’s sons, as well as the office of the Massachusetts attorney general, which said that it would violate various trusts and restrictions related to how the works must be handled. The attorney general, Maura Healey, who had been seeking additional time to examine the museum’s plan, asked the court on Friday for an injunction halting the sale.The court granted that request, saying that allowing the sale created more of a risk than stopping it. The ruling prohibits the museum “from selling, auctioning or otherwise disposing of any of the artworks that have been listed for auction.”The injunction will expire on Dec. 11, but the court added that the attorney general’s office may move to extend it.Sotheby’s had described the Berkshire Museum works as a “superb collection” that was “among the highlights” of its American Art sale on Monday.In addition to “Shuffleton’s Barbershop,” which Sotheby’s said Rockwell created for the cover of The Saturday Evening Post in 1950, the auction was to include Rockwell’s “Blacksmith’s Boy — Heel and Toe (Shaftsbury Blacksmith Shop),” which was estimated to have a price of $7 million to $10 million.Among other museum works to be offered on Monday were “The White Dress” by Thomas Wilmer Dewing, “Hunter in Winter Wood” by George Henry Durrie and “Connecticut River Valley, Claremont, New Hampshire” by Albert Bierstadt.Last summer, the financially strapped museum announced the planned sale of 40 works, including Impressionist and modern art, contemporary art, 19th-century European paintings, American art and Chinese art. The museum said the proceeds were needed to build its endowment, renovate its building and expand programming to create a “heightened emphasis on science and history.”Officials from the museum and from Sotheby’s said they were disappointed by the decision.Elizabeth McGraw, the president of the museum’s board of trustees called the court decision a “setback” for the institution and its neighbors.“The auction that held the promise of addressing our museum’s serious financial difficulties will have to proceed without our works, and our plans for the future will be delayed,” she said in a written statement. “Until that process resolves, we will continue to do what we do every day: bring our passion for art, science and discovery to our community.”The auction house confirmed that Monday’s auction would go forward with the rest of more than 70 works that have been slated for sale.“We have never doubted that the board of trustees acted in good faith and was well within their legal rights,” Sotheby’s said in a statement, “and we remain confident that they will prevail in their plans to ensure a bright future for the Berkshire Museum in support of the community of Pittsfield and western Massachusetts.”Michael B. Keating, a lawyer for the Rockwell family and others seeking to stop the sale, said his clients fully supported the decision that blocked the auction of the museum items and “the irreparable harm that would occur if these paintings were to be sold.”Museum organizations have condemned the museum’s deaccessioning plan, saying it violated guidelines against the sale of art to subsidize operating and other expenses instead of using such proceeds to enhance or maintain a collection.Rockwell’s sons and a group of museum members sued separately to stop the sale. But Judge John A. Agostini of Berkshire Superior Court found that they lacked legal standing. Judge Agostini also denied a request by the attorney general to block the sale.The state’s lawyers told the appeals court on Friday that the museum was looking to sell nearly all of its valuable art. Doing so would violate a number of trusts, they said, including what they described as a promise to Rockwell that his works would remain in the permanent collection and another pledge that some of the works slated for auction would never leave Pittsfield.“This sale is unprecedented in terms of the number, value and prominence of the works being proposed, the centrality of these works to the museum’s collection, and the process the museum employed to select and dispose of the deaccessioned items,” the attorney general’s office said in its filing on Friday.The lower court had described the attorney general’s office as a “reluctant warrior,” whose objections had not included specific details on how it would review the planned sale. It noted that a delay would have “considerable financial consequences” for the museum. It did not find that the museum had violated any of the charitable trusts through which it had come into possession of the art.The attorney general’s office countered in its filing on Friday that while the museum could sell the works in the future, any items disposed of at auction would be very difficult to get back. It said the museum had not abided by its most pressing mission — to preserve its charitable purpose — and that whatever the financial hurdles, its relationship to other museums and with donors would be damaged by the sale.
Egon Schiele Is Still Too Racy for Some, Nearly 100 Years After His Death VIENNA — It’s been nearly a century since the Austrian painter Egon Schiele died, but his art — charged with erotic energy and usually showing more than a little skin — still ruffles feathers.A series of advertisements showing Schiele’s graphically contorted bodies (with explicitly rendered private parts) didn’t make it past the critical eyes of those selling advertising space in Britain and Germany — nor the anti-nudity restrictions on Facebook. The artworks had to be covered up.Both Schiele and his mentor, the painter Gustav Klimt, died in 1918, the same year World War I and the Austro-Hungarian empire ended. In 2018, museums in Vienna will mount a yearlong series of exhibitions and events to mark the centennial: “Stairway to Klimt” begins at Vienna’s Kunsthistorisches Museum on Feb. 13; “Egon Schiele, Expression and Lyricism” opens at the Leopold Museum on Feb. 23.Vienna’s Tourist Board has also been working on a campaign celebrating these and other big-draw exhibitions, and Viennese modernism in general. But the campaign ran into an unusual glitch — the office’s originally planned posters, featuring large Schiele nudes, turned out to be too racy.According to a Vienna Tourist Board spokeswoman, Helena Hartlauer, Transport for London rejected the original images, citing trepidation about depicting genitals in public space.Ms. Hartlauer said that modified advertisements with pixelated genitals were also declined. Ultimately approved were versions using the same artworks (Schiele’s “Seated Male Nude (Self-Portrait),” 1910, and “Girl With Orange Stockings,” 1914, and other paintings by the artist, all from the Leopold Museum collection), but with certain bits covered by a banner.The banner reads: “SORRY, 100 years old but still too daring today.” The modified images are now on view on bus shelters in Cologne and building facades in Hamburg, and, since this week, in tube stops in London.“We wondered, How much Viennese modernism is bearable today?” said Norbert Kettner, chief executive of the Vienna Tourist Board. Apparently for the British and Germans, less than the Austrians anticipated.In some ways, the no-nude attitudes abroad have been a blessing in disguise for Vienna’s campaign — since early November the Tourist Board has been highlighting images of the public ads with the hashtag #DerKunstihreFreiheit (#ToArtItsFreedom in English) on social media.The hashtag comes from the slogan “To every age its art, to art its freedom,” still visible in German on the facade of the Viennese Secession, an exhibition venue co-founded by Klimt in 1897 and still operating today as an autonomous artist-run institution. And the controversy certainly echoes discussions that took place in Schiele’s time. In fin-de-siècle Vienna, an era of dramatic shifts in both art and society, many considered the artist’s work to be pornographic. Schiele’s first broader acceptance didn’t come until early 1918 with a major exhibition in the Secession — later that year, the artist succumbed to Spanish flu at age 28.“We want to show people just how far ahead of their time Vienna and its protagonists really were,” Mr. Kettner said. “And also encourage the audience to scrutinize how much really has — or hasn’t — changed in terms of openness and attitudes in society over the times.”
Cyberattack Casts a Long Shadow on Equifax’s Earnings Equifax has suffered a new intrusion — into its profitability. Costs relating to the consumer credit reporting agency’s major cyberattack helped knock earnings down 27 percent in the third quarter from a year earlier. Revenue also took a big hit. And the likely biggest expenses — including a long list of unquantified legal exposures — are yet to rain down.The Atlanta-based company, led by an interim chief executive, Paulino Barros, reported $87.5 million of pretax expenses in the period related to the hack, which allowed attackers to extract information on as many as 145.5 million consumers. Some of the expenses are one-offs, and others won’t be. The company expects up to $75 million in additional expenses this quarter.That may be only the tip of the iceberg. Equifax is one of a handful of credit-scoring companies that collect people’s data on a huge scale and sell it to lenders, making it almost systemically important. That arguably means the bar for protecting its data is higher than for other corporations. It now faces 240 class-action lawsuits in North America, and investigations by a who’s who of watchdogs, including the Securities and Exchange Commission, Britain’s Financial Conduct Authority and the attorneys general of all 50 states. Equifax says it cannot yet estimate damages and fines, but there are likely to be some of both.Although overall revenue was up in the third quarter, sales in its biggest division, which handles American consumer credit reports, fell 3 percent. That was a sharp turnaround from 7 percent growth in the first half, considering that the breach was made public only on Sept. 7. To give that result, the unit’s revenue in the last three weeks of the quarter would have had to slump by about a third from what was expected, according to Breakingviews calculations. Executives expect overall revenue to decline by 3 to 4 percent in the fourth quarter as customers defer more orders.Investors have lopped off about a quarter of Equifax’s market capitalization since the breach. That’s consistent with a sustained drop in profit on the scale of the third quarter, but it doesn’t allow for an extended slide in revenue or big legal outlays. The investors may be too sanguine.
Senate Plan Could Increase Taxes on Some Middle-Class Workers WASHINGTON — Mitch McConnell, the Senate majority leader, acknowledged on Friday that the Republican tax plan might result in a tax hike for some working Americans, saying he “misspoke” days earlier when he said that “nobody in the middle class is going to get a tax increase” under the Senate bill.“I misspoke on that,” Mr. McConnell, a Kentucky Republican, said in an interview on Friday with The New York Times. “You can’t guarantee that absolutely no one sees a tax increase, but what we are doing is targeting levels of income and looking at the average in those levels and the average will be tax relief for the average taxpayer in each of those segments.”The Senate bill unveiled on Thursday would raise taxes on millions of middle-class families, according to a preliminary New York Times analysis. The plan would also disproportionately benefit high earners and corporations. Still, middle-class earners would fare better under the Senate proposal than its counterpart in the House, the analysis found.The Senate Finance Committee bill would, on average, cut taxes for people at every income level. But, as Mr. McConnell alluded to in his revised remarks, those benefits would vary widely within income brackets, depending on the specific circumstances of individuals and households, and many would pay more than under existing rules.Republican lawmakers have been in a dash to devise — and pass — a tax overhaul that would mark their most significant achievement since taking control of Congress. President Trump and Republican leaders have outlined two main objectives for the rewrite: cutting taxes for American businesses and for the middle class. The legislation reduces tax rates on individuals and businesses, while eliminating some tax breaks to make up for lost revenues. It is meant to accelerate economic growth and increase wages for workers.Both the House and Senate bills would cut the corporate tax rate to 20 percent from 35 percent and provide business tax benefits, such as the ability to immediately expense purchases of equipment.The Times analysis, using the open-source software TaxBrain, found that roughly one-quarter of families in the middle class would see their taxes increase in 2018, by about $1,000 on average. By 2026, the share seeing an increase would rise slightly, to about one-third, and the average increase would rise to about $1,600. For the majority of middle-class families that receive a tax cut, the average savings would be about $1,300 in 2018 and $1,700 in 2026.The Times analysis defines the middle class broadly as those earning between two-thirds and twice the median household income, or about $50,000 to $160,000 per year for a family of three. To focus on families, the analysis excluded individual filers and households headed by people 65 or older and is adjusted for the size of each household.Under the House bill, The Times has found, about half of middle-class families would pay more in taxes in 2026.The analysis did not seek to calculate how workers might benefit from a steep cut in the corporate tax rate, which both the Senate and House bills would reduce to 20 percent from a top rate of 35 percent today, or project how the bills might increase economic growth and, with it, Americans’ wages.On Friday, the independent Tax Foundation released an analysis of the plan’s growth effects. It projected that the Senate bill would increase gross domestic product by 3.7 percent over the next decade and raise wages by 2.9 percent across the economy.For taxpayers earning more than $1 million a year, the Senate bill offers a more limited upside and downside than the House bill.The Senate bill is less likely than the House bill to yield tax increases for high-income Americans, in part because it cuts the top marginal personal tax rate, while the House bill creates a so-called “bubble rate” that would actually raise taxes on many high-salaried workers.The Senate measure would also produce a smaller average tax windfall for high earners than the House version, in part by offering less generous benefits for owners of businesses known as pass-throughs, which are not organized as corporations.Under the Senate plan, “Americans are especially likely to face a tax increase if they have a smaller family, have mostly wage income instead of investment income, or claim some of the many deductions that the bill repeals, like those for state and local taxes and employee business expenses,” said Lily Batchelder, a professor and tax specialist at New York University Law School, who worked on economic policy in the Obama administration. “They are increasing taxes on many in the middle class, while concentrating their tax cuts on the wealthy.”The Senate bill appears much better for the very wealthy than it is for the somewhat wealthy. About half of families earning between two and three times the median income — or about $160,000 to $240,000 for a family of three — would pay more in 2018 than under existing law. But among the richest families, those earning more than about $500,000 for a family of three, nearly 90 percent would get a tax cut.The findings come with an important caveat: The Senate bill, as written, appears unable to muster the 60 votes needed to avoid a Democratic filibuster, meaning Republicans will need to amend it to comply with the budget reconciliation rules and allow permit passage by a simple majority. Those changes could likely include putting expiration dates on some of the bill’s major provisions, which could make the final version of the bill look less favorable to the middle class, particularly in later years.The Times’s figures are based on an analysis of Census Bureau data using a tax model from the Open Source Policy Center, a Washington research organization affiliated with the right-leaning American Enterprise Institute. Because the analysis is based on publicly available data, not actual tax records, it may not capture all the intricacies of Americans’ household finances.The Senate bill differs sharply from the House version in its approach to cutting taxes on businesses. But when it comes to taxes on individuals and families, the bills are more similar than different. Both would double the standard deduction while eliminating a raft of deductions and credits. Both would make the child tax credit more generous. Both would restructure federal income tax brackets to impose lower marginal tax rates at most income levels, although the Senate approach, unlike the House version, doesn’t eliminate two brackets entirely.The Senate bill includes features that would make its plan more favorable to the middle class. It preserves some popular tax deductions and credits that the House bill initially would have eliminated, and it makes the child tax credit somewhat more generous and widely available. On the other hand, the Senate bill, unlike the House version, would eliminate the deduction for property taxes, which could lead to higher federal taxes for homeowners in areas with high property tax rates or expensive housing markets.Aparna Mathur, an economist at the American Enterprise Institute, said senators could improve the bill with further changes, such as expanding the earned-income tax credit and extending the benefits of the child tax credit to more low-income taxpayers. “We clearly need to do more to help the lowest-income families,” she said. “At the same time, we can engage in more base broadening for the highest-income households, perhaps by eliminating and not just capping the mortgage-interest deduction.”The Times analysis found that roughly one-fifth of the Senate bill’s cuts in 2018 would go to families and individuals earning $1 million or more, and close to half would go to people earning at least $200,000. Between 10 million and 15 million taxpayers earning less than $100,000 a year would pay more than under existing law.Families earning more than $1 million a year would see their after-tax income rise by about 1.7 percent in 2018 compared with what they would make under current law, nearly triple the gains enjoyed by those earning less than $200,000.Over all, the Senate bill would cut individual income taxes by about $30 billion in 2018, and by $900 billion over the next decade, according to Congress’s nonpartisan Joint Committee on Taxation. And most people in all income groups would see a tax cut, although the cuts would be modest for most lower earners.
Gilbert Rogin, 87, Magazine Editor and Writer of Droll Fiction, Dies Gilbert Rogin, who had an enviable run as a writer of droll short fiction for The New Yorker while building toward an impressive career as a top editor at Sports Illustrated and other magazines, died on Nov. 4 at his home in Westport, Conn. He was 87.His death was confirmed by his wife, Jacqueline Duvoisin, a former photographer for Sports Illustrated. She did not specify the cause, but Mr. Rogin had been in declining health for years.Talented and idiosyncratic, Mr. Rogin was managing editor of Sports Illustrated for five years beginning in 1979, a stretch when the magazine was still dominant in sports journalism and ESPN was just a fledgling.Before that, though, it seemed as if he might be on his way to a career as a fiction writer. The New Yorker published more than 30 of his stories beginning in 1963, humorous tales that often seemed at least somewhat autobiographical, and he had written several well-received books. But in 1980 Roger Angell, the magazine’s fiction editor, rejected one of his submissions on the grounds — as Mr. Rogin later told the tale — that he was repeating himself. He stopped writing fiction entirely.“Maybe I knew I’d exhausted the fiction vein,” he told Franz Lidz, one of his former Sports Illustrated reporters, in a 2010 interview for AARP the Magazine. “The idea had always been in the back of my mind. For whatever reason, after Roger voiced that opinion, I literally couldn’t write fiction again. Not a single word.”Gilbert Leslie Rogin was born on Nov. 14, 1929, in Brooklyn. His father, Robert, was a lawyer. His mother, the former Lillian Ruderman, had been an actress who, under the name Billie Rudell, made several Broadway appearances in the 1920s.Mr. Rogin grew up in Manhattan and graduated from Columbia College. In 1951 he began a brief stint at The New Yorker as an office gofer; his assignment on his second day on the job was to bring a suit of clothes to a funeral home for Harold Ross to be laid out in. Mr. Ross, the magazine’s founding editor, had just died.In 1955, after two years in the Army, Mr. Rogin joined Sports Illustrated, which Time Inc. had begun the year before. His job was to clip articles from newspapers and the wire services for filing in the magazine’s library, but he began writing almost immediately, and soon was a reporter.He became known for elegant phrasing and carefully observed profiles of figures like the boxer Floyd Patterson and the basketball star Bill Russell. In 2014, when the magazine commemorated its 60th anniversary by republishing 60 of its best articles, one by Mr. Rogin was among them: “12 Days Before the Mast,” his account of participating in a sailing race from California to Hawaii aboard a 55-foot yawl. Not a sailing fan, he found the experience underwhelming.“It was a numbing, embittering and largely useless 12 days,” he wrote. “There was no plot, no suspense. Our progress was as lacking in memorable incident as the passage of an hour hand across the face of a clock. We proved only that a curving, erratic line is not the shortest distance between two points.”When not on assignment for Sports Illustrated, Mr. Rogin began writing short fiction. The New Yorker published its first Rogin story, “Ernest Observes,” in 1963, and they came regularly after that, right up through “The Hard Parts” in November 1978. More appeared in other magazines.A story collection, “The Fencing Master,” came out in 1965, and in 1971 Mr. Rogin published his first novel, “What Happens Next?” The poet L. E. Sissman, reviewing that book in The New York Times, called it “a novel of the first importance.”A second novel, “Preparations for the Ascent,” thematically related to the first, came in 1980. In 2010 the two novels were reissued by Verse Chorus Press as a single volume. Jay Jennings, in the introduction to that republication, wrote of the similarities that run through much of Mr. Rogin’s funny, understated fiction.“The protagonist,” Mr. Jennings wrote, “no matter the name, is a (presumably autobiographical) middle-aged, Jewish, Manhattanite male, a magazine writer of eclectic intellectual interests and eccentric habits.”As to why Mr. Rogin’s fiction, whose admirers included John Updike, had been largely forgotten, Mr. Jennings speculated that oversaturation might have played a part.“He was writing at the very apex of the market for protagonists who were middle-aged, Jewish, Manhattanite male intellectuals/writers and musers,” Mr. Jennings wrote. “The ur-text in this genre is Saul Bellow’s ‘Herzog’ (1964), with cohorts Mailer, Malamud and others doing variations on the theme.”It also certainly did not help that Mr. Rogin abruptly abandoned fiction. The story that drew the discouraging New Yorker rejection back in 1980, “My Masterpieces,” did eventually see the light of print, in 2010, when The Lowbrow Reader published it. (It appears in the anthology “The Lowbrow Reader Reader” as well.) The magazine also arranged for a Mr. Rogin to do a reading at an event at the Housing Works Bookstore in SoHo.“Gil was accustomed to the upper echelon of publishing — The New Yorker and whatnot — and here he was, publishing his lost masterpiece in some idiot’s comedy zine,” Jay Ruttenberg, editor of The Lowbrow Reader, who joined with Mr. Jennings in getting Mr. Rogin’s novels republished, said in an email. “But he was genuinely appreciative of our efforts and visibly delighted by the attention.”Mr. Rogin’s shift away from fiction coincided with his rise to the top editing spot at Sports Illustrated, where his eccentric style alienated some writers — Dan Jenkins was one — but was embraced by others.“He’d make his changes with a touch so light that you could only nod appreciatively,” Jerry Kirshenbaum, a writer and editor at the magazine for 30 years, wrote in an email. “You didn’t feel like your fingers were being chopped off the way it was with some other editors. With Gil, it was like having a manicure.”Yet there could also be bellowing and red-penciled rage, and savvy staff members learned that Mr. Rogin was a man of sometimes strange routines that were not to be disrupted.“Between 2 and 3, everybody had to be silent while he took his nap,” Mr. Lidz said in an interview. Breakfast was always Bumble Bee tuna eaten from the can. He would often edit in the bathroom adjacent to his office. When he traveled, his assistant had to be sure not only that the hotel had a pool but that it was suitable for Mr. Rogin to swim his daily laps in — no kidney shapes allowed.An oft-told tale: Once, on the road, Mr. Rogin turned up for his swim to find that the hotel pool was being drained; he frantically swam his mile’s worth of laps anyway, racing the declining water level.Mr. Rogin married Ruth Copes in 1963. That marriage ended in divorce. He is survived by his wife, with whom he had a relationship of more than 30 years; they married in 2010.His oddities aside, Mr. Rogin was adept and versatile enough that, in 1984, Time moved him — despite his reluctance — to Discover, its struggling science magazine, which he helped stabilize. In 1986 it won a National Magazine Award for general excellence. In 1987 Mr. Rogin became corporate editor, the No. 3 editing position in the Time Inc. empire.In that capacity, he helped Quincy Jones found Vibe magazine in 1993. And his volatile impatience seemed to grow.“He felt that the guilty should be shot,” Jason McManus, who as editor in chief was his boss, said on the occasion of Mr. Rogin’s retirement in 1993. “I often made him unhappy by my reluctance to take summary action on some perceived outrage; on the other hand, if I instantly had taken Gil’s advice, hardly any of our present managing editors would still be employed, nor would I.”
J.C. Penney Stock Surges as Turnaround Plan Shows Results J. C. Penney surprised Wall Street on Friday, but not in the way investors had come to expect: The beleaguered department store chain reported an increase in a key measure of sales that was greater than anticipated, causing its stock to surge.The retailer said comparable sales — those at stores open at least a year — had risen 1.7 percent in the third quarter compared with the same period a year earlier, more than double analysts’ expectations and the company’s own forecast last month.The upswing was J. C. Penney’s first in that critical metric in a year, an indication that the chain’s strategy of purging excess inventory and closing underperforming stores was paying off. The company’s $2.8 billion in revenue for the quarter also exceeded expectations.J. C. Penney stock was up 15.3 percent on Friday, to $3.17 a share. A year ago, shares were trading above $9.The J. C. Penney results were a departure from recent earnings reports from retailers that have raised concerns heading into the holiday shopping season. Department stores, in particular, have struggled to recapture foot traffic and to make innovations as they lose sales to Amazon and other online sellers.Macy’s reported on Thursday that its comparable sales for the third quarter had slipped 3.6 percent year over year. Kohl’s reported an uptick in same-store sales, but its quarterly profits missed expectations, a result it attributed to the impact of Hurricanes Harvey and Irma hitting during the back-to-school season. Comparable sales at Nordstrom’s, which were also announced on Thursday, also underwhelmed.Not all of J. C. Penney’s earnings picture was positive. The company reported a net loss of $128 million, or 41 cents a share, nearly doubling from $67 million, or 22 cents a share, a year earlier. Adjusted for one-time changes, the loss was 33 cents a share, less than analysts had expected.The company managed expectations by releasing an earnings forecast on Oct. 27 — a day before the end of its third quarter — that predicted a more modest performance than the final report showed.But J. C. Penney has also taken “bold but necessary steps” to help “reset” major parts of its business, Marvin Ellison, the chief executive, said in an earnings call on Friday.He said the retailer had used deep discounts to clear out slow-moving inventory in its women’s division and had expanded its casual and contemporary offerings, leading to the first positive same-store sales in the category in 14 months.The company said in February that it planned to close as many as 140 stores — 14 percent its total — in the months ahead.“The goal is simple,” Mr. Ellison said. “We wanted to flatten the organization, streamline decision-making and increase our agility in this rapidly changing retail environment.”
The Power of the Courts Is Messing Up Politics AS four newly Senate-approved federal appellate judges move into their chambers seven months after Neil Gorsuch joined the Supreme Court, they may seem to have vindicated conservatives who swallowed their qualms about Donald Trump last year out of a conviction that, whatever his flaws, he would save the judiciary.Yet this “but the courts” defense of Mr. Trump says less about him than it does about the courts: namely, that their importance is swollen beyond constitutional recognition. If a branch of government that Alexander Hamilton dismissed as “the least dangerous” can overshadow every other concern about Mr. Trump, the branch is more dangerous than it was supposed to be. Originalists who believe these judges will help to tame judicial overreach should credit Mr. Trump for the appointments. But all should take notice of the fact that the “but the courts” argument reveals a judiciary of outsize importance.Conservatives did not always hold the judiciary in such awe. Judge Robert Bork, whose nomination to the Supreme Court the Senate rejected three decades ago, became a martyr to the cause of originalism because he believed in the courts’ demotion in the constitutional scheme from the inflated role they had assumed under Chief Justice Earl Warren. Using the same reasoning, Mr. Bork also criticized conservative judges of earlier generations, like those who overruled economic reforms in the Progressive Era.Now, however, as a constitutional matter, deference to the judiciary unites a broad coalition of right and left, which dispute how, not whether, the judiciary should exercise a far-reaching power to overrule the people’s elected representatives. Liberals have long argued in favor of an extensive understanding of individual rights, especially on issues such as privacy, a stance to which Mr. Bork’s judicial modesty was a correction. Originalism is a diverse movement that consists of both opponents and supporters of Mr. Trump’s election. Many of them still support a deferential judiciary, but growing numbers seek control of the courts to promote conservative ends.The “but the courts” argument for voting for Mr. Trump percolated largely from grass-roots quarters, among religious conservatives in particular — where one would have expected the most hostility to Mr. Trump. Deflating the power of the judiciary might help to normalize our politics and help restore the primacy of considerations like policy and character in the choice of public officials.Courts have removed wide areas of jurisdiction from the public’s authority, corroding the ethic of measured majority rule that James Madison described as “the vital principle of our free Constitution.” Elected officials have been willing participants eager to shed their responsibility to the courts despite the fact that the Constitution imbues them with ample authority to exercise it themselves. When President Barack Obama used executive authority to provide subsidies for health care that House Republicans said the Affordable Care Act did not authorize, they did not retaliate legislatively, as Madison’s Federalist 51 — the paper that based the separation of powers on each branch’s propensity to defend its own turf — would have predicted. Instead, they sued, essentially asking the judiciary to shelter them rather than sticking up for themselves. When they raised constitutional objections to Mr. Obama’s executive order on immigration, Representative Jim Clyburn, Democrat of South Carolina, dismissed them by disclaiming the authority that the Constitution had placed in his hands: “That’s not for Congress to decide, that’s why we have courts to make that decision.”That is emphatically not why the framers thought we had courts. Madison wrote that allowing unelected judges the last word on constitutional questions “was never intended, and can never be proper” in a republic. Hamilton emphasized that the judiciary had no power of enforcement, only of judgment.But Hamilton’s pseudonymous adversary Brutus, an opponent of the Constitution, understood the power of judgment in a republic. He observed that the Constitution gave judges the final word, without appeal, on constitutional questions to the Supreme Court, and asked the crucial question: How would officials with unaccountable power behave? His answer was that the justices of the Supreme Court would be “independent of the people, of the legislature, and of every power under heaven. Men placed in this situation will generally soon feel themselves independent of heaven itself.”A simple thought experiment illustrates the extent to which Brutus was right. Were it within the power of the president to deliver a majority in Congress, would conservatives set aside such other core principles in the executive as decorum, morality and economic freedom in order to attain control of the legislature? Such a victory would be transparently hollow because it would entail ceding principles to obtain power whose putative purpose is to enact those principles in the first place. Thomas Jefferson understood this. In 1792, a political adversary was contemplating running for the House of Representatives, where Jefferson was concerned real damage could be done. Consequently, Jefferson wrote his friend Madison, “I think nothing better could be done than to make him a judge.” The rival’s name was John Marshall.What makes judges different today, so much so that “but the courts” conservatives were willing to forgo other important principles to attain the judiciary? Obtaining life tenure for your allies is only a worthwhile bargain if conservatives believe the courts are substantially more powerful in the long run than the elected branches are in the medium term. If that’s true, then something is constitutionally awry: Judges are affecting life in America more than elected officials. There are, of course, other reasons for thoughtful conservatives to have supported Mr. Trump. That so many were swayed by the “but the courts” defense alone despite their myriad concerns about Mr. Trump is compelling evidence that the judiciary has grown independent of heaven itself.
How the ‘Shalane Flanagan Effect’ Works When Shalane Flanagan won the New York City Marathon last week, her victory was about more than just an athletic achievement. Of course, it’s a remarkable one: She’s the first American woman to win in 40 years, and she did so in a blistering 2 hours 26 minutes.But perhaps Flanagan’s bigger accomplishment lies in nurturing and promoting the rising talent around her, a rare quality in the cutthroat world of elite sports. Every single one of her training partners — 11 women in total — has made it to the Olympics while training with her, an extraordinary feat. Call it the Shalane Effect: You serve as a rocket booster for the careers of the women who work alongside you, while catapulting forward yourself.“Shalane has pioneered a new brand of ‘team mom’ to these young up-and-comers, with the confidence not to tear others down to protect her place in the hierarchy,” said Lauren Fleshman, who became a professional runner in the early 2000s, around the same time Flanagan did. “Shalane’s legacy is in her role modeling, which women in every industry would like to see more of.”Here’s how it worked until Flanagan burst onto the scene. After college, promising female distance athletes would generally embark on aggressive training until they broke down. Few of them developed the staying power required to dominate the global stage. And they didn’t have much of a community to support them; domestic women’s distance running was fractious and atrophied. In 2000, for example, only one American woman qualified for the Olympic marathon, after training alone in her Anchorage home on a treadmill.But things changed after 2009, when Flanagan joined Jerry Schumacher’s fledgling running group in Portland, Ore., called the Bowerman Track Club. She was the team’s lone woman, and worked with him to create something new: a team of professional female distance runners who would train together and push one another to striking collective success. They were coached by a man and surrounded mostly by male runners, but over time Flanagan and her teammates outperformed the men in the national and global arenas.Instead of being threatened by her teammates’ growing accomplishments, Flanagan embraced them, and brought in more women, elevating them to her level until they become the most formidable group of distance athletes in the nation. National championships, world championships, Olympics: They became some of the best runners in the world.One of them, Emily Infeld, joined the club in Portland after college, but developed one stress fracture after another. She contemplated quitting in 2014. That December, Flanagan took her aside for a glass of wine and a talk.“I was really struggling — I cried and told her ‘I can’t do it, my body isn’t built for this,’ ” recalled Infeld. “And she totally changed my mind-set. She told me that of course this was bad, but she believed I could do better. I got better, we trained together and she held me accountable. It’s completely changed my career.”By the following August, Infeld had become one of the fastest runners in the world, taking a surprise bronze in the 10,000 meters at the World Championships.This is not all selfless acts of mentorship; the camaraderie Flanagan has fostered with her teammates served her well.“I thoroughly enjoy working with other women,” Flanagan told me. “I think it makes me a better athlete and person. It allows me to have more passion toward my training and racing. When we achieve great things on our own, it doesn’t feel nearly as special.”In fact, it arguably made the difference in securing her spot in the Olympics last year.On a searing day in Los Angeles at the United States Olympic marathon trials in February 2016, Flanagan and her teammate Amy Cragg broke away from the pack early in the race. They had spent months training together for that day and ran stride-for-stride in matching uniforms. But toward the end of the race, Flanagan’s face turned red and she began to wilt, staggering a bit as their advantage narrowed.Cragg slowed down and urged her on, pacing her over the few final miles and even fetching her water so Flanagan could conserve energy, a remarkable demonstration of support on a racecourse. Flanagan barely made it across the finish line, where she collapsed into Cragg’s arms. But Flanagan was able to make her fourth Olympic team and go on to become the top American finisher in the Olympic marathon in Rio, in sixth place.“We had run thousands of miles together; we had worked so hard for this. She had been there every step of the way, struggling with me,” Cragg told me a few months after the race. “We all have someone like Shalane where you’re kind of dependent on her, who has your back and would do the same thing.”This year, Cragg took the bronze medal in the marathon at the track and field world championships.Flanagan’s leadership style doesn’t fit the “girl boss” leadership archetypes that are flourishing in pop culture, the Ivanka Trump feminism, with its shallow claims of support for women, that yields no results. (Ms. Trump’s kind of feminism may attract cheers at races, but it does not win them.) Flanagan does not just talk about elevating women; she elevates them. And they win.The Flanagan kind of feminism — a ruthless adherence to goals — rarely makes for interesting stories in the moment. It took Flanagan from the time she turned professional, in 2004, until this year to win a major international race; years of tedium and drudgery, and robotic routine (churning her legs through 130 miles a week). She went on her first vacation in seven years of marathon training after suffering a stress fracture this spring. It’s not fun, and it’s not relatable.To be sure, Flanagan’s unapologetic competitiveness is not universally popular, but she is respected for it. Flanagan boldly acknowledged the work she put into her marathon training and was unabashed about wanting to win before the race. Her victory in New York involved fist-pumping and profanity-laced affirmations as she crossed the finish line in front of millions of viewers.We usually see competitive women, particularly athletically excellent women, only in one of two ways: either competing to defeat one another, or all about team over self. But that’s a flawed, limiting paradigm. The Shalane Effect dismantles it: She is extraordinarily competitive, but not petty; team-oriented, but not deferential. Elevating other women is actually an act of self-interest: It’s not so lonely at the top if you bring others along.So, it was no coincidence that, with the support system she spent years building for herself, it was Flanagan who finally prevailed.
China Has Donald Trump Just Where It Wants Him YANGON, Myanmar — President Trump is incidental to China’s ambitions, a mere blip on a 33-year plan. In a speech last month, President Xi Jinping set out the objectives with great clarity. By 2035 China will be a “global leader in innovation,” showing “solid progress” toward “prosperity for everyone.” By 2050, China will be a “global leader in terms of composite national strength” and a “great, modern socialist country.”Xi gave Trump a warm welcome this week, said the Pacific was big enough for both nations and offered business agreements. Trump made nice and suggested that China and the United States could solve “almost all” of the world’s problems, “and probably all of them.” This was the noise. The real story is growing Chinese strength, steady Chinese purpose aimed at midcentury dominance and erratic American outbursts suggestive of a petulant great power’s retreat.China is busy. It has the reserves, the surpluses and the growth to shape the world. More important, it has the pride and the confidence to think long term. America First, Trump’s ugly slogan, reeks of retrenchment. By contrast, Xi’s One Belt, One Road initiative is an enormous infrastructure project designed to use Chinese money and technology to reconnect the old Silk Road and tie nations to China. In scope and value it dwarfs the Marshall Plan, the postwar reconstruction program for Europe that was a farsighted expression of American confidence almost 70 years ago.Xi’s speech to the 19th National Congress of the Communist Party of China marked his apotheosis. He has joined the pantheon along with Mao Zedong and Deng Xiaoping. His thought is now dogma. His China has entered a different phase. Having grown independent and then rich, it is now “becoming strong.”To what end will the strength be used? China, Xi said, “offers a new option for other countries and nations who want to speed up their development while preserving their independence.” A new era has begun “that sees China moving closer to center stage.”There could scarcely be a more explicit offer of China as an alternative, single-party, authoritarian model to the liberal democratic system of the United States (of which Trump has been such a feeble advocate). China is now “actively pursuing almost an ideological competition with the United States,” said Yun Sun, a senior associate at the Stimson Center. Xi’s speech was “a declaration of the Chinese saying that we have won this game, we are winning this game.”They are, for now. The Chinese gambit — in the past, China has been reticent about offering itself as a global paradigm — comes at a moment of American democratic fracture. It’s a good moment for Beijing to talk of arriving “center stage.” Trump does not really have ideas. He has impulses (like his dangerous infatuation with Saudi Arabia).On his Asian swing, the president spoke of pursuing a “free and open Indo-Pacific region” built around democracies including India, Japan and Australia. This was the right thing to say to counter China. Hundreds of millions of Asians outside China don’t want to find themselves obliged to study Xi Jinping Thought. They prefer liberalism to Leninism.Xi Jinping Thought calls for building the Chinese military into “world-class forces that obey the party’s command, can fight and win.” It portrays the leadership of the Communist Party as “the defining feature” of Chinese society.So Trump’s commitment to Indo-Pacific freedom is significant. It’s also dubious. Trump likes surpluses, hates deficits. It’s not clear whether any Trump strategy can get beyond such zero-sum rabble-rousing.Around Asia, the last thing countries want is to have to choose between China and the United States. From Singapore to Myanmar, they know that America is the only possible balance to China. If China is money and investment, the United States is security and freedom. The Chinese-American relationship is what the regional order depends on.Those Chinese targets for 2035 and 2050 presuppose one essential thing: regional stability. That’s the headline, not Trump’s machinations. A second Korean War would be a nuclear war. This is the last thing China wants.The second-to-last thing is the end of the North Korean regime and a united Korean Peninsula at its border, allied to the United States. China’s rise to dominance is predicated on stability until that dominance is achieved. Kim Jong-un, the North Korean leader, must be managed in this context.Therefore, China will try to squeeze Kim, not to the point of denuclearization (let alone collapse) but to the point where he does not further provoke the United States or Japan. The question is whether Kim is controllable.The other question is whether Trump is controllable. Xi projects the image of a reliable partner committed to an open, stable trading system. Trump, meanwhile, goes on walkabout with the Saudis.For now, a conventional Saudi-backed war in Lebanon against Iranian-backed Hezbollah is more likely than nuclear war with Pyongyang. These things happen when an America-First American president can’t think beyond next week (or money).
Sex, Senators and — Oh Gosh, Mitt Mitt Romney is coming back.Well, maybe. Romney seems to be angling for a Senate seat if Utah’s Orrin Hatch retires next year. And it’s a tribute to the times we live in that at the moment, he looks … wow, not bad.It is true that as a politician Romney would pander to a guppy. But this week he was a veritable profile in courage by Republican standards. He told his party to drop the “if true” hedge when they were talking about charges that Alabama Senate candidate Roy Moore once sexually assaulted a 14-year-old girl.“Innocent until proven guilty is for criminal convictions, not elections,” Romney said. “I believe Leigh Corfman. Her account is too serious to ignore. Moore is unfit for office and should step aside.”Simple and straightforward. Election to high office is an honor, not a right. Voters, who have been urged in past elections to reject candidates for everything from bad hair to being pregnant, can look at the Moore story — including the multiple women who say he dated or tried to date them when he was in his 30s and they were 16 to 18 — and just say no.Romney is completely right. It doesn’t matter if you think he’s making a grab for attention. In a way, that’s the whole point. This is a man who always has his finger to the wind, and he intuited that this was the thing the American people want to hear: a political uprising against powerful men putting their grubby hands on powerless women.It’s not what they’re getting from most Senate Republicans, who are simply shaking their heads and saying Moore should step down … if it turns out he really did the terrible thing that The Washington Post reported in stupendously credible detail. (John McCain was one of the first to demand that Moore drop out; Jeff Flake was telling the world what a terrible person Moore was even before the sex accusations came up.)President Trump, according to his press secretary, believes “a mere allegation” shouldn’t “destroy a person’s life.” This is pretty unsurprising. After all, if the president had said anything less weaselly, we would swiftly point out that this is the guy who was recorded bragging that he didn’t bother to wait for permission before he started kissing women, adding “Grab ’em by the pussy. You can do anything.”Which we now have no excuse for bringing up.Meanwhile, the Alabama Republican Party has been desperately trying to cover Moore’s tracks:■ “Other than being with an underage person — he didn’t really force himself.”■ “The same thing went on when President Trump ran for office; there was about 15 ladies who ran to the press and said the same thing.”■ “There’s just nothing immoral or illegal here. Maybe just a little bit unusual.”That last was from the Alabama state auditor — the guy who cited the Bible and argued that Joseph did the same thing with Mary. I have covered politics for a very long time, but I swear this is the first time I’ve seen a race hinging on the issue of virgin birth.It’s very possible Moore will be elected. Alabama is a super-red state. American voters do not have a strong history of switching parties in order to punish a politician for personal misbehavior. And the ballot is already printed. (A Hollywood studio is erasing Kevin Spacey from an entire movie, but once you’re on a ballot, no earthly power can get you off.)The whole spectacle would be less awful if at least Republicans from outside the state had the spine to speak up — to follow Romney’s lead.Whoever thought we’d get to the point of urging everybody to just agree with Mitt? Romney appears to be a man with an exemplary private life, but on the political front he has had no moral spine whatsoever. He spent all of 2016 warning the world what a terrible, terrible person Donald Trump was, but then he wouldn’t even say who he voted for in November, except that it wasn’t Hillary. Which was exactly as helpful as sitting outside the polling place under a sign that says, “I’m sulking.”Now, however, we are looking at him with new eyes. And really, he’s due. George W. Bush is getting super-popular, and at least Romney never wrecked the entire Middle East. True, he did get the Republican nomination in 2012 by slamming his opponents as soft on illegal immigrants. But having a history of babbling about “self-deportation” somehow seems a lot less troubling these days.It’s also true that Romney once complained that Barack Obama had been elected with the help of college-age women trading their votes for “free contraceptives.” But now we’ve got a president who’s turning pregnancy prevention programs over to people who don’t believe in birth control.And yes, as a candidate Romney’s idea of expressing empathy for low-income Americans was saying, “There’s no question it’s not good being poor.” But that’s better than Trump’s recent revelation that he felt so sorry for rich people he had to propose eliminating the estate tax “just to give them something.”Who’d have ever thought it? I wish Mitt was president.
Trump in the Age of the Strongman In recent weeks, two leaders — Xi Jinping in China and Mohammed bin Salman in Saudi Arabia — have consolidated personal power to degrees unprecedented in their countries’ recent histories. And Donald Trump, presumptive leader of the free world, has praised them both for doing it.In later October, China’s Communist Party added what it called “Xi Jinping Thought for the New Era of Socialism With Chinese Special Characteristics” to the Constitution. A cult-of-personality campaign for Xi, reminiscent of the days of Mao Zedong, is in full swing. So are purges of his political rivals, dressed up as “anti-corruption” drives.A few days later it was Saudi Arabia’s turn, with Crown Prince Mohammed launching a wave of dismissals and detentions of senior ministers and fellow members of the royal family. Again, the pretext was corruption. Again, the goal was to sideline rivals as he aims to take his elderly father’s throne and remake the kingdom — at best, as an Arabian version of the autocratic liberalism practiced by the late Shah of Iran (an improvement, to be sure, over current conditions).Xi and Mohammed are not alone. We are living through another age of strongmen: Recep Tayyip Erdogan in Turkey; Abdel Fattah el-Sisi in Egypt; Rodrigo Duterte in the Philippines; Viktor Orban in Hungary; Vladimir Putin in Russia. Trump isn’t one of them — the American system won’t allow it, as Tuesday’s elections happily remind us — though he fits the psychological profile and yearns for their level of control.We are also living through another era of democratic self-doubt. Low growth became the new normal for the better part of a decade. We fight wars we don’t know how to win and rue the consequences of action (Iraq) and inaction (Syria) alike. We inhabit a culture we despise and see no way of improving. Congress is paralyzed. The parties are broken. The president is a dolt.Such moments aren’t historically unknown: They seem to recur roughly every 40 years. The 1930s and 1970s were also periods of autocratic resurgence and democratic degeneration, when exhaustion with process-based politics gave rise to enthusiasms for the politics of charisma, efficiency, or both.“I have seen the future and it works,” was the progressive journalist Lincoln Steffens’s judgment on the Soviet Union. “The notion of liberty,” he added, “is false, a hangover from our Western tyranny.”But something is different this time. In Franklin Roosevelt and later in Ronald Reagan, the United States elevated leaders who made the case for the superiority of open societies over closed ones. They ennobled democracy by giving it a sense of destiny and high moral purpose.“Optimism is in order,” Reagan told the British Parliament in June 1982, adding that the “march of freedom and democracy” would leave “Marxism-Leninism on the ash-heap of history.” Reagan spoke at a moment when unemployment in the United States was reaching 10 percent and the prime interest rate ran north of 15 percent. But he was right, and prophetic, and his confidence was infectious.Compare that to Trump, who in his visit to Beijing made clear how arousing he finds huge displays of military pageantry. “You’re a very special man,” the president told Xi, and congratulated him for his “extraordinary elevation” to dictator-for-life. Left unsaid was that this is a man whose regime has, in recent years, kidnapped Hong Kong booksellers, imprisoned the country’s sole winner of the Nobel Peace Prize, kept his widow under house arrest, and seized U.S. naval equipment in international waters.As for Saudi Arabia, Trump tweeted his approval of the purge by saying the crown prince and his father “know exactly what they are doing” and that the detainees the regime was “harshly treating” had been “‘milking’ their country for years!”American presidents of both parties, including Roosevelt and Reagan, have long known how to maintain productive relationships with regimes whose judicial and political standards fall short of our own. Previous administrations have also used prudent diplomatic silence in the face of domestic upheavals abroad.But Trump’s rhetorical effusions on behalf of a repressive Communist dictator and a Saudi political crackdown are something else: An American presidency in the service of un-American values. Conservatives were once enraged when Jimmy Carter lavished praise on Romanian despot Nicolae Ceausescu. What do they have to say for the president now?The Trump administration has proposed gutting funding for the National Endowment for Democracy, whose origins lie in Reagan’s 1982 speech. The National Security Council dropped its focus on democracy and human rights. And the State Department is giving active consideration to scrubbing democracy promotion from its mission statement.This is supposed to be a counsel of realism, the lesson of bitter experience from past democratic exuberance. But it smacks of the envy our stunted strongman feels for his role models. And it raises the question of who will stand up for freedom as the Age of the Strongman rolls forward, unopposed. ☐
The ‘If True’ Cowardice This article is part of the Opinion Today newsletter. You can sign up here to receive more briefings and a guide to the section daily in your inbox.She was 14 years old at the time. Roy Moore was a 32-year-old prosecutor. He took her to his home in the woods, the woman says, removed both her clothes and his and then molested her.The Washington Post’s story about Moore — centered around that allegation — is detailed and persuasive. It included named sources, corroborating evidence and multiple disturbing incidents.After the story’s publication yesterday, the most common reaction from other Republicans was a conditional condemnation that revolved around the words “if true.” A spokeswoman for Vice President Mike Pence said, “If true, this would disqualify anyone from serving in office.” Mitch McConnell’s statement was similar.It’s a wholly insufficient response.I understand why senators might make their immediate response conditional. Maybe they didn’t yet read the story. But once you have read the story, there is only one decent response: Moore, the Republican nominee to become Alabama’s next senator, needs to quit the race immediately.The “if true” response wrongly suggests that there will be some final reckoning of facts to remove any doubt about what Moore did. But there won’t be. He will likely continue denying the allegations, and people will have to choose between The Post’s reams of evidence and Moore’s lack of it.John McCain showed what an ethical response looked like, and he didn’t need long to issue it:“The allegations against Roy Moore are deeply disturbing and disqualifying. He should immediately step aside and allow the people of Alabama to elect a candidate they can be proud of.”What Trumpworld hears. Seeking to downplay the Moore story, Steve Bannon said in a speech last night that “the Bezos Amazon Washington Post that dropped that dime on Donald Trump is the same Bezos Amazon Washington Post that dropped the dime this afternoon on Judge Roy Moore.” (He was referring to the Post’s reporting, in October 2016, about the tape in which Trump bragged about molesting women.)Taxes. Should the Senate pass a tax bill that hurts the middle class but doesn’t hurt the middle class as much as a House tax bill?Obviously not. And that appears to be the choice senators will have, based on yesterday’s early news about the Senate bill.Republican Senate leaders seem to be putting together a bill designed to give huge tax cuts to the wealthy and little to the middle class. The bill would also create large budget deficits that middle-class families would ultimately have to help pay off.The Senate will probably take away a few damaging provisions from the House bill, like a higher tax rate for low-income households. But the bill still seems geared overwhelmingly to the wealthy. One centerpiece is a reduction of the estate tax, which falls on only a sliver of rich families. Another provision makes the House bill worse: a lower income tax rate for the highest earners.It is still possible for the Senate to write a bill that actually tries to clean up the tax code and make life easier on the middle class and poor. But the Senate is now a long way from doing so.I’m encouraged to see several Republican senators raising concerns. Bob Corker and Jeff Flake are worried about soaring deficits. Mike Lee and Marco Rubio want a larger child tax credit. There are also multiple differences between the Senate and House bills that could be difficult to square. Any three Republicans can likely keep a damaging bill from passing.Elsewhere: John Harwood conducted a meaty CNBC interview with Gary Cohn, the top White House economics adviser, yesterday. Among the points Harwood made: Any additional economic growth that the bill might create through corporate tax changes is likely to be overwhelmed by the drag from larger deficits. Cohn didn’t have a good answer.Red Century. My colleague Max Strasser, an Opinion editor, writes:“One hundred years ago this week, the Bolshevik Revolution began in St. Petersburg, Russia. This year, the Opinion section’s Red Century series has looked back at the revolution and its aftershocks. In the first installment, in February, David Priestland wrote about not just Communism’s legacy but also what its future might hold. In the final installment, this week, Simon Sebag Montefiore looked at how the revolution reverberates, what might have happened if it never occurred — and how it almost didn’t.“Those are just a couple of the great pieces in the series. If you want to know more about how this event in 1917 shaped our world, you should read the rest of the Red Century series here.”The full Opinion report from The Times follows, including Diana Nyad on her life after a childhood sexual assault.
Saudi Arabia’s Special Power Over Donald Trump Consider this foreign policy challenge: A Mideast leader undertakes a stunning power play to cement domestic control, carrying out mass arrests without due process and installing loyalists in key ministries. He ratchets up criticism of a regional rival and accuses it of effectively declaring war. And another Mideast leader, while on a visit to the first one’s country, abruptly resigns and doesn’t return home.If all this were happening in Iran, it’s a fair guess that President Trump, Congress and a host of other voices would react with outrage. In truth, the scenario sums up what’s been happening in Saudi Arabia in the last week under Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman. And Mr. Trump could not have been more effusive. “I have great confidence in King Salman and the Crown Prince of Saudi Arabia, they know exactly what they are doing,” he tweeted.There’s a big difference, of course, between Saudi Arabia and Iran; the former is an American ally, the latter an antagonist. But it has not been American practice to give allies a free pass when they’re destabilizing the region, and Saudi policies, both domestic and foreign, have become increasingly aggressive under Crown Prince Mohammed. In addition to his power play, he’s escalated Saudi involvement in Yemen; continued his boycott of Qatar, ostensibly another American ally; and made inflammatory statements about Iran. Saad Hariri, the Lebanese prime minister, resigned a week ago while in the Saudi capital, Riyadh, in circumstances that remain a mystery.No problem, suggests Mr. Trump, who made clear early on that he would side with the kingdom and its Sunni allies against Shiite-led Iran. But there is a problem: Mr. Trump’s uncritical support of the prince’s behavior is stirring fears of a war with Iran and undermining American interests.Secretary of State Rex Tillerson knows this, even if his boss doesn’t. On Friday Mr. Tillerson reaffirmed Lebanon’s independence, hailed Mr. Hariri and cautioned against using Lebanon for proxy conflicts. His words were a stern, if indirect, admonishment to Saudi Arabia. And to his boss in the Oval Office. Though why should a headstrong Saudi prince pay any attention to an American underling who has been repeatedly undermined by that same boss?
The Insanity of Taxpayer-Funded Addiction The pharmaceutical industry was listed as one of the “Contributors to the Current Crisis” in the final report of President Trump’s Commission on Combating Drug Addiction and the Opioid Crisis. The report cites decades of aggressive marketing and industry-sponsored physician “conferences” aimed at expanding opioid use by minimizing the dangers of addiction. Lawsuits by state attorneys general, counties and local jurisdictions allege that the industry fostered the epidemic by overpromoting its products, while raking in billions as Americans became addicted and overdosed. “To this day,” the commission says, “the opioid pharmaceutical industry influences the nation’s response to the crisis.”It sure does. In its response to an epidemic that now kills 50,000 Americans a year, the Trump administration wants to spend tens of millions of dollars in part to help the industry responsible sell ostensibly nonaddictive pain medications and “abuse deterrent” opioids that are as addictive as the original opioids.In a recent speech, President Trump praised a new public-private partnership involving the National Institutes of Health and pharmaceutical companies to develop nonaddictive painkillers and new treatments for addiction and overdoses. “I’ll be pushing the concept of nonaddictive painkillers very, very hard,” he promised. The N.I.H. says it hasn’t set a budget for its “public-private initiative” but spent roughly $600 million on research into pain and opioid use and abuse in 2016.The federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recommends that prescribers avoid opioids for most chronic pain. Experts not affiliated with the pharmaceutical industry urge doctors to make greater use of over-the-counter analgesics and non-pharmacological pain relief methods like physical and spinal manipulative therapies, movement retraining and electrical stimulation.In September, at a meeting in Trenton with more than a dozen pharmaceutical manufacturers to explore solutions to the crisis, the opioids commission’s chairman, Gov. Chris Christie of New Jersey, said developing nonaddictive drugs was a priority. Among the companies he hosted was Purdue Pharma. In late October New Jersey’s attorney general joined 10 other states in suing Purdue, owned by the Sackler family, alleging that Purdue deceptively marketed its drug OxyContin as safe for long-term use. “The attorney general makes those judgments, not the governor,” Mr. Christie said.Purdue executives call abuse-deterrent opioids, along with highly effective non-opioid pain products, the “holy grail” for the pharmaceutical industry.“Abuse-deterrent is a marketing term used to mislead,” says Dr. Adriane Fugh-Berman, a pharmacology and physiology professor at Georgetown University who directs PharmedOut, a group that monitors pharmaceutical industry marketing efforts. “At least half of prescribers think that abuse-deterrent means less addictive.” It does not; abuse-deterrent pills are simply harder to crush or alter for injection or snorting. “It doesn’t prevent you from swallowing them, which is the most common way of abusing opioids,” Dr. Fugh-Berman said.In an email, a Purdue spokesman cited support by the N.I.H., the Food and Drug Administration and the Drug Enforcement Administration for its approach, saying that along with other pharmaceutical companies and “stakeholders” the company believes that “abuse-deterrent technologies can be one of the many effective components of a multipart approach toward combating prescription opioid abuse, misuse and diversion.”Purdue says it supports the C.D.C. guidelines, and its chief executive, Craig Landau, said in Trenton, “I firmly believe there are too many opioids prescribed in this country.” True. And Purdue owns a large share of the responsibility for that.The N.I.H. began its public-private initiative this summer with a series of closed-door meetings with pharmaceutical companies and academics. An N.I.H. spokeswoman, Renate Myles, said the research would include work on non-pharmacological approaches, but “we need to develop new nonaddictive medications for pain. These medications can only be brought to market with the active participation of the pharmaceutical industry.”Purdue participated in the N.I.H. initiative. In June, in response to a call for public comments, J. David Haddox, the company’s vice president for policy, sent a  letter to the commission outlining Purdue’s proposed “policy options,” including recommending that the F.D.A. “convert” the opioid market to predominately abuse-deterrent formulations.The commission’s report includes important recommendations like expanding Medicaid coverage for inpatient treatment; expanding treatment with buprenorphine, methadone and other medications, including some still being developed; establishing a national curriculum and standards for opioid prescribers; and expanding an alternative system of drug courts that encourage treatment. Those should be the immediate priorities, not channeling money for more meds to drug companies, from the pockets of Americans whose pain was the industry’s gain.
Women Walked the Talk on Tuesday Back in January, when millions of fired-up women in pink pussy hats marched in Washington, Los Angeles, Chicago and scores of other places to protest the election of President Trump, Democrats wondered whether this could be the start of a movement, while Republicans hoped it was little more than a one-off explosion of rage.On Tuesday came an answer. Across the country, from City Council to lieutenant governors’ races, female Democratic candidates notched impressive election victories.“Everywhere I went, women who were activated by the loss last year, activated by the march in January, were out there knocking on doors. They got excited about these candidates, who were their neighbors,” says Stephanie Schriock, president of Emily’s List, a political action committee that recruits, supports and funds women who support abortion rights.During the 2015 and 2016 cycles, about 920 women approached Emily’s List for help. It was the biggest surge of interest in the organization’s three decades, and Ms. Schriock and her staff called it the “Hillary Bump.” Hillary Clinton’s loss left every Democratic organization, not least Emily’s List, reeling and exhausted. Then, in the first month after the election, about a thousand women called and emailed, seeking advice or money for a stab at elective office. A year on, about 20,000 women have contacted the group, eyeing races years into the future. “First-time candidates are the vast, vast majority,” Ms. Schriock says. “This is the next decade of women coming up.”Emily’s List endorsed 55 candidates nationwide for Tuesday’s races, and 33 of them won. So far, 13 of its 16 endorsed candidates for the Virginia House of Delegates have won (a couple of them may face runoffs.)That so many women landed on ballots this year was remarkable, but their skills and organizing talent, not their gender, proved most persuasive. Most who won had strong roots in the jurisdictions they now represent. Careers in medicine, education, law, community organizing and other fields equipped them with ideas for tackling issues voters cared most about: health care, guns, criminal justice, opioid addiction.In other words, they were the type of candidates who should run for Congress in 2018, if Democrats hope to make gains enough to put the brakes on Mr. Trump’s agenda.Sheila Oliver, New Jersey’s first female African-American lieutenant governor, was between 2010 and 2014 its first black female assembly speaker. In 2011 she parted with fellow Democrats to join Gov. Chris Christie in backing an overhaul of benefits for public workers, arguing that the move, while unpopular, was financially unavoidable, and it was better to have a seat at the table.Joyce Craig unseated an incumbent Republican, Ted Gatsas, to become the first female mayor in the 266-year history of Manchester, N.H. Ms. Craig was born in Manchester, where she served on the school board and as an alderman, authoring three city budgets. Yvonne Spicer, the new mayor of Framingham, Mass., is a political neophyte: A former schoolteacher, she is vice president of advocacy and educational partnerships at Boston’s Museum of Science. She beat John Stefanini, a longtime local pol, thanks to a desire among voters for a fresh face.In Virginia Democrats made historic gains up and down the ticket. In Prince William County, Democrats ousted five of the six Republicans representing the county in the House of Delegates. Among the winners were Elizabeth Guzman and Hala Ayala, who bested incumbent men to become Virginia’s first Latina delegates. Ms. Guzman has a background in social work, family and mental health services; she beat her Republican opponent, Scott Lingamfelter, with a strong door-to-door campaign that helped increase voter turnout by some 70 percent. Ms. Ayala, a 35-year resident of Prince William County, beat Rich Anderson, an incumbent whose seat Democrats didn’t even contest in 2015, delivering to Republicans one of the loudest wake-up calls of any of Tuesday’s races. She is a cybersecurity specialist at the Department of Homeland Security who helped organize the D.C. women’s march in January.“This is not slowing down,” Ms. Schriock says. “It’s a moment that we’ve never seen before, and we’ve been waiting for it for 32 years.”
Nothing to Cheer About in New York City Elections Before leaving the New York City elections behind, let’s note a few things the voters did not do.For starters, they did not necessarily give Mayor Bill de Blasio the mandate he repeatedly proclaimed after winning 66 percent of the vote on Tuesday. “Mandate” can be an abused word in American politics. Winners have a way of claiming it even without a majority or even a plurality (see: Bush, George W., and Trump, Donald).Granted, life belongs to those who show up, and Mr. de Blasio did splendidly among those who bothered going to the polls. All the same, three of four registered New York voters stayed home. Their silence, of itself, was an important statement. What many of them may have been saying is that they were displeased with this mayor, but also found the competition unpalatable.Mr. de Blasio might want to bear in mind that, give or take a percentage point, he won a mere 16 percent of the eligible electorate. That’s miles from brilliant.He was in a similar situation when he was first elected in 2013. Yet he acted then as if he had been crowned with a laurel wreath. Cockiness caused him to stumble more than necessary — among other things, by being foolishly late to appointments, excessively protective of dubious supporters and overly confident that he had national status. Maybe he has learned from those unforced errors and will enter his second term with confidence but also essential humility.Voters did not give Cyrus Vance Jr. a mandate, either. That may seem odd to say, given that Mr. Vance won a third term as Manhattan district attorney with more than 90 percent of ballots cast. But his was the only name on the ballot. Even so, 9.4 percent of the voters took the trouble to write in the names of others they preferred. (Their identities are not yet known, but we bet Preet Bharara, the United States attorney in Manhattan who was ousted by President Trump, got some support.)That 9.4 percent is extraordinarily high for write-in votes. It may reasonably be viewed as a rebuke of Mr. Vance for taking campaign money from lawyers who have dealings with his office, including those who in the past represented Harvey Weinstein and Ivanka Trump and Donald Trump Jr. The D.A. had to fend off questions about his impartiality in deciding not to pursue potential cases against Mr. Weinstein and the Trumps. Wisely, he says he will now review his fund-raising practices. All those write-in votes seem to be saying: Good idea.Finally, voters did not do well by women in New York politics. It wasn’t entirely their fault. In a city that’s overwhelmingly blue, relatively few female Democrats were on the ballot for City Council. Unless a further count changes the result in a Queens district, the new Council will have only 11 women among its 51 members — not quite 22 percent. That’s down from 18 women in 2009, and it reinforces a warning from the Council’s women’s caucus in August that “we face a systemic crisis of representation.”Perhaps equally important, after 12 years of that body’s speakership being held by women, the position seems destined to go to a man. Whoever he is must ensure that legislation does right by those who hold up half the sky.
Mr. Trump, Alone With His Lies in a Warming World President Trump is about to be a party of one.Earlier this week, Syria announced during an international conference in Bonn, Germany, that it would add its name to the historic 2015 Paris climate agreement, in which nearly 200 countries pledged their best efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions. This would leave the United States as the only country to have rejected the Paris deal, which Mr. Trump did in a Rose Garden rant on June 1 that was notable, even by Trumpian standards, for its dishonesty.Our advice to the delegates in Bonn is this: Ignore Mr. Trump, who seems, on this issue anyway, to be beyond persuasion. Honor your pledges. Get on with the talks, which are supposed to build on the Paris agreement by establishing benchmarks to measure how well you’re doing now and to lay the groundwork for even more ambitious targets in 2020. And hope, as we do, that efforts now underway by state and local governments and by private businesses to control emissions and move the United States to a cleaner energy future will make up for Mr. Trump’s indifference.That Mr. Trump wants out of Paris is only one measure of that indifference. A better measure is provided by policies that would move exactly in the wrong direction, policies aimed at overturning greenhouse gas regulations on power plants, repealing limits on methane emissions, weakening automobile efficiency standards, enlarging subsidies for coal plants and increasing oil drilling in the Arctic.Meanwhile, the hacks, industry careerists and global warming deniers he has appointed to run agencies responsible for climate policy are mostly a joke, the latest howler being Kathleen Hartnett White, a former Texas regulator whom Mr. Trump has named to run the White House Council on Environmental Quality. Mrs. White, who, if approved, would coordinate the administration’s environmental policy, has dismissed carbon dioxide as a “harmless trace gas” (but a useful “plant food”) and described as “paganism” the belief that man-made pollutants are warming the atmosphere.Outlandish though her views are, she’ll fit right in with the see-no-evil likes of Scott Pruitt, the administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency, who has scrubbed references to climate change from the agency’s website and barred its scientists from presenting reports on the subject; Rick Perry, the energy secretary with various oddball schemes to prop up coal plants; and all the others in high office who seem impervious to the real-time evidence of climate change — the wildfires, hurricanes and rising seas — as well as one authoritative study after another, the latest being a congressionally mandated National Climate Assessment that directly contradicts the administration’s view that humans are not responsible.We’ve been here before. In the George W. Bush administration, government officials doctored scientific reports, Vice President Dick Cheney stacked the top ranks of government with friends of the fossil fuel industry, and the president himself rejected a climate agreement adopted in 1997 in Kyoto, Japan, as “fatally flawed” because, he said, it would damage the economy.Mr. Bush made many of the same flawed arguments that Mr. Trump is making. He, too, fretted unnecessarily about federal overreach, while greatly underestimating the jobs and economic benefits a clean energy economy could bring. There was, however, one big difference. Amid all of Mr. Bush’s flimflam was a solid beef about the Kyoto agreement, namely, that while it committed the big industrial countries to making legally binding emissions reductions targets, it let developing countries — which then included China and India — off the hook.That complaint is no longer valid. One of the great achievements of the Paris accord, engineered in large part by President Barack Obama and his secretary of state, John Kerry, is that it ropes in everyone. Everyone, that is, except the one nation whose president bailed out.
Social Media and Democracy To the Editor:Re “Silicon Valley Can’t Destroy Democracy Without Our Help,” by Emily Parker (Op-Ed, Nov. 3):Social media may not create our bad habits, but it feeds them, and for one reason alone: money.Those who want to blame social media for the state of our democracy, as well as those who want to absolve the industry of blame, can’t ignore this essential point.Twitter, Google and Facebook are moneymaking enterprises, and they will do whatever they need to do to increase revenue. Helping or hurting democracy is incidental to that goal, as are improving or degrading our daily lives, or making the world a better or worse place.Social media may be only as harmful as we allow it to be, but as to whether social media is a force for good, as is so often claimed, I would ask this: How many people working in the industry would still be there if their jobs paid the same as, say, teaching or social work?Don’t ask about the intentions, aspirations or responsibilities of social media companies. Just follow the money. That’s the real story.STEVEN K. WOJCIKIEWICZPORTLAND, ORE.To the Editor:Emily Parker repeats industry ideas about individual responsibility and a faith in self-regulating systems. Manipulation, however, is a feature, not a bug, in many of the products and platforms that companies like Google and Facebook design. It is in fact the premise of the advertising businesses that account for some 90 percent of their revenue.Discreet changes to the underlying algorithms of these platforms have immense power over what is seen by users but, more important, they affect what goes unseen.But Silicon Valley corporations are willfully opaque in explaining how and where their algorithms work, what their objectives are and whom they are ultimately benefiting.To call these platforms “a mirror” fails to acknowledge the role that ideology plays in their construction and the power Big Tech has to determine the winners and losers in our society.JASON FRIEDMAN, BROOKLYNTo the Editor:Re “How to Fix Facebook? We Asked 9 Experts” (news article, Nov. 1):I found the suggested “fixes” to Facebook et al. unhelpful, focused on technical tweaks or appeals to somehow make us nicer or more knowledgeable.Facebook, Twitter and so forth are publishers of readers’ posts. The closest comparison to them is perhaps the letters column of The New York Times. You “curate” your letters page very carefully; so should they.It is no excuse to protest that they simply have too much “ink” to ever be able to do this. If you provide a huge platform, you should have a huge number of people looking after it. Like any publisher, they should be legally responsible for what they publish.ANTHONY J. WALTERS, CHICAGOTo the Editor:Getting the toothpaste back into the tube will not be easy. It’s been clear for some time now that social media is an instrument of chaos. It is the equivalent of millions of people standing on soapboxes on the street and shouting things at you. Many of the things are false, some are abusive and a lot of people hide behind curtains so you can’t know their true identities.As more and more Americans believe what they see on social media, they will not agree on what is real and what is fake.Democracy requires an informed and involved citizenry, and if the people in the country cannot even agree on what is actually happening, then how can our democracy survive?It may be too late, but at the very least Facebook and the others must limit their news feeds to only what comes from legitimate, acknowledged professional journalism sources.There will still be a lot of “alternate facts,” conspiracy theories and plain lies bandied about by both innocent and willful postings, and the sites certainly should provide fact-checks about any of these that gain currency. But to wean people, especially young people, away from social media and back to legitimate news sources may be an impossible task.MICHAEL SPIELMAN, BRONXTo the Editor:While reports of entities associated with the Russian government posting propagandistic material on social media outlets are undoubtedly true, those reports are neither surprising nor significant. It is no secret that outlets such as Facebook and Twitter are online gossip boards rather than journalistic or scholarly venues.What is surprising is that people would base important decisions on social media postings since verification of their accuracy is virtually impossible. Doing so is intellectually lazy at best.PAUL ROMERO, OAKLAND, CALIF.
Fanning Division Through Social Media To the Editor:Re “Congress Scolds Tech Companies Over Russia” (front page, Nov. 2):It is encouraging that many lawmakers expressed concern that the Kremlin attempted to “polarize the American voting public on issues like race, police abuse and religion,” and one hopes they can find a bipartisan way to move forward to safeguard future elections from foreign intervention. However, the Russians would not have been able to attempt this subversion had these issues not already been exploited, for many decades, by unscrupulous domestic entities in our politics and media.So, from the Willie Horton ad, to voter suppression efforts, to attempts by President Trump to vilify immigrants and attack pillars of American democracy such as the press and the judiciary, unhealthy divisions among Americans have been nurtured, magnified and exploited in order to win elections.Future Russian efforts may be thwarted best by a move toward decency in American politics. Regrettably, that is not an easily attainable goal.ALAN S. WEINER, YONKERSTo the Editor:It is clear from the materials released by Facebook and Twitter that, leading up to the 2016 election, Russia engaged in a campaign to divide the American voting public. The frustration of members of Congress conducting hearings into these efforts is certainly understandable. This country is clearly polarized, and the ads purchased by Kremlin-linked entities are troubling.More worrisome, however, is the divisive conduct during Donald Trump’s campaign and his continued efforts since taking office to fan the divisions in this country with his bullying racist, misogynistic, hate-encouraging tweets and rallies. This effort, mirroring the documented efforts of Russia and never before undertaken by a president, certainly appears to be collusion, stupidity, evidence of a deeply flawed character or a combination of these.No matter how one looks at it, though, it does not bode well for our country. It is time for Congress to turn its attention to the biggest threat to our democracy, and stand up for the values and standards that made America great before this administration came into power.ROBERT M. LEVINE, NEW YORKTo the Editor:Re “Internet Giants Pique Senators With Restraint” (front page, Nov. 1):After raking tech executives over the coals over Russia’s use of social media to influence the presidential campaign, Senator Lindsey Graham told reporters, “What we need to do is sit down and find ways to bring some of the controls we have on over-the-air broadcast to social media to protect the consumer.”As a scholar who studies First Amendment issues and the ways in which campaign finance laws have been used to stifle speech under the pretext of safeguarding democracy, I get very nervous when politicians discuss the need for “controls” over the media to “protect” us. The American people should be nervous, too.DAVID M. PRIMO, ROCHESTERThe writer is an associate professor of political science and business administration at the University of Rochester.
Choosing a Health Plan To the Editor:Re “Why So Many People Select the Wrong Health Plan,” by Richard H. Thaler (Economic View column, Nov. 5):There’s another reason people choose the wrong plan: H.R. departments aren’t knowledgeable about what plan employees should choose. When I joined my last employer and was faced with a confusing choice, the recommendation from H.R. was “choose the cheapest plan.”That wasn’t very helpful. So I narrowed my choice to two or three plans and emailed the provider with three doctor bills from the previous year. The difference in coverage was remarkable.Why not use an app that lets consumers enter some data — some previous bills, including prescription needs — to help employees make an informed decision? Surely that’s not too much to ask of employers and the health insurance market.FRED P. HOCHBERG, MIAMI BEACHThe writer is a Pritzker Fellow at the University of Chicago’s Institute of Politics.
N.Y.U. in Abu Dhabi To the Editor:Re “Journalism Teachers Boycott N.Y.U. in Abu Dhabi” (news article, Nov. 8):We are saddened that two faculty members could not come to teach at N.Y.U. Abu Dhabi, but we find the decision of the Journalism Institute disappointing, and antithetical to a fundamental mission of education in a fractured world.N.Y.U. Abu Dhabi has perhaps the most ethnically and religiously diverse student body in the world, reflecting the rich diversity of Abu Dhabi and the United Arab Emirates. We are home to more than 115 nationalities and people of all faiths — Sunni, Shiite, Christian, Jewish, Hindu — who embrace the values of mutual respect, understanding and inclusivity.Together we have built an elite global university, one that enjoys academic freedom and has produced eight Rhodes scholars in just four years, the highest number per student of any university in the world.As with any university, we do not control visa processes. But we can control our willingness to engage across borders and perspectives. For only through reaching out to understand others can we find and build the common sense of purpose and responsibility that the 21st century demands.AL BLOOMABU DHABI, UNITED ARAB EMIRATESThe writer is vice chancellor of N.Y.U. Abu Dhabi.
Tip Hotel Housekeepers? To the Editor: Re “Hotel Housekeepers Are Often Forgotten When Tips Are Given” (Itineraries column, Business Day, Oct. 31):I don’t know who set the expectation that hotel housekeepers should get tips instead of a living wage, but it is clear that guests aren’t buying it.We are only partly a “tipping society,” and that is under fire as well in restaurants. Provision of cleaning service is one of the things for which we pay high nightly charges.The employers of those who provide the service should pay the workers; it’s included in the bill. Don’t defend this exploitative practice; end it.SUSAN B. SHURIN, SAN DIEGOTo the Editor:Bravo for bringing your readers to the subject of tipping hotel housekeepers!Whenever I assigned Barbara Ehrenreich’s book “Nickel and Dimed” to my 11th-grade students as part of an English elective course on nonfiction, I always had students who were particularly moved by her stories on tipping hotel employees.Each semester, without fail, a handful of students told me that they had educated their parents to adopt the policy of leaving at least $2 per day of their stay.MAGGIE MILES, BARRINGTON, R.I.
We’re Sick of Racism, Literally Estifanos Zerai-Misgun, a black Brookline, Mass., police officer, pulled up in an unmarked car and greeted his superior, a white lieutenant. He wasn’t prepared for the response by the lieutenant, who said, as he gestured at the vehicle, “Who would put a black man behind one of these?”“I was shocked,” the officer later told a Boston news station about the experience. It was one of several derogatory racial comments he would hear on the job. It got so bad that he and a black colleague walked away from the force in 2015.The statements they’d heard were offensive and at times threatening in the moment, but they also made the men fear for their safety at work in a broader sense: The black officers weren’t sure that the white colleagues who were so willing to antagonize them would back them up if they were attacked on patrol.Even if Mr. Zerai-Misgun and his colleague were never directly physically harmed, the experience probably took a toll on their bodies. Perceptions of discrimination like those the officers experienced, as well as those that are less direct, may make us sick. And in the current political environment, with its high-profile expressions of racism, sexism, anti-Semitism, Islamophobia, homophobia and xenophobia, along with widely covered acts of hate and bigotry, countless Americans are at risk of this type of harm.Take Mr. Zerai-Misgun as an example. Chances are, in reaction to each instance of perceived discrimination, he had a stress response. His blood pressure increased, his heart rate went up, and his brain sent a signal to release cortisol. We know this because in 2008, researchers studied the effects of discrimination on blood pressure. Black and Latino study participants recorded their interactions with perceived racism and were outfitted with blood pressure monitors. The results were striking. While blood pressure normally dips at night, those who said they’d experienced racism were more likely to have blood pressure that did not — and this has been strongly linked to increased mortality. Over time, this high blood pressure hardens our arteries, increasing the risk of a clot forming in our hearts or brains.In 2015, researchers examined the effect of discrimination on cortisol, a natural hormone that helps the body deal with stressful situations. They followed black and white children in Maryland, measuring their perceived racial discrimination starting in seventh grade and for 20 years thereafter. When study participants were in their early 30s, researchers calculated their cortisol levels. Perceptions of discrimination consistently predicted slower declines in cortisol level throughout the day, which is associated with obesity, depression, decreased immune function, cancer and death.More than 700 studies on the link between discrimination and health have been published since 2000. This body of work establishes a connection between discrimination and physical and mental well-being. With all of these effects, it is no wonder that more than 100,000 black people die prematurely each year.These days, it’s nearly impossible to avoid headlines about things like the white nationalists and neo-Nazis who marched in Charlottesville, Va., and the recent spike in expressions of identity-based hate and harassment. Our commander in chief has said he wants to ban transgender people from our military and Muslim people from our nation, and he pardoned the former sheriff Joe Arpaio, in a sign of approval of Mr. Arpaio’s notorious racial profiling of Latinos in Arizona.In this climate, it makes sense that so many people report having personally experienced discrimination. In recent polls, about half of black respondents and a third of Hispanic respondents reported that they’d experienced unfair treatment because of their race in the past month. About half of Muslims reported discrimination in the past year. Even if one denies that these self-reported instances constituted actual discrimination, it is this perception of discrimination, in and of itself, that is linked to poor health.Worse, we know that racism doesn’t have to be experienced in person to affect our health — taking it in the form of news coverage is likely to have similar effects. After all, studies have shown that when television viewers observe scenes depicting racism, their blood pressure remains elevated long after the scenes are over. That means it’s reasonable to believe that every time we see a TV news segment or even get a notification on our phones about an event, statement or policy that we believe represents discrimination, our bodies pay the price.We shouldn’t need the specter of disease to denounce hatred in all its forms. Racism, bigotry, sexism, anti-Semitism, Islamophobia, homophobia, xenophobia, should have no place in our society. But the illness associated with discrimination adds injury to insult and magnifies the suffering of these times.
Can Donald Trump Save Roy Moore After All? DAPHNE, Ala. — Election season is always a tense time in Alabama, still shadowed as we are by George Wallace’s “segregation forever” antics and the dread among educated voters that our latest political star will humiliate the state yet again in the eyes of the nation.But not since the state sent William Lowndes Yancey, the original secessionist “fire eater,” to Congress in 1844 has the Alabama embarrassment syndrome reached a more acute stage than this past week, when Roy Moore, the homophobic front-runner in the United States Senate special election next month, was accused in The Washington Post of sexually molesting a 14-year-old girl after luring her to his remote home in the Alabama hills.Coming on the heels of Republican losses in Virginia on Tuesday, the Dec. 12 election in Alabama, which prides itself as a spiritual heartland of the Trump revolution, will be closely watched as a critical test of Mr. Trump’s political vitality. Even before the Moore allegations surfaced, his race against the Democratic nominee, Doug Jones, a celebrated prosecutor of Klan bombers, presented a potentially historic breach in Alabama’s long record of electing the candidate best known for radical showmanship.I decided to head to my home state to watch this race when Mr. Moore, a former state Supreme Court judge, won the Republican nomination in September over Luther Strange, a lumbering former state attorney general known as Big Luther who was endorsed by Mr. Trump and financed by the Senate majority leader, Mitch McConnell. Mr. Moore is a fundamentalist Christian who channels Reaganesque cowboy imagery and rides a horse named Sassy to his polling place. He crushed the charisma-challenged Mr. Strange, stunning elite Republicans, whose party is being consumed by class warfare between suburbanites and the rural white evangelicals who make up Mr. Trump’s base.Born in Birmingham in 1943, I found the contest an irresistible collision between national forces and Alabama’s political tradition. Elections here are performance art, with victory the reward for eye-catching clowns like Yancey, Cotton Tom Heflin in the 1920s, Jim Folsom in the 1940s and 1950s, Wallace in the 1960s, and now Mr. Moore.Nationally, Mr. Moore is known for ranting against gay people, but he is most celebrated at home for putting a granite monument of more than 5,000 pounds engraved with the Ten Commandments in the rotunda of the state judicial building and giving up his job as chief justice rather than obey a court order for its removal. In other words, he was cast perfectly to star in Alabama’s timeless election carnival of romanticized defiance and self-parody. My earliest surviving commentary on state politics was written in a letter in 1954 to my brother, then a soldier in Germany. I referred to a speech praising Bull Connor as “sickening.” He was subsequently re-elected to command the police and fire departments as Birmingham public safety commissioner, setting the stage for his fire hoses and police dogs in 1963.By 1965, as a reporter, I was writing in The Birmingham Post-Herald about Wallace’s segregation rallies. At The New York Times, I wrote a magazine piece about coming-of-age in Birmingham’s racial caldron. My 1977 book, “My Soul Is Rested,” was one of the first works to describe a man known as Dynamite Bob, a Connor associate and a Wallace acquaintance later revealed to be Robert Chambliss, as the leader of the Klan bomb squads.The tradition of rebelling against progress has left Alabama as the only state of the Old Confederacy never to have elected a senator or governor untainted by scandal who was willing to embrace modern attitudes on race, social justice and economic fairness. As I sat in the Macedonia Missionary Baptist Church in Daphne recently, I wondered if Mr. Jones, a steelworker’s son, could become the first campaigner to confront Alabamians’ mind-set of grievance.“We started in Alabama on the wrong side of history,” Mr. Jones said at the church. “Let’s not let those ghosts define us.” A day earlier, he had said: “Roy Moore represents a backward look. I’m tired of Alabama being an embarrassment around the country.”To my knowledge no other candidate had addressed the Alabama inferiority complex so directly as Mr. Jones, with the exception of Wallace, arguing in the opposite direction. In 1963, Wallace had journeyed to Harvard to assure an incredulous student audience that Alabama had “good race relations.” In that same speech, he blamed immoral Yankee soldiers for the presence of light-skinned black people in Alabama.Bob Zellner can attest firsthand to Wallace’s absurdities at Harvard’s Memorial Hall. Mr. Zellner, son of an Alabama Klansman, joined the Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee in 1961 and became its first white field secretary. At the Macedonia Missionary Baptist Church, Mr. Jones praised him from the pulpit as one of Alabama’s civil rights heroes. Over 50 years ago, an astonished Wallace had singled him out from the lectern at Harvard, having discovered that the Alabama rebel had followed him north. “Oh, I know you,” Wallace said, labeling Mr. Zellner a troublemaking jailbird for the question he put to Wallace about Alabama’s police brutality and murders of civil rights workers.“Alabama has always had a victim’s complex,” Mr. Zellner told me in an email. “Wallace was always ‘sending a message’ to the elite, pointy-headed rich people but he ended up turning one group of little people against other little people while helping the rich get richer. The worst available candidate, the most radical, would always get the most attention, the highest ratings.”I had never met Mr. Zellner until I sought him out in Daphne. There we were, two native sons of the Heart of Dixie, bound by hope as part of a standing-room-only crowd that Mr. Jones said represented “a shining Alabama the way it was always supposed to be.” The audience was about equally composed of black and white, young and old. How many of those whites were crossover Republicans? That’s the question that will determine whether Alabama sends its first truly New South figure to Washington.Like the national Republican Party, Alabama’s microcosmic version of Trump World was split along class lines. Even before the allegations about Mr. Moore’s predatory sexual history dropped, Mr. Jones seemed to be whittling Mr. Moore’s double-digit lead by assuring upper-class Republicans that their Confederate ancestors would recognize the “honor in compromise and civility.” His has been the most vigorous Democratic campaign in decades and, perhaps prophetically for Mr. Trump, the wealthiest Republican enclaves like Mountain Brook near Birmingham and Fairhope on Mobile Bay are covered with Jones lawn signs. Less affluent suburbs with highly educated professionals, like Vestavia Hills and Hoover near Birmingham, follow the pattern.I asked two prominent Fairhope residents about how their wealthy peers would vote. One, a liberal, said his neighbors on Mobile Bay’s fashionable Eastern Shore would claim to support Mr. Jones and then secretly vote for Mr. Moore, a man they would not invite to their homes.Another, a conservative, said “most of my Republican friends say they are going to vote for Jones” because Mr. Moore would shame the state. As to how local Republicans will finally split, he predicted half would vote for Mr. Jones and half might stay home. “That would be all right, too,” Mr. Jones told me later when I described the conversation.But things will be more complicated now that Mr. Moore has been wounded. Republican leaders in rural counties are urging voters to ignore allegations from nearly 40 years ago that don’t involve forcible rape. Alabama’s eccentric state auditor, Jim Zeigler, is even assuring evangelicals that they can stick with Mr. Moore in good faith because many women in the Bible, including Mary, the mother of Jesus, were married to older men.So the Alabama Republican Party is on the horns of another dilemma. Republican leaders in the Washington swamp are telling them to dump Mr. Moore. Local Trump supporters are telling them to ignore “fake news” and stand up for Alabama. Mr. Strange is lurking in the wings, feeding speculation that he could save his party’s respectability from Mr. Moore and Steve Bannon as a write-in candidate. But a split between Moore loyalists and Strange write-ins would hand the election to Mr. Jones, something that Mr. Trump can ill afford after the roughing up he took on Tuesday.Until now, the Moore campaign has believed that Alabama’s brand of glittery sideshows would, sooner or later, summon Mr. Trump’s inner showman and that he would sweep in to push Mr. Moore over the top. That would spoil the dream of Alabama’s embattled Democrats that Mr. Jones might pull off what would be the biggest political upset here since the populist “Big Jim” Folsom and his rustic Strawberry Pickers beat the “big mules” of U.S. Steel and the Black Belt plantations in 1946. (Mr. Trump himself has not spoken about the Moore allegations, but his press secretary said that Mr. Trump believes Mr. Moore should quit the race “if these allegations are true.”)For the next month, Mr. Moore’s disappearing inevitability, Mr. Jones’s hope-based insurgency and the strain between have and have-not Republicans will be debated every day in the state’s meat-and-three restaurants. Mr. Trump, given his own baggage and the freewheeling defiance of Alabama voters, would do well to watch cautiously. Mr. Zellner and I can attest that political theater can be tricky here. Alabama voters don’t mind being in the spotlight, no matter how bad it makes them look. They have that in common with the president.
The Lose-Lose Life of the Female Comedian When I was 21, I did my first comedy festival — sort of. I was performing for only five people. I wasn’t getting paid. But I had a badge that said “artist” on it, and just being near all of these people I had admired for so long made me feel important, like a “real” comedian.At the after party, I ran into one of the producers of the festival, a man in his early 30s. “Thank you so much for putting me on the festival!” I said to him, maybe a bit over-excited. “I just saw your roommate’s set about his breakup. I feel so bad for him.”“Oh, good!” he replied — and then asked if I would sleep with his friend. In a split second, I had been transformed from real comedian into groupie. When I said no thanks, he walked away.Often for male comedians, women are seen as part of the reward for success. Most were not exactly studs in their developing years and are thrilled that sex is part of what comes along with being recognized for the talents they are. Fair enough. But where does that leave us, their female peers and colleagues? (We now know where it leaves at least some of them: cringing in horror and uncertain how to proceed while a certain red-haired comedian gets naked in front of them.)My first approach to navigating this world was to try to desexualize myself — to be one of the guys, or if not quite that, at least something like a little sister. I didn’t want to be seen as a “female comedian,” so I tried to write jokes that didn’t appear to come from a distinctly female point of view. I wore hoodies and jeans on stage, which once prompted one of my male friends to say — while wearing a stained shirt and tattered jeans — “you know, Marcia, you could dress up every once in a while. Maybe brush your hair sometimes?” I took it as a joke. How could I have done otherwise? What could be worse as a female comedian than being seen as not having a sense of humor about these things?But after a while, it started to seem that this approach wasn’t serving me well. As a young comedian, I was desperate for a mentor. My friends who had begun to make money all got their start from someone with clout taking them on the road to open for them. Yet every man I talked to seemed either alarmingly flirtatious, uncomfortable interacting with women or determined to keep me at arm’s length. Some even seemed offended that I presented myself as sexually unavailable. (Once I told a male friend I considered him an older brother, and he told me that was “gross” and to “never say that again.”) Were these people bad men? No. Did it mean they would never give me a chance? No. Did any of them masturbate in front of me? Also no. Did I wish I could transform into a man so they would see me as a comic and not a potential sexual partner, or the type of woman who would make trouble? Yes.I tried to shrug it off. It didn’t matter if the men determined to see me a certain way didn’t like me, I thought. I always worked hard and would continue to. Anyone who thought differently was committed to misunderstanding me, and there was nothing I could do to control that.But the fact is you need to be liked in comedy to be given that initial shot. The sense that successful men would want to work with me for only one reason began to internalize as self-doubt about my own talent.What’s a young, funny girl with dreams to do? As comedians, we attempt to take our identities and turn them into careers in which others hear our truths, and relate to them as to their own. We aren’t bound by the rules of other professions, which demand decorum and a separation of who we are at work and who we are outside of it.For women in the business, the question of where to draw the line with our male colleagues can be complicated. We don’t want our reactions to instances of sexism or even sexual harassment to affect how we are viewed in the community. To speak out when we feel that men in comedy have crossed a line is to be a humorless downer — to say nothing is to be accused of betraying the sisterhood.To bring up that we work under different rules from our male colleagues is to disturb the irreverent, never-serious fantasy world that male comedians have created around themselves. It challenges their sense of themselves as people who are sharp and observant — how could they be missing something right in front of them? For some, it becomes, perhaps subconsciously, easier to not have women around in a professional capacity at all than it is to expect better behavior from creative men. Indifference toward our mistreatment is viewed as an unfortunate side effect to the necessary art of challenging taboos through laughter.I am fortunate enough to be pursuing comedy at a time when more and more women are coming onto the scene, and I’ve begun to see a concerted effort to not view one another as competition, but rather as a community — to not feel threatened by the new, talented woman in town, but instead to be excited, or to approach her with the kind of camaraderie that the men have always had with one another.With time, I’ve also become a more outspoken feminist. At 25, I started embracing my point of view as a woman, using feminist humor not only as a form of catharsis but also as a form of armoring myself. I’ve stopped evaluating my jokes based on how I think men will react to them.But still there are times when the little ways in which we are undermined as women feels like too much to conquer. There are instances where I feel more pressure than my male colleagues to be nice, always on or to “let things go.” I fear that I won’t be given the same room to fail. I fear I will be identified as a complainer for speaking my mind about the problems I see in the community around me. But I keep showing up, and I will continue to do so. Hopefully, after this week, at the very least there will be fewer unexpected penises.
Saudi Arabia Comes for Hezbollah Lebanon was stunned on Nov. 4 when its prime minister, Saad Hariri, speaking from Saudi Arabia, delivered a halting resignation speech. Mr. Hariri said he left Beirut because he feared assassination. He placed the blame for his long-distance resignation on Iran and its main ally in Lebanon, Hezbollah.In the days since, Saudi Arabia has accused Hezbollah of plotting against the kingdom and ordered Saudi citizens to leave Lebanon. Threats from top Saudi officials are causing new turmoil in a tiny country with complicated sectarian politics, failed power-sharing arrangements and a long history of foreign meddling.Since the Arab uprisings in 2011, Lebanon has largely avoided the conflicts sweeping the Middle East. Even the war that is raging in Syria, Lebanon’s much larger neighbor, has generally left the country unscathed. That calm is now threatened as the Trump administration and Saudi Arabia and its Sunni Arab allies set their sights on Hezbollah and its patron, Iran.Why would Saudi leaders risk a new conflagration? They see a way to make common cause with Washington by targeting Hezbollah, one of Iran’s most effective allies. President Trump has consistently singled out Iran’s support for Hezbollah and other groups that Washington considers terrorist organizations.But Saudi Arabia is already overstretched. Its war against Houthi rebels in Yemen drags on, and the diplomatic dispute with Qatar remains in a stalemate, too. If Saudi leaders think they can score an easy victory in Lebanon against Hezbollah, it will be another misjudgment that adds to a dangerous and combustible moment in the Middle East.Hezbollah was part of Lebanon’s national unity government formed in late 2016 with Mr. Hariri as the prime minister. Iran and Saudi Arabia — which views itself as the protector of Lebanon’s Sunni community — blessed the power-sharing agreement.Hezbollah agreed to the deal because it wanted to avoid conflict in Lebanon and to direct its energy toward the Syrian war, where it fights alongside the government of President Bashar al-Assad. As a leader with strong ties to both the Sunni Arab states and the West, Mr. Hariri provided Hezbollah with political cover as it continued to dominate Lebanon.The militia’s important role in the fighting in Syria has made it more powerful than ever. But Mr. Hariri’s resignation exposes Hezbollah and its allies in the Lebanese government to harsher United States sanctions, a potential war with Israel or even an economic blockade led by Saudi Arabia and its Sunni Arab allies, similar to the one imposed on Qatar.Hezbollah, which was founded in the 1980s during a civil war and an Israeli invasion, is now the country’s dominant political and military force. It is unrealistic of Saudi leaders and the Trump administration to expect that it can be supplanted by a popular Lebanese groundswell against it or removed by a foreign military force without causing catastrophic damage to Lebanon.Saudi Arabia’s new ruler, King Salman, and his son and designated heir, Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman, are pursuing a far more aggressive foreign policy than previous Saudi rulers. They have been bolstered in this by Mr. Trump’s support for the kingdom in its conflict with Iran. Now that Iran’s ally, Mr. Assad, has essentially won the civil war in Syria, Saudi Arabia is looking to contain Iranian influence elsewhere. Lebanon is a tempting target.The Saudis have also been emboldened by their recent outreach to Shiite factions in Iraq, especially the nationalist cleric Moktada al-Sadr, who visited the kingdom in July and met with Prince Mohammed. The Saudis are hoping to cultivate Mr. Sadr and other Shiite leaders who can be a counterweight to Iranian influence in Iraq, especially ahead of parliamentary elections next year.But the Saudis won’t be able to find a Sadr in Lebanon, a political figure who can offer a serious alternative to Hezbollah and Iranian influence in the Shiite community.Since the end of Lebanon’s civil war in 1990, Hezbollah has entrenched itself in the largely Shiite areas of southern Beirut and southern Lebanon. With Iranian support, it opened schools and hospitals, provided business loans and fielded candidates for parliamentary elections. It also extended its military capability, deploying thousands of missiles along the border with Israel.In February 2005, Rafik Hariri, a billionaire construction tycoon and Lebanon’s former prime minister, was assassinated in a bombing in Beirut. His death deprived Lebanon of its most prominent Sunni leader — and Saudi Arabia lost its most important Lebanese ally. After Mr. Hariri’s death, his son Saad took over his father’s Saudi-based construction empire and the Sunni political mantle in Lebanon.In the summer of 2006, Hezbollah fought a monthlong war with Israel, which ended in a draw and increased the militia’s popularity across the Muslim world. But by early 2011, Hezbollah’s standing began to wane after a United Nations tribunal indicted several of its members for Mr. Hariri’s assassination.If Mr. Hariri’s killing was a first salvo of the proxy war between Iran and Saudi Arabia in Lebanon, subsequent battles also did not go Riyadh’s way.In May 2008, Hezbollah broke a post-civil-war vow not to turn its weapons against other Lebanese factions. At the time, Lebanon was mired in a political stalemate between a United States- and Saudi-backed government — which included Sunni, Christian and Druze parties — and Hezbollah and its allies.Hezbollah was infuriated by a government decision that outlawed its underground fiber-optic communication network, which was critical to its success during its 2006 war with Israel. Hezbollah’s leaders sent hundreds of fighters into largely Sunni neighborhoods of West Beirut. They overpowered Sunni militiamen and seized the offices and media outlets of political rivals, including Mr. Hariri.Hezbollah’s success so alarmed the Sunni Arab states that Saudi Arabia toyed with the idea of sending an Arab military force to intervene in Lebanon. Prince Saud al-Faisal, the Saudi foreign minister at the time, asked a visiting American diplomat whether the United States and NATO could provide equipment, logistics and “naval and air cover” to assist such an army, according to a classified American diplomatic cable disclosed by WikiLeaks. Prince Faisal warned Washington that Hezbollah’s actions would lead to an “Iranian takeover of all Lebanon.”Years later, Saudi leaders organized a similar force to wage their war in Yemen, against Houthi rebels allied with Iran. A day after Mr. Hariri’s resignation, the front page of a Saudi-owned pan-Arab newspaper declared, “Hariri departs Hezbollah’s republic.” The subtext was clear: Without its most prominent Sunni leader, Lebanon is under Hezbollah’s full control — and it will be fair game in the latest battle with Iran.
God, Jesus and Vietnam I arrived in Vietnam in early February 1967 and was assigned to First Battalion, First Marines. After falling away from the church in my midteens, I’d had a religious reawakening at Parris Island, where I found myself much in need of God’s mercy because we got none from our drill instructors. I took my renewed religious fervor to Vietnam with me, and soon got to know our battalion chaplain, a Jesuit priest, pretty well.Many months later, in November, the battalion was on an operation near the DMZ. Night was approaching, and I was digging in when Father Lyons came by. The conversation, which I still remember vividly, went something like this:“Hello, Corporal Ehrhart. How’s it going?”“Not bad, Father,” I said. “Can’t complain.”“You know, Corporal, I don’t mean to put you on the spot, but I do miss the talks we used to have when you first got here. You were more faithful than my Catholic boys,” he said with a laugh.“Things change, Father.”“What happened, Corporal Ehrhart? What’s wrong?”“What’s wrong, Father? Take a look around. And you’re asking me what’s wrong? Look, I’m sorry, sir. I’d rather not get into it.”“You can talk to me, son. That’s what I’m here for.”“Man to man?”“Of course. Making me an officer wasn’t my idea.”“Father, when I enlisted, I thought I was doing the right thing. I thought I was doing right by my country — gonna help the Vietnamese, and all like that. I really believed it. I guess that sounds pretty corny, doesn’t it?”“Not at all, son. We all want to believe we’re doing the right thing.”“Well, I don’t believe it anymore. I don’t know what I believe, but I sure don’t believe that. We’re not doing anybody any good around here, and any fool can see that. Well, anyway, the thing is, there I’d be, going to chapel every week and praying to God to forgive what I’m doing, knowing all the time I was just gonna go out and do more of the same thing the next day. Father, any God worth his salt isn’t gonna buy that for a minute. It got to where I could almost hear him up there while I was praying: ‘Don’t hand me this crap again, Ehrhart. Just don’t bother me unless you’re serious.’ After awhile, every time I’d try to pray, there’d be that Voice.”“God’s always ready to listen, son. He’s always been ready to comfort people like us, and he still is. I really don’t mean to preach a sermon at you, but you mustn’t let your own fear keep you from him.”“Father, that’s not right. You can’t just say you’re sorry, and then go out and deliberately keep doing the same stuff over and over again. You got no business telling guys like me it’s O.K. to deal like that.”“I’m not saying it’s O.K., Corporal Ehrhart, and I never have. I can’t presume to judge men. But you boys are as much a part of Jesus’ flock as anybody else. Maybe you’re the part he cares about most. Jesus broke bread with publicans and sinners, didn’t he? Can I do any less, and still be a priest?”“Well, if you’re just here to look after us sheep, how come you got that?” I pointed to the M-16 Father Lyons held.He looked down at the weapon and shook his head slowly. “I’d be happy not to have to carry one of these, and I hope I never have to use it,” he said, “but I’m afraid the VC don’t make exceptions for Catholic priests.”“I understand that, sir, but that’s the point. You’ve got an excuse. Colonel Gravel’s got an excuse. General Westmoreland’s got an excuse. President Johnson’s got an excuse. I’m up to my earlobes in everybody’s excuses. Either you’re a Christian, or you’re not a Christian. There’s nothing ambiguous about ‘Thou shalt not kill.’ ”“You’re right, of course,” said Father Lyons. “But it’s just not that simple. Nobody’s perfect, son. We’re all human beings. God made us in his image, and he knows we’re going to fall. That’s what Jesus Christ is all about.”“That just don’t get it, Father. These guys believe in you. They trust you. You tell ’em they’re gonna be forgiven, and they just keep praying and shooting and praying and shooting, and thinking they’re gonna go to heaven. You think God gives a big rat’s ass about Communism and democracy and domino theories? I just hope to high heaven there ain’t any God, because we’re all in a whole lot of trouble if there is.”“Corporal Ehrhart, have you ever thought about applying for a discharge as a conscientious objector?”“Oh, no. No way. End up in Portsmouth Naval Prison for 20 years? I’ve got enough trouble as it is. I’ve got four more months to go in this cesspool, and then I’m outta here.”“But if you’re really this troubled, maybe I can help you. I can talk to Colonel Gravel.”“Listen, Father, you said I could talk straight with you, so I am. But this is just between you and me, and I’m trusting you to keep it to yourself. I’ve got a good record, and I want to keep it that way. It’s gonna be hard enough to live with myself for the rest of my life. And then get drummed out of the service on top of that? I’m not gonna hang that albatross around my neck. No, sir.”Father Lyons sighed deeply. “Well, that’s your decision,” he said. “If you change your mind, let me know. But think about this, will you? Don’t let what men do in God’s name turn you away from God’s love. Just because we fail to live up to what God asks of us doesn’t mean he won’t forgive us. It’s God’s world, after all. He knows what we’re up against.”“Well, that’s a heck of a way to send somebody to sea, isn’t it, sir? Knock a hole in the bottom of the lifeboat, and then tell ’em, ‘Do the best you can, folks. Good luck.’ ”“I’m afraid I just can’t seem to find the right things to say to you, can I?”“I guess not, sir. I’m sorry. Really — it’s nothing personal. You’re a nice man, Father.”“I’m sorry, too, son,” said Father Lyons, his voice sounding very tired and lonely. “I just don’t have all the answers. God works in mysterious ways sometimes, I suppose. Let me know if you change your mind.”But I did not change my mind. At that stage of my life, C.O. didn’t mean “conscientious objector.” It was only the first two letters of “coward.”Later on that same operation, I lost my dog tags. When we got back to battalion, I had the company clerk make me a new set. On the line for religion, which originally read “UCC” for United Church of Christ, I had him put “None.”I still have those dog tags. But I’ve spent 50 years wondering if and how my life would be different if I had had the courage to take Father Lyons up on his offer.
Travis Mills Will Never Quit Belgrade, Me. — It was a golden day in late summer, and there in my town’s general store stood a dozen veterans missing arms and legs. Some of them wore high-tech prostheses that made them look superhuman.I wanted to throw my arms around them. I wanted to bake them pizzas. Instead, I told myself my silence was a form of respect. But it was really that I just didn’t have the words.These vets would tell you they’re not superhuman. “I don’t think the challenges in my life are any greater than anyone else’s,” Travis Mills says. “I’m just thankful I was able to serve my country.”But Mr. Mills, who served with the 82nd Airborne Division, was the reason the wounded veterans were here in my hometown, Belgrade, Me., in the first place.On April 10, 2012, during his third tour of duty in Afghanistan, Mr. Mills placed his backpack on the ground. A mine lay just below the surface. “The backpack touching the dirt was all it took,” he says. “Such a simple act of war. My world erupted. I saw a flash of flame and heard a huge ka-boom.”Only five soldiers in the Iraq and Afghanistan wars have survived the loss of both arms and legs. Mr. Mills is one of them.His journey back from that day tells the story not only of one man returning to life. It’s also a story of how a small town has been transformed, and with it, given new hope to wounded soldiers and their families.Maybe Mr. Mills is already on your radar. His autobiography, “As Tough as They Come,” was a best seller. A movie is in the works, with Adam Driver as Mr. Mills and Sylvester Stallone as his unsinkable father-in-law. A documentary, “Travis: A Soldier’s Story,” is available on Netflix.I first met Mr. Mills at, of all places, a writers’ conference in California. Even though we come from the same small town, and we’re both authors, we’d never met before.He told me about his project to transform an old estate into a place where wounded veterans and their families can gather, free of charge, for a week of community and conversation on the shores of a lake in Maine. Once, he said with a luminous grin, it had been owned by Elizabeth Arden.Everyone in town knows about the old Arden estate. From the 1930s to the 1970s it was called the Maine Chance resort, not only the glamorous home of the cosmetics magnate but a kind of Betty Ford Center of its day, a place where society ladies and Hollywood celebrities, among others, could escape to for the summer to dry out. Judy Garland stayed there. So did Mamie Eisenhower. The elegant mansion on the hill over the lake was once an essential part of the town’s economy, not to mention an essential part of its mythology.But the Maine Chance fell into disrepair. Its tattered shell overlooked Arden Cove on Long Pond. A dirt path leading into the woods was still marked “Elizabeth Arden Road” on a few old maps, but it was virtually impassable except by mountain bike or A.T.V.On a sunny Saturday in October, the new Travis Mills Foundation center for wounded veterans held an open house, and the elegant old grounds were full of vets and their families.“Look, the V.A. does the best it can,” a Vietnam-era mess sergeant told me, as we waited in line to have our photographs taken with Mr. Mills. “But it stays with you forever, once you’ve served. You’re never the same. People need places like this, places where vets can feel like they’re not alone.”Now, in rooms once graced by celebrities of yesteryear like Lilian Gish and Ava Gardner and Edna Ferber, wounded veterans and their families have that place. It has been made possible because of the support from donors, including the Barbara Bush Foundation, Wayfair and New Balance — but most of all because of the charisma of Mr. Mills.I left the open house wearing a bracelet imprinted with Mr. Mills’s mantra: “Never Give Up, Never Quit.” Later, I took a bike ride through the woods along the old Elizabeth Arden Road. As I headed deeper and deeper into the woods, the road deteriorated until it wasn’t much more than a gnarled footpath over the shoulders of McGaffey Mountain.At one particularly difficult hill, I got off of my bike and began walking it. Until I met Mr. Mills, I hadn’t given much thought to the fact that I have two arms and two legs, that no one has ever tried to kill me, that there are millions of Americans who have given their lives to make my life possible. But I was thinking about it now.And then, just off to one side of the path, I saw a single grave, surrounded by a beaten split-rail fence. I put my bike down and walked into the woods to look at it.“John Rogers,” it said. Sgt. Continental Line. Revolutionary War. 1756-1849. A small American flag fluttered by the stone.I had been so certain that I was all alone on the old Elizabeth Arden Road. But there, in the heart of the deep Maine forest, was this well-tended grave. Someone had been here before me, and remembered.
Yard Rage: The Rand Paul Assault When Senator Rand Paul, Republican of Kentucky, was tackled by a neighbor while riding his lawn mower this month, the initial assumption was that it was about politics. Not necessarily. It was more likely about yard waste, the developer of the gated community where the neighbors live told The Louisville Courier-Journal.“This has been festering for years,” he said. His best guess was that Senator Paul, a libertarian and believer in property rights, provoked the incident by blowing lawn trimmings from his yard into that of his alleged assailant, Rene Boucher. Errant tree branches may have also been at the root of things — with no pun intended.Of course, in this don’t-tread-on-me society, landscaping disputes between neighbors are as common as dandelions. Too much fertilizer, too little grass-cutting and new trees blocking sunlight can all light a fuse. Even too many vines growing on the wrong side of a fence can offend. Not to mention noise, which may have attributed to the attack on the senator, given his frequent mower riding. In 2015, he told Us Weekly that he found it therapeutic.In my years as a weekend homeowner on Long Island, I’ve alienated a beloved neighbor on one side by having her yew tree trimmed to keep it from covering my chimney. She had agreed to it, but the man we hired lopped off too much.Then, when my other neighbor cut back my pine branches hanging over her driveway, I dragged a mass of dying bamboo from a trash pile on someone’s curb to shield my view of her floodlight and car. The animosity I caused with my guerrilla landscaping only ended when I removed the offending wall of organic detritus and she invested in a tasteful latticed fence to stop my whining.At least she didn’t back her car into me. That’s what a landscaper in 1997 claimed Martha Stewart did when she discovered him erecting an illegal fence for Harry Macklowe next to her Hamptons property. She had already been feuding with Mr. Macklowe, a real estate magnate, winning a ruling from the village zoning board when she accused him of trying to “suburbanize the area with inappropriate dark greenery.” He put in more dark greenery anyway, and she managed to rip several plants out before his injunction stopped her. The lawsuits went on for years.Another celebrity yard war involved Julie Newmar, who, The Los Angeles Times reported in 2004, had once egged the house of Jim Belushi. Among her biggest gripes: Additions to his home kept the sunlight from her garden.If good fences make good neighbors, then entitlement, it seems, makes bad ones.Blocking a view is another cause of arboreal animosity. Larry Ellison of Oracle was in the news in 2011 for suing the San Francisco neighbors below him for letting their privacy trees grow despite the city’s Tree Dispute Resolution Ordinance guidelines. They eventually settled, but not before The Wall Street Journal jumped into the media birdbath and called it a “full-blown spectacle.”More recently, on Kauai, Hawaii, Mark Zuckerberg rankled locals by building a legal wall that blocked an ocean view from the road and, some even claimed, a breeze. One neighbor told the local paper that the wall was “oppressive.” Others made unfair comparisons with the president’s proposed wall for Mexico.Later, when Mr. Zuckerberg had to file a lawsuit to sort out ancestral land rights issues on the 700-acre property, more neighbors took offense and one local elected official told the press, “You don’t initiate conversation by filing a lawsuit.”But you also don’t initiate conversation by assaulting a neighbor. Senator Paul has six broken ribs and an injured lung.Nearly a week after the incident, with his assailant out of jail on a $7,500 bond, the reason for the attack remains anyone’s guess.My own is that it’s not just about a yard or politics.“Often this kind of dispute is more about control than anything else,” said Barri Bonapart, a Bay Area lawyer who specializes in tree law and who once had to stop a client in a view war from buying a gun. “If you’ve been fired from your job, have family conflicts or a serious health issue, a common response is to fixate on things you believe you can do something about, even if that turns out to be delusional.” She also thinks conflict can be an opportunity to find a solution.But on Thursday, the assailant, a retired anesthesiologist, pleaded not guilty to misdemeanor assault charges and otherwise remained, well, mum.His lawyer insisted the attack wasn’t political and was over trivial matters. Jim Skaggs, the developer who sold both men their homes, agreed and noted that the senator dislikes the community’s property rules. A Republican strategist said to CNN that coastal elites fail to understand “the leaf-blower wars that take place all across Middle America.”Is there a lesson in this bizarre story? One might be to watch your back this month while blowing your leaves. Also watch where you’re blowing them.
How Elite Colleges Hide Their Cash Last week, Republicans in Congress proposed a tax on wealthy private-college endowments as part of their make-or-break tax bill. The new tax, if passed, would bring in an estimated $3 billion from 2018 to 2027.University leaders were shocked. Had Republicans in Washington forgotten their own Ivy League roots? Or was the proposal just for show — red meat for a conservative base that resents cultural liberalism in academia? It seems improbable, after all, that the narrowly divided Senate would actually pass a tax on endowments.But it would be a mistake to dismiss this move as just partisan pandering. Democrats have also proposed state-level endowment taxes in Connecticut and Massachusetts, homes to some of the nation’s wealthiest schools.It’s an increasingly bipartisan view that elite private colleges are islands of wealth. And there’s good reason for that: It’s true.An investigative report this week by The New York Times, based on a leak of offshore financial records known as the Paradise Papers, revealed that dozens of wealthy college endowments use Caribbean islands as offshore tax havens for their investments.Endowments are already tax exempt, but they have increasingly worked with private equity and hedge funds that borrow additional money to invest. Endowments pay taxes on the money they earn that way because it is not related to their educational mission — unless they hide that money with the help of offshore investment corporations.Private colleges and universities have increased their endowments spectacularly through aggressive fund-raising and these kinds of investment and tax-avoidance techniques. Stanford University, one of the schools found to use offshoring, increased its endowment  to $18 billion in 2012 from $2 billion in 1977. Harvard’s endowment grew to $32 billion (in inflation-adjusted dollars) from $6 billion during the same period.The problem with enormous endowment growth is that private institutions have not used the resource boom to provide greater benefits to the public. Stanford is a case in point. Despite having increased its endowment tenfold, Stanford still only enrolls about 1,600 new freshmen every year — approximately the same number of new freshmen it enrolled annually in the 1970s. As a result, Stanford now spends about $55,000 each year on every full-time student, just from its endowment. That’s a ninefold increase since the 1970s after adjusting for inflation.Harvard, Princeton and Yale all spend even greater sums per student from their endowments.It’s true that a number of these wealthy universities have begun to increase the generosity of undergraduate financial aid, essentially offering free college, room and board to the lowest-income students. That’s a good thing, but most qualified low-income students receive zero financial aid from the wealthiest colleges because they are never admitted. According to the Stanford economist Raj Chetty, the top 38 private colleges today enroll more students from the top 1 percent of the nation’s income spectrum than from the bottom 60 percent. Basically, what wealthy colleges end up spending on low-income students is a drop in the bucket compared with what they could be doing.America’s top public universities, on the other hand, have substantially increased their enrollments since the 1970s despite shrinking state funding. They also tend to enroll low-income students at much higher rates. The University of California, Berkeley, enrolls more low-income students than the entire Ivy League.It would be easier to turn a blind eye to the increasingly lavish exclusiveness of the Ivies if it didn’t come at such great public expense. Just three tax breaks related to endowments now come at a cost of nearly $20 billion in reduced federal tax revenue annually. If that $20 billion was captured as federal revenue instead, it would provide nearly enough funds to double the federal Pell Grant program for low-income students.The answer is not necessarily to tax endowments, though they have only been fully tax exempt since 1984. But if wealthy private colleges want their endowments to remain tax exempt, they need to start providing much greater public benefits. The most obvious place to begin is a substantial increase in undergraduate enrollment, especially of underrepresented students.There has been a marked increase in anxiety about the cost and value of a college degree. Wealthy colleges could help assuage that by enrolling many more students from other walks of life. They can certainly afford to do so.
On the Paradise Papers Abandon ship.
Socrates in the Age of Trump ATHENS — When Socrates was condemned to death by a court of his fellow Athenians in 399 B.C., his friends arranged his escape. They had the money to bribe the prison’s guards and understood that the authorities would be quite happy to see the troublesome philosopher flee into exile.All that was needed was that Socrates agree. He refused, arguing that he had lived by the law and would not violate it now.My father told me this story when I was too young to understand. All I remembered — maybe it was all that mattered — was that a famous man chose to die because obeying the law was more important than living. Reading Socrates in the age of Trump adds another dimension to the story: our responsibility for the personal choices that affect society.President Trump is roughly the same age as Socrates when he died (70) and is just as stubborn. There ends any resemblance between the American president and the Athenian gadfly.Socrates lived his life as an endless examination of what is good and true and right, seeking neither office nor wealth; Mr. Trump is a know-it-all demagogue who treats the highest office as his right. Socrates served his city as a soldier in war when called upon; Mr. Trump played the system — avoiding military service, exploiting legal loopholes and connections, amassing riches. Socrates said he pursued knowledge because he knew nothing, and that people had to learn from experts, not follow the crowd. Mr. Trump proclaims himself the best at everything and gives the crowd what it wants, in order to make it his. He belittles experts, even his own country’s foreign service. “I’m the only one that matters,” he declares.In arguing for his life before a jury of 501 of his fellow citizens, Socrates rejected the charges of corrupting Athens’s youth and of creating new gods. But he refused to make a plea for exile, saying that rather than punish him the city should reward him for asking questions. When the death sentence was handed down, he accepted his fate calmly. He had chosen to live in Athens and this meant that he would respect its laws even when they worked against him, he said.The United States president calls his country’s judiciary “a laughingstock.” He rails against any check on his authority, disagreeing with investigations into his associates, demanding the prosecution of political rivals. His lack of interest in the Constitution that he is sworn to uphold is breathtaking.Socrates’ rational arguments should have easily refuted the charges against him, but to him this was secondary to the fact that he had been tried and sentenced according to the law. The process did not allow for an appeal.“Both in war and in courts and everywhere else, one must obey the commands of one’s city and country, or persuade it as to the nature of justice,” Socrates tells his friend Crito, in a dialogue written by Plato, another of his friends and pupils. The law, Socrates argues, provides two alternatives: Citizens can either use persuasion to change it, or they must do as it says.Agreeing with laws only when they suit us is not an option. By choosing to live in Athens and to raise children there, Socrates had shown in both words and deeds that he agreed to live in accordance with its laws. Violating them now would be a rejection of all that he had said and done throughout his life. Clinging to life, in other words, would make living worthless.Unable to best Socrates’ arguments, his friends are obliged to agree with him. All they can do is be with him in the hours before he is given the poison that will kill him. Socrates uses the time to discuss how one should live, because, as he said at his trial, “the unexamined life is not worth living.”At the time of Socrates’ trial, Athens was a dangerous place for principled citizens. Just five years earlier, the city lost an almost three-decade war with its great rival, Sparta, and a harsh oligarchy had been imposed. During their reign of terror, the oligarchs ordered Socrates and four others to arrest a fellow citizen so that he might be executed. The philosopher refused, and escaped death only because the oligarchy collapsed when exiled democrats rebelled.The democracy that followed was unsettled, vindictive and suspicious of new ideas. Socrates had been a figure for debate for decades. In 423 B.C., in “The Clouds,” the comic playwright Aristophanes lampooned him as making wrong appear right — inspiring the later charges that cost him his life. Furthermore, Socrates had also once taught a younger man, Critias, who became one of the oligarchy’s leaders, and some saw this as a reason to prosecute him. Socrates’ trial and execution would prove an indelible blot on democracy’s legacy, but other leading intellectuals, too, were prosecuted, including the natural philosopher Anaxagoras, who left the city after being accused of “impiety.”Directing his most probing and provocative questions against the pompous and self-righteous, sharing his thoughts with rich and poor, Socrates was the quintessential anti-populist. This was bound to gain him enemies from all quarters. He knew the risks. But having seen no reason to bow to the oligarchs, he would not compromise with the many, either.“No man will survive who genuinely opposes you or any other crowd and prevents the occurrence of many unjust and illegal happenings in the city,” he told his prosecutors and jury. “It is not difficult to avoid death, gentlemen; it is much more difficult to avoid wickedness, for it runs much faster than death.”In 406 B.C., after a naval battle that was the last Athenian victory in the war with Sparta, the Athenians tried their own generals for not picking up survivors and their sailors’ corpses (a violent storm had prevented this). Socrates, who was serving on the citizens assembly presiding committee, was the only member to vote against trying all the men as a body. Of the generals, all six who had chosen to return to Athens were executed in a verdict that, along with Socrates’, was later seen as regrettable.Mr. Trump, on the other hand, rode a wave of nationalistic populism to power. He presented himself as a man of the people not through shared struggles but in a communion of simplistic denunciations of anyone outside his supporters’ circle. His common touch was not humility, but pandering to prejudice.Choosing death before dishonor is not unique to one person, one era or one society. But when a person responsible to no one but himself sees the law as more important than himself, even when it has been unjust, we must ask: Should not the leader of the world’s most powerful nation hold himself to a similar standard?Ephemeral tweet storms and voracious news cycles may cause us to forget that history judges its protagonists on what they contributed to their society. Socrates’ shameful murder is eclipsed by the majesty of his devotion to the institutions of the city that sentenced him to death. This, in turn, reflects well on his city — that it should have such a citizen. Donald Trump’s disdain for truth and institutions, his chaotic words and deeds, do not augur well for his country or his legacy. What will parents tell their children about him?
The Vacuity of the Vice President With Donald Trump in Asia plugging his golf resort and telling his hosts “I never knew we had so many countries,” the leaderless United States has had a week to try out President Mike Pence. Make that Pastor Pence.It’s not a problem that Pence is a sycophant in chief, perhaps the greatest bootlicker to take up residence at the Naval Observatory. His little stunt, on Trump’s orders, of flying halfway across the country to walk out on people exercising their First Amendment rights at a football game cost taxpayers a pile. So. Veeps are expected to be slavish.Nor am I overly troubled that Pence reportedly calls his wife Mother or refuses to dine with a woman alone who is not Mom. (Angela Merkel, bring your chaperone.) Ronald Reagan called his wife Mommy.The big problem with Pence is the vast empty space between his ears and the articulation of thoughts formed in that space. His biblical bromides make Ned Flanders of “The Simpsons” sound like Voltaire. And because his mind is closed to rational thought outside his theocratic construct, everything he says comes out like platitudinous mush.Take the last week. (Please.) At least, take the part that started on Sunday with a man using a semiautomatic rifle to murder eight children among his 25 victims at a church in Texas. This outrage should stir conscience-stricken leaders to do something — anything — to ensure that it never happens again.Pence’s response? “We grieve with you and stand with resolve against evil,” he said. I’ll grant him the grieving part. But the resolve has translated into squat. His best solution to the scourge of mass killings, as he told heartbroken families in Texas, is more prayer.Not even six weeks ago, Pence had a similar answer to the massacre of 58 people in Las Vegas. In a radio interview, he dwelled on how great it was that people sang “God Bless America” just before they were slaughtered by a civilian who converted his rifle into a machine gun. Moving forward, Pence offered this suggestion: “I have to tell you, we find comfort in the Good Book.”The host, Storme Warren at Sirius XM, asked Pence if we could be assured of never seeing this kind of thing again. Pence fumbled for an answer, then said, “We’re united in our resolve to end such evil in our time.”But there is no resolve. No legislative action. No executive action. Nothing but meek, passive acceptance of the great horror that makes the United States stand out from every other civilized country. Oh, and since Pence expressed resolve to end evil after Las Vegas, more than 900 Americans have lost their lives to guns.In Texas this week, Pence told families, “We are working with leaders in Congress to ensure that this never happens again.” That’s a lie, which should be surprising for a man who wears his faith on both sleeves. But it is not unusual for Pence. PolitiFact rated 48 percent of his statements false or mostly false. He has learned from his master.Here’s what the administration is actually doing: In one of his first acts as president, Trump signed a bill making it easier for the mentally ill to buy guns.Pence can sound insipid on any topic. When the tape emerged last year of Trump boasting about how to be a sexual predator and get away with it, Pence urged his ticket mate to pray. His piety is the cover for Trump’s amorality.I’m not against people of faith in public life. The left should be faulted for intolerance of those who express belief in a higher power or religious tradition. But I’m with the first Catholic president, John F. Kennedy, who famously said, “I believe in an America where the separation of church and state is absolute.” In that, he stands with the Constitution.Pence calls himself a Christian first, a conservative second and a Republican third. Since taking the oath of office, he’s supposed to be a citizen first. But Pence is a theocrat — one who hasn’t had a new thought in years — and that’s why he sounds so vacuous.As governor of Indiana, he signed a measure that legalized discrimination against gays and made his state a pariah. It was only under pressure from the business community that he was forced to retreat. Still, his long record of anti-gay actions prompted even Trump to joke that Pence wants to “hang them all.” The White House denied the quote.As Jane Mayer documented in her  portrait of Pence in The New Yorker, he is also the ultimate corporate tool. The Koch brothers own him. He has called climate change “a myth” and has helped to plant fossil-fuel toadies in crucial Trump administration posts.Pence learned gasbagging for God as a talk-radio host, calling himself “Rush Limbaugh on decaf.” It’s a job that requires someone to fill hours of empty air with hours of empty nonsense. As vice president, he has refined the role.
Facebook Is Ignoring Anti-Abortion Fake News Last year, just weeks before the election, an article from a site called Mad World News began circulating around Facebook. The headline read “Before Applauding Hillary’s Abortion Remarks, Know the One Fact She Ignored.”In the article, the writer says she wants to expose Hillary Clinton’s lies about late-term abortions. She argues that a baby never needs to be aborted to save a mother’s life but doesn’t cite any sources or studies, and presents anecdotes and opinion as fact. Midway through the story, she shares an illustration of what she calls a “Partial-Birth Procedure” — a procedure banned in the United States. In it, she describes how a doctor “jams scissors into the baby’s skull” and how “the child’s brains are sucked out.”“Don’t let these lies kill another child in such a horrific manner,” she says, concluding the piece. The article was engaged with at least 1.1 million times, making it the most-shared article about abortion on Facebook last year, according to BuzzSumo, a company that tracks social sharing.Last week, the company’s general counsel appeared before Congress alongside his counterparts from Twitter and Google to testify on the company’s role in distributing misinformation ahead of the 2016 presidential election. Facebook says it’s taking “fake news” seriously. It has a label for “disputed” stories, brought in independent fact-checking partners and allows users to report false articles.It’s not clear whether these attempts to tackle misinformation will work; critics have called them ineffective and slow. But there’s another problem, too. So far, Facebook and the public have focused almost solely on politics and Russian interference in the United States election. What they haven’t addressed is the vast amount of misinformation and unevidenced stories about reproductive rights, science and health.Evidence-based, credible articles about abortion from reputable news outlets like The New York Times and The Washington Post didn’t make it to the top of the list of “most shared” articles on Facebook last year, according to BuzzSumo. But articles from the site LifeNews.com did.LifeNews, which has just under one million followers on Facebook, is one of several large anti-abortion sites that can command hundreds of thousands of views on a single post. These sites produce vast amounts of misinformation; the Facebook page for the organization Live Action, for instance, has two million Facebook followers and posts videos claiming there’s a correlation between abortion and breast cancer. And their stories often generate more engagement than the content produced by mainstream news organizations, said Sharon Kann, the program director for abortion rights and reproductive health at Media Matters, a watchdog group. People on Facebook engage with anti-abortion content more than abortion-rights content at a “disproportionate rate,” she said, which, as a result of the company’s algorithms, means more people see it.Facebook’s current initiatives to crack down on fake news can, theoretically, be applicable to misinformation on other issues. However, there are several human and technical barriers that prevent misinformation about reproductive rights from being identified, checked and removed at the same — already slow — rate as other misleading stories.First, the question of what’s considered a “fake news” site is not always black and white. Facebook says it has been tackling the sources of fake news by eliminating the ability to “spoof” domains and by deleting Facebook pages linked to spam activity. For example, this year Facebook identified and deleted more than 30 pages owned by Macedonian publishers, who used them to push out fake stories about United States politics, after alarms had been sounded about sites in the country spreading misinformation about the 2016 campaign. (Facebook says some of the sites may have been taken down for other terms-of-service violations.) But anti-abortion sites are different. They do not mimic real publications, and they publish pieces on real events alongside factually incorrect or thinly sourced stories, which helps blur the line between what’s considered a news blog and “fake news.”Second, Facebook says one of its key aims in tackling fake news is to remove the profit incentive, because it says “most false news is financially motivated.” It says it hopes to do that by making it more difficult for the people behind the fake news sites to buy ads on its platform and by detecting and deleting spam accounts, which it says are a major force behind the spread of misinformation.However, the incentive for the people who write content for anti-abortion news sites and Facebook pages is ideological, not financial. Anti-abortion, anti-science content isn’t being written by spammers hoping to make money, but by ordinary people who are driven by religious or political beliefs. Their aim isn’t to profit from ads. It’s to convince readers of their viewpoint: that abortion is morally wrong, that autism is caused by vaccines or that climate change isn’t real.Finally, public pressure influences where Facebook directs its attention. Facebook may be focused on fake news and the United States election now, but its efforts to prevent the spread of misinformation in the buildup to the election were practically nonexistent. It took action only after intense scrutiny.Now Facebook and its fact-checking partners say its focus is “on the worst of the worst, on the clear hoaxes spread by spammers for their own gain.” Simply put, without increased pressure, Facebook’s technical efforts and its human efforts, like fact-checkers’ trawling through flagged content, make it likely that the company, in the months to come, will be seeking out only the “obvious” flags of fake news stories and not the misinformation that is fueled by real people with no financial incentive. That is why those of us who are concerned by the misinformation around reproductive rights need to make ourselves heard.The Irish government says it will hold a referendum next year on whether to relax the country’s strict ban on abortion. Some abortion-rights campaigners have expressed concern over the role of misinformation on social media platforms like Facebook in the lead-up to the vote, but it’s far from clear whether those concerns are being listened to.Curbing the spread of fake news is no easy task, and Facebook says it cannot “become arbiters of truth” in the fight against fake news. But at the very least, the company can address its continuing role in inadvertently spreading false information about issues that go beyond the United States election and Russia.
My Forgotten War and Their Forgotten Graves JERUSALEM — My most unsettling neighbors here in Jerusalem are Indians: Afzal Hussein Shah, Chulam Muhammad, Mansub Ali. They occupy a lot on a street near my home. You pass No. 22, then No. 24, but instead of No. 26 you find a rectangle of grass and rosemary shrubs. Engraved on two memorial stones are the names I mentioned, along with dozens of others.I recently wrote a book about a small war, a mostly forgotten guerrilla conflict in Lebanon in the 1990s, in which I participated as an Israeli soldier. When I walked to the cafe where I did my writing, I took to pausing for a moment by their memorial. I still stop every few days. Each time I do, their presence, or their tangible absence, seems to tell me with greater insistence something about their experience and mine, about the bewildering century since Britain captured this city and lost these men in 1917 — and about the century that’s coming.On Saturday, British Commonwealth war cemeteries like this one will see ceremonies for Remembrance Day, in observance of the date of the armistice that ended World War I. But few of these soldiers can really be remembered. The faces and motivations of Chulam Muhammad and his comrades have been lost to time.So what do we know of them? They were children of British India, attached to units like the 124th Duchess of Connaught’s Own Baluchistan Infantry. Many were Muslims; others were Hindus and Sikhs. They traveled far from home to fight the Islamic empire of the Ottoman Turks in Palestine. They must have expected, or at least hoped, to make it back to their families. They were instead felled by bullets, shrapnel or disease, and remained in this cemetery through the improbable creation of a Jewish state.They could hardly have imagined that the empire that sent them to fight would vanish — that some of their hometowns would lose their connection not only to Britain but also to India and would become part of a different country entirely, Pakistan. How could they have known that the cause for which they died would become nearly incomprehensible within the span of the lives they should have lived?Only the dead are frozen in their old wars. The soldiers who walk away are left to watch everything change. Like many families, mine has a few stories to this effect. My father remembers sitting in a small kitchen in the Bronx with his great-uncle Viktor, a Jew from the Austro-Hungarian Empire who joined the German Army in World War I, performed a feat of bravery in the kaiser’s service and received an Iron Cross. Viktor remained in Germany until the 1930s, when the country for which he had killed began trying to kill him. The United States, his enemy in the war, became his refuge. When my father met him in the 1950s, nothing was left of the world of Viktor’s birth. He was a proud man with a little metal cross.In my own time in an Israeli infantry company in the last three years of the 20th century, during a small but very long border war against Hezbollah, I believed that an isolated hilltop outpost in southern Lebanon was worth my life and those of my friends. But in the spring of 2000 the army withdrew, and soldiers from my company blew up the outpost. Now it was worthless.Seventeen years have passed. Our old enemies from Hezbollah, the heroes of the Arab world for their stand against us, are now in Syria battling other Muslims. They’re fighting alongside Russians, a development unthinkable just a few years ago. States that existed in recent memory, like Syria, Iraq, Libya and Yemen, no longer really exist. The Egyptians, against whom two generations of Israelis fought bitter wars, are our allies against Iran, and old enemies like the Saudis aren’t quite our enemies anymore. Sunni jihadis wounded fighting the Assad regime are spirited across the border and treated in Israeli hospitals.It’s not that today’s Middle East would be unrecognizable only to the soldiers of 1917, like those buried in my neighborhood. Today’s Middle East would be unrecognizable to the younger version of me who reported to a draft office 20 years ago.The closest thing to a memorial for my little war exists in a field near Israel’s northern tip. It consists of 73 jagged pieces of limestone around a pool, on which 73 names are inscribed: Avi Ofner, Dotan Cohen, Shai Abukassis. These are soldiers who died when two helicopters crashed en route to my outpost and a neighboring army position in Lebanon one night in February 1997. The stones are roughly the size of human beings, and if you stand there, it feels as though those men are surrounding you, as though you’re one of them.The bases they were flying to are gone. Few remember why they were going there at all. The political lines that shaped and ended their lives are already blurring in our memories. What will these stones say to a visitor who passes by and pauses a century later? Who will that visitor be?When I pass the Indian cemetery, I try to think of two or three names and imagine their owners. I wish they weren’t here, that they’d made it home to tell stories of adventures in faraway places: They saw the Mediterranean and the Dome of the Rock, and heard strange languages. Instead they lie in my neighborhood where No. 26 should be. What their loss has meant in the world is suggested less by the stone markers than by the absence on this lot of an apartment building full of families.They’re still telling a story, though, and after pausing here dozens of times I think I know what it is. It’s a soldier’s lesson, whether your war was in Afghanistan or Iraq or Lebanon or on the Western Front: that victory and defeat never mean what you think, that with all of your weapons and illusions of power, you’re simply borne this way and that by tides beyond your grasp, and that all anyone can safely say about the future is that it’s nothing we can picture from where we stand.
Revenge of the Obama Coalition In his book “Active Faith: How Christians Are Changing the Soul of American Politics,” former Christian Coalition leader Ralph Reed described 1989, the year the group was founded, as a dark one for religious conservatives. The once-powerful televangelists Jimmy Swaggart and Jim Bakker were discredited by lurid scandals. In Virginia and New Jersey, anti-abortion Republican candidates lost gubernatorial races to pro-choice Democrats. “The number of conservative votes in Congress dwindled to barely enough to sustain President Bush’s abortion vetoes,” Reed wrote. The movement that had been so formidable at the start of the decade “seemed dead, and cultural elites danced on its grave.”Seeking resurrection, the religious right turned to local politics, investing in the bench of the Republican Party. “We are training people to be effective — to be elected to school boards, to city councils, to state legislatures and to key positions in political parties,” Pat Robertson wrote in a 1991 Christian Coalition fund-raising letter. The next year, Sarah Palin would get her start by winning a seat on the Wasilla City Council, part of a wave of evangelicals pouring into local politics.If there is one threadlike silver lining to Donald Trump’s election last year, it’s that it has forced the left to emulate the Christian right’s extremely successful strategy for building political power. For decades, Democrats have paid far less attention to local politics than Republicans. That’s part of the reason the party lost almost a thousand state legislative seats — there are 7383 in total — over the course of Barack Obama’s presidency. But in the last year, citizens nationwide — particularly women and people of color — who were horrified by Trump’s victory have decided to run for office in their own communities. And on Tuesday, many of them won.The most important Democratic victory on Tuesday was that of Gov.-elect Ralph Northam in Virginia. But there were countless down-ballot triumphs across the country, some of which had a cinematic sweetness. In New Jersey, a 32-year-old named Ashley Bennett was disgusted when John Carman, a Republican county official, posted a Facebook meme that said, “Will the woman’s protest be over in time for them to cook dinner?” Though Bennett told me she never before thought of running for office, she decided to challenge Carman, and won. In Virginia, a 33-year-old trans woman named Danica Roem defeated a Republican state legislator who’d introduced a so-called “bathroom bill.” Crystal Murillo, a 23-year-old Mexican-American in Aurora, Colo., who was gutted by Trump’s election, unseated her Trump-supporting city councilwoman.For the past year, the Democratic Party has been engaged in an angry internal debate over identity politics, which are often framed in opposition to a purely class-based appeal. At times, it feels like progressives are doomed to re-litigate the 2016 Democratic primary forever, tearing each other apart while Trump tears down the republic. But if you squint at Tuesday’s results, you can sort of see a synthesis emerging between Obama and Hillary Clinton’s theory of the emerging Democratic electorate — in which Democrats win by appealing to a coalition of white professionals and minorities — and Bernie Sanders’s focus on grass-roots organizing and economic populism.In some ways the election was the revenge of the Obama coalition. Educated white liberals joined people of color to elect an amazingly diverse group of candidates. A Latina single mother, Michelle De La Isla, was elected mayor of Topeka, Kan. Wilmot Collins, a refugee from Liberia, won the mayoral race in Helena, Mont. Seattle elected its first lesbian mayor, Jenny Durkan. After a year in which liberals have been bludgeoned by demands that they abandon identity politics and empathize with resentful Trump voters, the election was a reminder that white men needn’t be the center of the political universe.Yet class politics and identity politics aren’t really a binary, even if they’re sometimes presented that way. Murillo, for example, the first person in her family to graduate from either high school or college, told me that affordable housing was a central issue in her campaign. Overall, Tuesday was a great night for economic populists. Before this week, the Democratic Socialists of America had 20 elected officials among its membership. On Tuesday, 15 more won local office, including 30-year-old Marine veteran Lee Carter, who unseated the Republican majority whip in Virginia’s House of Delegates.Ultimately, the main lessons from Tuesday are probably more strategic than ideological. Democrats need to contest every seat they can, no matter how red. (In the wake of the Washington Post’s revelations about Alabama Senate candidate Roy Moore’s past sexual relationships with teenagers, it’s a good thing there’s already a strong Democrat in the race.) They should also recognize that young people are crucial to their fortunes, and make it easy for them to run. One person who played a key role in Democratic victories on Tuesday was Amanda Litman, a 27-year-old veteran of the Hillary Clinton campaign who co-founded Run For Something, which trains and supports progressive millennials seeking political office. (Her group backed both Bennett and Roem.) More millennial candidates, Litman told me, “means more millennial voters,” and millennials are largely left-leaning.Run For Something is part of a robust progressive grass-roots infrastructure that has emerged from the wreckage of the 2016 election. In the past year, membership in the Democratic Socialists of America has more than tripled, to around 25,000. Every congressional district in the country now has at least two Indivisible chapters, and on Thursday Indivisible launched a new program to mobilize these chapters for elections. In the past, the right was far better than the left at channeling its activist energy into electoral politics, but that’s finally starting to change. Perhaps the Resistance can do for Democrats what the religious right did for Republicans. If so, it will start local, but it won’t end there.
Managing Email on Multiple Devices Q. How do I efficiently manage my email with three devices: computer, phone and tablet? Do I have to read, save, delete email three times, or can I easily sync them?A. Most mail programs give you the choice of two ways to set up an account on a computer or mobile device — either with the IMAP (Internet Message Access Protocol) standard or POP (Post Office Protocol). If you want to keep your mailbox in sync across multiple devices, choose the IMAP method.Compared with POP, IMAP is a newer technology for managing messages and handles checking the same mail account on multiple devices much more smoothly. With IMAP, even though you can see your mailbox in the mail program on your computer and devices, IMAP messages actually live on the mail server. When you read, delete or flag a message, you are performing that action on the mail server. The mail apps on your other devices see the change when you view the updated mailbox.In contrast, most POP mail systems in their default settings download messages directly to the device that checks in at the time, and then deletes those messages from the mail server. When you check mail with your computer or other gadgets, those devices do not get the deleted messages, but they may download newer ones — which then get deleted from the server, making your mailboxes out of sync.As a workaround, some mail providers allow you to keep messages on the server without deleting them automatically after they download, but then you have to repeatedly delete a message on each device. Additionally, the messages you send stay on the Sent mailbox of the computer or device that actually did the sending.Most modern mail providers and programs support IMAP You can find instructions for setting up IMAP mail accounts for Google’s Gmail, Microsoft Outlook and Mozilla’s Thunderbird program on their sites. Apple’s iCloud mail does not support POP and uses IMAP by default.
Grab Copies of Google Emails, Photos and Files Q. I have decided to leave Google and move to another mail and file-storage service. How do I get my mail, photos and other files stored in my Google account?A. Google has a download page you can use to grab copies of your Gmail messages, uploaded pictures on Google Photos, calendars, contacts, Google Keep notes and more. To use it, log into your Google account and go to your Takeout page; if you use Gmail and Google’s other “G Suite” corporate services through your employer, talk to your company’s system administrator about moving your data.On the Takeout page, you can select the Google apps and services you use, and add your personal content from each one to an archive file. The pictures you download from Google Photos will be exported in the format you used when you uploaded the images. As you move down the list of apps and services, click the downward-pointing menu arrow to get more information about exporting the data from that particular Google product.Once you have made your selections, click the Next button at the bottom of the page to choose the format for your archive — the .zip format is probably the most universal here, as most computers can automatically open .zip archives. You can also select your delivery method, including getting a mail message with a link for downloading the archive, or copying the archive file to Microsoft OneDrive or a Dropbox folder.Keep in mind that downloading all your data does not remove it from the company’s servers. It also does not remove your Google-based web activity or delete your Google account. After you make sure your archive has what you need, log into your Google account and, in the account preferences area, click the “Delete your account or services” link and follow the steps on the screen.
Smartphones in Egypt Bring Biting Humor but Also Scrutiny How do New York Times journalists use technology in their jobs and in their personal lives? Declan Walsh, The Times’s Cairo bureau chief, discussed the tech he’s using.What tech is most important for you to do your job as our correspondent in Egypt? A dented, screen-cracked iPhone is the center of my work. When I started out as a foreign correspondent 18 years ago, in Kenya, I carried a small satchel that held a tape recorder, a camera, an address book, a map and perhaps a shortwave radio. Today all of that has been squeezed into the thin black slab in my pocket.It taped an interview with the leader of Hamas. It shot video and pictures as I drove across Syria. It has helped me navigate the back streets of Cairo, and then hails a cab ride home. It hasn’t, however, replaced pen and paper, although the stack of notebooks on my desk is gradually shrinking. I type faster into my Times-issue 13-inch MacBook Air than I can write. But I’ve come to realize that’s not always a plus: Slow and messy as it is, taking interview notes by hand makes you listen harder, and edit your notes as you go along.The other key thing is secure communications. With so many Egyptians in jail, and many others at risk of arrest, encrypted apps like WhatsApp and Signal have become indispensable tools. The Egyptian police detained dozens of gay people recently, so when I called an activist to set up an interview, it was through an encrypted app. If I’d called on a regular line, he would have hung up. Apart from that, digital lines are simply better quality.The Slack messaging app is replacing email as the way Times correspondents communicate with their editors, especially as our operation has spread out across the world. We might work with editors in London, New York or Hong Kong, depending on the story and the time of day.Equally important, you need to know when to put all that technology away. In the more paranoid corners of the Middle East, pulling out a glowing laptop in public is not a great idea.How is connectivity in Cairo and in the region when you travel on assignment? The internet can be teeth-grindingly slow in Egypt, to the point of me yelling, ridiculously, at the screen on deadline.In 2016, Egypt ranked 146th out of 150 countries for fixed broadband download speeds, according to Speedtest. The only worse country in North Africa was war-torn Libya. It’s surprising given that a major data cable, linking hundreds of millions of users, passes through one sleepy Egyptian village. The problem stems from a lack of investment in telecommunications infrastructure locally since the Arab Spring in 2011 and stifling state monopolies.We get around this with dongles connected to the 4G cellphone network, which is better, if not perfect. In conflict zones like Libya, where I covered an offensive against the Islamic State last year, I turn to my BGAN satellite data terminal and a Thuraya satellite phone.But increasingly there is at least patchy cellphone coverage in even the more dangerous places, such as during the battle for Aleppo, Syria, last year. That brings an immediacy that I once found jarring: the power to FaceTime with your mom, for instance, from a battlefront. But now that feels normal, and choices are dictated less by technology than by what simply feels right.Are Egyptians joined at the hip with their smartphones? Egyptians adore their smartphones. People have crazy-looking cases and a range of dramatic ringtones — Quranic verses for conservatives, melodramatic pop tunes for everyone else. Lionel Richie’s “Hello” and anything by Celine Dion are very popular.The flip side to the smartphone mania is that it also inspires deep paranoia among the police and some ordinary citizens, known popularly here as “honorable citizens.” I know people who’ve been threatened with arrest for taking a photo of the Suez Canal (after the pyramids, one of Egypt’s most famous features). A photographer friend was admonished by an “honorable citizen” for trying to take a photo of the Nile with her phone. He accused her of being a spy.What are the favorite apps or gadgets in Egypt? Are people on Facebook and using Google and Uber?Egypt has the largest community of Facebook users in the Arab world. It’s a huge part of many people’s lives, at a time when the public square is dramatically shrinking. Since President Abdel Fattah el-Sisi came to power in 2013, protest has been outlawed and the news media is largely in thrall to the government. So people turn to social media to talk politics, mock their leaders and hunt for independent news. If Mr. Sisi makes a slip-up on television, there will unfailingly be a flurry of mocking memes flying about on Facebook within hours. It can be funny, dark or both — jokes about the country’s pitiful human rights record, for instance.It’s not just Western apps. Anghami is the Arab version of Spotify, Souq.com is the big online retailer (and was bought by Amazon this year), and there’s a host of apps that tell pious Muslims when to pray or that help them to read the Quran.On the streets of Cairo, Uber and Careem, a ride-sharing app that concentrates on the Middle East, are slugging it out for market share. As a result, cab rides can be ridiculously cheap — just a few dollars to cross town.How does the Egyptian government treat tech like social media and Western apps?With wariness and frequent hostility.Egyptian officials closely monitor Facebook, Twitter and other social media sites, and posting an irreverent comment can land a user in court or in jail. A young army conscript is serving a three-year sentence for posting a photo of Mr. Sisi with a pair of Mickey Mouse ears. Since May, the government has banned over 400 websites, including Human Rights Watch, the Egyptian news site Mada Masr and, bizarrely, Medium. Earlier this year, I discovered the security services were seeking access to real-time information about ride-sharing customers — once known inside Uber as “God View” — through the Uber and Careem apps.All told, it’s a pretty grim picture.Beyond your job, what tech product do you love using in your daily life right now and why?I love my Bose noise-canceling Bluetooth headphones, but the most satisfying tech product I’ve started using is one that cancels out the rest. A smart little alarm clock by the French designer Philippe Tabet sits on my bedside table, and means that I no longer need my smartphone to wake me up.With the phone banished to another room, I can’t mindlessly scroll Twitter or Instagram at 8 o’clock in the morning, and I enjoy a tiny window of mental peace. If Times editors need me urgently, they can still call my land line. Sometimes, the old-fashioned tech is best.
Our Guide to the Holiday Season’s Biggest Video Games and Consoles It’s blockbuster season for video games.With the holiday season on its way, the games industry is pushing out a diverse lineup of titles, from new installments of long-running franchises like Activision’s Call of Duty and Ubisoft’s Assassin’s Creed to EA’s long-awaited Star Wars Battlefront II.But the real crowd pleasers this year may be in hardware. Microsoft and Nintendo are offering new or upgraded consoles after Sony rereleased its PlayStation 4 console and more powerful PS4 Pro last year.The hottest hardware ticket is Nintendo’s Switch console, which offers gamers the option of plugging in at home or pulling it off its dock to play on the go. Even though it was released eight months ago, the Switch is still so popular that supply is expected to be a problem at the end of the year.The arrival this week of Microsoft’s new Xbox One X console — featuring more processing power and 4K resolution, which means more defined picture quality — is also expected to make waves. The console supports hundreds of games from the Xbox back catalog, including all Xbox One titles, as well as select Xbox 360 titles.All of this is expected to fuel spending on games, which rose 7 percent to $14 billion in the first half of the year from the same period in 2016, according to the NPD Group. “I expect this growth to continue to edge up through the holidays,” said Mat Piscatella, who analyzes the video games industry for NPD.Here are some of the most anticipated games products this holiday season.Activision’s best-selling first-person shooter game returns with a new version developed by Sledgehammer Games.The last three games in the annual franchise used futuristic settings and high-tech weapons, but the latest version returns to a World War II setting. Sledgehammer Games enlisted the help of a war historian, Martin Morgan, to help create accurate weapons and locations for the game, from the Normandy landings in June 1944 to the Battle of Hürtgen Forest. The game follows a young soldier from Texas as he makes his way across Europe with his unit.Michael Pachter, an analyst with Wedbush Securities, said Call of Duty: World War II would most likely be the biggest game of the holiday season. He projected it would sell 20 million units for a cool $1 billion.Released: Nov. 3Platforms: PC, PlayStation 4, Xbox OneThe last Star Wars Battlefront, in 2015, was criticized for a dearth of content, said Joost van Dreunen, chief executive of SuperData Research, a video game data and market research firm.So for this sequel, EA listened closely to players’ feedback, said Matt Webster, an executive producer for the game. The result: Star Wars Battlefront II has nearly three times the content of the previous game, with more heroes, maps and vehicles, as well as redesigned space battles. EA is also starting a live service for the game so fans can get free content, including new playable characters, like Finn and Captain Phasma from the film“Star Wars: The Force Awakens,” as well as new multiplayer maps that tie in with the release of “Star Wars: The Last Jedi” in December.“The game has a movie coming out to support its marketing efforts, and is an easy gift for grandma to purchase at holiday,” said Mr. Pachter.Release: Nov. 17Platforms: PC, PlayStation 4, Xbox OneSuper Mario Odyssey is the first main Mario platforming game — in which players must make well-timed, precise jumps across a series of platforms while collecting power-ups and avoiding enemies and obstacles — for the Nintendo Switch.The game follows Mario as he traverses dozens of colorful worlds in search of his beloved Princess Peach. Odyssey is less linear than previous 3-D Mario games, rewarding exploration and introducing players to new mechanics — for example, Mario can use his iconic cap to "possess” other characters or objects, allowing him more freedom to explore. The worlds are also more expansive, including a towering cityscape inspired by New York.So far, reviews have been rapturous. “Super Mario Odyssey now joins that very short list of what we think are essential games to play and own,” said Randolph Ramsay, the editor in chief of GameSpot, a video game news and reviews site owned by CBS.Released: Oct. 27Platform: Nintendo SwitchAfter a year off in 2016, the action-adventure franchise has returned with a game that transports players to ancient Egypt.The game is set much earlier — in the first century B.C., around the time of Julius Caesar and Cleopatra — than previous Assassin’s Creed games, so players can explore the beginnings of the Brotherhood of Assassins, a renegade group fighting for freedom. The game’s combat system has been overhauled, with the duel-style action of previous games replaced by a lock-on mechanic that means enemies don’t really wait before they attack.In addition, players can now pursue or leave quests whenever they like, instead of having to finish off a quest to return to the main world.Released: Oct. 27Platforms: PC, PlayStation 4, Xbox OneNintendo’s console has been a hit with hard-core and casual gamers alike. As Nintendo’s first new home console since the Wii U in 2012, the Switch remains in tight supply — and demand is not slowing.Reviews for the Switch have been unanimously positive, praising its streamlined design and ability to seamlessly switch between at home and on the road without affecting how the games look and play.“Not only does it have two of the best games released this year — The Legend of Zelda: Breath of the Wild and Super Mario Odyssey — it’s also an impressive piece of gaming tech that works well both as a home console and a portable machine,” Mr. Ramsay of GameSpot said.Released: March 3Price: $299.99Nintendo’s SNES Classic console, which debuted in September, has become another hit.The console is a miniaturized rerelease of the classic SNES console from the 1990s, a kind of novelty box that comes loaded with 21 games, including Super Mario World, The Legend of Zelda: A Link to the Past and Final Fantasy III.The console plugs directly into a TV via HDMI, so players can use their current tech setup to play their childhood favorites.“The Super NES Classic is a surefire glorious trip down memory lane,” Mr. Ramsay said.Released: Sept. 29Price: $79.99Microsoft is hoping its new Xbox One X console can become the ideal partner to 4K televisions that promise better picture quality and higher resolutions.Microsoft has touted the Xbox One X as the most powerful console on the market, with more memory and bandwidth to allow better-looking games and faster loading times.But the device is priced relatively high: $499, compared with less than $300 for consoles like the Xbox One S and Sony’s PS4. As a result, the Xbox One X may not immediately be a mainstream gaming product, at least not until far more people own 4K televisions.Released: Nov. 7Price: $499
Add International Keyboards on an iPhone Q. My new iPhone does not have a little globe key on the keyboard like I’ve seen on other people’s Apple phones. Mine just has the “happy face” key. Why is this?A. Along with the smiling face and other emoji pictographs, the iPhone can display keyboard layouts for dozens of languages. When you add a new international keyboard, the “happy face” key used to insert emoji characters into text changes to the globe key. When you press and hold the globe key, a menu pops up to display your alternate keyboard choices — including emoji.If you would like to add a keyboard designed for use with another language, you can do so in the iPhone’s keyboard settings. Tap open the Settings icon on the home screen, select General and then go to Keyboard. Then go to Keyboards and select Add New Keyboard. On the Add New Keyboard screen, scroll through the list and tap the language you want to use. (If you are using the keyboard in an app, you can also go right to the settings by pressing and holding the emoji key for a few seconds until a menu pops up with an option for Keyboard Settings.)When you return to using the iPhone keyboard in the Mail, the Notes or another text-heavy app, you should now see the globe key on the keyboard. Press and hold the globe icon for a second or two until the list of keyboards appears — like the emoji set or the international keyboard you just added.In addition to the Keyboard Settings shortcut (where you can adjust your preferences for auto-correction, predictive text and other typing-related tools), the pop-up menu includes icons you can use to switch to the “one-handed” keyboard that is part of iOS 11. When you select either the left- or the right-handed layout, the essential keys slide over to your chosen side of the screen to make typing with your thumb easier.
Musical.ly, a Chinese App Big in the U.S., Sells for $1 Billion SHANGHAI — The only Chinese social media company to build a major network outside China will be taken over by a fast-growing Chinese upstart.Musical.ly, a video-based social network popular with teenagers in the United States and Europe, is being sold for between $800 million and $1 billion to Bytedance, the company that controls the Chinese news aggregator Toutiao, according to a person familiar with the matter.The deal knits together Toutiao’s 120 million Chinese users with the roughly 60 million who use Musical.ly in the United States and Europe, ultimately linking a platform in China with a more global one.Musical.ly will continue to operate a separate product, according to a statement on the deal, though the two companies will cooperate closely.Despite the dominance of established social media services like Facebook and Snap, Musical.ly rose to prominence among a teenage and tween audience by enabling users to record quick videos set to music. Young users of the app performed coordinated dance moves or lip-synced to the music.Since then the company has branched out to other types of videos, including live streaming, and has even sought to attract short-form video shows.For Toutiao, Musical.ly brings a toehold in valuable American and European markets. Ostensibly an aggregator of news content, Toutiao has evolved into something more like a Facebook newsfeed.The company uses artificial intelligence to cater an array of posts and videos to users. It has grown increasingly video heavy, and it works more as an aggregator of entertainment in a country where a large number of websites vie to attract a smartphone-addicted population.For Musical.ly, Toutiao brings a huge user base in China and expertise in how to attract users. While Musical.ly has had success overseas, the company has been slow to target a Chinese market that its founders say can be more competitive and radically different from Western markets.
Uber Hit With New Blow in London as Panel Says Drivers Aren’t Self-Employed LONDON — Uber suffered another setback in its biggest market outside the United States after a British employment tribunal rejected the ride-hailing company’s argument that its drivers are self-employed.The decision on Friday, which affirmed a ruling issued last year, means that Uber will have to ensure that its drivers in Britain receive a minimum wage and paid time off. That creates problems for a common hiring model in the so-called gig economy that relies on workers who do not have formal contracts.Companies argue that such labor practices increase flexibility on both sides of the hiring equation. But critics counter that the system is exploitative and deprives employees of important safeguards like unemployment insurance.The ruling was the second blow to Uber’s business here in recent months. In September, London’s transport authority barred the company from operating in the British capital.In the case before the employment tribunal, two men, James Farrar and Yaseen Aslam, had challenged Uber on behalf of a group of 19 drivers, saying that the service had denied them basic protections by classifying them as self-employed. Uber countered with an argument it has used around the world: Its drivers were independent contractors.“You can hide behind technology, but the laws are there, and they need to be obeyed and respected,” Mr. Aslam, 36, said in an interview after the tribunal issued its decision. “The impact of this ruling could affect thousands of drivers, and not just drivers but millions of workers across the U.K.”“It just means we can’t be exploited,” he added.The acting chief of Uber’s British operations, Tom Elvidge, said the company would appeal the decision, either to the Court of Appeal or to Britain’s Supreme Court.The employment case here is one of several challenges that Uber faces. Although the company has expanded at a breakneck pace and grown into a behemoth valued at $70 billion, it has had to grapple with allegations that it does not do enough to vet its drivers, revelations that it used software to evade the gaze of the authorities and other issues.Complaints about an aggressive workplace culture forced Travis Kalanick, a founder of the company, to resign as chief executive this year. He was succeeded by the former chief executive of Expedia, Dara Khosrowshahi, who has displayed a more conciliatory style.As part of his softer approach, Mr. Khosrowshahi went on a charm offensive last month in an effort to win over the London transport authorities. Uber is appealing the London ban, which declared the company not “fit and proper” to operate in the city. Uber was allowed to continue operating in the city until a final ruling was made in the case.Mr. Khosrowshahi’s shift in tone comes at a crucial time. Uber is aiming for an initial public offering in 2019, and working on securing a multibillion-dollar investment from the Japanese conglomerate SoftBank.As part of its push to win over customers and drivers concerned about Uber’s reputation, the company has introduced new measures and services, including allowing users to add tips to fares. Uber has also promoted its efforts, particularly in Britain, to provide drivers with benefits like access to insurance and pensions.“Essentially, it has been outrunning employment law and legislators,” said André Spicer, a professor at City University’s Cass Business School in London. “It’s having to become more like a normal company, rather than one that was able to evade existing legal frameworks.”Uber’s operations in London are crucial to its global expansion. The company started operating in the city in 2012, and now offers its services in dozens of cities nationwide. About 40,000 people drive for Uber in the British capital, and the company says that three million customers have used the app in London at least once in the past three months.Uber’s arrival in London has, however, set off a clash with the city’s famous black cabs. Drivers in the centuries-old taxi system must pass an exacting test known as the Knowledge, which requires the memorization of around 25,000 streets and 100,000 landmarks. A ride in a black cab is typically far more expensive than using Uber, which cabbies complain is too lightly regulated.Opponents of Uber argue that it is able to undercut rivals on price largely because of its employment practices, which mean it can avoid paying some of the costs and contributions required by permanent employees. But the company’s business model is facing challenges across Europe. The region’s highest court is expected to rule by year’s end in a case involving whether Uber should be regulated as a taxi service, which would make it subject to rigorous safety and employment rules, or as a digital platform that simply connects independent drivers and passengers.Labor experts say that laws in most countries have failed to keep pace with advances in technology and the rise of the gig economy. In Britain, for example, the main piece of legislation that regulates how workers are treated was passed in 1996.“The legislation is old,” said Susannah Kintish, a partner at the law firm Mishcon de Reya who specializes in employment law. “It came out when the Spice Girls had their first hit. It’s just way out of date.”
AT&T Deal Puts Trump’s Antitrust Cop at Center of a Political Storm WASHINGTON — A year ago, Makan Delrahim predicted that AT&T’s $85.4 billion purchase of Time Warner would be approved by regulators. “I don’t see this as a major antitrust problem,” Mr. Delrahim, then a law professor, said to a Canadian television network.Now, five weeks into his job as the top antitrust regulator at the Justice Department, Mr. Delrahim has taken a different position. The department has threatened to block the deal in court unless AT&T sells off major assets.Mr. Delrahim’s position has thrown a surprising twist into a blockbuster deal, which has been watched for signs about how the Trump administration would handle giant mergers. On Wednesday, the dispute spilled into the public with conflicting versions about what the Justice Department wants.In one account, the agency offered two paths: Sell Turner Broadcasting, including CNN, or offload DirecTV, according to several people at the companies. In another, AT&T offered to sell CNN, according to two officials at the agency.Randall L. Stephenson, AT&T’s chief executive, said on Wednesday that he had never offered to sell CNN. On Thursday, appearing at The New York Times’s DealBook conference, he said the company was ready to go to court against the Justice Department.“To suggest that selling some of the key franchises of the business that are the most desired for your business plan makes no business sense,” Mr. Stephenson said.The public spat has put a political cloud over the deal. President Trump has been critical of CNN and the deal. Several Democratic lawmakers have called for hearings to determine whether politics played a role in what is supposed to be an independent process.The Justice Department declined to comment on Thursday.Pushing AT&T to unload a big part of its business to get the deal approved goes against Mr. Delrahim’s history, antitrust experts say. His past comments have largely been in line with more free-market-oriented Republican views, and he was widely expected to be more lenient on mergers than predecessors in the Obama administration.“This is bold,” said Diana Moss, president of the American Antitrust Institute, a nonprofit that generally favors stronger antitrust enforcement. “It signals they are willing to consider the anticompetitive effects of big deals, and on the remedy side they would use structural remedies, which would signal a potential change in policy.”In an interview late last month, Mr. Delrahim strongly rejected the idea that the White House had tried to or could influence his thinking. At the time, he would not discuss AT&T’s bid for Time Warner or any other pending mergers.“All enforcement decisions will be based on the facts and the law. Not on politics,” Mr. Delrahim said. “That would be antithetical to everything I’ve stood for.”Mr. Delrahim, 48, was born in Tehran, but his family moved to Los Angeles when he was almost 10, around the time of the Islamic Revolution. He attended the University of California, Los Angeles, as an undergraduate and then went to law school at George Washington University.After a few years in corporate law, he spent time as an aide on Capitol Hill, working on some technology and antitrust issues. President George W. Bush later nominated him to be a top official at the Justice Department, where he focused on international antitrust enforcement. After his time there, he returned to corporate law in Los Angeles, representing numerous large technology, health and telecommunications companies.In his recent interview, he said that the Justice Department did not need to intervene just because a company was big, even a monopoly. He also said the government should not startle business markets with an abrupt change in its approach to antitrust legal theory.“There are people who think big is just bad,” he said. “They don’t understand why, but there is an instinctive reaction to big business these days.” He added that it was dangerous to go after companies without clear evidence that they were harming competitors.Mr. Delrahim has said his comments last year about AT&T and Time Warner were taken out of context. He has told lawmakers that the deal deserved a thorough review. He said there could be antitrust concerns when a company like AT&T, which controls distribution of television content through DirecTV and internet content through its mobile and home broadband service, bought a big media company.That view is more aligned with left-leaning consumer groups that have pushed for greater antitrust enforcement. After the news this week that the Justice Department was taking a deeper look at the deal, some Democrats, including Senator Richard Blumenthal of Connecticut, praised the tough stance.“AT&T and Time Warner is an enormous test because we are just seeing online video disrupting the dominant cable broadband providers,” said Gene Kimmelman, president of the nonprofit organization Public Knowledge and an antitrust official during the Obama administration. “And it would be a disaster for consumers and the competitive landscape if those developments are wiped out or diminished by the approval of this deal.”For years, though, antitrust officials have generally approved mergers of companies that do not have competing businesses. These are known as vertical mergers, and because AT&T is a telecommunications company, while Time Warner creates media content like movies, their deal would fit that category.Problems with those mergers have generally been resolved with settlements known as consent decrees, which restrict the new company’s behavior or operations.Mr. Delrahim is skeptical of such consent decrees, especially demands for “behavioral remedies.” The Obama administration approved Comcast’s purchase of NBC Universal in 2011 with a stack of behavioral requirements, including a requirement that Comcast make NBC content available to competing cable and streaming services.During his interview last month, Mr. Delrahim said industries moved too fast for those remedies to be effective.“We have major parts of our industry that are regulated by consent decrees with the Justice Department,” he said, referring to settlements with behavioral remedies.“I don’t think I’m smart enough to figure out where the market and consumer behavior will be 10 years from now, 20 years from now, 40 years from now, 100 years from now,” he continued. The agency, he added, is still overseeing consent decrees that are a century old.Instead, Mr. Delrahim said, he prefers so-called structural remedies, like forcing a company to sell assets before approving a merger. He said the ultimate test for healthy competition was the consumer welfare test, which looks at whether consumers are benefiting from lower prices and options.Mr. Kimmelman said the Justice Department could be concerned about how the combined broadband, satellite and media company could hurt competitors.The satellite service DirecTV, for example, can reach all American homes. The potential concern, Mr. Kimmelman said, is that the company may have an incentive to withhold valuable Time Warner content like HBO, TNT or CNN from rival cable and satellite providers or streaming services. The company could also make it harder for rival media companies like Starz to reach AT&T customers.The Justice Department has proposed various options to meet Mr. Delrahim’s demands, according to multiple people close to the discussions.In the interview last month, Mr. Delrahim defended the president’s criticism of AT&T’s bid. He said Mr. Trump was unfairly targeted for remarks about deals when other government officials were allowed to air their opinions.“What’s interesting is that you see the president getting criticized for commenting on certain mergers and you have senators who will write with comments on the same exact merger,” Mr. Delrahim said. “I find that fascinating but maybe not new in Washington.”And while he insisted that his decisions would be made independently, it was clear that Mr. Trump was not totally out of mind.When he arrived at the Justice Department in late September, Mr. Delrahim received a hat as a welcome gift. It reads: “Makan Antitrust Great Again.”
Legislator Targets Tech Perks in Baltimore County District Baltimore County Public Schools has pursued one of the most ambitious classroom technology makeovers in the United States. Now, some of its relationships with technology vendors are coming under intensified scrutiny.A Maryland state legislator said Thursday that the state needed to investigate whether industry perks played a role in the awarding of the district’s technology contracts. The lawmaker, Senator James Brochin, called on the Maryland State Board of Education to conduct an audit of the contracts.In 2014, the district committed $205 million for laptops for students and staff, and millions more since for math and language software. The audit would cover the device contract, which was awarded to a vendor whose laptop came in third place in the district’s hardware evaluations.Last week, an article in The New York Times examined Baltimore County, the nation’s 25th-largest public school district, as a case study in how tech companies court and cultivate school leaders. The Baltimore Sun has recently written about the former district superintendent’s travels to out-of-state events.The Times found that tech vendors or industry-funded groups paid for meals and rooms at fancy hotels for school leaders, as well as travel to conferences to promote the district’s tech initiative. And in February, the district’s former superintendent participated in confidential meetings with school tech vendors — companies whose contracts were later increased.“Evidence offered in the recent articles indicates digital education companies having unrestricted access to key decision makers in Baltimore County Public Schools and, in turn, the awarding of contracts to those companies,” Senator Brochin, a Baltimore County Democrat, said in a letter sent to state officials. “This has created the illusion of impropriety, thereby eroding public trust.”In response to questions about the audit request and potential conflict-of-interest issues regarding tech vendors, Mychael Dickerson, a school district spokesman, said the district had “answered all the questions we intend to answer on this matter.”This past spring, the district’s superintendent resigned without citing a reason. In an email to reporters last week, Verletta White, the district’s interim superintendent, wrote, “I do not believe there are any conflicts of interest” related to the district’s tech initiative.The push for an examination comes as some parents, ethicists and legal experts are calling for greater transparency in school-vendor relationships. “Anything that involves trips to fancy hotels should be looked at pretty closely by school boards,” said James E. Tierney, a former attorney general of Maine who is a lecturer at Harvard Law School, “and they should decide whether the ultimate users — kids — are getting the right products.”Senator Brochin said he was concerned about Baltimore County’s ties to a firm called the Education Research and Development Institute or ERDI. Among other services provided by ERDI, it charges a company $13,000 to facilitate one three-hour meeting between corporate representatives and five superintendents or other school officials to discuss products, according to an ERDI membership rate card. ERDI has in the past paid superintendents $2,000 per conference and covered their travel to conferences held at hotels like the Four Seasons in Baltimore.Baltimore County’s previous superintendent received payments last year as an adviser to a company that owned ERDI, according to his district financial disclosure. The Times last week reported that Ms. White, the interim superintendent, had been involved with ERDI events since 2013, where she provided guidance to ed-tech companies. On Wednesday, The Baltimore Sun reported that Ms. White had been paid about $3,000 a year by ERDI in that time.The district declined to provide The Times with a list of the companies Ms. White met with at ERDI.
Reddit Bans ‘Incel’ Group for Inciting Violence Against Women Reddit has banned the online community of “incels,” or men who blame women for their involuntary celibacy and sometimes advocate rape, as part of a new crackdown on forums that glorify and incite violence.On Tuesday, the incel subreddit disappeared from the internet forum and was replaced with a symbol of a gavel on a red background.A statement from the company emailed on Thursday said the move was in line with a policy annnounced on Oct. 25 to ban content that calls for violence or physical harm."Communities focused on this content and users who post such content will be banned from the site,” the statement said. “As of Nov. 7, r/Incels has been banned for violating this policy.”The incel subreddit, which had about 40,000 members, and similar online sites promoting hate against women have been under scrutiny for years. While the incel content was closed this week, some of it has been tracked by a watchdog online community called IncelTears, which posted screenshots of old posts to call out derogatory slurs for women, examples of misogyny and comments justifying rape.An online petition called on Reddit to ban the incel community subreddit, noting that Elliott O. Rodger, a California man who killed six people in a 2014 rampage in Isla Vista near the University of California, Santa Barbara, before firing a bullet into his head, was referred to in the group as “Saint Elliott.”Mr. Rodger had left behind a rambling history of videos and social media posts on sites popular with sexually frustrated men. In one site, called PUAHate, for “pick up artiste hate,” Mr. Rodger expressed his disgust at women, questioning how they could resist his charms.“One day incels will realize their true strength and numbers, and will overthrow this oppressive feminist system,” he wrote. “Start envisioning a world where WOMEN FEAR YOU.”Reddit’s move against the group fell into the same pattern that other companies, including Facebook and Twitter, and domain registrar services, such as the ones that banned the white supremacy site The Daily Stormer in August, have taken to address violent content.“I view this as part of that broader movement,” Danielle K. Citron, a University of Maryland law professor who has studied the phenomenon of online hate, said on Thursday. “That there are communities like Daily Stormer that we find troubling and call for violence, and we don’t want to aid and abet groups that call for violence.”It is not clear when the term incels was coined, but the link between misogyny and violence against women has emerged on sites where incel communities gather.Mary Anne Franks, a professor of law at the University of Miami, who has studied online abuse and harassment, said that when she read Mr. Rodger’s manifesto she was reminded of George Sodini, a Pennsylvania man who shot dead three women in Pennsylvania in 2009, leaving behind an online diary that detailed his loneliness and lack of success with women.“These men got angry at the women that they see as depriving them of something they are entitled to,” Professor Franks said. “It was a trend in online forums, that they legitimately had a reasons to lash out,” speaking of Mr. Rodger and Mr. Sodini.Last month, after Reddit initiated the broader policy to clarify its rules on what content was banned, the first to go were subreddits for Nazi, racist and white supremacist groups. The move to ban incels appears to be part of a wider sweep of subreddits that it has flushed out over the years, such as ones that encouraged people to covertly photograph women on the street, or one that promoted rape, which was banned for “inciting harm.”“Whether it is on this particular ecoystem or alternatively within the alt-right itself, it is part of the online world that has been growing very rapidly,” Heidi Beirich, the director of the intelligence project for the Southern Poverty Law Center, said. “Misogyny is shockingly frequent to find on the web in these areas.”
Twitter, Facing Another Uproar, Pauses Its Verification Process SAN FRANCISCO — On Tuesday afternoon, Twitter added a small blue check mark to the account of Jason Kessler, a move known as verification that indicates a prominent person’s real account.The action was quickly met with outrage. That’s because Mr. Kessler is a well-known white supremacist who has used Twitter to spread his message and organize rallies like Unite the Right’s march in Charlottesville, Va., where torch-wielding protesters marched through the streets chanting racist rallying cries.Across the Twitterverse, people including the comedian Michael Ian Black came down on the company.By Thursday morning, Twitter announced it would be halting its entire general verification program. It was yet another situation that the company has had to make amends on, just a week after the accidental deletion of President Trump’s Twitter account and testimony in Washington on how Russian agents used its service last year to sow discord.“The system is broken and needs to be reconsidered,” Twitter’s chief executive, Jack Dorsey, tweeted on Thursday. “And we failed by not doing anything about it. Working now to fix faster.”When Twitter puts a verified check mark next to a white nationalist’s name, is the company endorsing that person? That was what Twitter was trying to figure out on Thursday.“Verification was meant to authenticate identity and voice but it is interpreted as an endorsement or importance,” the company said on Twitter. “We have created this confusion.”Twitter originally began verifying accounts to give high-profile individuals — celebrities, politicians, journalists and others — a way to distinguish themselves from impersonators. The blue check mark has since become something of a badge of honor, signaling that someone had reached a certain level of importance.“It’s recognition. It’s a simple as that,” Richard Spencer, a white supremacist who was verified by Twitter in 2016, said in an interview. “The blue check mark is useful.”The white nationalist movement has flourished on Twitter, but Mr. Spencer said the platform had been behaving erratically toward his community lately.“It seems to be non-algorithmic now,” he said. “It seems like there’s one person who doesn’t like this tweet or that account one day, and it seems like a judgment. It’s incoherent.”Mr. Kessler’s account — with the handle @TheMadDimension — remains verified. Late Wednesday, he responded to the uproar with a tweet wondering if it was still O.K. to be white, and included a poll for people to answer. As of Thursday afternoon, he had gotten nearly 50,000 responses.
Will Qualcomm Agree to a Deal With Broadcom? Ask Apple Apple may anoint the winner of Broadcom’s $105 billion bid for Qualcomm. A dispute over iPhone royalties left Qualcomm vulnerable to an opportunistic offer from its acquisitive rival. If Apple settles its dispute, it could preserve Qualcomm’s independence — but it all depends on whether Apple thinks a bigger Broadcom would be slavishly devoted to its devices, or just surlier.Qualcomm and Apple came to blows over royalties that the chip maker collects on mobile gadgets, most of which use its technologies. The actual payments aren’t disclosed, but analysts generally peg them at about $10 per phone. When Apple sued Qualcomm and told its suppliers to stop paying these fees this year, it helped push Qualcomm’s share price down by $10 per share, in subsequent months, to the $54.84 at which it traded last Thursday, the day before Broadcom’s interest was reported.Settling the lawsuit might make Broadcom’s bid of $70 per share less compelling. Analysts project Apple should sell around 250 million phones next year. If it agreed to a lower royalty payment of, say, $7.50 per phone, with a post-tax margin of 85 percent, that would yield almost $1.6 billion in profit. Put this on a multiple of 10, and that’s worth about $16 billion — or roughly $11 per share. And that’s before any catch-up payments for previously withheld sums that Qualcomm might be able to claw back.Should Apple play along? It depends on which chip maker it considers the more malleable counterpart. Broadcom’s chief executive, Hock Tan, is said to be open to renegotiating the Qualcomm contract should his company prevail. The promise of $3 billion in annual cost savings from the merger more than defrays the opportunity cost of giving Apple a good deal. Winning the good graces of Tim Cook, the Apple chief executive, might also result in additional chip sales to the tech giant.Whatever Mr. Tan says, though, his priority is likely to be maximizing the returns on his new acquisition. A big motivation for acquiring rivals is usually gaining heft over customers, and Broadcom already derives over 10 percent of its revenue from Apple. Furthermore, the lengthy antitrust process for a Broadcom-Qualcomm merger means it might be a year before Mr. Tan could negotiate properly anyway. The iPhone maker may prefer its serfs smaller and more squeezable.
News Shared on Twitter Can Drive the Conversation, Study Finds For years, investigating the American media’s influence on discourse has required studying the conversations we have at homes, in the public square and in office corridors, to try to understand what prompted them.But a paper published Thursday in the journal Science offers a new, albeit unorthodox, method: The authors brought the media in on the experiment, persuading more than 30 outlets to agree to time publication of some stories so researchers could track how the pieces affected discussion online.What they found is that even a handful of stories by mostly small publications can boost Twitter traffic on topics such as race or climate by 63 percent over the course of a week, relative to a typical day’s traffic on that subject.“Journalists, even at small papers, appear to have quite a substantial power to affect the national conversation about politics and policy,” said Gary King, the paper’s lead author and the director of the Institute for Quantitative Social Science at Harvard University.To study the media’s influence, the researchers persuaded news outlets to publish related stories on one of 11 broad policy topics during randomly assigned weeks. They then studied the Twitter conversation on that topic in the days that followed, compared to the week before or after.Dr. King and his colleagues, Benjamin Schneer, of Florida State University, and Ariel White, of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, spent almost five years on the study, with the first three years dedicated to observing, learning from and building trust with journalists. Key to getting them on board, he said, was limiting his team’s involvement to a part of the process that is often arbitrary: the timing of publication.“In some sense, you’re flipping the coin already,” he said, noting that for many non-breaking stories, publication timing is subject to the whims of editors or the news cycle.At all times, the publications retained the right to bow out of the experiment, shelve the stories or publish them when they wanted.The study is not without its critics. Creative as it may be, the paper overstates its conclusion, said Kathleen Hall Jamieson, who studies political communication and is the director of the Annenberg Public Policy Center at the University of Pennsylvania.“Is this methodologically ingenious? Yes. Do we know whether or not the findings are substantively important? Not based on the disclosed information,” she said.Twitter is just one social media platform and social media itself is only one venue in which the national conversation takes place. Tweets also hardly amount to discussion, Ms. Jamieson said. Many people simply share links on Twitter, offering, at best, a few lines of commentary.Without seeing the content of the articles or the tweets, it’s difficult to judge the study’s findings, she said. (While the authors provided the names of the outlets that participated in the experiment, they withheld the articles involved to protect the reputations of the publications.)To those who participated, though, the experiment offered a chance to better understand their influence, a crucial issue for media organizations.“When we had the opportunity to actually measure impact in a new way, we were really, really excited. This is core to our mission,” said Jo Ellen Green Kaiser, executive director of the Media Consortium, a network of independent news outlets whose members accounted for the majority of those involved in the study.While most of the outlets the researchers worked with were small, independent publications, such as Truthout or In These Times, the study included some more well-known outlets, too, including The Nation, The Progressive, Ms. Magazine and Yes! Magazine, according to the authors. In all, 33 outlets participated in the final experiment, though more than a dozen more participated in earlier trial runs, which were designed differently. The authors did not say which publications participated in which part of the study.The researchers were principally involved at only two points in the publication process: the beginning and the end.Each experiment began with them choosing from one of 11 broad policy areas, such as food, immigration, reproductive rights or jobs, which had been identified as already being of interest to the news organizations.The researchers then asked a handful of outlets to volunteer to collaborate, in groups of two to five, on stories of their own choosing related to the topic. For example, the authors said, with technology as a topic, the group might decide to write pieces about how Uber drivers feel about driverless cars.The researchers then chose a two-week window in which to study discussion online, asking the outlets to publish the stories during either week, chosen at random. They would then compare the discussion on Twitter related to that topic in the week in which the pieces ran to the week in which they did not.The stories, typically published on Tuesday, could come in any form, be they straight news, investigations, interviews, opinion pieces, videos or podcasts. The outlets treated them no differently and the researchers said that, as far as they were aware, their involvement went unnoticed by readers. Awareness of the study varied at each outlet, but editors and reporters were often informed.“We really had to get whole editorial teams on board, and then often the reporters knew, too,” Ms. Kaiser said.In the end, the authors conducted 35 experiments for the study over a year and a half beginning in October 2014.The authors tried to anticipate some criticisms, too. Many tweets are created by bots, they acknowledged, but they found that bot traffic was consistent each week, making it essentially background noise. The researchers also avoided weeks when known world events, say a planned presidential speech on immigration, might have influenced the results.
Uber 2.0: New C.E.O. Wants to Put His Stamp on the Company Dara Khosrowshahi wants to make something clear: The new Uber will not look like the company he inherited.Speaking publicly for the first time since he became Uber’s chief executive in August, Mr. Khosrowshahi painted a rosier vision of the future of his company. His aim: To escape from the shadow cast over the ride-hailing giant after a series of scandals shook the company to its core and resulted in the eventual ousting of former chief executive and co-founder, Travis Kalanick.“The culture went wrong, the governance went wrong, the board went in a very bad direction,” Mr. Khosrowshahi said in conversation with Andrew Ross Sorkin at the DealBook conference on Thursday. “I think winning gives some excuses for bad behavior.”Indeed, when Mr. Khosrowshahi stepped into the role in August, he had to deal with a series of scandals. Employee attrition was at a high, the company’s board of directors was rife with infighting, the company faced no fewer than five federal inquiries into its business practices. And, moreover, the brand and what Uber stood for was taking a beating. The #DeleteUber hashtag surged across social media earlier this year, resulting in more than 500,000 deleted accounts.Now, Mr. Khosrowshahi is trying to put his own imprimatur on the company in what he calls “Uber 2.0.”He confirmed, for the first time publicly, that Uber is working on securing a multibillion dollar investment from SoftBank, the Japanese mega-conglomerate angling to get into the American ride-hailing market. He hinted at pulling back on Uber’s long-espoused strategy of spending enormous amounts of money in order to gain market share in certain areas.Perhaps most important, he has embarked on an apology tour of sorts in cities and countries around the world, trying to repair the damage done by Mr. Kalanick and his contentious, bare-knuckled approach to dealing with regulators in new markets.“I think we were generally immature with how we deal and dealt with regulators,” Mr. Khosrowshahi said.He spent the past few weeks traveling to London, where Uber is facing the threat of being banned, as well as Brazil, where Uber narrowly escaped being regulated as if it were more like a taxi service.He has not eschewed the company’s history entirely. Mr. Khosrowshahi nodded to the passion it took for Mr. Kalanick to get Uber to the near $70 billion transportation behemoth it is today. Mr. Khosrowshahi said he still talks regularly with Mr. Kalanick and that he would be crazy not to rely on Mr. Kalanick’s genius and tenacity to take the company forward.But make no mistake: Uber is Mr. Khosrowshahi’s company now, not Travis Kalanick’s. And Mr. Khosrowshahi said he’s made clear he needs some distance from the former C.E.O. to do his job, and to do it well. That’s especially true if he wants to make good on his goal of taking the company public in 2019.“I’ve got to put my stamp on the company,” he said. “We’re on our way.”
YouTube’s Rapid Response Partisans Game the News of Tragedy On Sunday afternoon, when Elmer T. Williams’s wife told him that a mass shooting had taken place at a church in Texas, he leapt into action. First, he skimmed a handful of news stories about the massacre. Then, when he felt sufficiently informed, he went into his home video studio, put on his trademark aviator sunglasses, and hit record.Roughly an hour later, Mr. Williams, 51, a popular right-wing YouTube personality who calls himself “The Doctor of Common Sense,” had filmed, edited and uploaded a three-minute monologue about the Sutherland Springs church shooting to his YouTube page, which had roughly 90,000 subscribers. Authorities had not yet named a suspect, but that didn’t deter Mr. Williams, who is black, from speculating that the gunman was probably “either a Muslim or black.”Later, after the shooter was identified as a white man named Devin P. Kelley, Mr. Williams posted a follow-up video. He claimed that Mr. Kelley was most likely a Bernie Sanders supporter associated with antifa — a left-wing anti-fascist group — who may have converted to Islam. Despite having no evidence for those claims, Mr. Williams argued them passionately, saying that photos of Mr. Kelley circulating online suggested that he was a violent liberal.“Sometimes, you can tell a lot from a person’s picture,” Mr. Williams said.I came across Mr. Williams’s videos several hours after the massacre, when one of them appeared prominently in YouTube’s search results about the shooting, alongside other videos making unverified claims that had been posted by pages with names like TruthNews Network and The Patriotic Beast.YouTube has long been a haven for slapdash political punditry, but in recent months, a certain type of hyper-prolific conspiracist has emerged as a dominant force. By reacting quickly and voluminously to breaking news, these rapid-response pundits — the YouTube equivalent of talk radio shock jocks — have successfully climbed the site’s search results, and exposed legions of viewers to their far-fetched theories.In a phone interview from his home in Houston, Mr. Williams told me that he had created more than 10,000 YouTube videos over an eight-year period, posting as many as 20 monologues per day, and racking up an estimated 200 million views.His hit productions have included fact-challenged videos like “Barack and Michelle Obama Both Come Out The Closet,” which garnered 1.6 million views, and “Hillary Clinton Is On Crack Cocaine,” which had 665,000. He was admitted to YouTube’s partner program, which allows popular posters to earn money by displaying ads on certain types of videos, and claims to have made as much as $10,000 a month from his channel.“I like to call myself a reporter who reports the news for the common person,” Mr. Williams said.Whether motivated by profit or micro-celebrity, the success of sensationalists like Mr. Williams has become a vexing problem for companies like Facebook, Twitter, and Google, which owns YouTube.These companies sort and prioritize information for their users, and most have built ranking systems that boost news from mainstream outlets over stories from less credible sources. But those algorithms can be gamed in breaking news situations by users who work fast, uploading their videos in the valuable minutes between when news breaks and when the first wave of legitimate articles and videos appears.“Before reliable sources put up stories, it’s a bit of a free-for-all,” said Karen North, a professor studying social media at the University of Southern California. “People who are in the business of posting sensationalized opinions about the news have learned that the sooner they put up their materials, the more likely their content will be found by an audience.”The phenomenon is not limited to YouTube. After last month’s mass shooting in Las Vegas, a Facebook safety check page featured a story from a site called “Alt-Right News” that made false statements about the gunman, and Google’s search results displayed a conspiracy theory from 4Chan, the notoriously toxic message board. After last month’s terrorist attack in New York City, a trending topic page on Twitter briefly featured a story from Infowars, a conservative site that is popular among the conspiracy-minded.Conservatives have argued that YouTube unfairly targets their videos while allowing liberal channels, such as The Young Turks, to post heated political commentary. And some dispute that there is any conscious gaming going on.“There is absolutely no strategy,” said Paul Joseph Watson, an editor-at-large at Infowars and a popular YouTube personality who has 1.1 million subscribers. On the day of the Texas church shooting, one of Mr. Watson’s tweets appeared as a result in Google searches for the shooter’s name, although it has since disappeared.Tech companies, already under fire for the ease with which they allowed Russia to interfere in last year’s election, have also vowed to take a harder stance on domestic misinformation. Twitter’s acting general counsel, Sean Edgett, told congressional investigators last week that the company would take steps to keep false stories from being featured on trending topic pages.“It’s a bad user experience, and we don’t want to be known as a platform for that,” Mr. Edgett said.YouTube, whose community guidelines prohibit hateful and threatening content, has begun using artificial intelligence to help identify offensive videos. But conspiracy theories don’t announce themselves, and machines can’t yet handle the complicated business of fact-checking.In Mr. Williams’s case, human intervention seems to have been necessary. On Tuesday, shortly after I asked YouTube some questions about Mr. Williams’s account, all of his videos disappeared, and his profile was replaced by a message saying, “This account has been terminated due to multiple or severe violations of YouTube’s policy prohibiting hate speech.”Mr. Williams, who said he had recently left his job as an operations manager at a hazardous materials plant to focus on full-time punditry, has tangled with YouTube’s hate speech policies before. The company shut down one of his previous accounts for similar infractions, which he claimed cost him 250,000 subscribers and a lucrative income stream.“If YouTube didn’t punish me,” Mr. Williams said, “I could easily be making over $30,000 a month.”In a statement, YouTube said that Mr. Williams’s account was banned “as soon as it was flagged to us,” because its terms of service prohibit repeat rule-breakers from opening new accounts. It also said that its terms prohibit advertising from appearing on videos featuring “controversial and sensitive events, tragedies, political conflicts, and other sensitive topics.”Even before this week’s crackdown, Mr. Williams was branching out. He sells cellphone ringtones on his website, and was considering starting his own paid streaming service. Tuesday night, just hours after he was banned by YouTube, Mr. Williams posted a video on Vimeo, another video-hosting platform. He pledged to keep insulting his favorite targets — Democrats, Hillary Clinton, Barack Obama — and not shy away from controversy, no matter what the policies said.“I don’t want to be on YouTube anymore,” Mr. Williams said. “It’s too communist.”
Bitcoin Expansion Is Off the Table. At Least for Now. SAN FRANCISCO — A long-running civil war over the design of Bitcoin appears to be over for now, after one side in the fight acknowledged on Wednesday that it had not won sufficient support from other virtual currency backers.The camp that conceded had been hoping to double the number of transactions that could be run through the network that supports Bitcoin, in order to keep transactions cheap and fast.This expansion was vociferously opposed by many of the programmers working on the Bitcoin project, who worried that expanding the network quickly would make it easier for a company or government to exert influence over the decentralized system.The group pushing for expansion had planned to switch to a new version of the Bitcoin software next week, which would have created a split in the network and most likely wreaked havoc on the virtual currency.This planned split, though, was called off on Wednesday, after the companies proposing it failed to win significant support from the Bitcoin community.In an email, the leaders of several of the largest Bitcoin companies said that “unfortunately, it is clear that we have not built sufficient consensus for a clean block size upgrade at this time.”The price of Bitcoin shot up immediately after the email went out, hitting a new high, above $7,800, before retreating. The price has been steadily climbing and is up nearly 1,000 percent over the last year.The rising price has attracted many new users, from places like Japan and South Korea and from big hedge funds, even as the authorities in places like China have cracked down on the currency.All of the new people seeking access to Bitcoin have run up against a limit on the number of transactions that can flow through the system every 10 minutes, which was put in place during Bitcoin’s early years.Because of the limit, the network can process only around five transactions a second. That has led to delays on the network and has pushed up the price of getting a Bitcoin transaction through.Companies that help process Bitcoin payments have been pushing to lift the limit on Bitcoin transactions for several years, arguing that it will be necessary if Bitcoin wants to compete with Visa or PayPal.The opposing camp has argued that quickly expanding the number of transactions flowing through the network would mean only large companies could track Bitcoin transactions, taking power away from individual users.The proponents of keeping the so-called blocks of Bitcoin transactions small said Bitcoin should be viewed more as digital gold: a secure place to keep money, even if it can’t be moved around as quickly and cheaply.Many of the programmers working on the basic Bitcoin software — the so-called core developers — said they would stop working on Bitcoin if the block size was increased.They also complained that the companies pushing through the block size increase were doing so without properly consulting the community.Leaders on both sides of the Bitcoin debate have complained about receiving death threats and hacking attacks, and some top developers have migrated toward other virtual currencies.In August, some of the most outspoken proponents of expanding Bitcoin created their own version, known as Bitcoin Cash, which can handle more transactions than traditional Bitcoin.The price of Bitcoin Cash has gone up since August, but it remains only a small fraction of the size of Bitcoin.On Wednesday, the companies that had been pushing for big blocks said they were calling off their plans in order to restore some measure of peace to the community.“Although we strongly believe in the need for a larger block size, there is something we believe is even more important: keeping the community together,” the email said.The announcement said that the companies still believed that an increase in the size of Bitcoin blocks would be necessary, but that they were willing to wait until the community agreed on a way to deal with the issue.The people opposed to quickly expanding the network say they still wanted to make it easier and cheaper to use Bitcoin. But they hope this will be made possible by new networks built on top of Bitcoin, keeping the Bitcoin network itself more secure and decentralized.
Confirm or Deny: Jaron Lanier Maureen Dowd: You often get confused for the lead singer of Korn.Jaron Lanier: No, never. I’m often confused with Arnold Schwarzenegger. I’m kidding.Like others in Silicon Valley, you had cards printed up with the job title “Visionary.”No, I certainly never did.You once got a job application from Monica Lewinsky.This was the ’90s and the internet was really not happening for most people yet, so I needed a new executive assistant. So we put an ad in The Times with a fax number and one of the faxes was from lawyers representing Monica Lewinsky. I was like, “Is this for real?” And they told me that it was real.Angela Merkel turns you on.You know, I think she’s impressive. She’s actually a kind of interesting figure to me because she’s suffering now for trying to bring in immigrants, but at the same time her initial impulse was not to, and she suffered worse.Al Gore invented the internet.Confirm. The packet-switched networks had been around for a long time. But the internet’s a political invention. And yeah, he should be remembered much more prominently than he is as a creator of it.Elon Musk is from another planet.No, he’s from the same planet.Facebook is a stupid human trick.I would say Facebook is the end of all human tricks.Wikipedia’s the devil.When Wikipedia came out, I objected to it because I didn’t like this illusion that there was a single truth about many things, or one official point of view. But at this point, criticizing Wikipedia doesn’t make sense anymore. They’re just being killed by Google because Google regurgitates Wikipedia articles without Wikipedia getting any benefits.Scientists are on the verge of bringing back woolly mammoths.If someone wants to revive a woolly mammoth, my feeling is, I’m not here as a cultural critic. I’m just trying to deal with the most basic issues of how we can survive. As far as the details of what people are into, hell, if they want to fornicate with a sex robot on top of a resurrected woolly mammoth, I feel like it is not my business.You own a Microsoft Zune.Well, look at this house. How would I know?Yo-Yo Ma is overrated.Yo-Yo Ma is wonderful, a fine, fine cello player. He’s the sweetest guy in the world.You can’t play a Serpent or an Ophicleide.Deny. I dare you to stump me. I don’t think you can come up with an instrument that’s obscure enough that I can’t go and pick it up and play whatever you ask me to. (Laughs.) How’s that for arrogance?Virtual reality started as a way to make a better air guitar.No. (Laughs.) We did do air guitars with data gloves originally, though.The internet is just a passing fad.I’ve actually thought about that quite a lot. That’s a profound question. Because most of us who worked on it thought, “O.K., this will be here forever and this is the thing.” But it’s turning out so badly. I mean, I feel like it’s such a failure on so many important levels, that it’s conceivable that people will decide it’s over and try to do some other form of digital networking. The internet might be remembered as a failed thing. It breaks my heart to even think that, and I hope it isn’t true, but I’m beginning to wonder.To read more from Maureen Dowd’s interview with Jaron Lanier, click here.
Dinosaurs Might Not Be Extinct Had the Asteroid Struck Elsewhere Dinosaurs reigned supreme for more than 160 million years. Their dynasty came to a cataclysmic close 66 million years ago when an asteroid crashed into the Yucatán Peninsula in Mexico at a site now known as the Chicxulub crater, paving the way for mammals — and eventually humans — to inherit the Earth.But had the extraterrestrial impact happened nearly anywhere else, like in the ocean or in the middle of most continents, some scientists now say it is possible dinosaurs could have survived annihilation. Only 13 percent of the Earth’s surface harbored the ingredients necessary to turn the cosmic collision into this specific mass extinction event, according to a study published Thursday in the journal Scientific Reports.“I think dinosaurs could still be alive today,” if the asteroid had landed elsewhere, Kunio Kaiho, a paleontologist from Tohoku University in Japan and lead author on the study, said in an email.Other researchers questioned their findings.When the asteroid, which had a diameter about half the length of Manhattan, struck the coast of Mexico, it found a rich source of sulfur and hydrocarbons, or organic deposits like fossil fuels, according to the researchers. Scorching hot temperatures at the impact crater would have ignited the fuel. The combustion would have spewed soot and sulfur into the stratosphere in sufficient quantities to blot out the sun and change the climate, setting into motion the collapse of entire ecosystems and the extinction of three-quarters of all species on Earth.The Chicxulub impact spewed an extraordinary amount of black carbon, or soot, from the rocks, the researchers said. That in turn launched nearly 60 Hoover Dams worth of soot into the upper atmosphere, cooling the Earth’s surface by as much as 18 degrees Fahrenheit, they said.Not every place on the planet has the same amount of fossil fuel reserves and sulfur trapped beneath its surface. Locations with less hydrocarbons would have jetted less soot into the sky upon impact and created a smaller cooling effect around the globe. So Dr. Kaiho set out to determine the mass extinction hot spots in the Mesozoic real estate market.He created a map of what the world looked like 66 million years ago and used present day measurements of sedimentary rocks and organic compounds to estimate the global distribution of hydrocarbons during that time.Dr. Kaiho’s co-author Naga Oshima, a senior researcher at the Meteorological Research Institute in Japan, created a model that simulated asteroid impacts that ejected varying amounts of trapped soot from rock. Only areas with the highest amounts of hydrocarbons released enough soot into the stratosphere to cool the climate to catastrophic levels.Eighty-seven percent of Earth’s surface, places like most of present day India, China, the Amazon and Africa, would not have had high enough concentrations of hydrocarbons to seal the dinosaurs’ fate. But if the asteroid had hit marine coastal areas thriving with algae, which would have included present day Siberia, the Middle East and the eastern coast of North America, the bang would have been about as devastating to the dinosaurs and life on Earth as the Chicxulub impact.Scientists not involved with the paper criticized the underlying research.“The idea that location, location, location is important for an impact, I think is absolutely correct,” said Sean P.S. Gulick, a marine geophysicist from the University of Texas at Austin. But he questioned the authors’ assumptions on where the soot came from and how it affected the climate.Scientists agree that the planet was blanketed by soot after the impact, but they argue over how it got there. Dr. Gulick said the asteroid impact most likely hurled fiery debris into the sky, which then rained down and ignited firestorms around the world within hours of the crash. The wildfires, he contends, not the burning fossil fuels at the impact site, were what released immense amounts of soot into the stratosphere.Dr. Gulick said his previous work drilling into the Chicxulub crater also showed only small amounts of hydrocarbons were present at the time of the impact.Natalia Artemieva, a senior scientist at the Planetary Science Institute in Tucson, added that soot played a smaller role in driving global cooling than other materials following the asteroid’s impact.Dr. Kaiho responded to the criticism by saying that his previous soot analysis indicated that it had burned at a higher temperature than what is seen in soot from forest fires and that it all most likely came from the same source, which he said were the rocks at the Chicxulub asteroid impact site.
NASA’s Rocket to Deep Space May Not Be Ready Until 2020 NASA’s new heavy-lift rocket will not get off the ground until December 2019 at the earliest, and its maiden flight could easily slip to the middle of 2020, the space agency announced on Wednesday.The rocket known as the Space Launch System would succeed the Saturn 5 that took astronauts to the moon more than four decades ago. NASA says it plans to use the vehicle to take astronauts not only to the moon — one of the goals of the Trump administration — but someday Mars.Earlier this year, NASA acknowledged it would not be able to make the previously announced launch date of November 2018 for the first flight, which will not carry any astronauts.The completed review indicates a launch date of June 2020, but NASA said it might be possible to move up the launch date by six months.“This earlier launch date is reasonable and challenges the teams to stay focused on tasks without creating undue pressure,” William H. Gerstenmaier, NASA’s associate administrator for human exploration and operations, said at a hearing of the House space subcommittee on Thursday. “Furthermore, NASA is taking additional steps to reduce schedule risks for both known and unknown issues and protect for the earliest possible launch date.”At the request of the Trump administration, NASA examined the possibility of putting astronauts aboard the rocket’s first flight. But that would have further pushed back the launch date and added as much as $900 million to the program’s price tag. NASA and the administration decided to stick with the original plan.A crewless flight also allows more thorough testing, closer to the edge of the capabilities of the Orion capsule, the separate spacecraft carried by the rocket where astronauts will eventually be seated.Mr. Gerstenmaier told Congress that the additional delay for the first flight adds less than 15 percent to the cost of the rocket and slightly more than that for ground systems.The delays have been caused in part by technological hiccups as well as factors out of NASA’s control, like a tornado striking the Michoud Assembly Facility in Louisiana, where parts of the rocket are being built, in February.He said that NASA is still on track for the first flight with astronauts in 2023. The rocket could also be used in the early 2020s to propel a robotic probe to Jupiter to study Europa, a moon with a vast ocean under its icy crust that is thought to be one of the most promising places in the solar system to look for life.Mr. Gerstenmaier said the agency would soon a provide a framework of NASA’s plans beyond 2023.A report this week from NASA’s inspector general highlighted problems that the program still faces including very tight budget reserves.NASA also remains without a permanent leader since Charles F. Bolden Jr. stepped down as administrator on President Trump’s Inauguration Day. The 293 days that have passed since are the longest that NASA has been without a permanent administrator.On Wednesday, the nomination of Jim Bridenstine, an Oklahoma congressman, to be the next administrator narrowly won approval of a key Senate panel, with all 14 Republicans on the commerce, science and transportation committee voting in favor and all 13 Democrats opposed. Bill Nelson, a Democratic senator from Florida, said Mr. Bridenstine lacked the experience needed for running a large agency like NASA. He also criticized Mr. Bridenstine for past statements questioning climate change. The full Senate still needs to vote on the nomination.Some outside space experts have suggested that NASA should abandon the Space Launch System and turn to alternatives being developed by commercial companies like SpaceX and Blue Origin that would be cheaper. SpaceX is aiming for the first launch of its Falcon Heavy rocket within the next few months, but that rocket is not as powerful as the Space Launch System and is also years behind schedule.Mr. Bridenstine has been an advocate of commercial space companies but also supports the Space Launch System and Orion.At Thursday’s hearing, Lamar Smith, the Texas Republican who chairs the House Committee on Science, Space and Technology, expressed frustration over the continuing delays and cost overruns. “The more setbacks S.L.S. and Orion face, the more support builds for other options,” he said.Mr. Smith, however, will not be among those deciding the future of NASA. He announced last week that he would retire when his term ends in January 2019.
Lab Chimps Are Moving to Sanctuaries — Slowly BLUE RIDGE, Ga. — On the 16-hour ride from Louisiana, Bo looked out the window, took in the scenery, dozed and relaxed.He was traveling with five other male chimps from the New Iberia Research Center in Lafayette, La., where they had been members of a colony of nearly 200 animals kept for biomedical and other research.During the ride, some of the other chimps hooted, restless and unsettled. Not Bo. “He’s the best,” said the driver of the truck.The animals arrived at Project Chimps, a sanctuary at the southern end of the Blue Ridge Mountains about 100 miles north of Atlanta, at 6:30 a.m. one day last spring. As the sanctuary staff began to open the truck and move the chimps’ cages inside the facility, the occupants hooted and screamed, anxious and uncertain about what was going on.The first cage was opened into a sort of antechamber, and a chimp named Jason was first to explore his new home, rushing with what seemed like nervous energy through a small door into the large habitat.Called a villa, the enclosed space is built like an extremely large metal cage, about 1,500 square feet and two stories high with metal platforms at different levels.Jabari, the second arrival, slowly joined Jason to explore the new enclosure, but they kept their distance from each other. Lance was third in line, hesitant to leave the small antechamber. The staff waited about a half-hour for him to build up his nerve.Then, hoping to encourage Lance, they decided to let in Bo, the group’s dominant chimp.Bo knuckle-walked, casually and confidently — knuckle-swaggered, you might say — into the large enclosure. Lance followed immediately. And then the group hugs began.Eddie and Stirlene, the last two chimps, came through the entrance to more hugs. The group’s relief and happiness was so infectious that all the humans smiled. The chimps lip-smacked and held one another’s genitals.“That’s normal reassuring behavior,” Jen Feuerstein, the top administrator at the sanctuary, told me.Bo was in the house, and all was well.It probably will stay that way in the long run: The era of biomedical research on chimpanzees in the United States is effectively over. Given the nearly 100-year history of experimenting on chimps, the changes seemed to come fairly quickly once they began.In 2011, the director of the National Institutes of Health, Francis Collins, declared that the N.I.H. would fund no new biomedical research using chimps, which he described as “our closest relatives in the animal kingdom” deserving of “special consideration and respect.”His comments were both stunning and obvious. Jane Goodall, the famed primatologist, and others already had shown the world the richness of chimp intelligence and social life; molecular biology had revealed that humans and chimps share 98 percent of their DNA. But the biomedical scientific establishment has long emphasized the importance of animal research.Dr. Collins’s decision reflected widespread ethical concerns among scientists about the treatment of such social, intelligent animals. But on a practical level, the care of chimps is costly, and they aren’t always a good model in which to study human diseases. They’re also a magnet for public concern.By 2015, the N.I.H. had gone through several stages of decision-making and concluded that it would retire all chimps it owned, retaining none for potential emergency use — in case of a human epidemic, for instance. The agency owns about 220 chimps outside of those now in sanctuaries and supports another 80, which will also be retired.That year the Fish and Wildlife Service classified all chimpanzees as endangered, removing a longstanding exemption for captive chimps that had allowed biomedical experiments. The decision made such research illegal without a permit requiring that any such experiments benefit chimpanzees. Privately funded medical research on privately owned chimps also was effectively banned.Currently, about 547 chimps are still held at research institutions, according to ChimpCARE, a site that tracks all chimps in the United States. Some of them are owned or supported by the N.I.H., and some are owned by research institutes like New Iberia, which is part of the University of Louisiana at Lafayette.All the government chimps are headed to Chimp Haven, a sanctuary in Keithville, La., where they will have a full social life and room to roam outdoors.Some critics say the process has been unnecessarily slow, but both Chimp Haven and the N.I.H. say transfers are moving more quickly now. The sanctuary has accepted 14 chimps in the past two months and is expecting more before the end of the year.Chimp Haven, with a staff of 50, more than 200 chimps and a 30-year history, has had a lot of experience caring for retired chimps. They are kept in mixed groups of various sizes and their social interactions monitored.To prevent breeding new chimps that would have to spend their lives in captivity, Chimp Haven gives all the males vasectomies.But “vasectomies do fail,” said Raven Jackson-Jewett, the attending veterinarian at the sanctuary. “Conan was the one that taught us that.”Conan had the procedure but somehow fathered three youngsters anyway, including Tracy, now 10 and a favorite of visitors. Dr. Jackson-Jewett said that because of Conan, Chimp Haven had learned that chimp vasectomies fail more often than those in humans.The staff changed its technique, re-vasectomized about 75 chimps with the new method, and hasn’t had a pregnancy since.The sanctuary also has learned to care for frail chimps. Many animals from labs have been infected with H.I.V. and hepatitis for vaccine experiments, and some have diabetes (not related to experiments).They are often old: Some arrive near 50 years of age, and the lifespan of chimps in captivity runs from 50 to 60 years. Occasionally chimps are deemed too old even to handle the stress of being sent to the sanctuary.The sanctuaries hope eventually to put themselves out of business. If all goes as planned, in another 50 years or so, there will be no more lab retirees.Chimps will still be in zoos and, as the laws now stand, private owners could still breed them. But since the demand for their use in research is now zero, that is unlikely to happen on a large scale.Most privately owned laboratory chimpanzees are also headed for retirement centers. New Iberia has shipped 22 animals to Project Chimps, where Bo and his cohort now live, but still has nearly 200.The Project Chimps facility, which formerly housed gorillas, is still being renovated for chimps. They will get to play in eight acres of walled-in open space, with trees, a stream and an open meadow — once the walls are fixed. (Unlike gorillas, chimps are agile climbers.)Those left at New Iberia aren’t isolated. They live in groups in large, dome-shaped outdoor cages. The domes have a bit less than a 1,000 square feet of floor space.Although chimps in research were once housed in smaller cages, and in isolation for experiments, practices have changed; labs and sanctuaries have recognized that it is cruel to house chimps alone.The only other private chimps still at research institutions include 46 owned by the Yerkes National Primate Research Center at Emory University in Atlanta, and one at Georgia State University. Yerkes is looking for retirement facilities for its chimps and has sent seven to the Chattanooga Zoo.Yerkes also sent eight chimpanzees  to an unaccredited zoo in England, prompting an outcry from animal welfare advocates in this country and in Europe. The move prompted a lawsuit, because the Fish and Wildlife Service approved it even though advocates insisted there were better options in the United States.Yerkes said that the English zoo was well equipped and enlisted comment from Dr. Goodall, who said she had visited the facility and supported the move.The lawsuit was the first test of the protections offered to chimps by the endangered species classification. Exportation requires a permit from the Fish and Wildlife Service, which can only be granted if the action benefits the species.The agency accepted Yerkes’s argument that a donation by the English zoo to a group that had never before worked with chimps fulfilled that requirement. The decision outraged many primatologists and chimp advocates, but in the end the courts allowed the move.Within the animal welfare community, some of the elation about the government decisions of a few years ago has now, inevitably, been replaced by a recognition of the difficult logistics, the need for continued fund-raising and the occasional roadblocks.“Patience has been a huge lesson for me,” Laura Bonar, chief program and policy officer at Animal Protection of New Mexico, said in an interview. Ms. Bonar was one of the activists who had worked to bring about the decisions to end experimentation.Patience is useful even in the case of chimps like Bo, who have already been transferred to sanctuaries. Soon, perhaps by the end of this year, Bo and the other chimps at the sanctuary are expected to step outside of steel bars for the first time in their lives.They have been doing well. Janie Gibbons, one of the staff members who takes care of the chimps, said Bo continues to lead by example — as he did recently when the group encountered something they never seen before.The first time they were given tomatoes, they were flummoxed. “Bo is very brave and tries things first,” said Ms. Gibbons. “He took one and very meticulously ate the peel first, then the fruit.”Satisfied that tomatoes were safe, the others followed. But not all in a rush: Jabari threw his first tomato against the wall, even though he and the other chimps had gathered around Bo and peered as closely as they could as he ate the alien fruit.Now the chimps all eat tomatoes as if they were apples. And that’s what the future may hold for all chimps: open space and tomatoes.But it’s just going to take a while.
The Circadian Clock in Your Nose When people tell you, “wake up and smell the roses,” they might be giving you bad advice. Your sense of smell may fluctuate in sensitivity over the course of 24 hours, in tune with our circadian clocks, with your nose best able to do its job during the hours before you go to sleep, according to a study published last month.The work, reported in the journal Chemical Senses, is part of a larger push to explore whether adolescents’ senses of taste and smell influence obesity. Rachel Herz, a sensory researcher at Brown University, and her colleagues designed this study to see if there might be times of day when the sense of smell was more powerful — perhaps making food smell particularly inviting.For the experiment, 37 adolescents ranging in age from 12 to 15 came into a lab for a very long sleepover party. For nine days, they followed a strict schedule to allow researchers to focus on the circadian clock, which helps control wake and sleep, but also influences other processes in the body, including metabolism.While more research is needed to test whether the results fully apply to adults, Dr. Herz says that as you grow up, the makeup of the smell receptors inside your nose doesn’t seem to change, although there is evidence your body clock may.The team kept track of where the teenagers were in their circadian cycle by measuring their saliva’s levels of melatonin, a hormone that rises and falls regularly over the course of the day. Every few hours, the children took a scent test, sniffing different concentrations of a chemical that smells like roses. The researchers recorded the lowest concentration they could detect at each time point.When the results were tallied up, the researchers saw a range of responses. “Nobody has the same nose,” Dr. Herz said. Some adolescents had only very mild changes in sensitivity, while sensitivity altered dramatically in others.Averaged together, however, the results showed that overall the circadian clock does affect smell, and that the times when the children’s noses were most sensitive tended to correspond to the evening, with an average peak of 9 p.m.“The results make sense — the circadian clock affects virtually every organ system in the body,” writes Dr. Leslie Vosshall, a researcher at Rockefeller University who studies smell and was not involved in the study, in an email.Smell was at its lowest ebb, intriguingly, from about 2 a.m. to 10 a.m.It is already known that when we are asleep, a strong smell won’t disturb us the way a loud noise or a bright light will. Perhaps the biological machinery behind smell shuts itself down for the night, at least in some people. But Dr. Herz speculates that having stronger olfactory abilities as dusk fell might have helped our ancestors survive.“It really underscores the importance of auditory fire alarms,” she said.Still, the experiment was designed to test the effect of the circadian clock, and that is not the only factor involved in smell sensitivity. Researchers have already found that another big player is how long someone has been awake and what variety of smells they have been exposed to. It’s likely that all of these have a role in determining when, in real life outside the lab, our sense of smell works best.
A Very Good Dog Hunts Very Bad Ants Tobias is a Labrador retriever with one job: sniffing out invasive Argentine ants wherever they hide. He’s really good at it, and with his help, a fragile island ecosystem may be spared a repeat inundation with the pests.Santa Cruz Island is 25 miles off the coast of Southern California, part of Channel Islands National Park. The island’s rich, rugged environment — which includes more than 1,000 kinds of plants and animals, including the bald eagle and the island fox — is threatened by Argentine ants, one of the world’s most successful and wily invasive species.The ants are one in a long line of threats that The Nature Conservancy has worked to overcome since it bought most of the island in 1978. In one section, the ants chased away flower-pollinating bees, native ants, spiders and other insects crucial to local ecology.They are nearly impossible to get rid of; it had never been done with an infestation as large as Santa Cruz’s. But Christina Boser, an ecologist who leads the conservancy’s ant eradication project, devised an aerial assault, dropping tiny sugar water beads spiked with diluted poison from helicopters.The campaign, largely in 2015 and 2016, appears to have killed off the ants. Still, if even one colony has survived, this elaborate effort might have been wasted.That’s where Tobias comes in. Once he pinpoints the faint pheromone scent left by this particular species of ant — and no other — he will sit down and look at his handler with the excited expectation of a child on Christmas morning. Tobias’s reward is his “wubba,” a soft blue ball.“We have developed a really special bond,” said Kyren Zimmerman, a handler with the nonprofit Working Dogs for Conservation, headquartered in Bozeman, Mont.Dogs are renowned for their scenting skills, whether they’re detecting narcotics, bedbugs, bombs or tumors. Increasingly, since the 1990s, scientists have trained them to aid in conservation.It is a rare package of traits that suit some dogs to this kind of work, the most important being a fanatical toy obsession and high energy. This is a personality that can be difficult for pet owners, which may be why Tobias and others in the Working Dogs for Conservation “pack” were found in shelters.“They love what they do. They just needed that purpose and direction,” said the group’s co-founder, Deborah Woollett.In March, Tobias and Mr. Zimmerman underwent weeks of basic Argentine ant training. Then they took a choppy ferry ride to the island and got to work.By summer’s end, the pair hadn’t found any new ant colonies in all their hiking and bushwhacking — a great sign that the eradication really worked.Ms. Boser believes there’s no other dog in the world trained like Tobias to detect Argentine ants in a wild landscape. Importantly, he is both cheaper and more effective than other search methods.Ms. Boser and Dr. Woollett are now working to publish their training methodology. With Argentine ants a major pest on six continents, they believe dogs with Tobias’s skills could be in demand.“It’s an emerging science, but it’s actually a very needed science,” Ms. Boser said.Monitoring will continue, but with the ants seemingly gone, the area’s ecology has already improved.“Being able to put your towel down on the beach and watch the sunset is nice,” Ms. Boser said. “You can do that now without having ants crawl all over you.”Tobias, however, has been happier since leaving in September. He’s moved to nearby San Clemente Island, where he’s helping scientists find Argentine ants in areas that are still infested.It’s a little closer to an ant-sniffing dog’s vision of heaven. “He’s getting a lot more of his favorite wubba time now,” Mr. Zimmerman said.
A Grecian Artifact Evokes Tales From the ‘Iliad’ and ‘Odyssey’ Two years ago, archaeologists excavating an ancient grave at Pylos in southwestern Greece pulled out a grime-encrusted object, less than an inch and half long, that looked like some kind of large bead. They put it aside to focus on more prominent items, like gold rings, that also were packed into the rich grave.But later, as a conservator removed the lime accretions on the bead’s face, it turned out to be something quite different: a seal stone, a gemstone engraved with a design that can be stamped on clay or wax.The seal stone’s image, a striking depiction of one warrior in battle with two others, is carved in remarkably fine detail, with some features that are barely visible to the naked eye. The image is easier to appreciate in a large-scale drawing of the original.“The detail is astonishing, especially given the size. Aesthetically, it’s a masterpiece of miniature art,” said John Bennet, director of the British School at Athens, an archaeological institute.“The stunning combat scene on the seal stone, one of the greatest masterpieces of Aegean art, bears comparison with some of the drawings in the Michelangelo show now at the Metropolitan Museum of Art,” said Malcolm H. Wiener, an expert on Aegean prehistory and a trustee emeritus of the Met.The seal stone comes from an untouched shaft grave near the ancient palace of Pylos. The grave was discovered in May 2015 by Jack L. Davis and Sharon R. Stocker, archaeologists at the University of Cincinnati who had been digging at Pylos for more than 25 years.“It was after cleaning, during the process of drawing and photography, that our excitement slowly rose as we gradually came to realize that we had unearthed a masterpiece,” they wrote in the journal Hesperia.The seal stone presents two mysteries. One is how and why it was engraved in such detail. The other is whether its battle scene, strongly evocative of those in Homer’s “Iliad” and “Odyssey,” depicts an event that contributed to the oral tradition behind the works of Homer.The seal stone’s owner, known as the Griffin Warrior after the mythical animal depicted in his grave, was buried around 1450 B.C. He lived at a critical period when the Minoan civilization of Crete was being transferred to cities of the Greek mainland.Local chieftains, as the Griffin Warrior may have been, used precious items from Crete to advertise their membership in the Greek-speaking elite of the incipient Mycenaean civilization, the first on mainland Europe. Their descendants, a century or so later, built the great palaces at Pylos, Mycenae and Tiryns, places mentioned by Homer.Dr. Davis and Dr. Stocker believe that the seal stone, like other objects in the Griffin Warrior’s grave, was made on Crete. Work of such quality was not being produced anywhere on the Greek mainland at the time. The detail is so fine that it seems the engraver would have needed a magnifying glass, as would admirers of his work.Yet no magnifying implements have been found on Crete from this era. Perhaps the engraver was nearsighted, the two archaeologists suggest.Fritz Blakolmer, an expert on Aegean art at the University of Vienna, argues that the seal stone is a miniature copy of a much larger original, probably a stucco-embellished wall painting like those found at the Palace of Knossos on Crete. He said the seal must have been engraved by someone with a magnifying glass, even though none has been found, and dismissed the possibility that people of that era had sharper eyesight than today.The seal, carved on a hard stone known as agate, shows a victorious hero slaying an adversary while a third warrior lies dead in the foreground. The seal stone is mounted so that it can be worn on the wrist, and indeed the hero is wearing just such an item, as if it were a wristwatch.The two defeated warriors seem to belong to the same group, because both are wearing patterned kilts whereas the hero sports a codpiece. The scene evidently represents some event that would have been familiar to the Minoans who made the seal stone and to the Griffin Warrior’s community.The seal stone’s possible relevance to the Homeric epics is intriguing but elusive. Early archaeologists, such as Heinrich Schliemann, who first excavated Troy and Mycenae, believed the “Iliad” recounted historical events and were quick to see proof of this in the artifacts they found.Later archaeologists were more doubtful, but allowed that the destruction of Troy in 1200 B.C. could have been remembered in oral poetry for 500 years until the Homeric poems were first written down, around 700 B.C.The Griffin Warrior was buried around 1450 B.C., distancing him even further from the first written version of Homer. Still, there is some evidence that the oral tradition behind the Homeric epics traces as far back as Linear B, the first Greek writing system.Linear B was adapted by the Mycenaean Greeks from Linear A, used by the Minoans. The oldest known Linear B inscriptions date to 1450 B.C., and the script disappeared after the collapse of Mycenaean civilization around 1200 B.C.Some of the scansion problems in the Homeric poems “can be resolved if you restore older forms of Greek which are consistent with the dialect recorded in Linear B documents,” said Dr. Bennet of the British School at Athens.So the oral tradition that led to the Homeric epics perhaps stretched over seven centuries.“We’re not saying this is a representation from Homer,” Dr. Stocker said of the tableau on the seal stone, while admitting it would be “fun to believe” the hero is Achilles. Rather, the image “is part of a cycle of stories familiar to both Mycenaeans and Minoans.”Dr. Blakolmer, too, finds it tempting to see the figures on the seal as Homeric heroes, like Hector or Nestor, but in his view the temptation must be resisted.“Fifty years ago, you would find nice attributions to Homeric heroes, but today’s academics are very careful in their Homeric attributions,” he said. “We have to make our own mistakes, not theirs.”
The Cool Beginnings of a Volcano’s Supereruption A supervolcano’s underground ocean of magma isn’t the seething, red-hot molten lava you might imagine. Instead, it’s likely at a low enough temperature to be solid.That’s according to a new analysis of volcanic leftovers from an ancient California supereruption, which shows that the magma melted shortly before the volcano erupted. The findings, published Monday in Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences, might help scientists forecast when such volcanoes pose a threat.The supereruption in question occurred 765,000 years ago, carving a vast volcanic depression that’s 20 miles long and 10 miles wide, now known as the Long Valley Caldera near California’s Mammoth Mountain. In the process, it ejected a giant quantity of ash and hot gas over one nightmarish week, enough to leave a layer of debris that spread from the Pacific Ocean to Nebraska.“It would have completely wiped out everything within 50 kilometers of the caldera,” said Brad Singer, a geologist at the University of Wisconsin in Madison and the study’s co-author. “All the vegetation and biota in that area would have been extinguished.”Scientists don’t expect Long Valley to erupt again, but given enough time another supervolcano will likely scar our planet. So, Nathan Andersen, a geologist now at Georgia Institute of Technology, analyzed 49 crystals from the Bishop Tuff — a fossilized ash deposit from Long Valley’s supereruption.These crystals — and the elements locked within — contain clues about the supervolcano before and after it erupted. Take the element argon as an example. Because hot crystals can’t retain argon, the team didn’t expect to see it until after the eruption. Instead, they found that roughly half of the crystals contained argon that is as much as 16,000 years older than the eruption.The data — which Tiffany Rivera, a geologist at Westminster College in Utah who was not involved in the study, calls “exquisite” — have surprising implications.They suggest that those crystals with older argon were not stored in hot magma for very long before the eruption. In fact, argon can only be retained in crystals that are surrounded by magma that’s less than 500 degrees Celsius. For magma, that’s quite chilly — so chilly in fact, that it would have been solid.And yet, scientists estimate that when the supereruption occurred, the magma was at 785 degrees Celsius. To explain the discrepancy, the team suspects that heat infiltrated the system so quickly that the argon didn’t have time to escape. This heat is likely what awoke the cool supervolcano, pushing it toward eruption in less than a few hundred years — perhaps within decades.That’s a far cry from the lethargic time scales that often define the field of geology. And yet, recent research at the Yellowstone supervolcano in Wyoming and the Taupo supervolcano in New Zealand has also suggested that the events leading up to supereruptions can occur on human time scales.The findings suggest that the supervolcano had to wake up from an extremely cold state, raising questions about how a solid ocean of magma could melt and mobilize so rapidly.“The physics of how this all works is still being worked on and debated,” Dr. Andersen says. But many think that an injection of fresh magma further below the volcano likely did the trick.And given that Long Valley’s magma sits a mere five kilometers below the surface, such an event wouldn’t have gone unnoticed, Dr. Gualda says. Waters circulating in the crust would have started to heat up, generating new hydrothermal features like geysers, hot springs and mud pots as the landscape started to boil over. The ground, too, would have swelled upward as the supervolcano’s magma reservoir grew.Should other supervolcanoes play by the same rules as Long Valley, the results could help scientists read the signals of unrest preceding future supereruptions or even smaller eruptions.
After the Dinosaurs’ Demise, Many Mammals Seized the Day When the dinosaurs are away, the mammals will play.That’s the basic idea behind the “nocturnal bottleneck” hypothesis, a concept proposed in 1942 that suggested mammals could have only survived in a dinosaur-dominated world by avoiding the sharp-toothed beasts during the day and coming out at night.Mammalogists have long thought the earliest shared ancestor of all mammals was nocturnal, and now a study published Monday provides a potential date for when the furry creatures stopped cowering in the shadows and started venturing into the daylight.The researchers found that the first mammals to be active during both day and night appeared around 65.8 million years ago, just 200,000 years after the extinction event that led to the demise of most dinosaurs. They were most likely the ancestors of even-toed ungulates, like today’s cattle, llamas and hippopotamuses, as well as the cetaceans like whales and dolphins.“In evolutionary time 200,000 years are hardly anything. It’s almost immediately,” said Roi Maor, a doctoral student at Tel Aviv University in Israel and University College London, and lead author of the paper that appeared in Nature Ecology & Evolution.They also found the first mammals that were clearly diurnal, or only active during the daytime, appeared about 52.4 million years ago, some 13 million years after the dinosaurs died out. Among these mammals were early monkeys and apes, the ancestors of today’s gorillas, gibbons and humans.Mr. Maor cautioned that his study only showed a correlation, not causation, between when nonavian dinosaurs went extinct and when mammals became daytime creatures. But the finding adds support for the 75-year-old hypothesis describing how our ancestors inherited the day after dinosaurs disappeared.Using a computer program, Mr. Maor and his colleagues plugged in behavioral data from 2,415 mammal species that noted whether the species was nocturnal, diurnal, or cathemeral (irregularly active at day or night). The analysis also evaluated ancestry information that showed how closely related the species were to one another.“Think of it as an atlas. We show all the species alive today and each one of their ancestors is mapped onto that road map,” he said. “Our algorithm told us whether or not their ancestors were diurnal or nocturnal.”It showed the expected behavioral patterns of ancestors going back at least 166 million years ago during the Mesozoic, and highlighted a shift from nocturnal to daylight activity among some mammalian ancestors after about 66 million years ago, when calamity struck the planet.Their data set represented 91 percent of all mammal families. About 60 percent were nocturnal, like the vampire bat, the fennec fox and the four-toed hedgehog, and 26 percent were diurnal like the eastern gray squirrel, giraffes and humans. Most of the rest were characterized as cathemeral like the star-nosed mole, the European rabbit and the muskrat.Lars Schmitz, an evolutionary biologist from The Claremont Colleges, in California who was not involved in the study, said he was excited to see such a large comparative study, and that the study’s finding of when mammals emerged in the daylight supports the nocturnal bottleneck hypothesis.“This seems to support what most people have been saying, that mammals were predominantly in the nocturnal niche and could not expand into the daytime until the dinosaurs were gone,” he said.But he noted that a limitation of the work is that it only includes living species and not extinct ones. Without knowing their behavior, the researchers may be missing some important clues about when mammals first carpe diem-ed.
The Humongous Fungus and the Genes That Made It That Way Thousands of years ago, two microscopic spores spawned and created a monster. It grew — up to three feet a year — sending out dark, gnarly, threadlike organs called rhizomorphs that explored the subterranean darkness, foraging for food. Now it’s a nebulous body, a tangled mat beneath the Oregon soil that occupies an area the size of three Central Parks and may weigh as much as 5,000 African elephants.Its scientific name is Armillaria ostoyae, but you can call it The Humongous Fungus. It’s the largest known terrestrial organism on the planet, according to the United States Forest Service. It’s also a deadly forest pathogen.Although none (that we know of) are as big, there are many others in the Armillaria genus. These fungi cause root rot disease in plants in forests, parks, orchards and vineyards across North America, Europe and Asia. What sets them apart from other fungi is those stringy rhizomorphs that find weak trees, colonize their roots, kill and eat them.An international group of scientists led by Hungarian researchers now have completed the first step to defeating these fungal demogorgons. In a genetic analysis published Monday in the journal Nature Ecology and Evolution, they uncovered tactics that help Armillaria develop their unusual rhizomorphs, grow so big and get so good at killing host plants.The biologists compared the genomes of four Armillaria species to 22 related fungi and looked for unique or special proteins and gene families. They also compared the rhizomorphs to their fruiting bodies, called honey mushrooms, at different stages of development.They found that Armillaria fungi had expanded their genomes by copying certain chunks of it, which meant additional capacity for making new rules of behavior. In a way, the fungus had more genes involved in making it really good at being bad. For example, the team found extra proteins for killing cells and gobbling up the glue that holds plant cell walls together.They also found special tactics for hiding: Armillaria can reabsorb substances lost in the soil that alert trees of their presence and avoid the tree’s full defenses. This lets them kill trees undetected and start leeching nutrients from the dead stuff before competing bacteria and fungi arrived. And if and when competitors do show up, Armillaria can create a chemical environment intolerable for them.They also found that rhizomorphs and fruiting bodies shared most genes, suggesting to the researchers that at some point the organs hijacked an ancient tool kit for making those cartoonish fruiting bodies we generally call mushrooms. But specific genetic traits in the rhizomorphs — a red-sensing photoreceptor and pheromones related to mating — may help them seek out their victims, the researchers speculated.However they find their hosts, pathogenic Armillaria are ancient. They arrived an estimated 21 million years ago and stuck around for a reason.In healthy, natural, diverse forests, the fungi absorb carbon and kill only the weakest trees, like gangly, underground forest rangers. But in monocultures made up of genetically identical trees, stresses like drought can cause all the trees to fall weak simultaneously.“This is how Armillaria can wipe out entire forests,” said György Sipos, a biologist at the University of Sopron in Hungary who led the study with László Nagy, of the Hungarian Academy of Sciences.While you’re unlikely to spot a fungal monster like the Humongous Fungus lurking beneath your soil, honey mushrooms can sometimes appear on the surface clumped together around tree trunks. And beneath the bark, you may find the indicators of infection that look like dark shoe strings and white paint. You can try to remove the stump, but there’s not much you can do from there because rhizomorphs go deep and live long.On the brighter side, you may get to witness foxfire, the glow of rotting wood that results from some infections.
Male Mammoths Died in ‘Silly Ways’ More Often Than Females, Study Finds Swallowed by a sinkhole. Washed away by a mudflow. Drowned after falling through thin ice.These are the fates that many unlucky mammoths suffered in Siberia thousands of years ago. Their well-preserved fossils have provided paleobiologists with insight into their prehistoric lives. Now, after performing a genetic analysis on the remains from the furry victims of natural traps, a team of scientists made a striking discovery: Most were male.“In many species, males tend to do somewhat stupid things that end up getting them killed in silly ways, and it appears that may have been true for mammoths also,” said Love Dalén, an evolutionary biologist from the Swedish Museum of Natural History.In a study published Thursday in the journal Current Biology, he and his colleagues analyzed DNA from nearly 100 mammoth bones, teeth and tusks, and found that about two-thirds came from males. They speculate the reason for the skewed sex-ratio may have to do with the risky behavior that young males take after leaving the protection of their mothers to live on their own.“Old females are very knowledgeable, they know best,” he said.The finding was an accident, according to Patrícia Pečnerová, a doctoral student at Stockholm University and lead author on the study. It came while she was entering data for a different project on mammoth genetics.“While filling this in on the spreadsheet we saw that there were too many males, more than there should be,” she said. “We were really surprised to see there were more than twice as many males as females because there was no previous research or indication that that should be the case.”A previous study of mammoth remains, in Hot Springs, S.D., had found that among 14 dead specimens, 13 were young adult males and only one was female. But Ms. Pečnerová’s study investigated sex ratios using genetics.The 98 specimens that the team had analyzed came from across the northern part of Siberia and had been collected over the course of four decades. The oldest were more than 60,000 years old, and the youngest, a specimen known as “Lonely Boy,” was about 4,000 years old. The genetic data did not provide insight into how old the mammoths were when they died, only their sex.To obtain the DNA, the team first had to limit contamination. For that, they worked in a clean laboratory and wore lab suits similar to what Ebola doctors wear. They shaved off a few millimeters from the surface of their samples and then drilled into them to extract genetic data. They found that 66 were males and 29 were females.The biggest limitation in the study is that their explanation for the skew is speculative and based mostly on the behavior of present-day elephants. The thought is that mammoths, like today’s elephants, lived in matriarchal societies where adult females protected the young. But around the ages of 14 or 15 when puberty set in, males left their herd and either became loners or joined bachelor groups, which were often led by inexperienced males. That was when they were more likely to do something risky, and find themselves stuck in frozen muck.The natural traps buried their bodies quickly, protecting them from scavengers. The researchers said that their findings say nothing about the sex ratio of mammoths when they were alive, which they think may have been 50-50, only that males were more likely to die in ways that kept their remains preserved for thousands of years.Beth Shapiro, an evolutionary molecular biologist at the University of California, Santa Cruz, who was not involved in the study, said she was surprised by the results and that the team’s hypothesis was sensible given what we know about elephant behavior. She added that it would be interesting to see if there is a sex ratio difference for other prehistoric mammals preserved in the permafrost, like bison and horses.Daniel Fisher, a paleontologist at the University of Michigan, said the hypothesis was well-founded, but that tusks should not have been used in the study because males often broke their tusks while fighting each other, but that did not mean they died.The authors said that even discounting their tusk fragments and only using teeth, bone and hair samples, they still had more dead males.
Ancient Fossil Offers a New European Ancestor to Giraffes A near-perfect fossil unearthed close to Madrid appears to be an ancient European ancestor of giraffes, representing a new species in the family and one that had two sets of bony bumps on its head rather than the single set of modern giraffes.Older fossils in the family known as giraffids have been found before, but none in such pristine condition, said Ari Grossman, an associate professor of anatomy at Midwestern University in Glendale, Ariz., who was not involved in the finding but said the whole field would benefit from it.“It’s something most paleontologists dream of and very rarely find,” Dr. Grossman said. “The discovery in and of itself was breathtaking.”Fossils of three other animals of the same species named Decennatherium rex by the researchers were also found, according to a new study in the journal PLOS One. They were not as complete, but all are about nine million years old and provide evidence that ancestors in the giraffe family lived deep inside Europe much earlier than had been suspected. The fossils also suggest that there were physical differences between males and females.“It fills a lot of gaps in what we knew about giraffes,” said Dr. María Ríos, the study’s lead author and a researcher with the Museo Nacional de Ciencias Naturales-CSIC in Madrid.Everyone thinks of a giraffe’s long neck as its distinguishing feature. But its biological family members are defined by two characteristics unrelated to necks: they all have double-lobed canine teeth, and ossicones, the bony outcroppings on the top of their heads. Modern giraffes have two small to medium ossicones. The new species had a double set, with the back pair larger than the front.Decennatherium rex looked more like a giant moose than either of its living family members, said Nikos Solounias, a giraffe evolution expert and professor of anatomy at the New York Institute of Technology, College of Osteopathic Medicine.The male animal stood about nine feet tall to the top of its head, 6.5 feet across and weighed about two tonnes – smaller than a modern giraffe, but much larger than an okapi, said Dr. Ríos, who received her Ph.D. based on her work with the fossils. In the female Decennatherium rex fossils, the ossicones measure only about two inches, but in the male the large set extends a full 16 inches. “The specimen we found is like a giant and bulky okapi with huge posterior horns,” she said.Because both the male and female Decennatherium rex had ossicones, Dr. Grossman said that may push scientists to reconsider their assumption that ossicones evolved to help males compete with one other for female attention.Today, there are only two living members of the giraffid family: the modern giraffe, familiar from zoos and African safaris, and the okapi, which has zebra-striped back legs and lives in the rain forests of central Africa. Some scientists have recently argued that modern giraffes are in fact four distinct species. But there have been about 30 giraffid species over time, ranging from the Indian subcontinent and China to the Mediterranean coast, said Dr. Solounias, who is also a research associate of the American Museum of Natural History in New York.Giraffids began appearing around the beginning of the Miocene, 23 million years ago, he said, probably in what is now Pakistan and India.The greatest diversity was found on the Greek Island of Samos, near Turkey, he said, where there were probably eight to nine different species at about the time Decennatherium rex was roaming Spain alongside one or two related species.The site where the fossil was found, Cerro de los Batallones (Batallones butte), about an hour south of Madrid’s city center, was first discovered in 1991, Dr. Ríos said. The finds in the clay-like soil have included a rich collection of carnivores, including big cats and bears, as well as giant tortoises, rhinoceroses and a giant elephant-like creature, she said. “It’s really cool.” The giraffe fossils were found in an area that has been the site of digging since about 2007.Dr. Ríos and her colleagues used information from the new fossil find to redraw the giraffid family tree. The new tree puts giraffes and okapis relatively far away from each other evolutionarily, Dr. Grossman said, adding to the understanding of these animals and their relationship. “We’re preserving relics of two very distinct groups of giraffes that were morphologically very different,” he said.The new family tree, Dr. Ríos said, “is a first step to unravel where they really come from.”The quality of the fossils and others at the site suggest that there will be many more research findings there, said Dr. Ríos, adding that this past summer she and the team found a complete fossilized rhinoceros.
When This Sea Slug Eats, It Prefers the Turducken of the Sea You’re camping in the woods, about to tuck into some salmon you’ve caught when a bear appears. It’s waiting for you to eat your fish, so it can swoop in to eat you.This is a steal for the bear. For the price of a human, it’s bagged a human-salmon combo meal.This scenario is hypothetical, but the feeding strategy it illustrates is not, according to a study published Wednesday in Biology Letters. In the report, a team of scientists from Britain and Italy termed the tactic “kleptopredation” and described it not in bears, but in a brilliantly colored sea slug, Cratena peregrina, that’s about the length of a soda can tab and commonly found in the Mediterranean.These psychedelic slugs, also called nudibranchs, are known to feed on tentacled marine organisms known as hydroids, which are related to corals and sea anemones. They pop the polyps off the hydroids as one might pick a flower off a stalk. But based on lab experiments, the authors of the new paper suggest the slugs prefer to eat hydroids that have just ensnared plankton, a food item nudibranchs aren’t capable of capturing for themselves.Think of it like wielding a living fishing rod. Or eating a turducken. Whichever your preferred analogy, kleptopredation — using one prey item to obtain another prey item — falls outside ecologists’ traditional classifications of feeding behavior. There’s predation, and there’s so-called kleptoparasitism (when one animal takes food from another animal, like a pack of hyenas stealing a fresh kill from a lion). But kleptopredation is something new.Patrick Krug, a nudibranch expert at the California State University, Los Angeles who was not involved in the study, said this “steal your meal, and eat you, too” strategy potentially rewrites how ecologists understand food chains. “You usually think of a predator eating a prey item, not eating what the prey item is eating,” he said.To test whether Cratena nudibranchs had a penchant for hydroids that had freshly eaten, the authors did lab experiments on 25 slugs, presenting each with four mesh bags. These bags held nothing, empty hydroids, hydroids that had just been fed brine shrimp or brine shrimp only.In 14 of 25 cases, the nudibranchs “went straight to the bags that contained fed hydroids,” said Trevor Willis, a marine ecologist at the University of Portsmouth in Britain and lead author of the study. The slugs also ate about double the number of fed polyps compared to unfed ones.Next, the researchers analyzed the diet of wild nudibranchs by measuring an isotope called nitrogen-15. When an animal eats another organism, this heavier form of nitrogen becomes more concentrated in its tissues than it was in its prey’s tissues, so the higher up the food chain you go, the more nitrogen-15 you should find.Dr. Willis and his colleagues found that nitrogen-15 levels in their nudibranchs were lower than they would expect if the animals were eating hydroids only. This suggests that the slugs might be getting a significant amount of nutrition directly from small plankton, which contain lower quantities of nitrogen-15 than hydroids. Using statistical models, the researchers estimated that these plankton possibly contribute as much, or more, to these slugs’ diets as the hydroids themselves.As for why sea slugs prefer hydroids who’ve had their fill, Dr. Willis speculates that it’s a way for the animals to get calories from plankton while also not overeating hydroids, which they depend on for shelter in addition to nourishment. “It seems counterintuitive that an animal would destroy its own habitat,” he said.But this is purely conjecture for now, Dr. Willis said, adding that the research is a “first step” that raises more questions than it answers. One of these is whether other animals, like nudibranchs that eat coral, perform kleptopredation. He added that unraveling these detailed feeding interactions will help scientists understand how energy flows through ecosystems, and how such dynamics might shift with climate change.“Once we have an idea of what’s going on at the species level, we can put these little stories together and look at whole communities,” he said.
In Africa, Rural Clinics Entice Pregnant Women With ‘Baby Pictures’ Getting women into medical care when they are only a few months pregnant is a top priority of public health officials, because simple interventions often save the lives of both mother and child.Early treatment for H.I.V., syphilis and high blood pressure, as well as vaccines like tetanus and vitamins like folic acid, can make enormous differences in whether mother and baby survive the birth.But poorly educated women often think it is not worth the trouble to visit a clinic before they are in labor. Many believe that consulting traditional healers is just as worthwhile.Now a group of Canadian doctors is pioneering what appears to be a very effective way to entice rural African mothers to visit clinics long before their due dates. They offered ultrasounds advertised on local radio with the words: “You will be able to see your baby.”The medical charity Bridge to Health Medical and Dental tested the concept in the highlands of southwest Uganda in 2014. Their study, published by PLOS One this year, found that when doctors set up temporary clinics in rural villages, six times as many pregnant women visited when free ultrasounds were advertised, compared with the turnout in villages where the ultrasounds were not offered or were advertised only by word of mouth.Women who previously had seen only traditional healers were nine times more likely to show up if the ultrasounds were advertised.“It’s magic to be able to see your unborn baby,” said Dr. Michael S. Silverman, an infectious disease specialist at Western University in London, Canada, and a study co-author.The ultrasound scanners in the study cost $10,000 new or $2,500 refurbished, said Dr. William Cherniak, the executive director of Bridge to Health and another co-author. They are battery-powered, do 40 scans per charge, and can survive bouncing along rutted dirt roads.The group hopes to test inexpensive new scanners that plug directly into smartphones; the technician can view the fetus on the phone and transmit the image to a radiologist anywhere in the world, Dr. Cherniak said.The women in the study could see their fetuses only on monitors, but Bridge to Health has since added a printer so the women can take home pictures.“We even diagnosed acute appendicitis in an older woman who came in even though she wasn’t pregnant,” Dr. Cherniak said. “These machines have lots of uses.”
The Way the Wind Blows Q. The wind turbines that generate electricity seem to have just three blades, or sometimes two. Why so few?A. As many as 90 percent of the turbines in use now have three blades. But experiments are still underway to determine what number of blades works best in terms of efficiency, durability and economy.When the wind shifts, the three-blade design minimizes vibration or “chatter.” A two-blade system is subject to considerable chatter when the blades are in the horizontal position, with associated wear and tear on the turbine. The chatter is sometimes audible.A design with only one blade would actually be the most aerodynamically efficient, but the single blade would move very fast, producing objectionable noise, and it wears out the assembly more quickly.Adding a fourth blade increases energy production by only a small percentage, and the added expense is comparatively large.Finally, many people consider the three-blade turbine to be the most aesthetically pleasing design.
$300 Billion War Beneath the Street: Fighting to Replace America’s Water Pipes Bursting pipes. Leaks. Public health scares.America is facing a crisis over its crumbling water infrastructure, and fixing it will be a monumental and expensive task.Two powerful industries, plastic and iron, are locked in a lobbying war over the estimated $300 billion that local governments will spend on water and sewer pipes over the next decade.It is a battle of titans, raging just inches beneath our feet.“Things are moving so fast,” said Reese Tisdale, president of the water advisory firm Bluefield Research. And it’s a good thing, he says: “There are some pipes in the ground that are 150 years old.”How the pipe wars play out — in city and town councils, in state capitals, in Washington — will determine how drinking water is delivered to homes across America for generations to come.Traditional materials like iron or steel currently make up almost two-thirds of existing municipal water pipe infrastructure. But over the next decade, as much as 80 percent of new municipal investment in water pipes could be spent on plastic pipes, Bluefield predicts.The outcome of the rivalry will also determine the country’s response to an infrastructure challenge of epic proportions.By 2020, the average age of the 1.6 million miles of water and sewer pipes in the United States will hit 45 years. Cast iron pipes in at least 600 towns and counties are more than a century old, according to industry estimates. And though Congress banned lead water pipes three decades ago, more than 10 million older ones remain, ready to leach lead and other contaminants into drinking water from something as simple as a change in water source.As many as 8,000 children were exposed to unsafe levels of lead in Flint, Mich., after the city switched to a new water supply but failed to properly treat the water with chemicals to prevent its lead pipes from disintegrating. Corroding iron pipes, meanwhile, have been linked to two outbreaks of Legionnaires’ disease in Flint that added to the public health emergency.The plastics industry has seized on the post-Flint fears.The American Chemistry Council, a deep-pocketed trade association that lobbies for the plastics industry, has backed bills in at least five states — Michigan, Ohio, South Carolina, Indiana and Arkansas — that would require local governments to open up bids for municipal water projects to all suitable materials, including plastic. A council spokesman, Scott Openshaw, criticized the current bidding process in many localities as “virtual monopolies which waste taxpayer money, drive up costs and ultimately make it harder for states and municipalities to complete critical water infrastructure upgrades.”Opponents of the industry-backed bills, including many municipal engineers, say they are a thinly veiled effort by the plastics industry to muscle aside traditional pipe suppliers.“It’s simply catering to an industry that is trying to use legislation to gain market share,” Stephen Pangori of the American Council of Engineering Companies testified this year before a Michigan Senate committee.To more directly reach towns and counties across the country, the plastics industry is also leaning on the American City County Exchange, a new group that gives corporations extraordinary capacity to influence public policy at the city and county levels. The group operates under the auspices of the American Legislative Exchange Council, a wider effort funded by the petrochemicals billionaires Charles G. and David H. Koch that has drawn scrutiny for helping corporations and local politicians write legislation behind closed doors.Corporations pay membership fees as high as $25,000 to gain access to some 1,500 mayors and local council members who have signed up for the initiative. At a July convention in Denver that brought together about three dozen local legislators, Bruce Hollands, executive director of the plastic pipe industry group Uni-Bell PVC Pipe Association, discussed what had gone wrong in Flint, and explained what needed to be done to open up local bidding for plastic water pipes. To spur local decision-making, the A.C.C.E. has also adopted model legislation pushing for more open bidding for water pipes.“We’re just trying to take up policies that limit the size of government, that keep it from growing exponentially,” said Jon Russell, national director of the A.C.C.E. and a councilman from the town of Culpeper, Va.Plastics are an obvious replacement for the country’s aging pipes. Lightweight, easy to install, corrosion-free and up to 50 percent cheaper than iron, plastic pipes have already taken the place of copper as the preferred material for service lines that connect homes to municipal mains, as well as water pipes inside the home.Still, some scientists warn that the rapid replacement of America’s water infrastructure with plastic could bring its own health concerns.Scientists are just starting to understand the effect of plastic on the quality and safety of drinking water, including what sort of chemicals can leach into the water from the pipes themselves, or from surrounding groundwater contamination. Studies have shown that toxic pollutants like benzene and toluene from spills and contaminated soil can permeate certain types of plastic pipes as they age. A 2013 review of research on leaching from plastic pipe identified more than 150 contaminants migrating from plastic pipes into drinking water.“Plastics are being installed without any real understanding of what they’re doing to our drinking water,” said Andrew J. Whelton, assistant professor of civil engineering at Purdue University, and an author of the 2013 study. “We don’t know what chemicals we’re being exposed to.”Sensing an opening, the iron pipe industry has started a public relations push of its own, voicing concerns over plastic, wooing President Trump with accolades for his infrastructure drive and setting up a war between the two industries.“Iron is just more durable. It’s a more proven material,” said Patrick Hogan, president of the Ductile Iron Pipe Research Association, the industry’s main lobby group. “Iron’s been in the ground for 100 years.”Plastic groups have criticized the studies, saying they focus on older generations of plastic piping and conflate different types of plastics. They also stress that their pipes are independently tested by the third-party organization.“It’s not a new material. It’s a safe material. It’s independently tested,” said Mr. Hollands, executive director of the Uni-Bell plastic pipes group.The industry outreach, at times, has been more overt.At the height of Flint’s water crisis, the chief executive of one of the nation’s largest manufacturers of plastic pipes, JM Eagle, traveled to the beleaguered city and offered to replace the city’s lead pipes at no cost.Pipes from JM Eagle would last 100 years and are a long-lasting and safe solution, the company’s chief executive, Walter Wang, told the City Council last February. “This water crisis, this contamination issue,” he said, “it’s hurting children and making them sick.”JM Eagle, however, has faced recent legal problems. In 2013, a federal jury in California found that the Los Angeles-based company had defrauded states and municipalities for more than a decade by knowingly selling defective water pipes. In some places, PVC pipes that were supposed to last 50 years exploded in their first year, causing injuries and flooding.JM Eagle declined to comment but has previously said the litigation was based on “scurrilous allegations” by a disgruntled former employee. Formosa Plastics, a Taiwanese industrial conglomerate that was its parent company at the time, agreed to pay $22.5 million in a settlement with municipalities and other government agencies in California.The uncertainty over potable water pipes of all kinds is exacerbated by a lack of regulation over their safety. There is no federal oversight of the materials or processes used to manufacture plastic water pipes; instead, water pipes are certified and tested by an organization paid for by industry.That organization, NSF International, displays a picture of the Capitol building on its regulatory resources web page and runs a hotline for questions on regulations and product safety. Yet it has never received regulatory authority from the federal government. Nor does it disclose test results for the pipes it certifies.NSF International called its testing robust. “If a product does not meet the requirements of a standard, it will not pass,” said Dave Purkiss, the organization’s general manager of water systems.For now, Flint is fitting the city with service lines made with another material: copper, at an expected cost of more than $140 million. Officials discussed creating a pilot area using plastic to replace the service lines to houses on several city blocks, according to Plastics News, though a Flint spokeswoman, Kristin Moore, said plastic pipes were not currently under consideration.“When you take that inherent issue that we needed to rebuild trust of the citizens in the water system, we felt that copper was the way to go,” Michael McDaniel, a retired Michigan National Guard brigadier general put in charge of replacing Flint’s water pipes, said at a conference this year.In Burton, just next door to Flint, budget realities have made plastics the realistic choice.The small city of 29,000 saved $2.2 million by using plastic to replace its own 1930s-era water system after state regulators alerted the city to critically needed fixes. For a municipality struggling with a dwindling tax base, those savings were huge.“We needed safe water, and we needed it fast. We needed to replace the system, and PVC was a good choice for us,” said Burton’s mayor, Paula Zelenko. “I’ve got to get the best bang for the buck, because bucks are hard to come by these days.”
What’s at Stake in the Bonn Climate Talks? The Paris climate agreement of 2015 was a key moment in the battle against climate change: 195 countries vowed to help limit the rise in global temperatures since the industrial revolution to “well below” 2 degrees Celsius (3.6 degrees Fahrenheit).But the Paris deal was just the start of a long, arduous process. The world’s nations are still struggling to translate their lofty promises into meaningful cuts in greenhouse gas emissions. Which explains why diplomats are now meeting for yet another round of climate talks in Bonn, Germany, which began on Nov. 6 and continue through Friday.Much of the attention at these talks will be on the Trump administration, which has vowed to withdraw the United States from the Paris deal by 2020. In response, a gaggle of world leaders, American governors, major corporations and advocacy groups will make a big show of insisting that global action on climate change is still trundling forward, with or without President Trump.Yet much of the crucial work at Bonn will happen behind closed doors as diplomats try to build on the initial Paris agreement, crafting new rules and guidelines that, they hope, will help turn hazy national promises into concrete action. Here’s what to watch for.The overarching task is the same as ever: figuring out how to limit severe global warming in the decades ahead.Under the Paris agreement, each country submitted a voluntary pledge to tackle its greenhouse gas emissions and then agreed to meet every five years to review their collective progress and prod one another to ratchet up their efforts.But so far, those pledges have proved inadequate. Most industrialized countries — from Europe to Japan to the United States — aren’t on track to meet their emissions goals. And even if they were, the current pledges put the world on course to heat up 3 degrees Celsius or more, an outcome with a far greater risk of destabilizing ice sheets in Greenland and Antarctica, drastic sea-level rise and more destructive heat waves and droughts. To stay well below 2 degrees, countries would need to cut back fossil-fuel emissions far more rapidly than they’ve promised so far.In 2018, leaders plan to assess their efforts to date and discuss what further action could help lessen the odds of drastic global warming — with the goal of crafting newer, stronger national pledges by 2020. But before they can do any of that, they need to agree to formal ground rules for that exercise. That “rule book” will be a focus at Bonn.One widely recognized problem with the current Paris pledges is that they’re fairly vague.China promised that its emissions would peak around 2030, but the country’s energy data is notoriously murky, so it’s hard to tell how much progress it’s actually making. Similarly, the European Union vowed to cut emissions 40 percent below 1990 levels by 2030, but offered few specifics on how to achieve that goal — making it hard to gauge whether European policymakers could realistically be doing much more.At Bonn, negotiators will be discussing how to make these pledges more rigorous and transparent, so that countries can more readily be held accountable for their actions. That means tackling questions like: What’s the best way to track nations’ progress, to see if they’re doing what they said they would do? Is there a way to tell if a country’s pledge could be made more ambitious? Which specific policies are working well and which aren’t?Because the Paris pledges are largely voluntary — world leaders would have never agreed to a deal otherwise — no one can force governments to take additional action. But, the idea goes, if pledges and policies are made more transparent, world leaders will be better able to pressure and help each other to do more.The final draft of this “rule book” is not due until next year, and it may not actually get finished at Bonn, but negotiators are hoping to make significant progress on a long list of items at these talks. As always, diplomacy tends to proceed fitfully.Even though the Trump administration has vowed to withdraw from the Paris agreement, the United States can’t formally exit the climate talks until 2020. So the State Department is sending a small team of negotiators to discuss some of the details of the pact.The United States and China will still preside over a working group on transparency, though it remains to be seen how much influence American officials can wield.The administration will also hold an event in Bonn with representatives from energy companies to promote coal, natural gas and nuclear power as solutions to global warming. Other countries are expected to view the American push to promote fossil fuels with a wary eye.In the meantime, a coalition of pro-Paris governors and other officials plan to attend the conference to tout efforts that states, cities and businesses are making to reduce emissions despite the Trump administration’s stance — highlighting the country’s deep divide over climate policy.Discussions around the “rule book” for assessing and ratcheting up pledges could prove contentious. In the past, for instance, the United States has insisted that developing countries be held to the same strict monitoring standards as wealthy countries, while China and India have pushed for a bifurcated system.Developing countries have also argued that they need financial aid from wealthier nations to expand clean energy and adapt to the ravages of climate change.The government of Fiji is presiding over the Bonn conference, which will put the spotlight on issues like “loss and damage” — that is, whether wealthy nations should compensate island nations and other poorer countries for the droughts, storms and rising sea levels that their emissions are causing. The Paris agreement broached this issue only briefly, and industrialized nations have resisted calls to be held legally liable for their role in warming the planet.Some climate advocates are hoping for a relatively low-key conference that makes modest progress on issues like transparency and climate finance. In this scenario, American officials would play a quietly constructive role in helping craft the rule book for ratcheting up pledges. And nonstate actors, including cities and businesses, would continue to press forward on efforts to tackle climate change outside of the formal United Nations process.Conversely, it’s entirely possible that the Trump administration’s rejection of the Paris deal could lead other countries to disengage from global efforts to address climate change. Or the talks could get bogged down by the traditional rifts between richer and poorer nations. That, in turn, could stall momentum right before the next big round of climate talks in 2018 — when countries are supposed to get down to the details of what’s needed to step up their climate policies going forward.
From Brussels to Arkansas, a Tough Week for Monsanto Opposition from France and Italy doomed a European Union vote on Thursday to reauthorize the world’s most popular weedkiller, glyphosate, a decision that came hours after Arkansas regulators moved to ban an alternative weedkiller for much of 2018.The decisions are a double blow to the agrochemical industry and particularly to the chemicals giant Monsanto. An appeals committee of European officials will convene this month, though, to weigh again whether to continue to allow glyphosate just weeks before its registration expires. The chemical is the main ingredient in Roundup, one of Monsanto’s flagships, but its patent has ended and it is now made by much of the industry.The effort to reauthorize the weedkiller failed to receive a majority even though regulators were seeking only a five-year reauthorization instead of the typical 15, amid controversy and disputes about cancer risk that have made glyphosate’s future in Europe uncertain. Its approval in the region expires in mid-December.The vote on Thursday, which was weighted based on the population of the various European Union member states, was nearly 37 percent in favor of renewing the chemical and a little over 32 percent against, with nearly 31 percent abstaining. France and Italy opposed the renewal; Spain was in favor, along with Britain, which is due to leave the union. Germany and Poland abstained.In Arkansas, regulators voted on Wednesday to ban the use of another major weedkiller, dicamba, for more than six months of next year, including the summer, amid widespread reports of crop damage. Dicamba has been around for decades, but new versions have been developed by Monsanto, BASF and DuPont as an alternative to Roundup. The regulatory recommendation is now being sent to a state legislative panel.Taken together, the decisions reflect an increasing political resistance to pesticides in Europe and parts of the United States, as well as the specific shortcomings of dicamba, whose tendency to drift has given pause even to the Trump administration’s Environmental Protection Agency, which has otherwise largely acceded to the wishes of the chemical industry. Dicamba has damaged more than 3.6 million acres of soybean crops in 25 states, roughly 4 percent of all soybeans planted this year in the United States.In a statement, an industry trade group known as the Glyphosate Task Force, which includes Monsanto and Syngenta, called the European decision “discriminatory and unacceptable,” adding that “delays of this nature which are evident during the final stages of the process simply expose acute politicization of the regulatory procedure.”But Nicolas Hulot, the French environment minister, tweeted after the vote: “Thanks to our opposition glyphosate is not reauthorized for 10 years, nor 5 years. The effort to get out of pesticides continues!”Regarding the decision in Arkansas, Scott Partridge, vice president of global strategy for Monsanto, said in a statement on Wednesday that the company was disappointed that state regulators “voted to put Arkansas farmers at a disadvantage, but we’ll continue to follow the process to help those growers have greater choice next season.”The European Union’s decision followed years of haggling and delay. Policymakers largely brushed aside the opinions of two of the bloc’s science agencies, which had found that glyphosate was not a carcinogen.But glyphosate, which accounts for about a quarter of the global market, has been plunged into controversy since the International Agency for Research on Cancer, part of the World Health Organization, declared it a probable carcinogen in 2015. The finding, which has been disputed by a number of other government agencies, has made the weedkiller a magnet for controversy.Glyphosate is also at the center of a federal case in the United States over claims that it causes cancer, and California has declared it a carcinogen, following in the footsteps of the international cancer agency.Use of glyphosate has soared in the United States and other parts of the world over the last two decades, after Monsanto introduced crops that were genetically engineered to be resistant to the chemical. That meant key crops like corn, soybeans and cotton could be sprayed with the herbicide after they emerged from the ground. During that time, the presence of glyphosate in human urine increased 500 percent, according to a recent study by the University of California San Diego School of Medicine and published in the Journal of the American Medical Association.Europe, by contrast, has largely shunned genetically modified crops, but glyphosate is still the Continent’s biggest seller. In Britain and Germany, it is used on as much as 40 percent of agricultural land, according to an industry trade group.But political sentiment in Europe has been turning against Monsanto, the American company that has become the face of the agrochemical industry, even though it is in the process of being acquired by Bayer, a German chemicals giant. The European Parliament voted last month to ban glyphosate, a step that was nonbinding. And in September, the Parliament made Monsanto the first company to be barred from lobbying the chamber.The science around glyphosate has become a muddle of allegations and counterallegations. Environmental activists have accused national regulators of hewing too closely to Monsanto’s wishes, while the industry has been exasperated that European politicians are overruling their science agencies. The litigation in the United States has only muddied the waters further, with evidence emerging that Monsanto ghostwrote both journalism and academic work, eroding trust in a company that had long been a lightning rod.But the latest major study, published Thursday by researchers at the National Institutes of Health, “observed no associations between glyphosate use and overall cancer risk.”With dicamba, the industry received warnings years ago that the weedkiller was prone to drifting on crops and vegetation it was not intended to treat. Dicamba is supposed to be used with soybeans that are genetically modified to resist its effects.Steve Smith, a member of an advisory panel set up by Monsanto, warned as far back as 2010 that “widespread use of dicamba is incompatible with Midwestern agriculture,” according to congressional testimony he gave that year. “Even the best, the most conscientious farmers cannot control where this weedkiller will end up.”Monsanto has argued that drift is occurring when dicamba is sprayed improperly or when unapproved versions are used. Many farmers and weed scientists say it can also turn into a gas and drift in certain weather conditions.Environmentalists called for federal action by the Environmental Protection Agency on dicamba.“It’s long past time the agency heed independent science and protect farmers by prohibiting the use of this hazardous weedkiller,” said Bill Freese, a science policy analyst at the Center for Food Safety.
Trump Ignores Climate Change. That’s Very Bad for Disaster Planners. When Hurricane Irma swept through the Florida Keys in September, it brought a vivid preview of the damage that climate change could inflict on the region in the decades ahead.The storm washed out two sections of the highway connecting the Keys, leaving residents stranded for days. With ocean levels rising around these low-lying islands, however, that interruption could end up seeming minor: By 2030, almost half the county’s roads could be affected by flooding.“We know that the water isn’t going away,” said Rhonda Haag, the sustainability director for Monroe County, which is preparing to elevate vulnerable roadways in the Keys. But the task is so costly, up to $7 million per mile of road, that the county may ultimately require outside help.In Washington, the Federal Emergency Management Agency is leading recovery efforts that could cost taxpayers more than $50 billion after devastating storms hit Texas, Florida, Puerto Rico and the United States Virgin Islands. At the same time, the agency is wrestling with an even harder problem: how to help communities prepare for future flooding disasters that could be far more severe than anything seen this year.Complicating that task is the fact that the Trump administration has largely been hostile to discussions of global warming. In August, a week before Hurricane Harvey made landfall in Texas, President Trump rescinded an Obama-era executive order that urged federal agencies to take into account climate change and sea-level rise when rebuilding infrastructure.Climate change remains a polarizing topic in the nation’s capital, and FEMA is caught in the middle. A recent report from the Government Accountability Office warned that rising sea levels and heavier downpours fueled by global warming could increase flooding costs in coastal communities by $23 billion per year by midcentury unless they start adapting now.“There are plenty of people who want to debate the vocabulary” around climate change, said Roy E. Wright, FEMA’s deputy associate administrator for insurance and mitigation. “But Congress’ instruction was for us to attend ourselves to future risks and reduce the costs of future disasters. So as I look at the adaptation dimension, that’s about resilience. That’s resilience against future events.”As the hurricane season unfolded, administration officials began  hinting that they would craft a new federal flood standard, though it is unclear whether it would take into account climate-change forecasts. And, Mr. Wright said, FEMA is still moving forward with other initiatives aimed at helping states and cities defend against future floods. Even states led by governors who reject climate science, like those in Wisconsin and Florida, are now taking steps to prepare for the worsening flood risks climate change could bring.But the controversy around the climate rule illustrates how tricky preparing for future disasters can be in today’s political landscape, especially since experts argue that adapting to stronger storms and several feet of sea level rise could require upfront investments beyond what the federal government has been willing to consider to date.“I don’t think the scale of what we need to do has sunk in,” said David W. Titley, a retired rear admiral and former chief oceanographer of the Navy who heads a climate center at Pennsylvania State University. “We’re not talking about elevating a few structures by a foot. We’re talking about elaborate flood defenses and relocation efforts that could cost billions — or trillions.”Most of the planning for floods happens at the state and local level, with officials making decisions about where to build homes or how high to elevate buildings in floodplains. But if a severe disaster like a hurricane strikes, the federal government typically steps in with aid for recovery.“Communities and states often want to allow as much development as possible, because they reap the tax revenue,” said Larry Larson, director emeritus of the Association of State Floodplain Managers. “But if there’s a major disaster, the federal government will bail them out.”That, experts say, can lead to a type of moral hazard. Studies have shown that one dollar invested in pre-disaster mitigation can prevent four dollars in average losses. But if cities aren’t paying the full price for those losses, they may have less incentive to take costly or difficult measures to avoid flooding in the first place — like restricting development along coasts.Under the National Flood Insurance Program, FEMA maps areas of the country at risk of flooding and requires homeowners in those zones to buy federal insurance polices and communities to enforce minimum construction standards, like elevating new homes above the 100-year floodplain, the area with a 1 percent probability of a flood in any given year.Yet there’s broad consensus that the flood insurance program is inadequate, partly because its maps are often outdated and don’t take into account future flood risks from expanding development or climate change, and partly because those minimum standards have often proved insufficient in the face of severe floods.Because Congress is unlikely to refuse aid to desperate citizens after a major flood, FEMA often has to strategically nudge localities into taking preventive action.After Hurricane Sandy battered the Northeast in 2012, FEMA officials took a harder look at what else the agency might do to encourage stronger flood preparation — particularly as climate scientists were warning that floods were expected to get worse over time.“I had a discussion with President Obama where he said, ‘Craig, the discussion about climate change is over, we need to start thinking about adaptation,’” said W. Craig Fugate, the FEMA administrator from 2009 to 2017. “That’s where I went back to my team and said: How can we start planning for the future?”In 2015, the White House issued an executive order requiring all infrastructure projects that get federal funding to be rebuilt two or three feet above the 100-year floodplain, or to take into account the best available climate science during planning. The order was opposed by homebuilders, who said it would increase costs. (FEMA had been working to implement the order when Mr. Trump rolled it back in August.)Another Obama-era change: In order to qualify for disaster aid, states would have to consider the effects of climate change in the hazard mitigation plans they submit to FEMA every five years, detailing the risks they face from floods and other disasters, as well as possible steps they might take to minimize losses.Most states aren’t scheduled to submit updated plans until 2018. But Wisconsin, a state whose governor has disavowed climate science, submitted one of the first mitigation plans in December and described in detail how global warming could affect the state and urged measures to prepare for things like heavier rainfall events. “Climate resilience,” the plan noted, “is a state and national priority.”FEMA also began folding climate adaptation into a program that allows cities to receive discounts on their flood-insurance premiums if they take additional steps to reduce their flood risk. Under the Community Rating System, cities can now get credit for planning for the effects of rising sea levels. Officials in the Florida Keys are planning to take advantage of these credits as they map their vulnerable roadways.A week before Mr. Trump entered the White House, FEMA also unveiled a proposal for a “public assistance deductible,” in which states would be responsible for a greater portion of the cost of disaster recovery unless they took steps like enacting stricter building codes to limit exposure to disasters. While this proposal, which is not yet implemented, may face pushback from states and homebuilders, environmentalists and fiscal conservatives say it could lessen the moral hazard around flood policy.Experts caution that FEMA can only do so much on its own. “They can’t force the hands of communities,” said Laura Lightbody, director of the Pew Charitable Trusts’ Flood-Prepared Communities initiative. “Ultimately it’s up to local leaders to take responsibility.”“But,” she added, “I do think the federal government has woken up to the fact that we need to start thinking more seriously about future risk.”Since coming to office, Mr. Trump has moved quickly to repeal Obama-era policies focused on curbing the greenhouse gas emissions causing climate change and has vowed to withdraw the United States from the Paris climate accord.But, apart from the rollback of Mr. Obama’s flood order, the Trump administration has been more restrained in directly targeting measures aimed at adapting to future disasters. While the Environmental Protection Agency has scrubbed mentions of global warming from its website, FEMA’s climate adaptation page remains.Mr. Wright, who has held his FEMA position since 2013, said the agency was still pursuing many of the mitigation efforts begun under the previous administration, while working to quadruple investments in pre-disaster mitigation by 2023. And administration officials are now contemplating a new federal flood standard that could guide post-disaster rebuilding efforts.Asked whether skepticism about climate change might impede these efforts, Mr. Wright said, “I have never experienced that as an obstacle. And I say that full stop.”Mr. Fugate, the former FEMA administrator, was warier: “The direction of this administration has been so uncertain, and you hope that they’re not just focused on getting rid of anything that might suggest that climate change is a problem.”Alice C. Hill, who helped develop the Obama administration’s climate resilience strategy, had a different concern: Unless the administration was actively engaged on adaptation efforts, it was less likely that such programs would expand in the future.“Within any administration, it’s easy for the urgent to overcome the important,” she said. “At some point, climate change will become urgent, but for now it’s still in the important category — it doesn’t need to get done today. So unless somebody’s actively pushing on agencies to act, it won’t get done.”For example, in 2012, Congress created an advisory council to help FEMA improve its flood insurance program maps. The council has made dozens of recommendations, including ways that FEMA could produce maps that accounted for climate risks to help communities plan for the future.But the task is costly, requiring airborne mapping of much of the country, and Congress hasn’t provided sufficient funds for FEMA to implement it. And in his first budget, Mr. Trump proposed further cuts to mapping programs.Ms. Hill said adaptation programs may have the best chance of survival if they’re not explicitly framed as climate measures. “This whole issue has become highly politicized,” she said. “But the longer I’ve worked on this issue, the less I care what we call it. You can just talk about fiscal risk. This is a fiscally conservative approach.”That framing may catch on. In October, Representative Mark Sanford, Republican of South Carolina, wrote a letter with 14 other lawmakers calling on the White House to reinstate a federal flood standard. The letter avoided mention of climate change, but noted that flood disasters were getting worse over time — and federal taxpayers were on the hook.“Taxpayer dollars are being spent to rebuild or repair public infrastructure — sometimes multiple times,” the letter said. “It makes no sense.”While climate experts praised some of the steps FEMA has taken to push localities to prepare for climate change, they argue that far more is needed.“I’m proud of the work we’ve been doing here” on mitigation, Mr. Wright said. “But looking at Harvey, Irma, Maria — it puts a very bright light on it. We’ve got a long way still to go.”In the Florida Keys, scientists project that ocean levels may rise between 2 and 7 inches by 2030, and between 9 and 24 inches by 2060.“We can probably handle what’s happening over the next 20 years, but when we look beyond that, that’s a very different conversation,” Ms. Haag said. If sea-level rise ends up at the high end of current projections, the Keys may need more extensive aid from the state or federal governments to adapt.Dr. Titley notes that the Netherlands may spend hundreds of billions of dollars to climate-proof its shores. “And their coastline,” he said, “is only the size of Massachusetts and Connecticut combined. Do the math.”Robert S. Young, who directs the Program for the Study of Developed Shorelines, asserts that federal lawmakers may eventually have to take more drastic steps. In the 1980s, Congress passed the Coastal Barrier Resource Act, which identified barrier islands most at risk of flooding and declared the federal government would no longer send aid to those areas.“It may be time to start adding places to that list,” Mr. Young said. “We need as a nation to decide whether it makes sense for the federal government to hold every shoreline in place forever.”A move like that would be politically explosive. In 2012, Congress passed a bill to reduce subsidies for federal flood insurance in high-risk areas, to better reflect the hazards involved. But after protests from homeowners, Congress partly reversed itself two years later.“If climate adaptation is a marathon, we’ve run about the first 50 yards so far,” Dr. Titley said. “Grudgingly.”
Are Mass Murderers Insane? Usually Not, Researchers Say If what people do is any reflection of who they are, then Devin P. Kelley, who slaughtered 26 churchgoers on Sunday in Texas, surely was a madman.Before the atrocity, he had attempted to sneak weapons onto an Air Force base after making death threats to his superiors, according to a local police report. In 2012, he had escaped from a mental hospital in New Mexico to which he had been sent after assaulting his wife and fracturing his stepson’s skull.A video of the church killing reportedly shows Mr. Kelley working his way methodically through the aisles, shooting some parishioners, even children, at point-blank range.“I think that mental health is your problem here,” President Trump told reporters on Monday.It is true that severe mental illnesses are found more often among mass murderers. About one in five are likely psychotic or delusional, according to Dr. Michael Stone, a forensic psychiatrist at Columbia University who maintains a database of 350 mass killers going back more than a century. The figure for the general public is closer to 1 percent.But the rest of these murderers do not have any severe, diagnosable disorder. Though he was abusive to his wife, Omar Mateen, who killed 49 people in an Orlando nightclub, had no apparent serious mental illness. Neither did Stephen Paddock, who mowed down 58 concertgoers from a hotel window in Las Vegas.Ditto for Dylann Roof, the racist who murdered nine African-American churchgoers in South Carolina in 2015, and Christopher Harper-Mercer, the angry young man who killed nine people at a community college in Oregon the same year.Nor does anything in these criminals’ history — including domestic violence, like Mr. Kelley’s — serve to reliably predict their spectacularly cruel acts. Even if spree killers have committed domestic violence disproportionately more often — and this assertion is in dispute — the vast majority of men who are guilty of that crime never proceed to mass murder.Most mass murderers instead belong to a rogue’s gallery of the disgruntled and aggrieved, whose anger and intentions wax and wane over time, eventually curdling into violence in the wake of some perceived humiliation.“In almost all high-end mass killings, the perpetrator’s thinking evolves,” said Kevin Cameron, executive director of the Canadian Center for Threat Assessment and Trauma Response.“They have a passing thought. They think about it more, they fantasize, they slowly build a justification. They prepare, and then when the right set of circumstances comes along, it unleashes the rage.”This evolution proceeds rationally and logically, at least in the murderer’s mind. The unthinkable becomes thinkable, then inevitable.Researchers define mass killings as an event leaving four or more dead at the same place and time. These incidents occur at an average of about one a day across the United States; few make national headlines.At least half of the perpetrators die in the act, either by committing suicide (Mr. Kelley is said to have shot himself in the head) or being felled by police.Analyzing his database, Dr. Stone has concluded that about 65 percent of mass killers exhibited no evidence of a severe mental disorder; 22 percent likely had psychosis, the delusional thinking and hallucinations that characterize schizophrenia, or sometimes accompany mania and severe depression. (The remainder likely had depressive or antisocial traits.)Among the psychotic, he counts Jared Loughner, the Arizona man who shot Rep. Gabrielle Giffords, Democrat of Arizona, and 18 others in 2011. By most accounts, including his own, Mr. Loughner was becoming increasingly delusional.Adam Lanza, who in 2012 killed 26 people at Sandy Hook Elementary in Newtown, Conn., exhibited extreme paranoia in the months leading up to his crime, isolating himself in his room.But what to make of John Robert Neumann Jr., who in June shot and killed five former co-workers at a warehouse in Orlando before turning the gun on himself? Mr. Neumann was not overtly psychotic, as far as anyone knows, and this is far more typical of the men who commit mass killings generally.“The majority of the killers were disgruntled workers or jilted lovers who were acting on a deep sense of injustice,” and not mentally ill, Dr. Stone said of his research.In a 2016 analysis of 71 lone-actor terrorists and 115 mass killers, researchers convened by the Department of Justice found the rate of psychotic disorders to be about what Dr. Stone had discovered: roughly 20 percent.The overall rate of any psychiatric history among mass killers — including such probable diagnoses as depression, learning disabilities or A.D.H.D. — was 48 percent.About two-thirds of this group had faced “long-term stress,” like trouble at school or keeping a job, failure in business, or disabling physical injuries from, say, a car accident.Substance abuse was also common: More than 40 percent had problems with alcohol, marijuana or other drugs.Looking at both studies, and using data from his own work, J. Reid Meloy, a forensic psychologist who consults with the F.B.I., has identified what he believes is a common thread: a “paranoid spectrum,” he calls it.At the extreme end is full-on psychosis of the Loughner variety. But the majority of people on this spectrum are not deeply ill; rather, they are injustice collectors. They are prone to perceive insults and failures as cumulative, and often to blame them on one person or one group.“If you have this paranoid streak, this vigilance, this sense that others have been persecuting you for years, there’s an accumulation of maltreatment and an intense urge to stop that persecution,” Dr. Meloy said.“That may never happen. The person may never act on the urge. But when they do, typically there’s a triggering event. It’s a loss in love or work — something that starts a clock ticking, that starts the planning.”Mental health treatment might make a difference for the one in five murderers who have severe mental disorders, experts say. Prevention is also possible in a few other cases — for instance, if the perpetrators make overt threats and those threats are reported.But other factors must be weighed.“In my large file of mass murders, if you look decade by decade, the numbers of victims are fairly small up until the 1960s,” said Dr. Stone. “That’s when the deaths start going way up. When the AK-47s and the Kalashnikovs and the Uzis — all these semiautomatic weapons, when they became so easily accessible.”
Congress Weighs Repeal of Tax Credit for Rare Disease Drugs A decades-old tax credit designed to spur cures for rare diseases has been so successful that it’s now become a target in the House Republican tax plan.The proposal under consideration would end the tax breaks for development of what are called orphan drugs. Ending the credit used by big and small drug companies could save the government an estimated $54 billion over the next decade, an effort to help offset some of the anticipated losses in revenue if other Republican tax cut provisions become law.With the Senate poised to offer its own broad tax plan soon, many details are still in flux. But if the orphan drug tax credit is eliminated, the move would represent a rare defeat for the powerful pharmaceutical industry.The tax credit is part of the popular 1983 Orphan Drug Act, and is one of a host of incentives that supporters say have led to the approval of more than 500 new and much-needed drugs for those rare diseases that each affect fewer than 200,000 people. But the program has also come under scrutiny because critics say that some major drugmakers have exploited it by obtaining the orphan designation for billion-dollar blockbuster drugs like Humira for treating rheumatoid arthritis and Crestor, the cholesterol drug, that were already on the market.Even if the proposal passes the House, it will likely face opposition in the Senate, particularly from Senator Orrin Hatch, Republican of Utah, who is overseeing tax reform in the Senate and was a leading sponsor of the Orphan Drug Act.No matter what happens, some experts welcomed a discussion about a political issue that was once considered untouchable because opponents risked being labeled coldhearted toward people with serious medical conditions.“I think it opens up the debate on the orphan drug tax credit, which we think is a flawed incentive,” said James Love, director of the consumers group Knowledge Ecology International. “And I think that’s a positive thing.”Under current law, companies that develop drugs for rare diseases can receive a tax credit for half of the cost of their clinical trials and they are also granted seven years of exclusivity, when the drug is protected from competition. Companies are not required to disclose the amounts of the tax credits they receive.Mr. Love said he favored replacing the tax credit with direct government subsidies of clinical trials for rare-disease treatments.In public, the pharmaceutical industry’s largest lobbying groups have not said much about the credit. The Biotechnology Innovation Organization, whose members include smaller companies, praised the overall tax plan in a statement last week, but disagreed with the elimination of the tax credit. The other major trade group, the Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America, whose members are generally large public companies, said in a statement that it was pleased that Congress has taken up a tax overhaul and, without mentioning the tax credit, encouraged policymakers “to maintain incentives” for research into rare-disease treatments.Big drugmakers in particular stand to benefit more from the proposed lower corporate tax rate than from the loss of a tax credit that some companies do not use. And like other major corporations, the industry’s opposition may be coalescing far more against a proposed excise tax that could penalize companies for manufacturing their products overseas. These days, many drugs are made outside the United States.Companies that make drugs to treat rare diseases and their lobbyists are already marshaling forces to retain the tax credit. Tactics include enlisting patient-advocacy groups — many financed by drug companies — and members, whose life-threatening and debilitating diseases often have more of a compelling effect than pharmaceutical executives on lawmakers and the public.“We didn’t have any prior warning,” said Paul Melmeyer, federal policy director for the National Organization for Rare Disorders, or NORD. “We look at that just utter lack of therapies for our patient populations. There could be even 33 percent fewer than what we have, going forward, and that is really what our concern is.”Over the last decade, the number of new drugs to treat rare diseases has proliferated, in part because of advancements in scientific research and in part because drug companies have found new ways to profit from diseases that were once seen as unworthy of corporate investment. In 2016, nine of the 22 new drugs approved by the Food and Drug Administration were for rare diseases; in 2015, 21 of the 45 drugs approved fell into that category.Despite the investment, advocates note that of the 7,000 rare diseases that have been identified, only about 5 percent have an approved therapy. About 30 million Americans have a rare disease, or about a tenth of the population.While many rare-disease approvals bring advances for patients, companies have also been seen to be taking advantage of the program by seeking the designation for drugs that would be profitable anyway. The drugmaker AbbVie has won multiple approvals for rare-disease uses for Humira, the world’s best-selling drug, ranging from a form of juvenile arthritis to an eye disease, uveitis. Many new cancer approvals also receive orphan-drug designation because they are targeted at a narrow slice of the population.With the coveted exclusivity granted by their orphan-drug status, companies can charge virtually anything they want for these products, and some manufacturers have set astronomical prices for drugs that have gone on to bring in billions in sales. Soliris, made by Alexion, racked up more than $2.8 billion in sales in 2016 even though it is only approved to treat three rare diseases.In May, three Republican senators, including Senator Hatch, asked the Government Accountability Office to look into possible abuses of the Orphan Drug Act, prompted by an investigation by Kaiser Health News. Mr. Melmeyer said he did not think the request showed a change of heart by Senator Hatch, who is chairman of the Finance Committee that may release its tax plan as early as Thursday.“We’re very much counting on him to step up and be the champion on this,” Mr. Melmeyer said.In 2015, a report commissioned by the biotechnology trade group and NORD estimated that if the tax credit were removed, the number of drugs approved over the next decade would decline by 33 percent.Eric Davis, the executive vice president and general counsel of BioMarin Pharmaceutical, which develops what it describes as “ultrarare” drugs, said the tax credit “is really critical to helping us get over the hump with our investment decisions, and I think that’s true for a lot of companies in our space.”Philip English, a former Republican Congressman who now lobbies for drug firms, said he believed that his clients were picking up support from Republicans and said he was confident that the tax credit would survive any Senate plan.“I think there is a consensus within the industry and within the advocacy community that the orphan drug credit has been immensely successful in generating innovative investment that has produced a string of successes,” Mr. English said.Rachel Klein, the senior director of advocacy and strategy for the EveryLife Foundation for Rare Diseases, which was founded by a drug industry executive, said policymakers need to be careful about tinkering with a program that has been around for decades.“What seem like small changes can really have a large impact,” she said. “Ultimately this could end up doing more harm than good, and that really would be a problem for the millions of people who are relying on these companies to develop new therapies.”
Gene Therapy Creates Replacement Skin to Save a Dying Boy Doctors in Europe used gene therapy to grow sheets of healthy skin that saved the life of a boy with a genetic disease that had destroyed most of his skin, the team reported on Wednesday in the journal Nature.This was not the first use of the treatment, which adds gene therapy to a technique developed to grow skin grafts for burn victims. But it was by far the most body surface ever covered in a patient with a genetic disorder: nine square feet.The boy’s disease, junctional epidermolysis bullosa, causes extremely fragile skin that blisters and tears, and is prone to infections and skin cancer. He had been expected to die but has recovered. Two years after the treatment, he continues to have healthy skin and lead a normal life. A video provided by the medical team shows the boy, Hassan, playing soccer with his father. According to news reports, the family is originally from Syria.Epidermolysis bullosa (epi-derm-uh-LY-sis bull-OH-suh) takes various forms, depending on the genetic mutation involved. About 25,000 people in the United States have the condition, and 500,000 worldwide. The severity varies, but some patients spend much of their lives covered in bandages and in severe pain.Brett Kopelan, who has a child with the disease and is executive director of a support and advocacy group, debra, said that the highly specialized dressings his daughter needs cost more than $500,000 a year.The treatment described in the new report offers hope to some patients but not all. Not every mutation can be corrected in the same way as the one in the report.“It certainly made an incredible transformation in the life of the boy,” said an expert not involved in the case, Dr. Jouni Uitto, the chairman of the department of dermatology and cutaneous biology in the Sidney Kimmel Medical College at Thomas Jefferson University in Philadelphia.“Now it’s just one case, and it sort of remains to be seen what’s the general applicability of this approach. The other issue is, what’s the cost of this?”Dr. Uitto also cautioned that epidermolysis bullosa often involves damage to internal tissue, like the lining of the esophagus and urinary tract, that gene therapy for the skin cannot repair.Dr. M. Peter Marinkovich, an associate professor of dermatology at Stanford University School of Medicine, said he was “blown away” by a presentation he had seen about the case. “Gosh, it’s just a great advance,” he said.Dr. Marinkovich has been conducting similar research and published a report a year ago in JAMA in which his team treated smaller areas of skin in four adults with a different form of the disease.Some improved, but the responses varied and tended to decline after a year. The research is continuing.The new report, he said, “has taken it to the next step and has actually used it to treat a large amount of skin. That’s what’s really incredible.”Other researchers have tried bone-marrow transplants to correct the genetic flaws in the disease, but several children have died from the side effects of that arduous treatment, and results have been mixed in those who survived.The boy in the Nature article had suffered since birth from blisters all over his body, and in 2015, when he was 7, contracted bacterial infections that caused him to lose two-thirds of his skin. His doctors did not know how to treat him, other than keeping him on morphine for the pain.Because burn victims also lose skin, the doctors sent him to the burn unit of the Children’s Hospital at Ruhr University in Bochum, Germany. A photograph of him then shows an emaciated body encased in raw, crimson flesh.“We had a lot of trouble keeping this kid alive,” Dr. Tobias Rothoeft, of the Children’s Hospital, said during a telephone briefing.Doctors in the burn unit tried everything: antibiotics, bandages, special nutritional measures, a skin transplant from the boy’s father. Nothing worked.“After two months, we were sure we could do nothing for this kid and he would die,” Dr. Rothoeft said. The physicians began to discuss just keeping the boy comfortable. But his parents begged them to keep trying.The doctors pored over medical journals and decided to approach Dr. Michele De Luca, the director of the Center for Regenerative Medicine Stefano Ferrari at the University of Modena and Reggio Emilia in Modena, Italy.His team had treated smaller patches of skin on a patient with the same disease, and he had expertise in growing large skin grafts, which had been used to treat hundreds of burn victims. He is also renowned in the field for producing corneal grafts that have saved the sight of people with eye injuries.“He promised he could give us enough skin to heal this kid, which we then tried, and we were in the end successful,” Dr. Rothoeft said.Dr. De Luca described the case as “compassionate use of an experimental therapy” that is being tested in clinical trials.The doctors removed a sample of the boy’s skin — slightly more than half a square inch — and took it to Modena, where they genetically engineered his cells, using a virus to insert the normal form of his mutated gene into his DNA.Then they grew the engineered cells in the laboratory into sheets of skin and transported them back to Germany, where surgeons grafted them onto the boy’s body.In October 2015, they covered his arms and legs with the new skin, and in November, his back. Ultimately, they replaced 80 percent of the child’s skin.Dr. De Luca said that when the bandages were removed, “It was spectacular. It was great. We removed the gauze, and saw the epidermis underneath. Everybody was pretty happy. We got the feeling that the body of the kid was recovering, was responding. That was the time where we thought, maybe we can make it.”A major concern with any type of gene therapy is that the inserted genetic material could have dangerous side effects, like turning off an essential gene or turning on one that could lead to cancer.Analyses of the patient’s new skin did not find the added genetic material in any worrisome places, the researchers reported. Tests also showed that just a few long-lived stem cells maintained the new skin, an important finding that underlines the need for careful cell culturing, Dr. De Luca said.The boy was in the hospital for almost eight months, Dr. De Luca said, including more than four months during which he was kept in a medically induced coma to spare him from pain. The drugs were stopped a few weeks before Christmas.“When he woke up,” Dr. De Luca said, “he realized he had a new skin.”
Democrats Assail Environmental Nominees Over Climate Change WASHINGTON — A Senate hearing on nominees for two top environmental posts on Wednesday quickly turned testy over the Trump administration’s ambivalence on climate change science.Andrew R. Wheeler, a lobbyist for Murray Energy, which is owned by Robert E. Murray, an Appalachian coal mining magnate and prominent backer of President Trump, has been nominated to be the deputy administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency.Kathleen Hartnett White, a former Texas environmental regulator who has described belief in global warming as “a kind of paganism,” has been tapped to lead the White House Council on Environmental Quality.Democratic members of the Environment and Public Works Committee focused much of their hostility on Mrs. White, a fellow at the Texas Public Policy Foundation and the former chairwoman of the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality. Democrats assailed her past writings on climate change, including articles in which she called carbon dioxide “the gas of life” and described renewable energy as parasitic.“Your positions are so far out of the mainstream, they are not just outliers, they are outrageous,” said Senator Edward J. Markey, Democrat of Massachusetts. “You have a fringe voice that denies science, economics and reality.”Asked if she stood by her previous statements, Mrs. White replied, “It’s likely that CO2 has some influence on the climate,” but added that carbon dioxide did not have the characteristics of a pollutant that directly affects human health. “It’s a plant nutrient,” she said.The Trump administration last week issued a comprehensive report on climate science that said that the planet was definitely growing warmer and that human activities were the predominant cause. Despite those unambiguous findings, administration officials and nominees continue to question the validity of climate change science.Mr. Wheeler, a former aide to Senator James M. Inhofe, an Oklahoma Republican, faced lighter questioning. He declined to pledge to recuse himself from working on lawsuits that Murray Energy has filed against the E.P.A., saying he would abide by the guidance of the agency’s ethics advisers.Midwestern Republicans, meanwhile, pressed Mrs. White on her past criticism of the renewable fuel standard, which requires refiners to blend corn-based ethanol with gasoline. White House officials last month directed the E.P.A. to halt efforts to weaken a federal biofuel mandate after pressure from Iowa politicians and others who threatened to hold up agency nominees.Mrs. White said that her position had recently changed because she had read new data and that she now supported the fuel standard.If the two are confirmed, it will go a small way toward filling the still largely empty ranks of senior energy and environmental posts, which are slowing the Trump administration’s ability to achieve its agenda. According to the Partnership for Public Service, a nonpartisan and nonprofit organization that tracks federal nominations, 28 key positions at the E.P.A., the Energy Department and the Interior Department that require Senate confirmation lack nominees.That includes critical positions like the under secretary for nuclear energy at the Energy Department and the director of the United States Geological Survey, who essentially serves as the Interior Department’s chief scientist. At the E.P.A., only the administrator, Scott Pruitt, has been confirmed by the Senate. Five others are awaiting confirmation, including William L. Wehrum to lead the agency’s air office and Michael L. Dourson to head the chemical safety office. Lawmakers acknowledged that Mrs. White and Mr. Wheeler may not have a confirmation vote until the end of the year, and six other E.P.A. positions are still without a nominee.Even Trump administration supporters who have applauded the E.P.A.’s moves to undo Obama-era climate change rules said they were frustrated.“You can talk the talk, but you need people to actually walk the walk in rolling back these agendas,” said Nicolas Loris, a research fellow in energy and environmental policy at the Heritage Foundation, a conservative research group. “You need people and staff in place to get these through the process.”Senator John Barrasso, the Wyoming Republican who is chairman of the Senate Environment and Public Works Committee, blamed Democrats for holding up the 11 environmental candidates the panel has approved and some 100 Trump administration nominees across agencies. The Senate, for example, has yet to confirm the administrator of NASA.“All year long Democrats have been putting up roadblocks to President Trump’s nominees,” he said. “It’s time to end this pointless spectacle.”Mr. Trump has indicated many of the vacancies may be permanent. “I’m generally not going to make a lot of the appointments that would normally be — because you don’t need them,” he told Forbes. “I mean, you look at some of these agencies, how massive they are, and it’s totally unnecessary. They have hundreds of thousands of people.”Max Stier, president of the Partnership for Public Service, agreed that in some cases confirmations for Mr. Trump’s nominees were taking longer than for other recent presidents. And, he said, Mr. Trump may be correct when he says the more than 4,000 appointments every new president must make are too many and largely unnecessary. Still, he said, with only about 440 people nominated to the 1,200 jobs requiring Senate confirmation, “the fault, bluntly, is predominantly with the executive branch.”“Nobody has done this quickly or well,” Mr. Stier said. “President Trump is just doing it worse than anyone else so far.”
Syria Joins Paris Climate Accord, Leaving Only U.S. Opposed WASHINGTON — Then there was one.Syria announced during United Nations climate talks on Tuesday that it would sign the Paris agreement on climate change. The move, which comes on the heels of Nicaragua signing the accord last month, will leave the United States as the only country that has rejected the global pact.According to several people who were in a plenary session at the climate talks in Bonn, Germany, a Syrian delegate announced that the country was poised to send its ratification of the Paris agreement to the United Nations.“This is the very last country that actually announced, so everyone has joined and the U.S. is now so isolated,” said Safa Al Jayoussi, executive director of IndyAct, an environmental organization based in Lebanon that works with Arab countries on climate change.A White House spokeswoman, Kelly Love, pointed reporters to a statement the administration made when Nicaragua joined the pact, noting there had been no change in the United States’ position.“As the president previously stated, the United States is withdrawing unless we can re-enter on terms the are more favorable for our country,” the statement said.President Trump announced in a Rose Garden speech this summer that the United States would quit the deal, calling it bad for America’s economy.The Paris agreement, struck in 2015 under former President Barack Obama, calls on nearly 200 countries to voluntarily curb greenhouse gas emissions. At the time, only Nicaragua and Syria did not join, for very different reasons.Nicaraguan leaders argued that the deal did not go far enough toward keeping carbon emissions at safe levels and helping vulnerable countries protect themselves from the effects of climate change. But last month Daniel Ortega, Nicaragua’s president, and Rosario Murillo, his vice president and wife, said in a joint statement that the country would sign anyway. “The Paris agreement, despite not being the ideal agreement, is the only instrument that currently allows this unity of intentions and efforts,” they said.Syria has been mired in a civil war since 2011. And because the Syrian government is subject to European and American sanctions, its leaders had been unable to send representatives abroad to negotiate or sign the pact.Roua Shurbaji, a spokeswoman at the Syrian mission to the United Nations, said the country’s decision was part of an effort “to be effective in all international areas including climate change.”Syria has not yet submitted targets for cutting greenhouse gases. Syria produces only a tiny fraction of global emissions, but every country that is party to the accord, including poverty-stricken and war-torn nations and tiny islands, has produced a plan for cutting carbon output.“We will get there,” Ms. Shurbaji said. “We are in the process of becoming part of the agreement. We will have our commitments and targets.”“With Syria’s decision, the relentless commitment of the global community to deliver on Paris is more evident than ever,” said Paula Caballero, director of the climate change program at the World Resources Institute. “The U.S.’s stark isolation should give Trump reason to reconsider his ill-advised announcement and join the rest of the world in tackling climate change.”Under the rules of the Paris agreement, the United States cannot formally withdraw until late 2020. Until then, administration officials have said, they will continue to negotiate the terms of the deal, but they have not specified what changes would be sufficient for the United States to reconsider quitting. American negotiators are attending the talks underway in Germany.
Wolves Know How to Work Together Dogs have evolved to be friendly and tolerant of humans and one another, which might suggest they would be good at cooperative tasks.Wolves are known to cooperate in hunting and even in raising one another’s pups, but they can seem pretty intolerant of one another when they are snapping and growling around a kill.So researchers at the Wolf Science Center at the University of Vienna decided to compare the performance of wolves and dogs on a classic behavioral test.To get a food treat, two animals have to pull ropes attached to different ends of a tray. The trick is that they have to pull both ropes at the same time. Chimps, parrots, rooks and elephants have all succeeded at the task.When Sarah Marshall-Pescini, Friederike Range and colleagues put wolves and dogs to the test, wolves did very well and dogs very poorly. In recordings of the experiments, the pairs of wolves look like experts, while the dogs seem, well, adorable and confused.The researchers reported their findings in the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences.With no training, five of seven wolf pairs succeeded in mastering the task at least once. Only one of eight dog pairs did.With individual training intended to show the animals that if both ropes were held in the mouth, they could get the treat, three of four wolf pairs succeeded multiple times. Two of six dog pairs succeeded — once.Dr. Marshall-Pescini said both wolves and dogs were raised in exactly the same conditions at the center, where they live in groups with a lot of human contact but are not kept as pets. The reason for wolves performing much better, she said, might be that in the wild they must cooperate in bringing down big game and sharing it if they are to survive.Dogs, whether they are free-ranging, foraging at garbage dumps or looking for discarded food, don’t need teamwork.But defining tolerance, which is supposed to aid cooperation, is tricky.“Wolves argue a lot around food,” she said. “But in the end they eat together.” As for dogs, she said, “They don’t even argue about it.” An earlier study of free-ranging dogs, she said, showed that the dominant dog ate first and other dogs waited.Of course, pet dogs often eat together with two bowls. And dogs can be trained to do just about anything; even the act of training may change their ability to cooperate.In a previous study, dogs that had been highly trained — not at the rope pull test, but for other tasks — were much better able to succeed at the rope pull.
For Patients With Heart Failure, Little Guidance as Death Nears Ricky Hurst’s doctors told him last year that there was nothing more they could do. His heart was failing and he should get his affairs in order. The end was coming.His family gathered. He spoke to his pastor and resigned himself to death. “If it was meant to be, it was meant to be,” he said.But. Mr. Hurst, 56, a former ranger and school football coach in Jackson, Mich., is still alive, although his heart continues to weaken. And patients like him are raising a new dilemma for doctors.Heart disease once killed ruthlessly and quickly; patients like Mr. Hurst succumbed to heart attacks and sudden death from cardiac arrest. But with improved medical care and implanted devices that bolster the heart, a growing number of heart patients survive for years, even decades, coping with a chronic, progressive condition punctuated by crises and hospitalizations.Their disease at that point is called heart failure — their weakened heart cannot pump enough blood to supply the body’s needs. The number of Americans with heart failure increased to 6.5 million in 2011-2014 from 5.7 million in 2009-2012, according to the American Heart Association.More than 10 percent of those over age 80 have heart failure, and more patients are living longer with advanced disease. Even as the death rate from heart attacks is falling, the figure for heart failure is rising.Yet there are no widely accepted guidelines for dealing with these patients as they near death. Cancer specialists regularly move their patients to hospice at the end of life, for instance, but few cardiologists even think of it. Heart patients account for just 15 percent of hospice deaths, while cancer patients make up half, according to a recent study.That paper, published in the Journal of the American College of Cardiology, reviewed a number of ways in which heart patients are let down at the end of life. Implanted defibrillators often remain activated until the very end, for example, even for those in hospice.A fifth of heart patients with defibrillators get shocked by them in the last few weeks of life, and 8 percent get shocked minutes before dying. Most patients are never told that they can ask that the defibrillators be turned off.“Getting shocks at the end of life is not really helping patients live longer or better,” said Dr. Larry Allen, a heart failure specialist at the University of Colorado and an author of the study.“We shouldn’t have a single one of these cases happening,” said Dr. Haider Warraich, a cardiology fellow at Duke University and first author of the study.Experts often focus on the strides made in preventing and treating heart disease. Its incidence has declined by 70 percent in the past 50 years. People have heart attacks later in life than they used to, are more likely to survive them, and often live for years afterward with few or no symptoms.“We are very proud” of that progress, said Dr. Patrice Desvigne-Nickens, a medical officer at the National Heart, Lung and Blood Institute.Still, she added, cardiologists and their patients should be discussing end-of-life options and palliative care earlier in the course of heart failure.“Everyone is uncomfortable with end-of-life discussions,” she said. “The field of cancer may be ahead of us. We should learn from looking at their example.”But cardiologists thrive on the dramatic saving of lives, said Dr. Michael Bristow, a cardiologist at the University of Colorado Denver. They devote their professional lives to rescuing patients having heart attacks and bringing them back from the brink.End-of-life care is not typically their focus; neither do they spend much time pondering what some of their patients may experience in the future. “Those who go into cardiology are not necessarily ones who want to deal with death and dying,” Dr. Bristow said.The very nature of end-stage heart failure makes it all the more difficult to prepare.“Very few patients understand the trajectory of the disease,” said Dr. Lynne Warner Stevenson, a heart failure specialist at Vanderbilt University. The path has peaks and valleys, but as the patient declines, each peak is a little lower than the one before.And often doctors do not tell patients what to expect.“Unfortunately, when you have patients with a chronic illness like heart failure, everyone thinks someone else will talk about it,” Dr. Stevenson said. “Too often, no one takes ownership of the last stage of the journey with the patient.”Dr. Ellen Hummel of the University of Michigan, one of a small number of doctors specializing in cardiology palliative care, said the typical patient with cancer will usually experience a “fairly predictable” decline.“They will be less able to take care of themselves,” she said. “They will be more symptomatic and come back to the hospital more frequently. And once this starts, it will probably continue until they die. Most people can see the end coming.”But patients with end-stage heart failure are more likely to have wild swings, Dr. Hummel said, veering from feeling better to being terribly ill.“It is confusing to both the patient and provider. Are they actually dying, or can we rescue them from a particular episode of worsening?”Dr. Harlan Krumholz, a cardiologist at Yale University, agreed: “The issue is knowing who is really at the end of life.” For patients with heart failure, seesawing between good periods and bad, it can be very difficult to make the call.Dr. Allen recently discussed all this with a patient, Ed Harvey.Mr. Harvey, 75, has an implanted defibrillator, and his heart is weakening, pumping progressively less blood. Dr. Allen gave him medications that helped for a while, but, Dr. Allen said, “we have maxed out on what can be done.”He can’t say with any certainty how long Mr. Harvey has. But now is the time, Dr. Allen told him, to talk about the end of life.Mr. Harvey still feels pretty good, but “when you have congestive heart failure and it is not getting any better, you know that day is going to come,” he said.He has been living with heart failure for more than a decade, and fears becoming a burden as his heart gets worse. It is now so weak that the only medical option left is an implantable pump. He knows that soon he will need full-time care.“I have elected that if it got to that point,” he said, “put me in a hospice and let me go.”
Election Results Invigorate Medicaid Expansion Hopes WASHINGTON — The election results in Maine and Virginia have energized supporters of expanding Medicaid under the Affordable Care Act in several holdout states. After months of battling Republican efforts to repeal the law, they now see political consensus shifting in their direction.Groups in Idaho and Utah are already working through the process of getting Medicaid expansion initiatives on next year’s ballots, hoping to follow Maine’s path after failing through the legislative route. And the outlook for legislative approval has brightened in Virginia after Democrats picked up at least 15 seats in the Republican-controlled House of Delegates and could potentially control the chamber once all the votes are counted.Advocacy groups are also hoping the decisive victory in Maine, and exit polls suggesting health care was the top issue in Virginia, will add momentum to efforts in Kansas and North Carolina.“The results from Maine and Virginia send a very clear signal that the public is interested in moving past the type of obstruction we’ve seen from policymakers in some states,” said Katherine Howitt, associate director of policy at Community Catalyst, a consumer advocacy group.The expansion debate in many states has been a political stew, with opposition a mix of fiscal concerns, philosophical resistance and stiff political opposition to Obamacare, which made Medicaid expansion possible. But many advocates hope growing public support for expansion and the fading of the Obama era will mean a softening of opposition among some governors and legislators who have long resisted the idea.Expanding Medicaid was a key provision of the Affordable Care Act, meant to ensure that all Americans below or somewhat above the federal poverty line would qualify for government health insurance. But a Supreme Court decision in 2012 made the choice to expand coverage optional for states. Before Election Day, 31 states and the District of Columbia had chosen to accept federal funding to expand coverage.In Virginia, the outgoing Democratic governor, Terry McAuliffe, tried repeatedly to expand Medicaid, but the majority Republican legislature kept blocking it. Advocates there hope that Democratic gains in the legislature, and perhaps some changes of heart among Republicans worried by the exit polls showing health care to be a top concern, could mean enough votes to approve expansion.In Maine, legislators had voted to expand the program five times, but Gov. Paul LePage, a Republican, vetoed each bill. Though the outcome of the ballot initiative is not subject to a veto, Mr. LePage indicated in a statement Wednesday that his administration will not implement the change unless the legislature identifies funding sources for the state portion of the program’s costs.Expansion supporters insisted the state had no choice but to expand Medicaid, but acknowledged Mr. LePage could make it difficult over the next year, his last in office.“He could violate the law,” said Robyn Merrill, who helped run the pro-expansion campaign. “But if the people who are now eligible for coverage are denied it, they will have legal recourse.”Not every state’s voters can count on ballot initiatives as a means of expanding Medicaid. Fewer than half the states in the country allow citizen-driven initiatives, including some of the largest that have declined to expand, like Texas and Georgia.Neither does Kansas, where the Republican-controlled Legislature voted to expand Medicaid earlier this year but failed to override a veto by Gov. Sam Brownback. Mr. Brownback is awaiting confirmation to an ambassador at large position in the Trump administration, but Lt. Gov. Jeff Colyer, a fellow Republican who would replace him, has also indicated he would resist expansion.Still, David Jordan, who leads the Alliance for a Healthy Kansas, an advocacy group, pointed out that if Mr. Colyer becomes governor, he will face re-election a year from now in a state where polls have found resounding support for expanding Medicaid.“Yesterday’s results in Virginia and Maine should send a message to him,” Mr. Jordan said. “It could become really tough to go against this wave.”But for many Republican politicians, the idea of expanding Medicaid remains hard to love. Providing government insurance coverage to poor adults who are not disabled is anathema to many. They view such help as discouraging work, though data suggests most new Medicaid recipients have jobs and states that expanded did not see reductions in employment among low-income people.Seema Verma, the administrator of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, which oversees the program, told state Medicaid directors on Tuesday that her department would begin approving state plans to condition Medicaid coverage for non-disabled adults on work or volunteer hours.“Believing that community engagement requirements do not support or promote the objectives of Medicaid is a tragic example of the soft bigotry of low expectations consistently espoused by the prior administration,” Ms. Verma said. “Those days are over.”Several states have asked Ms. Verma’s office for permission to impose work requirements on Medicaid beneficiaries. Matt Salo, the executive director of the National Association of Medicaid Directors, said that he thought work requirements might make expansion more acceptable to some state legislatures, like Florida’s, that have been reluctant in the past. “You can rebrand that,” he said. “You can do that very effectively.”The federal government paid the entire cost of expanding Medicaid for the first three years of Obamacare, but that changed this year. States now must pay 5 percent of the new beneficiaries’ medical bills, a proportion that will increase to 10 percent by 2020. So any state that expands now will need to find some funding to pay for its share.States that expanded Medicaid expect to spend $8.5 billion from their own funds on expansion in the 2018 fiscal year, according to the National Association of State Budget Officers.“Every political decision is about value, and the value is what’s the return for the money,” said Tony Keck, a former director of South Carolina’s Department of Health and Human Services, a state that has not expanded. Mr. Keck, now a hospital executive, said that legislators there thought it was more important to invest in existing populations of Medicaid beneficiaries than to expand the program to cover childless adults.In Utah, a newly formed political committee called Utah Decides Healthcare just concluded seven required public hearings around the state and hopes to soon start gathering the 113,143 signatures needed to get an expansion question on next year’s ballot. The Republican-controlled legislature could interfere if the initiative were to pass, but RyLee Curtis, the campaign manager for the Utah effort, said she doubted it would because Gov. Gary Herbert and the State Senate had tried to expand Medicaid in the past.Jonathan Schleifer, the executive director of the Fairness Project, a left-leaning group founded in California that donated nearly $700,000 to the pro-expansion campaign in Maine, said the group was eager to help the efforts in Utah and Idaho and scout out other states where ballot initiatives might work.“Grassroots groups in other states were waiting to see what happened last night and now they know what’s possible,” said Mr. Schleifer, his voice hoarse from whooping at a victory party in Maine on Tuesday night. “In the next couple weeks we’ll be able to start talking about what other states have the ability to run these initiatives and the grassroots enthusiasm to do that.”
Kathy Griffin’s Wild Show: Defiant, Shaken, Then Fainting DUBLIN — Every era gets the Lenny Bruce it deserves. Ours is Kathy Griffin.On Wednesday night, Ms. Griffin, 57, delivered a wild two-hour-and-15-minute performance that brought to mind Bruce’s late period, when that comic’s compelling if exhausting shows featured blow-by-blow analysis of his legal battles with the government.At the start of Ms. Griffin’s performance, which included raucous cheers, disarming boos and a premature finale when she fainted, she warned: “I’m not going to stop talking until I’m arrested.”A bit dramatic, sure, but not as much as you might think. Ms. Griffin embarked on this international tour, “Laugh Your Head Off,” after her American dates were canceled when she was photographed holding a Donald Trump mask smeared in ketchup. TMZ’s headline: “Kathy Griffin Beheads President Trump.”Even though Mr. Trump has picked fights with everyone from Meryl Streep to the cast of “Hamilton” since being elected, he has gone after no artist as hard as Ms. Griffin. He wrote a blistering tweet, his wife released a strongly worded formal statement and his son Donald Jr. harshly criticized her on Fox News.While Ms. Griffin joked on Wednesday, “For two hours I had to convince my mom I wasn’t in ISIS,” her stories about the resulting furor were dark and even chilling.As a result of this tasteless photo, Ms. Griffin didn’t just receive death threats, lose gigs and sponsorship money, and get fired as a host of CNN’s annual New Year’s Eve special. She was also put on the no-fly list and became the subject of a Secret Service investigation for, she says, “conspiracy to assassinate the president.” When she asked the federal agent why the government was going to such extremes, the woman pointed upward, indicating, Ms. Griffin interpreted, that this came from the president himself.Onstage, in front of red block letters spelling out her first name, Ms. Griffin wore the blue dress from the fateful photo, and appeared defiant one moment, shook up the next. She singled out stars who sent their support, fired back at celebrities who criticized the photo (look out, Alyssa Milano and Debra Messing), and got emotional about others, like Anderson Cooper, her co-host on New Year’s Eve, who tweeted his disapproval. “You know what Cher said?” Ms. Griffin said onstage, shifting into an impression of her friend. “Well, you wanted to be famous, bitch.”The entire episode showed her to be the outsider she always said she was, skewering the famous while somehow being obsessed with them at the same time. In this regard, she’s a perfect match for Mr. Trump, whom she has known for nearly two decades, dating to an episode of the 1990s sitcom “Suddenly Susan” on which both appeared. She remembered the moment on Wednesday: When he greeted her with “Call me The Donald,” she responded, “Call me The Kathy.”Mr. Trump may come from Queens and Ms. Griffin from suburban Chicago, but for some time now, they have both lived on Planet Celebrity. Though Ms. Griffin spent years making fun of Kim Kardashian, she moved next door to this reality TV star, and when not mocking the Trump family on Wednesday (she called his older sons “Eddie Munster and Date Rape”), Ms. Griffin spilled secrets about the home life of Kanye West and Ms. Kardashian: They drive around in a Rolls-Royce golf cart and keep the mannequin of Taylor Swift from his “Famous” video in their house. “Sometimes, late at night, I can hear them printing money,” she quipped.Ms. Griffin does not write taut jokes; she emerged from the West Coast alt-comedy scene of the 1990s, when comics were reacting against the machine-gun-joke style of comedy clubs and building acts on digressive stories and conversational riffs. Even then, Ms. Griffin relied on highly personal revelations, often shameless and sexual and sprinkled with celebrity dust. If she slept with Jack Black, she talked about it onstage, then wrote about talking about it.She is famous for frivolity, derided by some peers for her obsession with boldface names. But it’s not fair to chalk up Ms. Griffin’s success to our culture’s lust for scandal and stardom, though that’s certainly part of it. “I will be your guilty pleasure,” she wrote in her best-selling 2009 memoir, “Official Book Club Selection.”Ms. Griffin, who reveres Joan Rivers, belongs to a glorious show-business tradition of hard-working, mouthy survivors with ambition to burn, an instinct for self-promotion and a chip on the shoulder. If she ever cared about alienating someone famous to get a laugh — whether a network executive, a commander in chief or garden-variety actors doing their best — she doesn’t anymore. “I have a lot of female hostility,” she said Wednesday, pivoting from earnest to glib. “It’s very trendy.”Some of that hostility is directed toward Harvey Levin, the TMZ founder, and Andy Cohen, the host of “Watch What Happens Live” and her replacement on the New Year’s Eve show. After Mr. Cohen pretended that he didn’t know who Ms. Griffin was in a video on TMZ, Ms. Griffin responded with a 17-minute video of her own in which she criticized both men for misogyny. She also revealed Mr. Levin’s phone number and claimed that Mr. Cohen offered her cocaine twice (he has denied it).Onstage she took shots at both of them again, but the variety of insults she leveled, some more thinly supported than others, made it seem as if she were just tossing out the kitchen sink, and not to funny ends. Ms. Griffin often veered off-course, and when she referred to “being in the United Kingdom,” she was startled by the angry reaction of the Dublin audience. The packed crowd of die-hard fans turned on her, hissing and booing. She seemed thrown off-balance, and had trouble returning to her story, not for the last time.Some forceful directorial guidance could hone this wandering series of stories into a more refined show that sticks to a theme and a through-line revolving around Mr. Trump. But this messy, indulgent production instead gives us Ms. Griffin unfiltered, which has the benefit of seeming like a backstage gossip session, albeit one that lost steam as it headed past the 60-minute mark and she dabbed sweat from her forehead.After more than two hours, Ms. Griffin started telling a story about Mariah Carey when she froze, looked down and slumped, suddenly silent. She leaned into the microphone and said: “Randy, I’m going down.” Her boyfriend hurried onstage and grabbed her. Before he escorted her offstage, she said, “I’ll be back.”The crowd gasped and waited in the dark for minutes, until he helped Ms. Griffin back to the microphone, when she muttered something hard to hear over the cheers. What was clear was that the show was over. She later apologized in a video, saying she fainted.It was a shockingly anxious end to the evening, revealing perhaps the toll this sprawling tour (or her recent controversies) has taken on her. But counting out a force of nature like Ms. Griffin is a mistake. Just as the condemnation of her Trump photo fueled this new show, her collapse just added more drama to an evening that did not lack for it. As she exited with assistance, she turned to the crowd and scrunched her face into a self-mocking grimace that seemed to say: How ridiculous is this?
Maimed but Unbowed, He Understands What Lies Ahead for Gordon Hayward Edgar Sosa, the starting point guard for the New Zealand Breakers of Australia’s National Basketball League, was changing after practice one morning last month when he heard a commotion coming from the coach’s office, where his teammates were watching the Boston Celtics play the Cleveland Cavaliers in the N.B.A.’s season opener.Sosa soon learned what his teammates had seen — that the Celtics’ Gordon Hayward had crumpled to the court at Quicken Loans Arena with a grisly injury that contorted the lower part of his left leg into the shape of an ampersand. From his safe remove on the far side of the world, Sosa watched the aftermath unfold on television, and part of it was eerily familiar. He spotted the Celtics’ Al Horford.“I saw Al’s face,” Sosa said in a recent telephone interview, “and it was the same face he made when it happened to me.”In 2011, while he and Horford were playing for the Dominican Republic in an Olympic qualifier in Argentina, Sosa crashed under the basket and, in clinical terms, sustained compound — or open — fractures of his right tibia and fibula.Simply put, the two bones in his lower leg cracked and tore through his skin.“Your leg isn’t supposed to go that way,” Sosa said.In the gruesome tradition of quarterback Joe Theismann, whose football career ended when a sack snapped his right leg on “Monday Night Football” in 1985, Sosa has accepted his place as a 21st-century emblem of horrifying leg injuries. Before Kevin Ware (2013), before Paul George (2014) and before Hayward (2017), there was Sosa.“Anytime something like this happens,” he said, “my Twitter blows up.”As Hayward begins the long process of rehabilitating from a dislocation fracture of his left ankle, Sosa, 29, is the rare athlete who understands the hard road ahead. He has lived out an answer to the question: How does an elite athlete come back from such a mangling?Every injury is different, of course, and Hayward’s path forward has extra complexity because a dislocation involves torn ligaments.At a news conference last week, Hayward said that he was still susceptible to dark thoughts — “I have a lasting image in my mind of rolling over and looking at it,” he said — but that he wanted to attack his rehabilitation. An All-Star forward who signed a four-year, $128 million contract with the Celtics in July, Hayward also said he was relieved that his surgeons did not find any cartilage damage, which would have presented another set of challenges.“I’m putting zero expectations on myself as far as a timetable,” he said.Sosa, who grew up in Upper Manhattan and starred at Harlem’s Rice High School before playing at Louisville, can relate to it all: the deep desire to recover everything that he lost, the daily bouts with self-doubt, the nightmarish images that linger.“I thought my career was over,” he said.In September 2011, Sosa was fresh off his first season as a pro — and it had been a good one. Playing for a team called Angelico Biella in Italy’s top league, Sosa had averaged 14.1 points and 4.5 assists a game. Based on that body of work, Sosa said, the New Orleans Hornets had invited him to attend their training camp.But that was still a few weeks away when Sosa joined the Dominican Republic’s national team for the FIBA Americas Championship. In the late stages of blowout win against Panama, John Calipari, who was the Dominican Republic’s coach, urged Sosa to stay aggressive. Heeding Calipari’s advice, Sosa drove to the basket and absorbed contact as his defender looked to draw a charge. When Sosa fell, his leg buckled under him.He immediately knew that something was very wrong: His right shin had broken in half. The lower part of his leg simply dangled, as if the long sock that he wore was all that kept his ankle and foot attached to the rest of his body.Orlando Antigua, one of the team’s assistants, rushed to Sosa’s side and shooed away a camera operator. Sosa can remember screaming — but not because he felt physical pain. Instead, his mind raced. He thought about his future. He thought about the N.B.A. He thought the worst.After spending two days at a hospital in Argentina, Sosa was flown to the Dominican Republic, where surgeons put a titanium rod and several screws in his leg. Then came the hard part.Unlike Hayward, who will have a small army of specialists caring for him, Sosa was essentially unemployed. The Dominican national team covered the cost of his surgery, he said, but he returned home to New York without health insurance. He had only his savings from the season in Italy and a bonus from the national team as support for his indefinite future.Knowing that his rehabilitation would be a do-it-yourself project, Sosa became a self-taught expert on compound fractures.“I’ve never read up so much on anything in my life,” he said.Robinson Frias, his personal trainer and a childhood friend, found books on the topic. They made the Vanderbilt Y.M.C.A. on East 47th Street their unofficial headquarters. Sosa began spending six hours a day there, six days a week. (“Every day except Sunday,” he said.) He swam. He lifted weights. He got massages.“We just took the mind-set that if you feel better today than you did yesterday, or you can do something this week that you couldn’t do last week, then you’re doing it right,” Sosa said.After two months on crutches, he graduated to a walking boot. After four months, he wore sneakers again. But he had hang-ups. Walking down staircases terrified him. For weeks — months, even — he was afraid to put weight on his right foot. So he would grip the railing on both sides and hop down the steps.“It was all mental,” Sosa said.After six months, Sosa took his first tentative steps back onto a court and attempted some set shots. Frias suggested that Sosa take a dribble before shooting.“No, I’m not ready,” Sosa recalled telling him.“Come on, man,” Frias said. “Just try it.”Sosa found the courage to take a pull-up jumper. He landed.“And nothing happened,” he said.If that was a huge milestone, Sosa experienced setbacks, too. About nine months into the process, he was still having trouble flexing his right ankle. So surgeons removed two screws from the base of the titanium rod, which seemed to help.By July 2012, some 10 months after breaking his leg, Sosa had returned to competition for the Dominican Republic. But then, while bringing the ball upcourt in an exhibition against the United States, he planted and felt a sharp pain in his left foot.“Chris Paul might have been putting a little pressure on me, but nothing crazy,” Sosa said. “And then I just felt like, ‘Yo, what the hell?’ And I’m on the floor.”Sosa had fractured his fifth metatarsal, the long bone on the outside of the foot that connects to the little toe. He suspected that it had happened because he had overcompensated for lingering effects of the injury to his right leg.His plan to play for the Sacramento Kings’ summer league team? Gone.“At that time in my life, I was just out of it,” Sosa said. “I decided not to get surgery. I was tired of surgery. I was tired of seeing doctors.”And he was tired of rehab, but he stuck with it. By 2013, he was back (again), playing for professional teams in Puerto Rico and the Dominican Republic. A few months later, he secured a contract with Ratiopharm Ulm of Germany’s Basketball Bundesliga. He was thankful.“They gave me an opportunity,” he said. “I was able to get my career back on track.”Sosa’s career has since taken him to Iran, back to Italy and now to New Zealand, where he leads his team in scoring. And as the Celtics hoped for the best with Hayward, Horford said he took some solace in Sosa’s comeback.“It does make me feel good about Gordon,” Horford said in an interview. “I think his whole thing is just to make sure he doesn’t try to get ahead of himself. If he does the rehab process the right way, he should be able to come back and be ready to go.”Sosa has never summoned the nerve to watch the entire video of his fall. He can watch the first part, as he leaves his feet, he said, but then he has to turn away. He also cannot help but wonder how his life might have been different had he not gotten hurt. He once dreamed of the N.B.A.“I try not to think about it,” he said. “I speak about it with my family and they’re like, ‘You know, it was part of God’s plan.’ But I felt like I was so close.”Still, Sosa said he was grateful to be playing at all. He runs and jumps and hardly remembers his injury, he said. Just last week, he drained a game-winning 3-pointer to lift the Breakers to a last-second win against the Cairns Taipans. After a tough break, his game is whole.
‘Tell Your Story to Everyone’: Readers Affected by Mass Killings Offer Advice for Fellow Survivors The Reader Center is a newsroom initiative that is helping The Times build deeper ties with our audience.In the painful aftermath of the church shooting in Sutherland Springs, Tex., that left 26 people dead on Sunday, we asked readers affected by similar attacks to share their experiences and tell us how they have coped, in the hopes that any advice they offer might help others facing such a tragedy. We heard from more than 150 people in less than a day.Their responses suggest that such mass killings touch myriad lives — bystanders, first responders, close-knit communities, the families and friends of those lost, among others — and that the effects are powerful, lingering and often hard to talk about.David Silberman of Brooklyn, N.Y., survived a deadly 1985 grenade attack at the Vienna airport when he was 16 and found it cathartic simply to put his experience into words: “Thank you for giving me a place to tell my story,” he wrote. “I don’t get to tell it often. I don’t know how I got through it. It is haunting, and no one ever wanted to talk about it with me. It was scary, foreign and not part of anyone else’s reality.”Over all, those affected did not sugarcoat the suffering; some are coping better than others. But all have found a way to go on, and many expressed hope that they could provide a road map for survivors like those in Sutherland Springs, now taking the first steps on a very tough path.(Some replies have been edited and condensed for clarity.)Mandi Burkett, Austin, Tex. Affected by the shooting at Wedgwood Baptist Church in Fort Worth, Tex., in 1999Andie Caputo, Smyrna, Del. Affected by the shooting in Las Vegas in 2017Jon Ferguson, Vancouver, Wash. Affected by the shooting in Seattle’s Capitol Hill neighborhood in 2006Brad Geiger, Logan, Ohio Affected by the shooting in Aurora, Colo., in 2012Mary Kay Mace, Petersburg, Ill. Affected by the shooting at Northern Illinois University in 2008Dora Totoian, Roseburg, Ore. Affected by the shooting at Umpqua Community College in Oregon in 2015Jonas Nahoum, Santa Fe, N.M. Affected by the shooting in Newtown, Conn., in 2012Barb Cone, Concord, Mass. Affected by the downing of Pacific Southwest Airlines Flight 1771 in 1987Jolanda Arnold, Lorton, Va. Affected by the shooting in the Washington Navy Yard in 2013
Alternatives to Opioids for Pain Relief A combination of Tylenol and Advil worked just as well as opioids for relief of pain in the emergency room, a randomized trial has found.Researchers studied 416 men and women who arrived in the E.R. with moderate to severe pain in their arms or legs from sprains, strains, fractures or other injuries. They randomly assigned them to an oral dose of acetaminophen (Tylenol) with either ibuprofen (Advil) or the opioids oxycodone, hydrocodone or codeine. Two hours later, they questioned them using an 11-point pain scale.The average score was 8.7 before taking medicine. That score decreased 4.3 points with ibuprofen and Tylenol, 4.4 with oxycodone and Tylenol, 3.5 with hydrocodone and Tylenol, and 3.9 with codeine and Tylenol. In other words, there was no significant difference, either statistically or clinically, among any of the four regimens. The study is in JAMA.The lead author, Dr. Andrew K. Chang, a professor of emergency medicine at Albany Medical College, said that while any single patient might find opioids more effective, on average, even for the severe pain of fractures, non-opioids worked just as well.“Some docs will reflexively give an opioid to anyone with a fracture,” Dr. Chang said. “But if we can give the non-opioid and show the patient that it works, we can help with this ongoing opioid problem.”
Can Ketones Rev Up Our Workouts? Ketone supplements that are supposed to mimic the effects of a high-fat, low-carb diet have become popular recently among athletes looking for a performance boost.But a new study suggests that the supplements may not work as advertised and could have the kinds of gastrointestinal side effects that make starting, let alone completing, an event almost impossible.Anyone who spends time around serious endurance athletes or their advisers has probably by now heard chatter about and enthusiasm for high-fat, low-carb diets. These diets are supposed to enable the body to become better able to use fat as fuel.Carbohydrates are, of course, the body’s preferred source of quick fuel for muscles during activity. But our bodies can store relatively small amounts of them and may almost exhaust those stores during prolonged or intense exertion, forcing us to slow or stop.But most of us have plentiful stores of fat. If we became able to efficiently use that source for exercise fuel, we could continue longer and more intensively (and also, if desired, rid ourselves of excess body fat).Inspired by that possibility, some athletes and nutritionists now tout diets that contain almost no carbohydrates and large amounts of fat. Over time, these diets lower the body’s stores of carbohydrates and require it to burn fat almost exclusively.Such diets also result in an abundance of ketones, substances produced by the liver that the muscles and brain can use as fuel.The problem is that it takes weeks or, more commonly, months for the body to adjust to a low-carbohydrate diet. In the interim, athletic performance suffers and most people feel sluggish and unwell, sometimes developing a condition known as “ketone flu” that resembles food poisoning.So some athletes and their advisers have begun to wonder whether taking ketone supplements might allow athletes to gain the benefits of a high-fat diet without the long, difficult transition time. Various types of these supplements, in the form of powders or drinks, are chemically identical to the ketones made by the body. They are also widely available at many stores and, as of now, legal under international doping regulations.Last year, a much-discussed study conducted by researchers at Oxford University found that a proprietary type of ketone supplement improved cycling performance in a group of trained riders.But that study looked at relatively moderate exercise, not the kind of intense exertion required during competition.So for the new study, which was published last month in Frontiers in Physiology, scientists at the Australian Institute of Sport and other institutions decided to create a more real-world test of ketone supplementation.Conveniently, they had a ready-made group of volunteers in the 11 members of a men’s professional, world-class bicycling team that were about to begin their preseason training in Australia. The team’s members, who had ridden in the Tour de France and other international events, were keenly interested in the possible benefits of ketone supplements, according to Louise Burke, the head of sports nutrition at the Australian Institute of Sport and the study’s senior author.The experiment the scientists concocted was simple. About an hour before a training session, they gave each rider a drink that contained either ketones or a placebo. The drinks looked and tasted much the same. The riders had a second dose of that same drink immediately before starting. (The drink they used is, so far, available only for research purposes and not for sale to the public.)Then the men rode stationary bicycles programmed to recreate on a screen the 31-kilometer (about 19 miles) course of the 2017 road-cycling world championship. The riders virtually raced at the highest pace and power output that they could maintain.Each rider rode after drinking the placebo and, on another day, after swallowing the ketones.The results were unanimous. Every rider performed worse after drinking the ketone supplement. Their times were about 2 percent slower and their power output almost 4 percent less, declines that, in actual competition, would drop them from contention for medals.Every rider also reported some degree of gastrointestinal upset after drinking the ketone supplement. One experienced such “prolonged vomiting and dizziness,” the scientists reported, that he could not start the time trial. Others had symptoms ranging from dry retching to relatively mild nausea.Not surprisingly, the riders all guessed during which trial they had the ketones, based on their stomachs’ reactions. But most told the scientists that they thought they were riding faster during that trial, because the pedaling had felt so difficult. Told that their performance in fact had declined, almost all announced that they were no longer interested in using ketones for performance enhancement.This study was very short-term, however. It is possible that the riders and their stomachs might adjust to the supplement over time and perhaps gain benefits, Dr. Burke says. The study also does not show whether stomach upset alone clobbered the riders’ performance or if other physiological processes were involved. The riders’ brains could have interpreted the sudden presence of ketones as indicating a metabolic problem, Dr. Burke says, and responded by sending messages to the muscles urging them to slow down.The upshot is that far more research needs to be conducted before experts can make recommendations about ketone supplementation for athletes, Dr. Burke says. “Everyone wants simple answers,” she says, but the body’s mechanisms are too complex to allow for that, especially during sports.In the meantime, there is one other practical caveat to bear in mind about the currently available supplements, she says. They almost all “taste very nasty.”
Pesticides Tied to Problems in Assisted Pregnancies Eating fruits and vegetables high in pesticides may lower the chance of successful birth with assisted reproductive technology, according to a new report.Researchers studied 325 women undergoing fertility treatment in Boston. They collected data on medical and lifestyle factors and had the women fill out food frequency questionnaires. Using data from the United States Department of Agriculture, which samples produce for pesticide residue, they calculated the amount of residue on what the women ate. A list of fruits and vegetables and their “pesticide residue score” appears in the study, published in JAMA Internal Medicine.The 325 women had 228 live births. Women in the highest one-quarter for high-pesticide residue produce consumption had an 18 percent lower probability of pregnancy and a 26 percent lower probability of live birth than those in the lowest one-quarter.The senior author, Dr. Jorge E. Chavarro, an associate professor of nutrition at the Harvard T.H. Chan School of Public Health, noted that this is just one study, and it would have to be replicated before firm conclusions can be drawn.Still, he said, “If you really want to eat peaches or spinach” — two of the most contaminated foods on the list — “it makes sense to switch to the organic version. The literature is not so clear on whether switching has health consequences. This is the first study to my knowledge to suggest that it does.”
Women More Likely Than Men to Die in First Year After Heart Attack Compared with men, women are at significantly higher risk of death in the first year after a heart attack, a new study has found.The generally higher risk of death in women who have heart attacks is well known, but the differences are largely explained by women’s older age when the attack occurs, higher rates of other diseases, and types of treatment they typically receive.This new analysis, published in PLOS One, controlled for those variables and others. Researchers studied 802 men and 802 women matched for age, hypertension, diabetes, smoking status, various measures of heart function and the types of treatment and medications they received.In the first year of a five-year follow-up, women were 60 percent more likely to die than their male counterparts. Beyond the first year, men’s and women’s death rates did not differ.The reasons are unclear, but the authors suggest that higher levels of psychological stress and depression in women may play a role. They did not have the data to assess these factors.“We should follow female patients more carefully,” said the senior author, Dr. Georg Schmidt, a professor of cardiology at the Technical University of Munich in Germany. “As doctors, we should ask our patients about their concerns, and look for opportunities for support beyond drugs and other standard treatments.”
Delhi, Blanketed in Toxic Haze, ‘Has Become a Gas Chamber’ NEW DELHI — The toxic haze blanketing New Delhi was so severe on Tuesday that politicians announced plans to close schools, flights were delayed and the chief minister of Delhi state said the city had “become a gas chamber.”For Arvind Kumar, a chest surgeon for more than three decades, the situation is adding to a growing health crisis in the region. “I don’t see pink lungs even among healthy nonsmoking young people,” he said in a telephone interview on Tuesday. “The air quality has become so bad that even if you are a nonsmoker you are still suffering.”The thick, acrid fog is not new to Delhi, where it settles around this time every year, covering the capital in vehicle emissions and smoke from the burning of crops in neighboring states and from fireworks from Diwali, the Hindu festival of lights. But in recent years, the problem appears to have worsened.On Tuesday, levels of the most dangerous air particles, called PM 2.5, reached more than 700 micrograms per cubic meter in parts of the city, according to data from the United States Embassy. Experts say that prolonged exposure to such high concentrations of PM 2.5 is equivalent to smoking more than two packs of cigarettes a day.Officials have struggled to control pollution in the National Capital Region, which includes Delhi and is home to more than 45 million people. A ban on the sale of firecrackers before Diwali in October appeared to keep the problem in check, but the illegal burning of crops, which contributes significantly to pollution at this time of the year, has just started.The situation prompted the state’s chief minister, Arvind Kejriwal, to say on Twitter: “Delhi has become a gas chamber. Every year this happens during this part of year. We have to find a soln to crop burning in adjoining states.”Imran Hussain, the environment minister of Delhi, said on Twitter in August that he had written to officials in the states of Haryana, Punjab, Rajasthan and Uttar Pradesh requesting a reduction in agricultural fires, but no action had been taken, a government spokesman said on Twitter on Tuesday.The fires, combined with car exhaust, smokestack emissions and the burning of garbage, contribute to pollution levels that often hover in the “severe” category, the highest level designated by the Central Pollution Control Board.An article last month in the medical journal The Lancet found that pollution was responsible for up to 2.5 million deaths in India in 2015, more than in any other country.Manish Sisodia, the deputy chief minister of Delhi, said on Tuesday that “all options” for reducing pollution were being considered. The government has suggested reintroducing an alternate-days limit on the use of private cars, and using helicopters to sprinkle water to help clear the air.At a news conference late Tuesday, Mr. Sisodia announced that classes at primary schools would be suspended on Wednesday, and possibly longer. Last year, the government temporarily closed more than 1,800 schools after a string of especially polluted days.Dr. Sarath K. Guttikunda, an air pollution specialist and the director of the independent research group Urban Emissions, said that keeping children at home could reduce their exposure to air pollution, especially in areas where vehicles emissions are high.But Dr. Kumar, the chest surgeon, said he was unconvinced by the government’s approach to curbing pollution. The problem would continue, he added, unless the city’s residents put greater collective pressure on politicians to devise sustainable solutions.“The options for Delhi residents are three,” Dr. Kumar said. “One is to stop breathing. That is not possible. Second is to quit Delhi. That is also not possible. Third is to make the right to breathe fresh air a people’s movement.”
Could You Be Allergic to Additives in Food or Drugs? When Kammy Eisenberg broke out in hives last December, she attributed it to stress. But the rash persisted, and Ms. Eisenberg was covered in hives “from head to toe” for eight months.“It was everywhere,” said Ms. Eisenberg, 52, who lives in Atlanta. “I was beyond itchy.” Even powerful drugs like prednisone provided only moderate relief, she said. “My allergist was at a loss.”She eventually consulted Dr. Robert Swerlick, an Emory University dermatologist known to take on difficult cases, who reviewed her medical record and suggested that since she was allergic to sulfa drugs, she might also be sensitive to dyes used to color medications.Within days, Ms. Eisenberg switched her anti-allergy pills, which contained two blue dyes, even though they looked white, to a dye-free brand.“The day after I switched, I was 90 percent better,” Ms. Eisenberg said, adding, “I was swallowing my problem by the handful every day.”Doctors disagree on whether food additives like dyes, preservatives, stabilizers, emulsifiers and other substances can provoke a true allergic reaction. Medical journals have published case reports of allergic responses to food additives, including anaphylaxis, a potentially life-threatening reaction that causes the throat to constrict. But many allergists say such reactions are extremely rare, noting that the reports are anecdotal and that rigorous double-blinded studies have not found evidence that allergies to food additives exist.“It’s very, very rare to see hives from a chemical that’s a food additive, because these are small molecules that typically don’t trigger allergic reactions,” said Dr. Scott Sicherer, a professor of pediatrics, allergy and immunology at Icahn School of Medicine at Mount Sinai. “No one’s saying it doesn’t happen, but the reports in the literature are handfuls — they’re not in the thousands.”In 1986, however, after more than a dozen deaths were linked to severe allergic reactions to sulfite preservatives used to prevent green vegetables from turning brown, the Food and Drug Administration banned restaurants from using sulfites on raw fruits and vegetables.The agency also requires foods containing yellow dye No. 5 to list the color on the label, saying the dye can cause hives in rare cases, estimated at “fewer than one in 10,000 people.”In recent years, however, as consumer demand for natural foods has risen, food manufacturers have been replacing synthetic additives with natural ones derived from plants, insects and other animal products. These natural substances are more likely to provoke an allergic reaction because they contain proteins that our immune systems might react to, said Dr. Ronald Simon, an allergist and immunologist at Scripps Clinic Carmel Valley in San Diego, who reviewed the literature for UpToDate, a clinical information resource used by doctors.These natural additives include substances like a red food dye called carmine or cochineal extract, which is made from insects; a yellow dye made from the fruit of the annatto tree; psyllium, a source of dietary fiber derived from seed husks; and guar gum, which is made from a bean and is used as a binder and emulsifier in food and drugs. All of these have been implicated in rare cases of anaphylaxis.Allergic reactions have also been reported from carrageenin, a thickener derived from seaweed; the jelling agent pectin; gelatin; and Mycoprotein/, a fermented fungus used as a meat substitute and marketed under the brand name Quorn.Our immune system recognizes these natural proteins, Dr. Simon said, “because it evolved to protect us against invading organisms and to recognize protein structures in fungi and bacteria or cancer cells.” He said the immune system is less likely to recognize a synthetic additive. (Dr. Simon acknowledged he has served as a consultant on food additives for the International Association of Color Manufacturers.)Dr. Swerlick, the dermatologist who treated Ms. Eisenberg, agreed that reactions to synthetic additives are rare and not well understood, making them even more difficult to identify. In a 2013 paper, he described 11 patients he had seen over a five-year period, all of whom came in with chronic skin disorders that cleared up significantly when drugs containing coloring were replaced by dye-free medications. (Skeptics say that hives generally come and go and there is no proof that the removal of dyes caused the patients’ skin to clear.)Each of Dr. Swerlick’s cases was slightly different, he said, so it was “a bit of detective work.” One 61-year-old patient had chronic skin problems on his hand, but the rash flared up suddenly, shortly after he refilled a prescription for diabetes pills and noticed that the color had changed from off-white to dark purple. The new pills, it turned out, contained a blue dye. Another patient, a 42-year-old man, had suffered from a rash for almost a year but noticed it resolved when he went on vacation and left his toothpaste, which contained a blue dye, at home.Many of the patients had “a drug allergy list that’s 20 drugs long,” Dr. Swerlick said. “You realize they can’t be allergic to all these medications. It must be something common to all of them, like a dye. That’s one of the clues.”He said people concerned about dye additives should watch for reactions to items that contain food coloring, such as red velvet cake and drinks like Powerade and Crystal Light. Patients can look up the ingredients in prescription and nonprescription drugs by reading the label or using the online resource Daily Med.Unlike severe allergic reactions to a food, like peanuts, which occur immediately, the reactions to additives tend to be delayed for several hours or even days, making them difficult to trace, he said, and there are no good diagnostic tools for identifying food additive allergies. One hint that you may have an allergy to an additive is if you develop a reaction to a prepared product or a restaurant item, even though you tolerate the same food when you make it at home.“There’s reason to be skeptical,” Dr. Swerlick said. “But I think the allergy community historically has equated absence of proof with proof of absence.”
CVS Will Offer Next-Day Delivery of Prescription Drugs CVS Health said on Monday that it would begin offering next-day delivery of prescription drugs and same-day service in some big cities next year, reflecting the company’s worries about potential competition from Amazon.CVS Health also said its retail sales declined in the third quarter of this year, a dip that the company said occurred because of the three major hurricanes that forced many stores to close.Amazon’s possible expansion into prescription drugs has set the pharmacy industry on edge in recent months, igniting fears that the online behemoth will upend the existing business in much the same way that it has disrupted other consumer markets, from books to household supplies to groceries.Amazon has not publicly announced its plans. But it has acquired several state-level permits to be a wholesale pharmacy distributor over the past year and recently hired a handful of executives from the drug industry.Anxiety over such a market upheaval is said to have partly driven CVS to enter into talks with Aetna, the large health insurer, over a potential acquisition. Larry Merlo, the president and chief executive of CVS Health, did not discuss the potential deal in a call with analysts on Monday.Free delivery will be available “within hours” for prescription drug orders, as well as a “curated selection of over-the-counter products” in Manhattan beginning Dec. 4, the company said. Same-day delivery would expand to Miami, Boston, Philadelphia, Washington, D.C. and San Francisco early next year. Next-day delivery, from local stores, would become available in the rest of the country.A CVS spokeswoman, Erin Pensa, said delivery fees outside of Manhattan will vary by location, and have not yet been made public. She also said the company’s delivery partner has not been announced, but “we’ve been able to use our scale to negotiate low-cost, affordable options for all CVS Pharmacy customers.”“Our goal is to meet the needs of all of our customers wherever, however and whenever they want,” Helena Foulkes, executive vice president of CVS Health and president of CVS Pharmacy, said in a statement Monday.CVS said Monday that retail sales, which include prescription sales, fell 2.7 percent in the third quarter, although that was offset by the performance of its pharmacy services business, which manages drug benefits for employers and insurers. That unit saw revenues increase by 8.1 percent. Overall, third-quarter revenues increased by 3.5 percent, or $1.6 billion, to $46.2 billion, compared to the third quarter of 2016.
Chopin’s Heart, Pickled in a Jar, Offers Clues to His Death The heart of Frederic Chopin, pickled in a jar of alcohol and then encased in a stone pillar in Holy Cross Church in Warsaw, shows the Polish composer died from complications of tuberculosis, according to an early version of an article published by the American Journal of Medicine.According to the article, which is to be published in its final form in February under the title “A Closer Look at Frederic Chopin’s Cause of Death,” the researchers found Chopin’s heart “submerged in an amber-brown liquid,” thought to be Cognac, which was often used for tissue preservation.The researchers did not open the jar, but they could see that Chopin’s heart was “massively enlarged and floppy,” they wrote in the article. It was also covered in a white substance that gave it a “frosted” appearance, leading the researchers to conclude that Chopin had suffered from pericarditis, an inflammation of tissue around the heart that was likely the result of tuberculosis. Previous theories held that he may have died from cystic fibrosis.The heart has a long and contentious history. Chopin, who died in Paris in 1849 at the age of 39, dreaded being buried alive, and asked that his body be cut open before burial and his heart sent to Warsaw. Accordingly, his heart was cut out, sealed in a crystal jar and smuggled past the Russian authorities into what is now Poland.During the Warsaw Uprising in 1944, the occupying German forces, anxious about Chopin’s status as Polish national icon, suppressed performances of his music. His heart was removed from the church and kept at the headquarters of the SS commander Erich von dem Bach-Zelewski. After the war, it was returned to the church and interred in a pillar inscribed with a verse from Matthew: “For where your treasure is, there your heart will be also.”On the evening of April 14, 2014, a small group that included Polish scientists, church officials and members of the Chopin Institute disinterred the jar and examined its contents in secret. An account published a few months later by The Associated Press is thick with intrigue: “With a feeling of mystery hanging in the air, they worked in total concentration, mostly whispering, as they removed the heart from its resting place and carried out the inspection — taking more than 1,000 photos and adding hot wax to the jar’s seal to prevent evaporation.”One of the scientists, Dr. Tadeusz Dobosz, told The A.P., “The spirit of this night was very sublime.”Dr. Michal Witt, the lead researcher on a team of Polish scientists who worked on the article, said in a telephone interview that it was important to understand the heart as a symbol of Polish national identity: “For Poles, this piece of his body which is present still in Poland is of special emotional value.”Except for his heart, Chopin’s body is buried in at the Père Lachaise Cemetery in Paris.
Don’t Nudge Me: The Limits of Behavioral Economics in Medicine Whenever I talk to physicians about outcomes that are worse than you’d expect, they are quick to point out that noncompliance — when a patient does not follow a course of treatment — is a major problem.Sometimes prescriptions aren’t filled. Other times they are, but patients don’t take the drugs as prescribed. All of this can lead to more than 100,000 deaths a year.A thorough review published in The New England Journal of Medicine about a decade ago estimated that up to two-thirds of medication-related hospital admissions in the United States were because of noncompliance, at a cost of about $100 billion a year. These included treatments for H.I.V., high blood pressure, mental health and childhood illnesses (it can be difficult to get children to take their medicine, too).To address the issue, researchers have been trying various strategies, including those rooted in behavioral economics. So far, there hasn’t been much progress. A systematic review published five years ago in Annals of Internal Medicine looked at all kinds of trials that tried to improve patient compliance. It found some limited successes in improving patient compliance in different disorders, but most of the trials were small and not easily generalized outside the research setting.A more recent Cochrane review concluded that “current methods of improving medication adherence for chronic health problems are mostly complex and not very effective.”At first glance, behavioral economics — the basis of Richard Thaler’s recent Nobel Prize in Economics — seems like a rich field of potential solutions. People tend to do things, like donate organs, when it’s the default option as opposed to something they need to request. They tend to be less likely to miss appointments if you tell them how many other patients show up for theirs. They tend to be more likely to engage in preventive behaviors like using sunscreen if you focus on the benefits, not the harms. Many are turning to ideas like these to improve medication adherence.But those excited about the potential of behavioral economics should keep in mind the results of a recent study. It pulled out all the stops in trying to get patients who had a heart attack to be more compliant in taking their medication. (Patients’ adherence at such a time is surprisingly low, even though it makes a big difference in outcomes, so this is a major problem.)Researchers randomly assigned more than 1,500 people to one of two groups. All had recently had heart attacks. One group received the usual care. The other received special electronic pill bottles that monitored patients’ use of medication. Those patients who took their drugs were entered into a lottery in which they had a 20 percent chance to receive $5 and a 1 percent chance to win $50 every day for a year.That’s not all. The lottery group members could also sign up to have a friend or family member automatically be notified if they didn’t take their pills so that they could receive social support. They were given access to special social work resources. There was even a staff engagement adviser whose specific duty was providing close monitoring and feedback, and who would remind patients about the importance of adherence.This was a kitchen-sink approach. It involved direct financial incentives, social support nudges, health care system resources and significant clinical management. It failed.The time to first hospitalization for a cardiovascular problem or death was the same between the two groups. The time to any hospitalization and the total number of hospitalizations were the same. So were the medical costs. Even medication adherence — the process measure that might influence these outcomes — was no different between the two groups.The researchers in this trial deserve praise for their frank assessment of their results, as well as for trying to brainstorm ways in which they might achieve success in the future. Getting patients to change their behavior is very hard. In the past, we’ve tried making drugs free to patients to get them to adhere to their medications and improve outcomes. That failed. We’ve tried lotteries (as in the study above) to nudge people to achieve better compliance. That failed.Maybe financial incentives, and behavioral economics in general, work better in public health than in more direct health care. There have been successes, after all, with respect to weight loss — although these seemed to disappear over time. We’ve also seen promise with respect to smoking cessation, although these come with caveats as well.Experts caution that the interventions that achieve success are often very intensive. They demand a great deal of attention, and can be quite expensive. Moreover, they are very focused, usually on a single issue or condition.The problem is that health has so many moving parts. The health care system has even more. Trying to improve any one aspect can make others worse. Behavioral economics may offer us some fascinating theories to test in controlled trials, but we have a long way to go before we can assume it’s a cure for what ails Americans.
Mumps Makes a Comeback, Even Among the Vaccinated If you think you’ve been seeing mumps in the news more often in the past couple of years, you’re absolutely right.“Mumps outbreaks are on the rise,” said Dr. Janell Routh, a pediatrician who is a medical officer on the mumps team at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. More than 6,000 cases of mumps were reported in the United States last year, the highest number in 10 years. Around 2010, total annual cases were down in the hundreds.Most of the recent cases occurred in outbreaks, including a large one in Arkansas, rather than as a sporadic here-a-case, there-a-case disease. And most of the outbreaks were among people 18 to 22 years old, most of whom had had the requisite two doses of mumps vaccine in childhood. “We are seeing it in a young and highly vaccinated population,” Dr. Routh said.In my world, you can date people by their childhood diseases. I’m too young to have had measles, but old enough to have had mumps and chickenpox. Chickenpox I remember as particularly itchy and unpleasant; mumps I remember for the swollen chipmunk cheeks and, as with tonsillitis, a certain amount of ice cream to make painful swallowing easier.Mumps is a virus that causes swelling of the parotid glands, the salivary glands under the ears, along with some more general symptoms like fever and fatigue. The mumps vaccine was licensed in 1967, based on the Jeryl Lynn strain of mumps, and developed by Dr. Maurice Hilleman, who cultured the virus from his sick daughter.Mumps is transmitted by droplets of saliva or mucus. It can be spread by coughing and sneezing, but also by sharing cups and the close contact of living and eating and exercising together. Many of the recent outbreaks occurred in college dorms or among athletic teams, as happened with the Syracuse University men’s and women’s lacrosse teams last month. And “we are seeing it in other close-knit communities that tend to live closely together with strong social or cultural interactions,” Dr. Routh said, including religious groups.Mumps vaccine is now combined with measles and rubella vaccine in the M.M.R., given at ages 1 and 4. But the immunity wanes over time in some people, and with close contact, there can be sufficient exposure to sufficient quantities of virus to overcome the vaccines’ protection.Dr. Patricia Quinlisk, the medical director and state epidemiologist for the Iowa Department of Public Health, dealt with an outbreak at the University of Iowa and surrounding area in 2015 to 2016 of more than 450 cases of mumps. The students involved had all had their childhood M.M.R. shots, she said, as required by the university, and the decision was made to hold a series of clinics offering a third dose of vaccine.In an article in September in the New England Journal of Medicine, Dr. Quinlisk and her colleagues traced the importance of waning immunity, and the effectiveness of that third M.M.R. shot in the Iowa outbreak.“Should this situation occur again, we would give a third dose,” Dr. Quinlisk said. “In our outbreak it did substantially decrease the risk of other students getting mumps, and was instrumental in stopping the outbreak.”Other strategies to contain the outbreak on campus included education about cough hygiene (for instance, cough into your arm or a tissue), and working with student health services to make it possible for infectious students to isolate themselves, arranging for them to miss classes and retake tests so there was no pressure to break isolation, setting up food delivery services, and providing masks for those who had to use communal bathrooms.Even if the immunity has dwindled, “we know that two doses of M.M.R. decreases your risk of serious complications,” Dr. Routh said. An important rationale for vaccinating against mumps was always to protect against orchitis, an inflammation of the testicles which used to be relatively common in post-pubertal males who came down with mumps, affecting 20 to 30 percent of them, and sometimes leaving them with loss of testicular tissue, decreased sperm counts and concerns about future fertility. The rate was much lower in vaccinated young adults.Mumps virus can also more rarely cause inflammation of the ovaries, and even more rarely, though more dangerously, deafness and inflammation of the brain; again, these complications appear to be even rarer in those who have been vaccinated, but they may still occur. And even with 6,000 cases, it can be hard to estimate the frequency of a complication like lasting deafness, which used to occur in about one in every 20,000 cases.Of course, waning immunity can be a problem after college as well. Dr. Alan Lucerna, the program director for combined emergency and internal medicine at Rowan School of Osteopathic Medicine in New Jersey, reported in February 2017 on a case of mumps in a fully immunized adult, in an article titled “Still a pain in the neck after all this time.”“A good number of patients who come to the E.R. and are subsequently diagnosed with mumps are vaccinated and come in thinking it was just a lymph node swelling,” Dr. Lucerna said. Adults who develop swelling at the angle of the jaw together with flulike symptoms should think about mumps, he said. “We probably underdiagnose it.”Should parents worry about sending their children off to college with their two childhood doses of mumps vaccine? “No, we do know that two doses of vaccine is protective,” Dr. Routh said. The current recommendation is that a third dose, while safe, is only warranted for people felt to be at high risk by public health workers, like the Iowa students in the setting of an outbreak. The two childhood doses of M.M.R. do protect most people against getting mumps, and they also, of course protect against measles, a much more serious disease, not to mention rubella.“We’ve heard some people say this proves the vaccine’s not working, but the vaccine probably prevented a lot more students from getting ill,” Dr. Quinlisk said. Immunity does not wane in everyone, so many people who are exposed don’t get sick. “We certainly commend the University of Iowa for having a mandatory vaccine policy which kept it from being worse and prevented complications.”Parents might want to keep in mind the informal survey done at the Iowa vaccine clinics where students waiting to get their third M.M.R.s were asked why they had come: Were they motivated by the posters on campus bulletin boards or by fear of complications?“The No. 1 answer by far was: My mother called me and told me to,” Dr. Quinlisk said. “So the emails that went out to parents had a significant impact, and we have told other college campuses to make sure they don’t forget to keep the parents in the loop.”
Unlocking the Secrets of the Microbiome Modern technology is making it possible for medical scientists to analyze inhabitants of our innards that most people probably would rather not know about. But the resulting information could one day save your health or even your life.I’m referring to the trillions of bacteria, viruses and fungi that inhabit virtually every body part, including those tissues once thought to be sterile. Together, they make up the human microbiome and represent what is perhaps the most promising yet challenging task of modern medicine: Determining the normal microscopic inhabitants of every organ and knowing how to restore the proper balance of organisms when it is disrupted.Proof of principle, as scientists call it, has already been established for a sometimes devastating intestinal infection by the bacterium Clostridium difficile. This infection, popularly called C. diff, often occurs when potent antibiotics wipe out the normal bacterial inhabitants of the gut that otherwise keep it in check.When all else fails to clear up a recurrent C. diff infection, treatment with a fecal transplant from a healthy gut presumed to contain bacteria that can suppress C. diff activity is often highly effective, with a cure rate in excess of 90 percent.Under the auspices of the National Institutes of Health, a large team of scientists is now engaged in creating a “normal” microbiological road map for the following tissues: gastrointestinal tract, oral cavity, skin, airways, urogenital tract, blood and eye. The effort, called the Human Microbiome Project, takes advantage of new technology that can rapidly analyze large samples of genetic material, making it possible to identify the organisms present in these tissues.Depending on the body site, anywhere from 20 percent to 60 percent of the organisms that make up the microbiota cannot be cultured and identified with the older, traditional techniques used by microbiologists.If the institutes’ five-year project succeeds in defining changes in the microbiome that are associated with disease, it has the potential to transform medicine, assuming ways can be found to correct microbial distortions in the affected tissues.Here are some of the demonstration projects already underway:Skin: Dr. Martin J. Blaser, microbiologist and director of the human microbiome program at New York University School of Medicine, is directing examination of the organisms on the skin of 75 people with and without psoriasis, checking whether agents used to treat the condition adversely alter the microbiome.Vagina: Jacques Ravel at the University of Maryland School of Medicine and Larry J. Forney at the University of Idaho are studying 200 women to determine the microbial changes that may result in a common and difficult-to-control infection called bacterial vaginosis, which afflicts more than 20 million American women of childbearing age.Blood: At Washington University in St. Louis, Dr. Gregory A. Storch, a specialist in pediatric infectious disease, and colleagues are examining the role of viruses and the immune system in the blood and respiratory and gastrointestinal tracts of children who develop serious fevers that result in some 20 million visits a year to hospital emergency rooms.Gastrointestinal tract: Claire M. Fraser-Liggett, a microbiologist, and Dr. Alan R. Shuldiner, a geneticist, both at the University of Maryland School of Medicine, are exploring how the microbiome affects the body’s use of energy and the development of obesity.Previous studies have already found differences in the gut microbiota of lean and obese adults. There is also evidence that the typical high-calorie American diet rich in sugar, meats and processed foods may adversely affect the balance of microbes in the gut and foster the extraction and absorption of excess calories from food.A diet more heavily based on plants — that is, fruits and vegetables — may result in a microbiome containing a wider range of healthful organisms. In studies, mice that had a microbiota preconditioned by the typical American diet did not respond as healthfully to a plant-based diet.Compared to lean mice, obese mice have a 50 percent reduction in organisms called Bacteroidetes and a proportional increase in Firmicutes, and lean mice get fat when given fecal transplants from obese mice. A similar shift has been observed in people, and the distorted ratio of organisms was shown to reverse in people who lose weight following bariatric surgery.There is also evidence that microbes residing in the gut can affect distant sites through their influence on a person’s immune responses. This indirect action has been suggested as a possible mechanism behind rheumatoid arthritis. In mice, certain bacteria in the gut have been shown to foster production of antibodies that attack the joints, resulting in the joint destruction typical of rheumatoid arthritis.Similarly, studies have suggested a role of the gut microbiota in the risk of developing neuropsychiatric illnesses like schizophrenia, obsessive-compulsive disorder, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, autism and even chronic fatigue syndrome. Researchers have suggested that in genetically susceptible people, altered microbes in the gut may disrupt the blood-brain barrier, leading to the production of antibodies that adversely affect normal brain development.Among the challenges in elucidating the microbiome’s role in health and disease is determining whether changes found in the microorganisms inhabiting various organs are a cause or an effect. Most of what is already known about the microbiota in people with various health problems is based on observation, making it difficult to say which came first: the disease or the disrupted microbiota.Animal studies like those mentioned above are a clue but not proof of a similar effect in people. Until therapeutic studies now underway are completed, people with conditions thought to be influenced by the microbiome have no choice currently but to rely on possible treatments suggested by animal research and some preliminary human studies.For example, people with irritable bowel syndrome, inflammatory bowel disease, allergic disorders and infections with drug-resistant organisms may benefit from taking probiotics, though some probiotics sold in health food and drugstores may be ineffective. It may be necessary to tailor-make the remedy for each condition or even each patient.Meanwhile, people interested in fostering a health-promoting array of gut microorganisms should consider shifting from a diet heavily based on meats, carbohydrates and processed foods to one that emphasizes plants. As Dr. Jeffrey Gordon, a genomics specialist at Washington University School of Medicine, told The Times last year, “The nutritional value of food is influenced in part by the microbial community that encounters that food.”
Gymnast Aly Raisman Says She Was Molested by Team Doctor The American gymnast Aly Raisman said that she too had been sexually abused by the team doctor who is facing criminal charges for molesting other gymnasts.Ms. Raisman, 23, made the revelation in an interview with “60 Minutes,” excerpts from which were released Friday, and in a book, “Fierce,” being released next week.“I am angry,” she said. “I’m really upset because I care a lot, when I see these young girls that come up to me, and they ask for pictures or autographs, whatever it is, every time I look at them, every time I see them smiling, I just think I just want to create change so that they never, ever have to go through this.”Ms. Raisman was captain of the teams that won gold medals for the United States at the 2012 London and 2016 Rio Olympics. Another member of the 2012 team, McKayla Maroney, said last month that the doctor, Lawrence G. Nassar, began molesting her at age 13. Jamie Dantzscher, a 2000 Olympian, is among the other gymnasts who have accused Dr. Nassar.Dr. Nassar is in jail in Michigan, facing 22 counts of first-degree criminal sexual conduct involving at least seven victims. “This guy is a monster,” Bill Schuette, the attorney general of Michigan, said in February.Dr. Nassar, who has pleaded guilty to possession of child pornography, is awaiting trial on criminal sexual conduct charges, and he has been sued by more than 100 women accusing him of sexual abuse. He has pleaded not guilty to the assault charges.Although the charges relate to seven gymnasts, lawyers say dozens of other accusers have come forward.Dr. Nassar has denied accusations against him in the past. A lawyer who has represented him, Matt Newburg, said Friday that he did not have a comment.“Why are we looking at why didn’t the girls speak up?” Ms. Raisman told “60 Minutes.” “Why not look at, what about the culture? What did USA Gymnastics do, and Larry Nassar do, to manipulate these girls so much that they are so afraid to speak up?”In a statement, USA Gymnastics said it had adopted a new policy that requires the reporting of suspicions of sexual abuse. “We want to work with Aly and all interested athletes to keep athletes safe,” it said. “We are appalled by the conduct of which Larry Nassar is accused, and we are very sorry that any athlete has been harmed during his or her gymnastics career.”The interview will air in full on Sunday on CBS.In addition to her team gold medals, Ms. Raisman won the 2012 gold medal in floor exercise, as well as two individual silver medals and one bronze in her Olympics career. She also won four world championships medals and numerous national titles.Though she was the oldest gymnast on both the 2012 and 2016 teams, she has spoken of continuing her career and going for the 2020 Games.
Canadian Filmmakers Get a View of North Korea Through Hockey VANCOUVER, British Columbia — The dated but majestic Pyongyang Ice Rink is adorned with timeless symbols of a country in isolation.In the arena’s upper bowl, portraits of North Korea’s past leaders, Kim Il-sung and Kim Jong-il, hang like championship banners.On the ice below, the national men’s hockey team often simulates a five-on-four penalty killing drill that was introduced to the North Koreans by the Soviets several decades ago.Over the past year, five Canadian filmmakers have often been at the rink with the team, sometimes even on the ice. They are documenting the slap shots and the post-practice speeches, but are also trying to peel back the layers of a long-existing hockey subculture in one of the world’s most mysterious nations.Why were their pads and equipment old? Why did they repeatedly run the same predictable plays? Where did these players come from?“All of the questions that I’m sure a lot of people have about North Korea and hockey over there, I had when I first went,” said Nigel Edwards, 27, the director of the coming documentary “Closing the Gap.”The opportunity to get answers to those questions raised even more. How did a film crew from Vancouver, British Columbia, acquire unparalleled access to shadow North Korean sports teams?Matt Reichel, one of the film’s producers, worked and lived in Asia on and off over the past decade. A 2009 graduate of Brown University’s international relations and East Asian studies program, Reichel started nonprofit and digital marketing ventures while living overseas, building connections in the process.He estimated that he had been to North Korea more than 60 times. On one of those visits, he discovered that North Korea had a pastime in common with his home country.“I saw that there was a hockey tournament one year around the time of Kim Jong-il’s birthday, so I decided to go check it out,” he said.Back in Vancouver, his hometown, Reichel teamed up with Edwards, a former television production assistant.“We wanted to use media arts as a way to look at something about North Korean society that’s not political,” Reichel, 30, said. “We focused on a very tiny slice of North Korean society and wanted to see what we can learn about it in a very earnest, very honest way.”It took two years of leveraging Reichel’s contacts and forming new ones with the Ministry of Sports and the Korean Ice Hockey Association, a league of seven clubs, for the filmmakers to get permission for the project.In November 2016, the production crew went on the first of three trips to Pyongyang, the North Korean capital, to shadow the men’s national team and a professional team, Taesongsan Winter Sports Club. Reichel and Sunny Hahm, an associate producer, a translator and a Seoul native, provided insight into North Korean culture for the new visitors.“They told us the first time you go there you’re a stranger, the second time you’re a friend, and the third time you are family,” Edwards said.To break the ice with the athletes during the first days of filming, the crew played the Canadian card.“I think from a hockey standpoint, they were very interested in us being Canadians,” Edwards said. “I think they were a little more disappointed that my entire production team couldn’t skate.”But Hahm, a competitive recreation hockey player, could skate and was critical to building rapport. Aside from being able to speak Korean, he often practiced with the Taesongsan team, making suggestions to the coach and players.In a game during the crew’s first trip, the Taesongsan coach presented Hahm with a jersey and an offer to sit with the team during the game, though Hahm did not play because of Korean Ice Hockey Association rules.For the rest of the crew, trust and relationships were built on consistency and gestures. Edwards made a point of learning each player’s name; in turn they remembered his. While shooting interviews, members of the crew were cognizant of their subjects’ skepticism.“We spent lots of conversations just sort of talking about, how do we frame these questions?” Edwards said. “How do we try to show and prove to them that we mean well and we’re not going to like rip them off or show them in a bad light?”Every morning after breakfast, the crew made the five-minute trek from its downtown hotel to the arena.Many competitors in ice sports like speed skating, figure skating and hockey have the arena on a given day. The schedule is planned to the minute, Edwards said.Sharing the facility is efficient, but not conducive to ideal hockey practice. The ice is worn from overuse, and divots courtesy of the figure skaters are visible throughout the rink. The glass is scratched, and the boards lack compression.The hockey play is also behind the times.“It was a very conservative, traditional style of play,” Hahm, 29, said. “You can tell there was a sense of real lack of creativity when it comes to formulating plays.”According to the filmmakers, North Korean teams still abide by the training materials and methodologies passed on from the Soviet Union in the 1950s. While South Korea’s hockey program has evolved in recent years, qualifying for the 2018 Winter Olympics as the host country, North Korea’s has remained stagnant. The lack of outside exposure and information sharing — televised N.H.L. games, foreign-exchange skills clinics and access to the internet — has significantly impeded the progress.“The vast majority of the team comes from the countryside, and they are recruited as kids 12, 13 years old, based on who has athletic talent in those small villages or towns,” Reichel said.Most of the team’s equipment is used and is donated by the International Ice Hockey Federation, which is based in Zurich. The film crew tried to help, contributing tape and new composite graphite hockey sticks.“We wanted them to feel they were on equal levels of playing,” Hahm said.What the North Korean players lack in knowledge, gear and size (no one on the national team is over six feet tall), they try to make up for through discipline and heart.“You must rise higher and faster because if you are running, the opposite player is flying, and in order to catch up them, you need to train harder,” Hong Chun-rim, a star forward, said through an interpreter in “Closing the Gap.”The filmmakers shadowed the Taesongsan team for 11 days during their first trip in November. When they returned to film last spring for three weeks, they focused on the 20-man national team, which was training for and competing in the I.I.H.F. world championship in Auckland, New Zealand.A Division II team in international competition, North Korea was in a pool that also included China, Israel and Mexico.Hong, the fastest and most skilled player on the team, scored a hat trick in North Korea’s only victory in Auckland — an 11-3 win over Turkey. The team had sustained several injuries, mainly from the intense play against bigger and stronger opponents.The yearly change of scenery for international tournaments provides an opportunity for the players to explore things they cannot find in Pyongyang.“When we were in New Zealand, there was a group of them that would always be looking at YouTube videos in the lobby,” Edwards said. “They are very aware that there is the N.H.L. and big players. So, when they travel abroad, they always learn more.”In December, the crew will make one last trip to Pyongyang to conclude filming. The filmmakers are seeking a distributor and hope to show the documentary at the top film festivals next year.“We said this story is going to be a real interesting tile,” Reichel said, “as if North Korea is this giant mosaic and there’s all these different components to what North Korean society is.”He added that he did not expect the recent rising tensions between North Korea and the United States to have much impact on the players’ day-to-day lives.“They are all seeking what we all seek, which is self-worth,” Edwards said. “They are just looking for a place to prove themselves, and that, for them, is winning gold on an international stage. Even though, how realistic is that?“But they will keep pushing that forever, because that is their job.”
On the Table, the Brain Appeared Normal BOSTON — The brain arrived in April, delivered to the basement of the hospital without ceremony, like all the others. There were a few differences with this one — not because it was more important, but because it was more notorious.It went to the lab outside the city, instead of the one in Boston, where most of the examinations are performed these days, because it was less likely to attract attention that way. Instead of being carried in through the service entrance, it was ushered in secretly through the underground tunnel system. The brain was given a pseudonym, and only three people knew how to identify it.Other than that, the brain came alone and disconnected from its past, unattached to its celebrity. The sordid details of the man’s rise and fall, the speculation over what went wrong, the debate over justice — all that was left behind for others to assess.It was just a brain, not large or small, not deformed or extraordinary in appearance, an oblong and gelatinous coil weighing 1,573 grams, or about three and a half pounds, just carved from the skull of a 27-year-old man. The coroner took special care, and it arrived hours later in near-perfect condition.“They handled everything beautifully,” the neuropathologist said.The laboratory was a 30-minute drive from the prison where the man hanged himself a night or two earlier. His name was familiar to the scientists, just as he was to people throughout New England and many around the country. Now his brain was about 30 miles north of where the man had most recently worked, in Foxborough, Mass.They expected a normal brain because of the man’s age.“I didn’t equate his behavior with the disease,” the neuropathologist said. “I just thought that’s who he was.”On the table, the brain appeared healthy. The meninges, the layers of translucent membranes that coat and protect the brain, still enveloped it. The brain had a healthy sheen.The brain was sliced into sheaths, maybe a half-inch at a time, starting at the front. That was where the first inkling came that this was not just another 27-year-old brain. Even to the naked eye, the cross sections had substantial gaps in the tissues — fluid-filled ventricles that expanded as the brain tissue itself shrank. A cross section of a healthy 27-year-old brain looks robust, fleshy. This one was hollowed by boomerang-shaped caverns.“The reason the skull grows is to make room for the growing brain,” the neuropathologist explained. “Everything is packed really tightly. Nature doesn’t leave any gaps.”The septum pellucidum, a small membrane between the two halves of the brain, was atrophied to the point that it looked withered and fragile, even perforated. When the neuropathologist later went to look for others in a similar condition, the youngest comparable example was a 46-year-old boxer.The fornix, a C-shaped bundle of nerves, was similarly deteriorated, stripped of its relative heft. The hippocampus, too. Even some of the most famously diseased brains that the neuropathologist had explored, from men who had died decades later, did not have such obvious signs of destruction when examined by the naked eye.But only under a microscope could the disease be diagnosed with certainty. Wafer-like tissues were immunostained, using antibodies designed to discolor a specific protein — in this case, tau, which clumps and spreads, killing brain cells. That is where the full scope of the damage was apparent.Tau, stained brown, appeared like bursts of fireworks in the frontal cortex, the part of the brain that controls decision making, impulse and inhibition. The neuropathologist could see it spreading through the brain. It was in the amygdala, the part of the brain that regulates emotions like fear and anxiety, and the temporal lobe. She spotted “a perfect demonstration” of lesions around the tiny blood vessels, a telltale sign. She found previous microhemorrhages and astrocytic scarring around the ventricles.She declared the case Stage 3 on her own scale of severity, which goes from 1 to 4. It was the most damage she had seen in anyone that age. Among the hundreds of other brains she had examined and graded, the median age of a Stage 3 brain from his profession was 67. Now she had one that was only 27.What made the brain extraordinary, for the purpose of science, was not just the extent of the damage, but its singular cause. Most brains with that kind of damage have sustained a lifetime of other problems, too, from strokes to other diseases, like Alzheimer’s. Their samples are muddled, and not everything found can be connected to one particular disease.This one looked as if it had been lifted from the pages of a textbook devoted to just one disease.“It’s rare for us to get a brain of a person this young in such good shape,” the neuropathologist said. “It is a classic case. And it tells us a lot about the disease.”The brain is no longer a brain, in function or form, because it has been sliced into pieces. Those pieces have been numbered, archived and stored. Scientists still study it, probably will for years, because it is such a perfect, fascinating specimen.The neuropathologist and her closest associates kept this all to themselves for months, though, until the man’s family agreed to let the results go public. In September, the news came out and the headlines returned, but the neuropathologist did no interviews. She released only a short statement confirming the results of the examination.“I didn’t want to contribute to the sensationalism,” she said.But science cannot advance without the cumulative power of research, which was why she was in a university ballroom on Thursday, in front of more than 150 neurologists, pathologists and other scientists.She stood in the dark and put a PowerPoint presentation on the screen, several dozen slides of images showing an immensely atrophied young brain, the mind of a former star in his field who was also a convicted murderer.“He had beautiful pathology, if you can call it beautiful,” the neuropathologist had said earlier.The particulars of the damage that the neuropathologist detailed — the tangled tau proteins, the battered frontal cortex, the shrunken tissues and the enlarged ventricles — have long become familiar to those paying attention to brain science. They are the things that threaten the long-term future of the industry in which the man worked.This is where his job faces the most scrutiny — under the microscope in darkened labs and in the scientific presentations at academic conferences.“It’s scientifically interesting,” the neuropathologist said. “To me, it’s a fascinating brain.”
Shohei Otani, a Two-Way Player, Says He Is Ready to Leave Japan for M.L.B. OSAKA, Japan — Shohei Otani, an accomplished young pitcher and outfielder in Japan’s top league, announced on Saturday that he wanted to move to Major League Baseball next season.“The other day I met with team officials and stated my intentions,” Otani said at a news conference. “My request was met with warm words of support, so I hope to do my best in America from next year on.”Otani’s Japanese club, the Nippon Ham Fighters, said on Friday that it would allow Otani to use the posting system this off-season, clearing the way for him to sign with a major league team next season.Otani, 23, was named the most valuable player in the Pacific League for 2016, and he was 3-2 with a 3.20 earned run average this year. Despite thigh and ankle injuries, he batted .332 in 65 games with 16 doubles, eight home runs and 31 runs batted in. He had ankle surgery last month.He has a 42-15 record with a 2.52 E.R.A. and 624 strikeouts in 543 innings over five seasons, and a .286 batting average with 48 homers and 166 runs batted in.Because Otani has less than nine years of service time, Nippon Ham retains his rights, and he must go through the posting system to leave.If M.L.B., the MLB Players Association and Nippon Professional Baseball agree to a deal that would extend the expired posting agreement through this off-season, the team that signs Otani would pay the Fighters $20 million. Under M.L.B.’s labor contract, his signing bonus would be restricted, with the remaining pool money limited to $3,535,000.Under baseball’s new collective bargaining agreement, the 23-year-old Otani can agree only to a minor league contract that is subject to signing bonus pools. If added to a big league roster, he would have a salary of about the minimum $545,000 next season and would not be eligible for salary arbitration until 2020 at the earliest.If Otani waited until he turned 25 to enter M.L.B., there would be no restrictions and he could expect a better deal. But Otani said he wanted to go now rather than wait.“I am not a complete player yet, and I want to go to an environment where I can continue to get better,” he said. “I felt the same way when I graduated from high school. And it is my strongest reason for wanting to go now.”Otani considered going straight to M.L.B. out of high school but was persuaded to sign with the Fighters, who assured him that he could play the outfield as well as pitch.He said in the news conference that he hoped to continue batting and pitching.“Just before I turned professional, I didn’t imagine I would be able to do both,” Otani said. “But since then, the fans have encouraged it.” He added that Manager Hideki Kuriyama and his coaches had helped make the dual role possible. “That has left me with a strong desire to keep doing it,” he said, “not only for me, but for them.”“I don’t know if it will be possible,” he continued, “but I want to hear what teams over there say and what kind of situations might be available. Until that process has started, I can’t say how it might work out.”
Yuzuru Hanyu Withdraws From Key Skating Event After Injury OSAKA, Japan — Yuzuru Hanyu’s name was called at practice on Friday morning, and his music, Chopin’s Ballade No. 1, began playing over the public address system. There was only one problem. Hanyu, of Japan, the reigning men’s Olympic figure skating champion and the sport’s biggest star, was nowhere to be seen.On Thursday at training, Hanyu had sustained ligament damage to his right ankle during an awkward landing of a four-revolution jump. On Friday night, he was scheduled to compete in an important pre-Olympic competition, the NHK Trophy. But little seems to happen without drama and a sense of crisis in figure skating.Word spread early Friday that Hanyu, 22, would try to practice in the morning. If his ankle felt stable, he would compete in the evening. His fans, who follow him obsessively, began to gather hours ahead of the short program. Ina Oprisi, the manager of a medical equipment company, had traveled all the way from Romania, even with a ticket only to an exhibition performance on Sunday.“I’m checking my watch every five minutes” for updates on Hanyu’s condition, she said.Japanese reporters and photographers staked out the entrances to Osaka Municipal Central Gymnasium. The waiting was futile. Hanyu did not show up. He was receiving medical treatment, the Japanese Skating Federation said. He still hoped to compete in the evening. Anticipation reached a fever pitch.And then the answer came: Hanyu had withdrawn. No details were given about the severity of the ligament damage, which occurred when Hanyu essentially did a split while trying to land a quad Lutz. Later in the afternoon, Hanyu issued a statement, saying, “I am very sorry to have everyone worried.”His doctors had decided that he should not participate, he wrote. He would aim for the Japanese national championships, to be held just before Christmas. Even if he did not compete then, Japanese reporters said, the skating federation’s rules contain an exception that would permit Hanyu to compete at the 2018 Winter Games in February in Pyeongchang, South Korea.Hanyu is a fierce competitor, and there is wide belief here that he will make every effort to become the first male skater to repeat as Olympic champion since Dick Button of the United States in 1952.Some observers believe the injury might actually benefit him in a way, by dissuading Hanyu from compulsively trying for six or seven quad jumps at the Games, when his completeness as a skater could bring him a second gold medal with only, say, three or four.Still, if Hanyu recovers in time for the Olympics, it will be his first international competition in three months. Meanwhile, younger challengers like Nathan Chen of the United States and Shoma Uno of Japan — both magnificent jumpers — now have a chance to try to gain an edge in conditioning and performance.Other skaters and coaches wished Hanyu a speedy recovery on Friday. Some in the sport consider him the greatest skater ever, one whose presence inspires others to elevate their performances.“We hope he will be healthy enough to compete,” said Chen’s coach, Rafael Arutyunyan. “He gives so much spirit to a competition.”Asked whether Chen and Uno might now have a possible edge at the Olympics, Arutyunyan said: “We’re not talking about advantage. Competition is always good when everybody participates.”
The Secret to Roger Federer’s Success is This Man Pierre Paganini took part in track and field in his youth, and when he first decided to become a coach he was interested above all in working with soccer stars.But it is in tennis, a sport he has never played regularly, where he has made an indelible mark as the key man in the shadows for Roger Federer and Stan Wawrinka.If they have continued to win big into their 30s, it has a great deal to do with Paganini, the 60-year-old Swiss fitness coach who takes a cerebral approach to working up a sweat.“A big part of the reason that I’m here where I am today is definitely because of Pierre,” Federer told me in a recent interview.Where Federer finds himself now is back in London at the ATP Finals, the tour championship reserved for the world’s top eight players.Federer, now 36, is by far the oldest man in the field and in a round-robin group with Alexander Zverev, Marin Cilic and Jack Sock, who will face Federer in the opening singles match on Sunday. Federer has won the prestigious event a record six times and is the understandable favorite to win it again.Though he skipped the entire clay-court season to preserve his body and his spark, he has swept nearly all else before him, winning seven titles, including the Australian Open and Wimbledon, and losing just four matches all year.Back to No. 2 in the rankings behind Rafael Nadal, Federer’s winning percentage of 92 percent is his best since 2006, when he went 92-5, winning 95 percent of his singles matches (a season, it should be noted, in which he did play on clay).Paganini has worked with Federer for 17 years, longer than any other member of Federer’s current team. Is even he surprised by his man’s 2017?“Yes, totally, completely,” Paganini said on Tuesday by telephone in French. “You have to be honest. It’s a majestic, fantastic year. It’s not possible normally.”Paganini, who does most of his work with Federer off the tour in Switzerland and Dubai, has only seen two of Federer’s 19 Grand Slam tournament victories in person. In 2009, he was in Federer’s box when he won his first and only French Open. This year, he was at Wimbledon.Paganini said he was very much in the moment as he watched Federer defeat an emotional Cilic on the grass of the All England Club, but when Paganini caught his flight back to Switzerland, he said images kept surfacing in his brain of all the work Federer had done off camera to get back to this astonishing level.One of the most powerful images was from February 2016, when Federer was still recovering from surgery to repair a torn meniscus in his left knee, the first surgery of his life.“Rog worked with his physical therapist for two weeks and when we started the fitness training, at the beginning he had to, for example, jog five meters and then walk backwards,” Paganini said. “It was like he was learning to walk again. You can be the most positive person in the world and there are still moments where you wonder, is he really going to be able to play high-level tennis again?”The answer has been a resounding yes, although it required another six-month break from competition at the end of 2016. The question is how long Federer, the oldest men’s singles champion at Wimbledon in the Open era, might be able to sustain this if he continues cherry-picking his spots and staying fresh in the head and legs.Five years ago, I asked Paganini if Federer, then 31, could play on until 2016. He said he saw no reason to doubt it based on Federer’s playing style, talents and enduring enthusiasm.How about 2020?“I think only Rog will know when it’s the moment that he’ll want to say perhaps this is enough,” Paganini said. “Rog does have the biological age of 36 but for me, he has an athletic age that is younger than that and yet he has the maturity of someone well over 40. So it’s quite a balance. And because of that it’s very difficult to say or predict. It’s the man who makes the decision, not just the athlete, unless there’s a serious injury that leaves you no choice.”The two met when Federer was 14 and a new arrival at the Swiss national training center in Ecublens near Lausanne. Federer, the youngest boarder there, was still working through his talent and his temper. When he eventually put together his own team in 2000, he asked Paganini to join him.“He’s made fitness workouts so enjoyable, if they ever can be,” Federer said. “I just follow his beat. Whatever he tells me I’ll do it because I trust him. People ask me, do you still do your physical tests and stuff? I don’t have to do any tests because I work with Pierre and he knows and sees if I’m moving well or not; if I’m slow or fast; all these things. He’s had a huge part of this success, and I’m happy I called him way back when.”Paganini said his methods of training Federer have changed with the years. They used to play other sports like basketball in Federer’s youth to add variety but now focus on activities that directly correspond to tennis and, according to Paganini, they emphasize complex drills that mimic the multipronged challenges of the sport.“You have to be strong, fast, coordinated and have endurance in tennis and you have to do drills for that,” Paganini said. “But you also should never forget you have to use this on a tennis court; not on the road or in the pool. So you always have to create a link between the speed and the athletic way it’s used on the court. Nine times out of 10 on the court, the speed is in the first three steps and then you’re playing the tennis ball. So you have to train to be particularly strong in the first three steps.”Paganini said he truly believes Federer has not lost a step while acknowledging that full transparency was not the goal. “If there is anything that has diminished, it’s for the opponents to figure out,” he said with a chuckle.“When you judge speed in tennis, you have to judge it differently than you judge a 100-meter runner,” Paganini said. “You have to judge a great deal the reaction time and how well the speed is coordinated. It’s not only important to move fast. You have to move right, and with the nature of the sport, you have to move fast and right for a long time in a match. Rog has proved like others before him that it’s possible to do this past 30. I think what we forget with him is the discipline he has had for many, many years. All his life and his philosophy revolve around tennis.”Paganini’s enthusiasm remains intact, too, and he now has another comeback to manage. Wawrinka, 32, has been out since July because of left knee surgery of his own. Though he is still ranked seventh and technically qualified for the ATP Finals, he is unable to take part and returned to practice in Geneva for the first time since the operation on Tuesday. Paganini was with him.“We always benefit from experience and as we plan with Stan, it’s useful to have just gone through this with Rog,” Paganini said. “What is comparable is the duration. Rog stopped in July 2016 and started in January. Stan stopped in July 2017 and the goal is to start in January 2018.”It is a short-term project but Paganini and his prize pupils have focused above all on the long term. “Rog was always, even at age 20, interested in doing what he could to have a long career,” Paganini said.That has meant not overplaying, building breaks into the season and listening intently to his body’s signals. It has meant reducing, if only marginally, the number of training sessions through the years. Paganini hopes the younger set, the #nextgen if you will, is taking notes.“I think if we manage to motivate the young ones to give time to their bodies to recover from training before playing and then to give time to their bodies to recover from playing before training, this simple message can help us have fewer injuries in the future,” Paganini said.But he is not planning on being the next generation’s fitness trainer.“At my age, I’m looking at next season and no further than that,” he said. “I cannot plan long term for my own career at this stage. For now, I have the pleasure every day to cross paths with Rog and Stan. That’s my essence, and that’s enough.”
Knicks Roll Over the Kings as Porzingis Returns and Scores 34 Kristaps Porzingis returned after a one-game absence to score 34 points to lead the Knicks over the visiting Sacramento Kings, 118-91, on Saturday night.Courtney Lee added 20 points, and Enes Kanter had 17 points and 13 rebounds for the Knicks, who have won four straight at Madison Square Garden. They led by as many as 33 points in the fourth quarter.Skal Labissiere scored 19 points and Buddy Hield 17 for the Kings.Porzingis missed Wednesday night’s road loss against Orlando because of ankle and elbow injuries.The Kings got within one point on three occasions in the second quarter, the last time with 6 minutes 54 seconds remaining, when Hield’s jumper made the score 43-42. The Knicks then took off on a 21-7 run, capped by four straight points from Porzingis, and led by 64-49 at halftime.Porzingis, 22, who entered the game as the N.B.A.’s second-leading scorer, went 11 of 21 from the field, including 3 for 4 from 3-point range. He strung together six straight points to put the Knicks ahead by 74-53 with 8:38 left in the third quarter as fans serenaded him with “M.V.P.” chants.He went to the bench for good with the Knicks leading, 88-60, late in the third.The Knicks started slowly, missing five straight shots and turning the ball over twice as the Kings jumped out to a 10-0 lead.The Knicks closed out the opening period on a 32-13 run, highlighted by 16 points from Porzingis.
When He Needs Advice, a Philadelphia Flyer Turns to His Brother the Dancer For the first time in his young N.H.L. career, Taylor Leier made the Philadelphia Flyers’ opening-night roster. His parents, Tim and Cindy, shared in his triumph by making the trip from Saskatoon, Saskatchewan, to watch him play early-season games in Anaheim and Los Angeles last month.Leier’s brother, Keaton, could not make the trip to Southern California. He was instead enjoying a career milestone of his own. A first-year company dancer with the Atlanta Ballet, Keaton Leier, 21, had already been training 10 hours a day, five days a week, for more than a month by the time his older brother reported to the Flyers’ training camp in September. Keaton’s training regimen impresses his hockey-playing brother, who was selected by Philadelphia in the fourth round of the 2012 draft.“You should see him: He can do the splits up the wall,” Taylor Leier, 23, said. “That’s how strong he is in his lower body.”After he performed with the second company at the Houston Ballet last year, Keaton Leier’s move to Atlanta is a major promotion. The months of training leading up to the company’s first performance in December have not gone unnoticed by Taylor, who is hoping for a breakout season in the N.H.L.“Their schedule is pretty grueling,” said Taylor Leier, who had played 16 N.H.L. games entering this season. “They train very hard and I respect them a lot and how hard they work. They’re going the whole day.”Playing hockey was a natural pursuit for the elder Leier brother growing up in Saskatchewan surrounded by family members involved in the sport. Tim Leier coached Taylor’s youth team while numerous uncles and cousins also played hockey. Keaton Leier’s decision as a child not to pursue hockey was a departure — even before he dedicated himself to ballet.“From a really young age, I always kind of had the mind-set of just doing my own thing even though everybody else was really into hockey,” he said. “My family especially is very hockey heavy. Ever since I was little, especially when I was younger, my dad really encouraged me to play. I liked it, but I never really loved it. I was just influenced by what I wanted.”Taylor’s hockey and Keaton’s dancing made for a hectic home life, an endless effort to deliver the two boys to games, tournaments, practices and recitals. On one particularly hectic day, Cindy Leier said she attended a dance competition with Keaton in Edmonton, Alberta, before having to rush back home to Saskatoon, a drive of more than 300 miles, to attend Taylor’s hockey awards banquet.During the long drive home, she received word that Keaton had received the competition’s top accolade, an honor that included a trip to a Los Angeles dance studio.“Honestly, I look back at our life sometimes and it just feels like a blur,” Cindy Leier said. “It goes by so fast and they were so busy all the time.”Despite their divergent paths, the brothers remained close. When Taylor left home at 17 to play junior hockey with the Portland Winterhawks in Oregon, he was unknowingly establishing a precedent for his brother, who at 17 left home to train at the Royal Winnipeg Ballet School.The parallels between the brothers’ endeavors were quickly appreciated by their mother.“They experience the same emotions: the mental challenge of what they are both doing and also the physical challenge,” she said. “Sometimes with the mental challenge I’ll say to Keaton: ‘Why don’t you call your brother? He’s been through this. Even though he’s doing something completely opposite of what you’re doing, he’ll understand what you’re going through right now.’ That has been helpful for Keaton.”Those conversations proved invaluable for the brothers whenever they encountered inevitable career disappointments, whether it was being assigned to the Flyers’ minor league affiliate or being relegated to the second company at the Houston Ballet. But the benefits of having a brother at the highest level of his chosen field do not end there.The brothers also occasionally work out together, although their areas of concentration in the gym often contrast drastically. When Taylor encounters the occasional tweaks and pulls that come over the course of a lengthy hockey season, it helps to have a brother capable of resting his legs at a 180-degree angle.“I know sometimes he’ll text me and say: ‘My hip is really bothering me. Do you know any stretches or exercises I can use to fix it?’ Usually I can give him some sort of help,” Keaton said. “Sometimes it works, sometimes it doesn’t.”With his parents looking forward to their next opportunity to watch Taylor play for the Flyers, Keaton has been busy earmarking dates to go to Philadelphia and watch his older brother play. But it is not easy. His arduous schedule with the Atlanta Ballet will continue through December, when the company begins performing “The Nutcracker.”Afforded a holiday break by the N.H.L. schedule, Taylor will be there with his parents to watch his brother perform.“We’ve been working and we’ve been grinding,” he said. “Our family has a lot of versatility and our parents get to experience two different professions, which is pretty cool.”
Rangers Beat Edmonton for a 6th Straight Win The Rangers, who have become the hottest team in the N.H.L. after an awful start to the season, used a man advantage to help them to a season-high sixth straight win on Saturday.The Rangers scored two power-play goals in the second period en route to a 4-2 victory against the Edmonton Oilers — their fifth consecutive win at Madison Square Garden.“They are a penalty kill that is struggling,” said the Rangers’ Kevin Shattenkirk, who extended his point streak to seven games. “We just tried to expose them the best way that we could. We worked for each other to get in the spots that were open and made some good plays.”Rick Nash scored twice, Mats Zuccarello picked up two assists, and Pavel Buchnevich had a goal for the Rangers. Henrik Lundqvist made 26 saves, and for the fourth consecutive game, Ryan McDonagh registered an assist.Jesse Puljujarvi and Connor McDavid each scored for the Oilers, who fell to the Rangers for the fourth straight time.Nash scored what turned out to be the game winner when defenseman Brady Skjei found him darting toward the back post at 18 minutes 53 seconds of the second period. McDonagh also assisted on the play.“We kind of talked about that play before the game, and we knew there’s going to be a chance it would be open,” Nash said of his power-play goal against Oilers goaltender Cam Talbot. “Brady and I talked about it, and he made a great pass. You just try to build a wall with your skates and your sticks, and you hope it hits something. When you get a goalie like Cam, we know him pretty well. He challenges hard. He leaves that backdoor play open.”The Rangers had jumped in front, 1-0, when Nash and Kevin Hayes completed an odd-man rush at 12:16 of the first period. Zuccarello also assisted on the play.“I just look to see what stick the defenseman has. When it’s a lefty on lefty, you just wait for him to move his stick,” Hayes said of the two-on-one opportunity. “You just got to wait out the goalie, then make your decision from there.”Puljujarvi, playing in his first game of the season since being called up Friday from the A.H.L., tied the game with a wrist shot at 16:26 of the first period. Skjei and Buchnevich each had difficulty clearing the puck from the defensive zone, and eventually Ryan Nugent-Hopkins controlled it. He delivered a soft backhanded pass to Puljujarvi before the wrist shot. Darnell Nurse also assisted on the play.McDavid added a power-play goal in the middle period, extending his point streak to three games.“They were able to get two quick ones on the power play,” Oilers coach Todd McLellan said. “They do such a good job in the neutral zone of clogging things up that it’s hard to come back against them.”Buchnevich scored for the third time in three games when Shattenkirk delivered a cross-ice pass to set up the one-timer at 15:10 of the second period. Since Oct. 26, Buchnevich has the N.H.L. in goals, with seven.Michael Grabner added an empty-net goal with 1.4 seconds remaining.Talbot made 30 saves for Edmonton.The Rangers, who had a disappointing 3-7-2 start this season, can look to a third-period rally on Oct. 31 against the expansion Vegas Golden Knights as a turning point in their season. The Rangers trailed, 4-2, at the end of the second period and scored four unanswered goals to begin their winning streak.“The things we want to do have stayed the same,” Rangers Coach Alain Vigneault said. “There’s no doubt that we’re executing better. With that execution, it doesn’t lead to costly mistakes, and we’ve been able to build off that the last few games and play, for the most part, pretty good hockey.”There was a scary moment at 3:24 of the second period, when Edmonton’s Zack Kassian and the Rangers’ Jimmy Vesey got tangled up. As both fell to the ground, Kassian’s skate clipped Vesey in the mouth. Vesey returned with full cage to start third period.
Indoors, Who Is the Greatest Men’s Tennis Player? Indoor tennis might seem a modern invention, a way to keep raking in the revenue when the weather turns chilly. But the ancestor of today’s game was actually played exclusively indoors.Known now as real tennis, it was a diversion for royalty and their minions in France, England and elsewhere during the Renaissance and beyond. Fewer than 50 of the asymmetric courts with their sloping internal roofs still exist.It is tough to know who was truly the best in those days: Presumably, they let the kings rule. But there is no shortage of evidence in the digital age, and with the world’s most prestigious indoor men’s tournament, the ATP Finals, set to begin on Sunday in London’s O2 Arena, it is worth a ponder.Who is the greatest of all time indoors? Let’s call him the GOATI, which sounds vaguely Swiss and thus brings to mind Roger Federer, not a bad candidate as it turns out.Federer, at No. 2 after a triumphant season, has won the singles title at the year-end championships a record six times, although only the last four were played indoors. He won his first two on outdoor courts in 2003 and 2004 in Houston, where the event had been wooed briefly away from Shanghai.But the year-end championship has been back under cover since 2005.Federer, best able to express his manifold gifts on faster surfaces, has nonetheless been eclipsed at the O2 Arena by Novak Djokovic, who won four straight titles from 2012 to 2015, beating Federer in two of those finals in straight sets.Djokovic is an underrated player indoors but not an underrated player on hard courts, which are now the indoor surface of choice. But even if Djokovic leads Federer, 5-4, in indoor matches, Federer still holds the overall edge. His career indoor record of 269-64 and winning percentage of 80.8 are superior to Djokovic, who is at 135-37 (78.5 percent).Andy Murray, born a week before Djokovic, has exactly the same career indoor record of 135-37 but there will be no separating them next week.Neither has qualified in large part because neither has played an official match since Wimbledon, although Murray at least played and lost an exhibition against Federer in Scotland on Tuesday (Djokovic has still not returned to full-blown practice).Those career records are not quite complete, however, because they do not include indoor matches played at the Grand Slam tournaments. All of the slams, except the French Open, now have stadiums with retractable roofs that can be closed in inclement weather.But with or without the Grand Slam factor, the career indoor records from this era do not quite match up with those of the best players earlier in the Open era like John McEnroe and Ivan Lendl. They played more often indoors then. There were 19 indoor events in the first year of the ATP Tour in 1990. That was down to 15 this year. Consider that Jimmy Connors won 53 career indoor titles and McEnroe won 52. Federer has won 23, Djokovic just 12.The playing conditions then were also generally much quicker.“Indoor tennis was totally different,” said Brad Gilbert, a coach and ESPN analyst whose playing career lasted from 1982 to 1995. “I do think the slower indoor courts today give everybody more of a chance. When you were playing Mac and Lendl on carpet and Supreme, it was good night Irene. Those are courts that really favor you if you have a dominant shot but you also needed to be able to return so guys like Mac or Lendl who both served really well and put returns in play were deadly.”Federer, with his precise serve and knack for blocking huge serves back into play, presumably would have been a health hazard in that era, too.Lendl was 341-70: a winning percentage of 83, which ranks second in the Open era indoors. McEnroe was 419-72: a winning percentage of 85.3, which ranks first by a significant margin, and he won five WCT Finals, which were the prestigious culmination of the WCT circuit, a rival of the traditional tour.The only other men with an Open era winning percentage over 80 percent indoors in singles are Connors at 82 percent (469-103), Federer and Bjorn Borg at 80.6 percent (216-52).Boris Becker, a tremendous indoor player, is next and close at 79.8 percent (297-75). And then there is Pete Sampras, whose five-set victory over Becker in Hanover, Germany, in the 1996 ATP final is the best indoor match this correspondent has seen in person. Sampras was 213-61 (77.7 percent) and won five year-end championships.As in the GOAT debate, it is easier to compare and contrast indoor play in the Open era, when the major events were open to all instead of only to amateurs. But those who turned professional before 1968 had ample opportunity to play indoors. As they barnstormed, they often played in a new city each night, traveling with a canvas court that could be rolled out and then rolled up and moved to the next venue.“They could put it down on wood or cement, they even put it on ice a few times,” Rod Laver said in an interview. “In Madison Square Garden, when hockey season was on, they’d roll it out the day before, and your ankles were pretty much frozen by the time you came off court.”They played on other surfaces, too, including polished gymnasium floors (talk about quick).“Jack Kramer on quick courts indoors was the best of the pre-Open era players in my view,” said Steve Flink, a tennis historian and author of “The Greatest Tennis Matches of All Time”. “From the time Kramer turned pro at the end of ’47, he dominated Bobby Riggs, Pancho Gonzales, Frank Sedgman and all of his pro rivals on those head-to-head tours. But Gonzales should also be on the list. Like Jack, he was an all-out serve-and-volleyer who excelled under a roof.”Serve-and-volley no longer rules. Neither do the French kings, but indoor tennis excellence survives. Tune in to London for proof.
Oddities, Good and Bad, Abound at the Next Gen ATP Finals The Next Gen ATP Finals tournament in Milan this week has delivered on its promise to be different from tennis as usual. Whether that is for the better or worse is still up for debate.The event, created this year to showcase young talent in men’s tennis, featured seven players born in 1996 or later who earned the most ranking points during the season and one Italian wild card from the same age range. It is a lucrative exhibition. There are no ranking points awarded, but players receive $50,000 for participating. An undefeated champion would earn $390,000.Eligible players quickly bought into the concept when it was announced, with many contenders closely tracking the standings week to week. But the best young player was lured away by his own success. Third-ranked Alexander Zverev, 20, twice a champion at the Masters level this year, withdrew from the event to focus on the ATP Finals, which begin Sunday in London.His withdrawal left Andrey Rublev of Russia as the highest-ranked player in the field at No. 37. Rublev will play No. 54 Hyeon Chung of South Korea, who is undefeated so far, in the final Saturday.The lack of star power did not mar the event as much as its draw ceremony did.Instead of drawing chips from a bowl, organizers instructed the young players to select a model who would then reveal a letter, A or B, on her body to determine each player’s group.The first model selected hiked up her dress and pulled her garter to reveal the letter A. Another instructed a player to remove her glove with his teeth.The tennis world quickly expressed its disapproval at the crass sexualization of the event. The Hall of Famer Amélie Mauresmo called it a “disgrace,” while the French player Alizé Cornet mocked the regressive start to a showcase of innovations.“Good job ATPWorldTour,” Cornet wrote on Twitter. “Supposed to be a futurist event right? #backtozero.”The draw ceremony was co-produced by the ATP and a sponsor, Red Bull. They issued a joint apology Monday.“The intention was to integrate Milan’s rich heritage as one of the fashion capitals in the world,” the statement said. “However, our execution of the proceedings was in poor taste and unacceptable. We deeply regret this and will ensure that there is no repeat of anything like it in the future.”The tour had expected strong reactions to the event’s rules changes, not the opening ceremony.The young players tested numerous innovations that have been discussed in tennis. Most of the ideas had been tried before, but not since the creation of World TeamTennis in the 1970s have so many new concepts been used all at once.The most popular has been automated line calling. Instead of relying on human line judges whose calls can be challenged and reviewed with Hawk-Eye technology, the event puts the calls in Hawk-Eye’s hands directly. As soon as a ball lands out, there is an immediate audio recording of “Out!” played, and the word flashes on screens around the court. There has been little arguing and second-guessing of calls.Besides no line judges, there are also fewer lines: Because it is a singles-only tournament, the court was painted without doubles alleys, which are a standard feature on most courts in the world.The scoring system is perhaps the sharpest deviation. Instead of playing best-of-three sets, in which it takes six games to win a set and in which sets must be won by two games, the matches in Milan have been best-of-five sets, but the sets have been shorter. Sets are played to only four games, with a tiebreaker played at 3-3. Each game has no-ad scoring, meaning that at 40-40 the next point decides the game.The points themselves are also different: There is no let call on serves, which several players said was hard to get used to.Though the changes were designed to create more momentum swings in a match, many sets have been uncompetitive. So far, 24 of the 57 total sets (42.1 percent) have been won by scores of 4-0 or 4-1. Because tiebreakers remain normal length, they can feel laborious compared with the quick pace of the abbreviated set.Several other changes have been instituted to expedite play: Between points, there is a 25-second clock; players are limited to one medical timeout per match; and warm-ups are shorter, with play beginning five minutes after players walk onto the court.“It’s not just reducing time — because if a product is boring for six hours then it can be boring for six minutes,” Chris Kermode, executive chairman and president of the ATP, told reporters in Milan. “It’s about taking away the dead time, making more points matter.”The pauses that remain in the match have been layered with entertainment. Between sets, players can talk to their coaches on headsets (but only in English, and the conversations are broadcast). On-court coaching has been a feature of WTA matches since 2009, but the headset version seems to have advantages: The audio is clearer, especially on the player’s side, and keeping the coach in the stands maintains tennis’s appearance as a one-on-one sport.On Thursday, the headset provided Denis Shapovalov of Canada an opportunity to gush to his coach, Martin Laurendeau, about how much he enjoys the coffee in Milan.“Dude, I’m telling you: best coffee I’ve ever had in my life,” he said.Some of these innovations may come to official events soon. No-ad scoring is often used in doubles and mixed doubles. The United States Open experimented with a 25-second clock between points and with coaching from the stands in some events this year.“The big changes — best-of-five, first-to-four, is that going to happen in the next five years?” Kermode said. “No chance, in my opinion. Can it happen in 10 years? Yeah, I think it could.”
CoCo Vandeweghe Leads the U.S. Team in the Fed Cup Final Before CoCo Vandeweghe turned to tennis, team sports were a way of life. She was playing basketball before she could ride a bike, and she listened to stories of her mother, Tauna, playing volleyball and swimming on two United States Olympic teams.Vandeweghe, now 25, played backyard football with her whole family in Southern California, learning the hard way that one had to throw quickly or risk getting tackled.While she was doing homework, her grandfather Ernie, a guard with the Knicks from 1949-56, would suddenly and sneakily throw things at her, ensuring that she was always on her toes.Her uncle Kiki, a two-time N.B.A. All-Star who went on to be a coach and league executive, taught her to rely on her teammates. Her uncle Bruk won a medal in beach volleyball at the Goodwill Games, and her aunt Heather was captain of the American women’s polo team and also attended Stanford on a tennis scholarship.“I’m very used to a team atmosphere,” said Vandeweghe, who followed her older brother, Beau, to the tennis courts. “Even in an individual sport like tennis, it takes a team to get where we are each and every day.”Vandeweghe was speaking from Minsk, Belarus, where she and her American teammates Sloane Stephens, Shelby Rogers and Alison Riske will take on the Belarusians in the final of the Fed Cup this weekend. It is the first Fed Cup final for the United States since a loss to Italy  in 2010.The United States has 17 titles, more than any other team, since the competition began in 1963, but has not won the Fed Cup since Monica Seles, Lindsay Davenport, Jennifer Capriati and Lisa Raymond beat Spain in 2000, when Vandeweghe was 8.The Americans, who toppled the three-time defending champion Czech Republic, 3-2, in the semifinals, are heavily favored against a Belarusian team that has no player ranked in the top 75. With the two-time Australian Open champion Victoria Azarenka home in California and unable to travel because of a custody battle over her 11-month-old son, Belarus is counting on No. 78 Aryna Sabalenka and No. 87 Aliaksandra Sasnovich.Sabalenka, 19, has had an admirable autumn, reaching the semifinals in Tashkent, Uzbekistan, in September and then losing to Maria Sharapova in the final of the Tianjin Open last month. Sasnovich has not lost a match in the Fed Cup this year, leading Belarus to upset victories over the Netherlands and Switzerland en route to the final. Sabalenka and Sasnovich are from Minsk and the team is playing its third consecutive tie in what will be a full and highly partisan arena.“Believe me, we are not underestimating this team,” said the first-year American Fed Cup captain Kathy Rinaldi, who, along with Raymond, a coach, prepared the squad for deafening, boisterous fan behavior. “These girls are extremely talented and moving up the rankings quickly. And they’re fearless.”The task of choosing a team did not fall easily on Rinaldi’s shoulders. Serena Williams is on maternity leave; Venus Williams opted not to play Fed Cup this year; and Stephens and Madison Keys were injured earlier this season. So Rinaldi relied on Vandeweghe, Riske, Rogers, Lauren Davis and Bethanie Mattek-Sands to get past Germany and the Czech Republic.Citing continuing wrist problems, Keys withdrew from all tournaments after she reached the United States Open final. Mattek-Sands, who won the deciding doubles match over the Czechs with Vandeweghe in April, is still recovering from a ruptured patella tendon sustained at Wimbledon in July. She had planned to cheer on the team in Belarus but recently had varicose vein surgery that prevented her from flying.“I still feel very much a part of this team,” Mattek-Sands said from her home in Scottsdale, Ariz. “I’ll be cheering wildly from here.”Stephens, the surprise winner of the United States Open in September, is making her first Fed Cup appearance of the year after missing 11 months from August 2016 to June because of surgery on her left foot. But she has not won a match since she defeated Keys in the United States Open final.Stephens, who has played three tournaments since the Open, said her life “isn’t really much different” since she claimed her first Grand Slam title.“I haven’t purchased anything, I haven’t gone anywhere,” she added. “Nothing in my life has changed. I still look the same.”Her ranking at least has changed, rising from No. 83 at the Open to No. 13. Vandeweghe began the season at No. 37 and ended it in the top 10 for the first time. Despite losing her first match in eight of 18 tournaments she played this year, the notoriously feisty Vandeweghe reached the semifinals at  the Australian Open, beating top-seeded Angelique Kerber and Garbiñe Muguruza, and at the United States Open, where she upset then-No. 1 Karolina Pliskova. Vandeweghe also advanced to the quarterfinals at Wimbledon.“CoCo has really stepped it up this year,” Rinaldi said. “She’s more consistent and she’s learning more about the patterns of her game. She’s got a big personality and she’s passionate about her tennis. She lives for team moments like this.”Raymond also credited Rinaldi with uniting the young women by providing energy, enthusiasm and bonding experiences like game nights and trips to play laser tag and Escape the Room.Vandeweghe and Stephens, however, admitted to being weary from a long WTA Tour season.“The fall has been really difficult for me,” Vandeweghe said. “It’s been very hard to find any motivation after the U.S. Open because it’s such a big tournament for the American players.”This weekend, however, she needs no more motivation than bringing the Fed Cup home.
James Harden Beats LeBron James While Equaling Michael Jordan James Harden always seems to have extra motivation when he faces off against LeBron James, but on Thursday night he not only helped his Houston Rockets beat James and the Cleveland Cavaliers, 117-113, but in doing so he reached a statistical achievement that had only been accomplished by one other player in the last 30 years: Michael Jordan.Harden’s final line for the night included 35 points, 13 assists, 11 rebounds and 5 steals. The last player to match that line of at least35-10-10-5 in a game was Jordan, who did it in a win over the Los Angeles Clippers in January 1989. In that game, Jordan had 41 points, 11 assists, 10 rebounds and 6 steals.Assists and steals have only been official statistics since the 1983-84 season, but going back that far adds just two more players that have accomplished the feat: Terry Cummings of the Milwaukee Bucks in January 1987 and Micheal Ray Richardson of the Nets in October of 1985. Hakeem Olajuwon of the Houston Rockets twice had a triple-double with 35 or more points and five or more steals, but in both games he had double-digit blocks rather than assists.Harden’s game against Cleveland was not without faults, as he shot just 1 for 8 in the fourth quarter of a fairly close game. But, on the heels of a 56-point performance against the Utah Jazz on Sunday, he recorded his 33rd career triple-double. It was the second career game in which he had a triple-double with five steals.When asked by reporters this week if he drew extra motivation from big performances by star players, Harden said he was actually driven by watching young players like Donovan Mitchell of the Jazz, Jayson Tatum of the Boston Celtics and Ben Simmons of the Philadelphia 76ers.But there is an argument to be made that Harden brings his best when James is around, as in his last three games against James and the Cavaliers — two of which Houston has won — Harden has averaged 38 points, 13 assists and 9.3 rebounds.
Disputed Penalty Kick Gives Switzerland a Win in World Cup Playoff BELFAST, Northern Ireland — A controversial penalty awarded because of a hand ball was enough to give Switzerland a 1-0 victory over Northern Ireland in the first leg of their World Cup playoff on Thursday.A volley by Xherdan Shaqiri struck Corey Evans’s shoulder as Evans attempted to block the shot. The Romanian referee Ovidiu Hategan pointed to the penalty spot, drawing angry protests from the Northern Ireland players.Ricardo Rodriguez converted the penalty kick in the 58th minute, putting the Swiss in the drivers’ seat to qualify for their fourth World Cup in a row.“It’s strange because I had a feeling the referee knew that he had made a wrong decision,” Evans said, “and I’m sure he was getting fed information throughout the game and he could tell with everybody else’s reaction that maybe he had made the wrong call.”Northern Ireland Manager Michael O’Neill bemoaned the lack of video assistant referee technology in the World Cup playoff series.“It’s just staggering in this day and age when the stakes are so high at this level of the game that something like that is a game-changer,” O’Neill said. “I spent three hours in a conference the other week at FIFA on video assistant refereeing, and certainly when you see what happened tonight you would certainly be an advocate of it.”Boos rang out at the final whistle as home fans directed their ire at the match official.The second leg will be played in Basel, Switzerland, on Sunday.CROATIA 4, GREECE 1 Croatia took a decisive step toward World Cup qualification, overwhelming Greece in the first leg of their playoff.Captain Luka Modric shook off concerns of poor form by opening the scoring from the penalty spot in the 13th minute.The Italian referee Gianluca Rocchi awarded the penalty after goalkeeper Orestis Karnezis of Greece failed to control the ball and fouled Nikola Kalinic with a poorly judged clearance.Kalinic added another goal six minutes later, flicking in a cross from Ivan Strinic with the side of his foot.Greece struggled to regain composure and rarely attacked, but Sokratis Papastathopoulos briefly silenced the home crowd, sending a header over Croatia goalkeeper Danijel Subasic and into the net.But relief for the visitors was short-lived. Ivan Perisic headed in a cross from Sime Vrsaljko in the 33rd minute as Croatia dominated both wings.The fourth goal came four minutes after the break from Andrej Kramaric, swooping in after an error by Kostas Stafylidis.Greece hosts the second leg of the playoff on Sunday.
Yankees’ Interviews for Their New Manager Begin With a Familiar Face In his 28 years in the Yankees organization, Rob Thomson has been a field coordinator, a director of player development, a special assignment instructor, a coach and manager in the minor leagues, and over the last decade the major league club’s third-base coach and bench coach.Now, the consummate organizational man, who has operated largely in the shadows, is raising his hand for a new job: Yankees manager.Thomson became the first candidate on what is expected to be a lengthy list to interview for the job since his old boss, Joe Girardi, was dismissed two weeks ago.Thomson, 54, spent more than five hours on Wednesday interviewing with General Manager Brian Cashman, several of Cashman’s deputies and others in the organization. On Thursday he spoke for 20 minutes by conference call with reporters who cover the team. The Yankees plan to make each candidate they interview available in a similar manner.Thomson has had only one other interview for a major-league manager’s position. It came with Toronto in 2010 — Thomson is Canadian — and was done over the phone. He said that he would like to stay with the Yankees organization if he did not get the manager’s job, but that he did not think the interview was just a courtesy.“Because I’ve been here so long, I don’t think you get a free pass to interview for this job,” he said. “I think you have to have certain skills and certain things about you that pertain to the job.”Thomson, who has not been a manager since running the Yankees’ rookie-ball club in Oneonta, N.Y., in 1995, said he believed his knowledge of the organization was an asset. But he also had to distance himself from Girardi, whom Cashman let go in large part because he saw communication shortcomings.“I really don’t want to compare myself to Joe,” Thomson said. “I love Joe. But I do know this: My strengths are my communications and my trust with the players, and because of that trust, we can implement more things into our game, whether it be analytics or sports science. Whatever we want to do, I think can get through to the players.”As the bench coach the last three seasons, Thomson had a variety of duties, including working with the outfielders and distributing scouting reports to players. Another of his duties was using the dugout telephone to serve as the go-between for Girardi and Brett Weber, who monitors replays for the Yankees.Thomson accepted some of the responsibility for a replay snafu in Game 2 of the Yankees’ American League division series against the Cleveland Indians, when Girardi neglected to challenge a call that the Indians’ Lonnie Chisenhall had been hit on the hand by a pitch.Thomson said he had turned to use the phone immediately and had not seen the reaction of Chisenhall or catcher Gary Sanchez.“One thing that I learned is just to take your time to the phone and always keep your eyes on the field, because Sanchy had a reaction to the play, the hitter had a reaction to the play,” Thomson said.He added: “Maybe if I had kept my head on the field, and kind of watched the reaction, I maybe would have been able to help Joe out in that way. A lot of things to learn — just on that one play — for me.”INSIDE PITCHThe Yankees announced Thursday that they were moving up start times by 30 minutes for Monday-to-Thursday home games in April. Seven games will begin at 6:35 p.m.
Jerry Jones Doubles Down on Threats Over Goodell’s Compensation Jerry Jones, the owner of the Dallas Cowboys, renewed his threat of suing the N.F.L. to derail efforts by the league’s compensation committee to extend Commissioner Roger Goodell’s contract, further escalating a bitter battle among some of the most powerful owners in country’s most powerful sports league.The most recent threat came in a letter sent on Wednesday, the same day The New York Times reported that Jones had hired the high-profile and controversial lawyer David Boies and had told the six owners on the committee that he would sue them and the league if they did not alter the commissioner’s pay package.In a three-page letter sent to the lawyer representing the committee and to the rest of the league’s owners, the Cowboys’ general counsel said that the league’s fortunes had significantly changed since May, when the owners, including Jones, voted unanimously to extend Goodell’s contract by five years and to give the committee the authority to work out the details.In the letter, a copy of which was obtained by The New York Times, Jones did not specify what conditions had changed since May. But in August, Goodell suspended the Cowboys’ star running back, Ezekiel Elliott, for six games after he was accused of assault by a former girlfriend. Jones has repeatedly spoken out against that decision, which was put back into effect on Thursday when an appeals court ruled against an emergency injunction that would have kept Elliott on the field.Through his lawyer, Jones said he wanted Goodell’s new contract, which would begin in 2019, to include less guaranteed pay and more incentives tied to the league’s financial performance. Jones noted that Goodell had already been paid $200 million in the decade since he became commissioner, and that making a decision potentially worth more than $200 million should be done carefully.In the letter, which repeatedly criticized the committee chairman, the Atlanta Falcons owner Arthur Blank, Jones demanded that all owners, not just the committee members, vote on the pay package.The Cowboys’ lawyer, Jason Cohen, wrote that Jones did not want to resort to legal action, but said it might be necessary to stop the committee’s work.“Accordingly, Jerry Jones will continue to exercise his right to protect himself and the owners from the Committee Chairman’s undertaking of a substantial financial commitment on behalf of the NFL without the owners’ vote,” Cohen wrote.A letter written on behalf of the compensation committee, which includes Blank as well as the owners of the Chiefs, Giants, Patriots, Steelers and Texans, brushed aside Jones’s claims and said his call for a full vote on the details of the contract was “contrary to the League’s operation practices.”“Indeed, your description of the proposed extension is so at odds with the actual facts that we can only conclude that you are either uninformed or seek deliberately to mislead the other owners,” stated the letter, which was sent Thursday.Goodell’s contract extension, which has been in the works for about six months, has turned into an embarrassing proxy in the dispute between Jones and Goodell. Many other owners agree with Jones that Goodell has an inordinate amount of sway on league matters.Typically, issues like the commissioner’s contract are finalized quietly. But Jones’s increasingly strident opposition to Elliott’s suspension, as well as Goodell’s handling of the protests by players who have refused to stand for the national anthem, has spilled into an open battle at a time when the league is grappling with even larger problems, including a decline in television ratings and growing concerns over the safety of the game.Goodell has tried to sidestep questions about his extension, mostly saying that he will continue to work at the behest of the owners and in the interest of the league.Joe Lockhart, a league spokesman, told reporters on Thursday that all 32 owners voted in May to extend Goodell’s contract and that he expected discussions on the extension to be “wrapped up soon.”He denied reports that Goodell was “furious” about how the contract talks have become the focus of the dispute.He said was unaware of any lawsuit being filed by Jones against the league.Asked if he expected a lawsuit to be filed, Lockhart said: “That’s a question that should be put to Mr. Jones.”
The Cowboys’ Ezekiel Elliott May Have Run Out of Options Yet another court hearing resulted in yet another change in Ezekiel Elliott’s status, and he now appears to be suspended after a ruling against his request for an emergency injunction.If this sounds familiar, it is. Similar developments have already played out several times this season with Elliott, the Dallas Cowboys’ star running back.Barring further action, the N.F.L. said Thursday that Elliott’s six-game suspension — which came as a result of domestic violence allegations — was in effect. That meant he was banned from team facilities and would not be allowed to play in the Cowboys’ game against the Atlanta Falcons on Sunday.The latest ruling came on Thursday from the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit, where the N.F.L. Players Association had argued on Elliott’s behalf that the suspension should be delayed until the court could hear his appeal. The court’s decision said an appeal hearing should be expedited, but it terminated what had been a temporary administrative stay of the suspension and denied a request for an emergency injunction. No date was given for when an appeal would be heard.The N.F.L. originally suspended Elliott this summer after a yearlong investigation into allegations made by a former girlfriend of his. Elliott was not arrested or charged with any crimes, but the N.F.L. built its case on statements made by the woman, along with photographs of the injuries he was accused of inflicting on her.Elliott has argued that the investigation and the appeal process were unfair to him.“This is bigger than a suspension, this is bigger than football,” Elliott told reporters last week. “It’s them trying to make me something that I’m not. I’m not an abuser, that’s not who I am. This is my name, this is my reputation, something that I’ll have to live with beyond football. So every day is worth fighting.”Elliott’s absence would presumably have a significant effect on the Cowboys, who have won three games in a row, thanks in large part to his regaining the form that made him the N.F.L.’s leading rusher last season. He is second in the N.F.L. with 783 rushing yards, and during the three-game winning streak he had 390 rushing yards and five rushing touchdowns. He also had a 72-yard receiving touchdown in the first game of the streak, against San Francisco.When asked recently about the Cowboys’ ability to play without Elliott, the centerpiece of the offense, Coach Jason Garrett said the team would be fine with Darren McFadden and Alfred Morris splitting his carries.“We have some veteran running backs,” Garrett said. “We have some depth at that position. It’s not like we’re just living this day, and we don’t think about the future at all — you have to do that. I think you build your team that way at all positions.”If the suspension is enforced for the entire six games, Elliott would be eligible to return for Dallas’s matchup against Seattle on Dec. 24.
Putin Sees U.S. Conspiracy After Olympic Doping Ban on 4 Russians The International Olympic Committee announced on Thursday that it had penalized four Russian athletes for doping violations at the 2014 Winter Games in Sochi, prompting criticism from President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia.Four cross-country skiers were disqualified and barred from competing in future Olympics: Yuliia Ivanova; Alexey Petukhov; Evgeniya Shapovalova; and Maksim Vylegzhanin. At the Sochi Games, Vylegzhanin won three silver medals, which Olympic officials ordered Russia to return.Though the officials who announced the disciplinary decisions were Swiss and Spanish, Putin called the decisions an American attempt to undermine Russia and affect his nation’s presidential election in March. He cited a web of “connections and dependencies” within international sports.“The controlling stake is located in the United States, because the main companies that order and pay for television rights, the main sponsors, the main advertisement buyers and so forth are located there,” he said.“I have very serious suspicions that this is done to create the necessary environment, to incite discontent among sports fans, athletes, that the state was allegedly involved in these violations and is responsible for them,” Putin said. “In response to our alleged interference in their elections, they want to create problems during the election of the president of Russia.”Thursday’s disciplinary decisions are among the first that I.O.C. officials have made regarding Russia’s state-sponsored doping program, which corrupted several Olympics — most notably the Sochi Games. Russia’s Federal Security Service and sports officials staged an elaborate overnight cheating operation there to enable the nation’s athletes to dope throughout competition.Late last year, the Olympic committee provisionally suspended 28 Russian athletes who had competed in Sochi.Earlier this month, the Olympic committee announced the first formal penalties resulting from those cases. They applied to two other Russian cross-country skiers: Evgeniy Belov and Alexander Legkov, who won gold and silver medals in Sochi. Those results have been overturned, although the decision is under appeal. In addition to announcing the four new penalties on Thursday, the Olympic committee said it had closed a disciplinary case against one unidentified Russian athlete.All decisions were made by a disciplinary commission appointed more than a year ago to scrutinize the individual athletes implicated in the revelations about Russia’s systematic cheating, which was exposed by the nation’s former antidoping lab chief, Dr. Grigory Rodchenkov, who now lives in the United States.In 2016, Rodchenkov detailed how he had devised a three-drug cocktail, which was administered to Russia’s top Olympians. He worked overnight with security service officers, he said, to break into supposedly tamper-proof bottles of urine at the Sochi Games and swap out incriminating samples.A subsequent investigation commissioned by the World Anti-Doping Agency, global sports’ drug regulator, confirmed his account with forensic evidence and revealed the vast scope of the cheating, implicating some 1,000 athletes who competed from 2011 to 2015.“I find it completely absurd, because alcohol mixed with steroids even sounds laughable,” Legkov said in May 2016, the day after The New York Times had named him as one of the Russian Olympians who had ingested a specially formulated cocktail of anabolic steroids and whiskey, to speed up the body’s absorption of the drugs during the Games. “As for steroids — I don’t even know how they look and what they are.”The Olympic committee provided little detail about the cases on Thursday. “The reasoning for these decisions will be communicated in due course,” the organization said in a news release. “Due to the nature and complexity of the cases, this thorough, comprehensive and time-consuming process has taken several months and had to involve external forensic experts, who had to develop a legally-defendable methodology.”Russian athletes are likely to appeal the decisions to the international sports arbitration court, which is headquartered in Switzerland. The lifetime ban is vulnerable to being overturned by the court, which has previously prevented the I.O.C. from automatically disqualifying an athlete convicted of a doping offense from a future Olympics.Another Olympic commission led by a former president of Switzerland, Samuel Schmid, is similarly scrutinizing Rodchenkov’s account and deliberating how to punish Russia ahead of the 2018 Winter Games in Pyeongchang, South Korea.Possible penalties under consideration by Olympic officials include preventing Russia’s national anthem from playing at the Games or barring its athletes from marching at the opening ceremony. The Olympic committee is expected to announce its decision the first week of December.
Jack Sock’s Comeback Turns Into a Title and a Resurgence Jack Sock was down and just about out, lying on his stomach on a secondary court at the Paris Masters as a trainer massaged his stiff lower back.True, Sock had just saved a break point in the previous game against Kyle Edmund, but that had only kept him from trailing by 0-5 in the third and final set of his opening-round match.It looked very much like the end of Sock’s season, one that had started full of deep runs and promise and largely failed to deliver. But his back felt looser when he rose to resume play, and though he soon fell behind by 1-5, he played with fresh abandon and salvaged the match in a tiebreaker, 4-6, 7-6 (4), 7-6 (5).Four rounds later, he also found a way to win the title — his first in a Masters 1000 tournament — and earned a spot in the top 10 and the final slot in the tour’s most exclusive event, the eight-man ATP Finals that begin Sunday in London.“We weren’t feeling too good at 1-5,” said Jay Berger, Sock’s new coach. “But it’s a great lesson to learn and great for Jack to realize that if you get through one match, it’s pretty amazing the things you can do.”No American had won a Masters 1000, the top tier of men’s events after the Grand Slam tournaments, since Andy Roddick won the Miami Open in 2010. No American has played in the ATP Finals since Mardy Fish in 2011 after he, too, secured the eighth and final spot in Paris.That achievement felt like a late-career reward for Fish, who was 29 at a time before Roger Federer had reset the biological clock for men’s tennis excellence.Sock, long considered a great talent with his wrenching forehand and athleticism, turned 25 in September.He said that of all the consequences of his surprise Paris victory, breaking into the top 10 meant the most. “I think that everyone that grows up and aspires to be a tennis player dreams about being in the top 10 and pushing from there and going as far as you can,” he said in an interview.Asked if he might frame a copy of this week’s ATP rankings, where he is at No. 9, Sock demurred and said, “I hope to be framing a lower number than that in the future.”Still, these are giddy times for a man who arrived in Paris ranked No. 22 and with no thoughts of an ATP Finals debut. Other players were seemingly better placed to claim the final slot.“Obviously there’s only eight guys a year who make it and to do it for the U.S. — and not only for myself — is special,” said Sock, who will face Federer in the opening singles match on Sunday. “I’m just going to go to London and play free. I snuck into the last spot, so nothing to lose.”Sock did, however, miss out on a tee time at Augusta National Golf Club with John Isner, which was booked for this week at the home of the Masters.Sock will be indoors at the O2 Arena instead, and Berger had to make some new travel arrangements of his own.Berger was not planning any late-season European travel when he decided to leave his post in June as head of men’s tennis at the United States Tennis Association player development program. His goal was to improve his own golf game and watch his son play — Daniel Berger is a two-time winner on the PGA Tour and was part of this year’s winning Presidents Cup team from the United States.Instead, Berger got a call in June from Sock, who met Berger as a teenager and was looking for help after splitting with his longtime coach Troy Hahn.“I think I understand Jack,” Berger said. “And really from the first time I saw him play, I really believed in him. I know in my bones he’s a great player, so I told him I would certainly help him out. I did not hesitate.”Now, all in a rush, Berger, once a top-10 player himself, is working with another top-10 player.“It’s not a late-season surge; it’s a one-tournament surge,” said Brad Gilbert, a coach and ESPN analyst.But the platform for the big rankings leap was built in the first three months of 2017, when Sock won titles in Auckland, New Zealand, and Delray Beach, Fla., and then lost to Federer in the semifinals of the Masters 1000 event in Indian Wells, Calif., and to Rafael Nadal in the quarterfinals of the Masters 1000 tournament in Miami.But soon after Sock made the long trip to Australia and back in April to play in a losing effort for the United States Davis Cup team, his season turned into a struggle.“He was playing at a super-high level, and then we got overextended a bit in the scheduling,” said Mike Wolf, Sock’s longtime mentor in Overland Park, Kan., who remains part of his coaching team. “He had to take kind of a breather, which was somewhat on us. We had him play too much and then he got hurt.”Sock injured a knee training on grass at the Queen’s Club before Wimbledon but played in the Grand Slam event anyway, losing in the second round. He also attributed his midseason difficulties to lost confidence and personal issues he did not want to discuss in public.“Mental stuff on and off the court,” Sock said. “Just normal life stuff.”He is in a happier place now, traveling in Asia and Europe this autumn with his girlfriend, Michala Burns, a former tennis player at Palm Beach Atlantic University.“There can be some lonely and down moments on tour for sure,” Sock said. “So to have someone that obviously cares about me and I care about her, it definitely helps.”Sock has an unusual look for a top tennis player with his chinstrap beard. On court, he is an uncommon mix of brute force in the backcourt and feathery touch in the forecourt; his rugged frame belies his remarkable foot speed. He also has his rackets strung at an extraordinarily low tension, sometimes under 40 pounds.“With his feel and ability to control the slingshot effect, it affords some easy power,” Wolf said.But upon arrival in Paris, Sock had won only 11 of his last 24 matches, losing six times in the first round. One of those defeats came at the United States Open, where he was beaten by Jordan Thompson of Australia in five sets.“The U.S. Open was a massive letdown for me,” Sock said. “I was actually pretty depressed after that. In my mind, I’d put myself physically and mentally in a great position to go there and do really well.”Instead, he had, much to his and his rivals’ surprise, put himself in position to do well in Paris but only under great duress.“Paris was important for Jack on a lot of levels,” said Jim Courier, the United States Davis Cup captain and former No. 1. “If he loses to Edmund, his year-end ranking would have been roughly where it was one year ago, which would not have been a successful year for him. With the title, he jumped to a different place mentally, ranking-wise and in the eyes of the locker room.”
Fantasy Football: Who to Start in N.F.L. Week 10 Now that we have seen enough football this season to have a good idea about which defenses represent favorable fantasy matchups for each offensive position, the remaining N.F.L. schedule is worth looking at.But be warned: Overanalyzing the matchups could lead to bad decisions.For example, Todd Gurley has a brutal remaining schedule. Five of his next six opponents are among the 10 toughest fantasy matchups for running backs, including three in the top five (the Texans, Vikings and Eagles).But for players like Gurley, strength of opponent should not affect how you play him or whether you keep him. Gurley has been matchup proof this season. He even had 20-point-plus performances against two tough run defenses (the Cowboys and Cardinals).On the flip side, strength of opponent could be a significant factor for players who have not performed as consistently as Gurley has. Take LeSean McCoy, who was taken ahead of Gurley in most drafts last summer but who has been up and down this season.With favorable matchups against the Chargers, the Colts and the Patriots (twice) the rest of the way, you might see McCoy right the ship and give his fantasy owners a major boost in the second half. It also won’t hurt that the Bills should now have a more balanced offensive attack after adding receiver Kelvin Benjamin.Before we get too far ahead of ourselves, let’s break down Week 10 from a fantasy perspective.Jared Goff (LAR vs. Texans) — It may be time to accept that the Rams have a high-powered offense, which was on full display in Week 9 against the Giants. Goff led the charge with four touchdown passes as the Rams routed the Giants, 51-17. Goff has more to prove before he can be a locked-in fantasy starter each week, but consider him one against the Texans, who have allowed the fourth most fantasy points per game to quarterbacks (19.3) this season.Tyrod Taylor (BUF vs. Saints) — Taylor has been a top 10 fantasy quarterback in each of the past three weeks, averaging 21.2 F.P.P.G. during that span. What makes Taylor a safer bet than most fantasy quarterbacks is his running ability. His 210 rushing yards are the fifth most among quarterbacks and he has added two touchdowns as a runner. With the former Panthers receiver Kelvin Benjamin set to debut with the team, joining Jordan Matthews, Zay Jones and Charles Clay in the Bills’ receiving corps, Taylor could have an even stronger second half of the season.Also consider: Josh McCown (NYJ at Buccaneers)Jordan Howard (CHI vs. Packers) — Howard had at least 20 carries in four games this season. These days, that makes him a workhorse, as he is one of seven players to do so. He has been productive with those carries, too, topping 12 fantasy points in five of his eight games. The last time he played the Packers, he ran for only 53 yards but scored a touchdown. The Packers yield the fourth most F.P.P.G. (20.9) to the position and have allowed eight backs to top at least 10 fantasy points in eight games played.Carlos Hyde (SF vs. Giants) — With the help of having the second most targets among all backs, and the third most receptions, Hyde has been a consistent fantasy performer this season. He has five games as either a top-15 back or at least a 12-point scorer, and has been held to under 7 fantasy points once. Expect more success against an imploding Giants defense that got mauled by the Rams’ Todd Gurley for over 22 fantasy points.Also consider: Lamar Miller (HOU at Rams)Robby Anderson (NYJ at Buccaneers) — It’s time to take Anderson seriously in terms of fantasy production. I know, it feels weird talking up any Jets offensive player given the last few years of production, but quarterback Josh McCown has found a nice rhythm throwing to Anderson, Jermaine Kearse and tight end Austin Seferian-Jenkins. Anderson has averaged over 12 fantasy points per game over the last three weeks. On the season, he has the 14th most fantasy points among wide receivers. Up next is a matchup with the team that has given up the third most fantasy points to the wide receiver position (25.3 F.P.P.G.).JuJu Smith-Schuster (PIT at Colts) — After flashing signs that he could be a productive N.F.L. receiver for most of the first half, he exploded in Week 8 with 193 yards on seven receptions and a touchdown. Coming off a bye week, there’s no reason to think that Smith-Schuster is not the team’s second receiving option behind Antonio Brown, no matter what the team says about getting Martavis Bryant more involved. A matchup with the Colts should lead to more fantasy success, as they have allowed the second most receiving yards (293.1 per game) and the seventh most fantasy points (23.7 F.P.P.G.) to the position.Also consider: Sammy Watkins (LAR vs. Texans)Cameron Brate (TB vs. Jets) — There’s not a lot of good fantasy news coming out of Tampa Bay of late, with quarterback Jameis Winston expected to miss three games and receiver Mike Evans suspended for Week 10. But even with Ryan Fitzpatrick behind center, Brate should be considered a decent fantasy asset at the thin tight end position, especially in a favorable matchup with the Jets (9.5 F.P.P.G., fifth most).LAR vs. Texans; DET vs. BrownsKai Forbath (MIN at Redskins); Ryan Succop (TEN vs. Bengals).
The Biggest Obstacle for Young British Coaches? Old British Coaches On Oct. 27, Sam Allardyce sat down in a television studio in Doha, Qatar. It was two days after Everton had fired Ronald Koeman as its manager, and four since Leicester City had appointed Claude Puel, a Frenchman, to the same post.Allardyce was in the Gulf to appear on the beIN Sports show hosted by Richard Keys and Andy Gray, the veteran British broadcasting duo drifting into a reluctant obsolescence after being ostracized for a workplace harassment scandal. He was there, in part, to discuss what Keys described as the “glass ceiling” faced by English managers.This is, of course, Allardyce’s specialist subject. He has long championed the idea that British coaches are too readily overlooked by Premier League clubs in thrall to exotic imports. In 2010, he declared that he was better “suited” to managing Real Madrid or Manchester United than his then employers, Blackburn Rovers. Two years later, he decreed that he would have been a Champions League coach if only he had a more glamorous surname.In Keys and Gray, Allardyce knew he had a sympathetic audience. Last December, he had appeared on the same show to claim that the Premier League’s top six were appointing “branded” foreign coaches because they held more global appeal. A couple of days before his October appearance, Keys had tweeted that Leicester’s appointment of Puel sounded a death knell for British coaching.In front of his willing audience, Allardyce readily reprised his greatest hit. British coaches, he said, are now seen as “second class” in England. They have, he said, “nowhere to go.”“The Premier League is a foreign league in England,” he concluded.Allardyce should be delighted, then, at the events of the last two weeks. Leicester might have followed the fashion for the foreign, but West Ham did not: it has appointed David Moyes, a Scot, to replace its Croatian coach, Slaven Bilic. And Everton seems set to follow. Within a few days of his appearance in Doha, Allardyce himself was reported to have held talks with Farhad Moshiri, the club’s largest shareholder, over Koeman’s position.Indeed, Allardyce’s passion for British coaches is matched only by his prescience. A week after he had appeared with Keys and Gray in December last year, he was appointed as manager of Crystal Palace. Two weeks after his most recent remarks, he is in line to return to work again. It is almost as if he sets out to make himself visible — and his employment a moral, as well as professional, issue — whenever he suspects opportunities may arise. They say sharks can sense blood in the water.The reality is, however, that the appointment of Moyes, and the prospective return of Allardyce, will not be cause for celebration for any British coaches other than the two men themselves. It should, in fact, be precisely the opposite. On the surface, nobody has done more to highlight the plight of British managers than Allardyce (or Moyes). Beneath it, both men — and those like them — are part of the problem, not the solution.There are 92 clubs in the four professional divisions of English soccer. At the time of writing, 22 have foreign coaches. Precisely half of those men work in the Premier League, and among those 11 are the bosses at all six of the teams — Arsenal, Chelsea, Tottenham, Liverpool, Manchester City and Manchester United — that might reasonably hope to win the title at the start of any given season.That number has been slowly increasing in recent years, giving rise to the broadly held, largely accepted assumption, as voiced by Allardyce, that foreign managers are blocking the path of England’s own bright young things.The premise does not, though, stand up to scrutiny. Four of the top six clubs have been managed by a Briton at least once in the last decade: Alex Ferguson and Moyes at Manchester United; Kenny Dalglish and Brendan Rodgers at Liverpool; Harry Redknapp and Tim Sherwood at Tottenham; Mark Hughes at Manchester City.Only Chelsea and Arsenal — a fairly unusual case when it comes to managerial stability — have not given a British manager an opportunity. In the circumstances, if anything, the remainder of the elite have been a little too nationalist in their appointments.All six see themselves as Champions League clubs. It is reasonable for them to believe that the most qualified candidates for their managerial posts are those who have managed Champions League clubs previously. Those candidates, logically, are most often found abroad.It is below them where the real problem lies. Of the eight — nine, if Allardyce is appointed at Everton — British managers in the Premier League, only one, Bournemouth’s Eddie Howe, is under age 40. Only two more — Burnley’s Sean Dyche and Swansea City’s Paul Clement — are under 50.The rest range from 54 (Moyes, now installed at West Ham, and Hughes at Stoke) to 70 (Roy Hodgson, Palace’s latest manager). Between them, and including Allardyce, they have held 25 Premier League jobs.It would be harsh to suggest that all of them are without merit, or to dismiss their experience out of hand, but it is worth noting that failure does not seem to reduce their employability. Moyes’s work in almost a decade at Everton was impressive, but he has won only five home league games in more than two years. He was fired by Manchester United, Real Sociedad and Sunderland, whom he led to relegation. West Ham still appointed him, despite howls of protest from its fans, to try to avoid the same fate.The second-tier Championship has the same problem: 7 of its 24 managers are foreign, but more telling is that only 5 of the 17 British coaches in the division are 40 or under.In League One, the 24-team third division, there are only six British coaches under 40. In League Two, there are eight (and plenty more only a little over 40), though it is worth noting that many of those clubs that employ a novice — the likes of Barnet and Yeovil Town — do not necessarily have the budget to attract a more established name.Across those three divisions, though, there are 19 managers over the age of 50. Between them, they have been appointed by English clubs 103 times; Cardiff City’s Neil Warnock is the clubhouse leader, in his 14th league job.So Allardyce is right: there is a glass ceiling. It is just that it is not one that has been constructed by migrant workers, but by him and his ilk. It is not foreign coaches who prevent young British hopefuls from finding jobs, but older native managers. So stifling is their effect that it is hard to list half a dozen realistic, English contenders for a Premier League job. It is not just that a generation of domestic coaches are not being given a chance; it is that there is not a generation of domestic coaches to be given a chance.Eager to rectify that, the Football Association has invested no little time or resources in recent years in improving its coaching courses at the game’s new national base, St. George’s Park. In the facility’s first five years, more than 1,300 prospective managers passed through its doors. Who knows what bright ideas, what clever innovations, they might collectively possess?Nobody, alas, will ever find out. The world they are entering is barren, inhospitable. Not because Manchester United appointed José Mourinho or Liverpool hired Jurgen Klopp, but because the rungs beneath those clubs are already occupied by a group of men who have been there for a decade or more, and who are always offered a hand back up, no matter how many times they fall off.It is that lack of imagination from clubs that makes English managers seem so limited compared to their continental peers, and ensures that English managers are always adopting German, Italian or Spanish concepts and styles: These are the same old ideas, riddled with the same old flaws, regurgitated again and again.It is that misidentification of failure as experience, too, that explains why British coaching remains so steadfastly white — the same old faces means the same old color — and why the Premier League’s most ambitious teams are now, increasingly, managed by foreigners.It is not that those teams do not want to appoint locally; realistically, they cannot. They look at the proving grounds of the lower reaches of the Premier League — Howe and Dyche aside — and into the Championship, where the future should be, and see only the past.There is nothing wrong with Allardyce’s conclusion. There are too few opportunities for young English coaches. It is his explanation that is incorrect. The imports are not blocking the road: it is Allardyce, and those he represents, standing in the way.
At the Pistons’ New Home, Empty Seats and Hockey Statues DETROIT — After you have spent a very pleasant evening in a shiny new sports arena in a spruced-up neighborhood in a once-decaying city, it feels unduly meanspirited to mention that the place feels kind of empty.But that has been the vexing situation lately in Detroit, where the enormous fanfare that greeted the opening of the Little Caesars Arena in September has been followed by a succession of not-so-enormous basketball crowds.Though the Detroit Pistons’ first home game was announced as a near sellout, with 20,491 seats sold, many of the people who supposedly paid for the seats appeared not to be sitting in them during the actual game. The Pistons were 26th  in the N.B.A. in  home attendance through Thursday, with an average of 16,214 for their first six games at the new arena.Local news organizations and sports websites have been quick to notice. “Do you blame the Pistons or their fans for empty seats at Little Caesars Arena?”  Scott DeCamp asked on the MLive news site.On PistonPowered, a fan site, Duncan Smith said: “If you do enjoy watching the Pistons, many people prefer the viewing experience from home.”People have different explanations, starting with the fact that the Pistons have not been the world’s most thrilling team in recent years.“It’s the Pistons, man — they never win,” said Daniel Bronston, 29, a cook who was at a game against the Minnesota Timberwolves late last month. (He was exaggerating. The team is 9-3, and it handily beat Minnesota that evening, 122-101. But it is fair to say that the Pistons’ performance in recent years has been anemic.)Then there is the area itself. Stan Van Gundy, the Pistons’ coach, said that Little Caesars and the surrounding neighborhood were too full of distractingly fun stuff to do, so that fans would be lured into wandering outside and would not return to their seats to watch the game.“They build these great restaurants, and everybody goes and eats,” he said recently. “The first half of the third quarter, there’s no one in the building.”For almost 30 years, the Pistons played at The Palace at Auburn Hills, in a Detroit suburb that hosted the franchise’s Bad Boys-era title teams of 1989 and ’90 and also its less pugnacious championship squad of 2004.Suburban fans who came to the game against the Timberwolves last month said they were having to adjust not only to the new location — a hard thing for fans who like old routines — but also to the new breed of visitors.“Ten years ago, nobody wanted to live downtown, and now everybody does, especially young professionals and ‘hipsters,’ as they call them,” said Dustin Kosnik, 26, an engineer in the auto industry. “Hipsters want to do everything before it’s cool.”As far as the Pistons’ management is concerned, the arena is extremely cool. Built by Olympia Development, part of the Ilitch family empire, it cost $862.9 million, $324 million of it in public financing. It has brought new life to a once-neglected area of Detroit, with retail shops, upmarket restaurants and handsome new or recently renovated housing.The arena was originally built for the city’s hockey team, the Red Wings, which relocated from the Joe Louis Arena across town. (The Ilitch family owns the Red Wings and the Little Caesars pizza chain, which explains the arena’s name.) Fans grumbled about the name, which they found déclassé, and about the huge Little Caesars logo on the roof of the building — a man in a toga waving a pizza on what appears to be a spear — which they found annoying.“I’m officially embarrassed,” one Red Wings fan, Brent Latam, wrote on Twitter. Nicknames proposed by disgruntled fans for the new arena included The Oven, Pizzarena, The Frozen Pizza and Voldemort arena (“because I will never refer to it by name”).But if Cleveland fans could get used to showing up at Quicken Loans Arena, where the Cavaliers play, then surely Detroit fans can cope with a gym named after a pizza conglomerate, even one that fails to use an essential apostrophe in its title. “Welcome to Little Caesars Arena, the newest, most exciting arena in the world!” blared a loudspeaker from the side of the building as fans arrived for a recent game.Charlie Metzger, the Pistons’ chief revenue and marketing officer, said the team was pleased with how things had gone so far. More than 80 percent of last year’s season-ticket holders came back, he said, and the team added 3,000 new ones.“There’s an adjustment period,” he said, “but overall the reaction we’ve gotten has been very, very positive. In addition to its being a brand-new building, the excitement is in being part of what’s happening in the city.”Sure, there are fans who feel aggrieved about what they see as a hockey-centric atmosphere, reflected in the steeply graded seats and in what seems to be a disproportionate array of Red Wings memorabilia scattered about the ground-floor concourse. The arena is full of statues of hockey players like Gordie Howe and Ted Lindsay, while famous Pistons like Isiah Thomas and Joe Dumars have to settle mostly for appearing in photographs suspended from the ceiling.The thought is not lost on the players, either. Little Caesars looks “more like a hockey arena,” the Pistons’ star center, Andre Drummond, tweeted in September.He told reporters: “I went down there last month, and I just felt there’s a lot of hockey stuff. I’m like, damn, I mean, I understand we’re sharing the arena, but … ”Metzger said the memorabilia display was a work in progress. “We’re working closely in partnership with the Wings to make sure that both teams are properly represented,” he said.The point guard Reggie Jackson said he was not thrilled about playing with ice under the floor, a state of affairs that Little Caesars, of course, shares with many other combination arenas.“I don’t think people know, especially when the ice is under there, it’s a little bit colder,” Jackson said last month. “You’re breathing cold air while you’re trying to exercise, the first thing that happens is it goes to your chest.”At the Timberwolves game, the mood was gently benign rather than raucously enthusiastic. The arena did its best to stir the fans’ passions, such as they were. Music blasted out across the crowd. “WE FEEL YOUR EXCITEMENT,” said the Jumbotron, a sentiment that under the circumstances felt more aspirational than descriptive. Although the Pistons dominated the game, the crowd seemed to respond most vociferously when workers roamed the stands dispensing giant Michigan state lottery cards.But it’s hard not to love Little Caesars, which fits so seamlessly into its city.“Before, this was a no-go area, full of derelict land and abandoned buildings,” said Craig Hepworth, who was on a brief return visit to Detroit after moving to Florida in search of the sun. “It’s great to be able to stay downtown and do stuff instead of just getting in your car and driving away right after a game.“If Detroit gets any nicer,” he added, “we’ll have to move back.”
Without Porzingis, Knicks Fall to Magic ORLANDO, Fla. — Nikola Vucevic scored 24 points and Evan Fournier added 23 to help the Orlando Magic beat the Knicks, minus Kristaps Porzingis, 112-99 on Wednesday night.Jonathon Simmons scored 15 of his 16 points in the second half. His surge came at just the right time as he scored 11 straight points early in the fourth quarter, which pushed the Magic’s lead into double figures.The Magic, benefiting from the return of starting point guard Elfrid Payton, ended a two-game losing streak. The Knicks, playing without Porzingis, who is dealing with injuries to his ankle and elbow, had their three-game winning streak come to an end.In Porzingis’s absence, Tim Hardaway Jr. was the Knicks’ only consistent scoring threat, and he had 26 points and 11 rebounds in 38 minutes. The Knicks’ second-leading scorer was Doug McDermott, who had 13 points off the bench.The Knicks entered the game having won six of their last seven games, but they seemed out of sync offensively without Porzingis. They shot 53 percent from the field but committed 23 turnovers.Thanks to Payton’s return, the Magic showed improvement on offense. They shot 54 percent from the field and 46 percent from 3-point range, mainly on the strength of spacing that Payton provided. He had missed eight straight games because of a hamstring injury, but finished with 11 points, 11 assists and six rebounds in his first game back.Aaron Gordon also came through for the Magic with 21 points. He was 4 for 6 from 3-point range and 8 for 11 from the field after a few signature alley-oop passes from Payton.
A Leonardo and a Ferrari Set the Contemporary Art Sales on a New Track The bellwether November gigaweek of art auctions starting Monday promises drama, with the most talked-about inclusion in a New York contemporary art sale in years — and a last-minute exclusion of works by Norman Rockwell.What is a painting by Leonardo da Vinci (1452-1519) doing in Christie’s sale of postwar and contemporary art Wednesday night, sandwiched between Jean-Michel Basquiat and the Latvian-born Vija Celmins?Simple. At these important biannual auctions, the evening contemporary sales are where the world’s wealthiest art collectors do their buying. And Christie’s is expecting Leonardo’s recently rediscovered “Salvator Mundi” to sell for at least $100 million.A guarantee of a minimum, undisclosed bid, by a third party, ensures that the price is certain to set a new high for an old master at auction, beating the $76.7 million achieved in 2002 at Sotheby’s in London for the Rubens masterpiece “The Massacre of the Innocents” ($83.5 million today).And when fees are added, it should also exceed the colossal $110.5 million spent by the Japanese collector Yusaku Maezawa for a Jean-Michel Basquiat painting at Sotheby’s contemporary auction in May. The allure of Leonardo has already inspired Paramount to buy the film rights to Walter Isaacson’s newly published biography of the Italian Renaissance artist, with Leonardo DiCaprio as the lead.“It’s an iconic picture and an iconic name,” Jean-Luc Baroni, a dealer in old masters, based in London, said of the Leonardo. “By putting it in a contemporary sale, they shine a big light on the painting.” And for clients of contemporary art, “the price level might sound less prohibitive,” he added.Impressionist, modern and contemporary art with an estimated value of least $1.6 billion will be offered at Christie’s, Sotheby’s and Phillips. The value of these consignments, which include works by Francis Bacon, Andy Warhol, Fernand Leger and Franz Kline, as well as, incongruously, a Ferrari racecar, represents an increase of more than 46 percent over the equivalent auctions last November.The $110.5 million bid in May for the 1982 Basquiat was the most dramatic indicator of how the auction market for contemporary art has grown over the last six months. After two years of contraction, global auction sales of contemporary art grew 14 percent in the first half of 2017, “signaling a new period of prosperity,” according to a report published by Artprice.com, which monitors auction results.David Nisinson, a collector and art adviser based in New York, said that a year ago there was uncertainty about how the United States election would affect the stock market, but “it’s just continued to go up. There’s a lot of unexpected money around, and some of it is very confident,” Mr. Nisinson said.Confident buyers give confidence to sellers, particularly when their entries are backed by guaranteed prices. About half of the 74 lots at Sotheby’s Tuesday night contemporary auction carry some form of guarantee. (The figure is a bit lower at Christie’s.)With the Dow Jones industrial average at an all-time high, and President Trump planning tax cuts for corporations and the wealthy, the key indicators seem to be positive for the top end of the art market, at least in America.But there are one or two clouds on the horizon.President Trump’s proposed tax changes include a measure to restrict 1031 like-kind exchanges to real estate transactions. This provision had allowed high-end art investors to sell works and quickly replace them with pieces of similar value and defer paying federal taxes.“There are so many active and influential players who use it,” said Mr. Nisinson, the collector. “They’re constantly selling and buying without having to pay capital gains. They will sell less and have less money to buy with. It could put a damper on things.”But for the moment, those with the wealth to spend millions on art have plenty to choose from. Here are some of next week’s highlights — and one cliffhanger withdrawal.Leonardo’s ‘Salvator Mundi’It has been hailed by some experts as the art discovery of the century. Dating from about 1500, this panel painting of Christ as “Savior of the World,” was identified in a 2011 exhibition at the National Gallery in London as the long-lost original of a Leonardo owned in the 17th century by Queen Henrietta Maria, the wife of King Charles I of England.But it comes to Christie’s with plenty of baggage. In 2005, the “Salvator Mundi,” then unrecognized and in much overpainted condition, was bought at an estate auction in the United States for less than $10,000.After being cleaned and researched, the painting, now cataloged as a work by Leonardo, was sold in 2013 by three dealers to the Swiss businessman Yves Bouvier for  $80 million in a private transaction brokered by Sotheby’s. Soon afterward, Mr. Bouvier sold the painting for $127.5 million to the Russian billionaire collector Dmitry E. Rybolovlev, whose family trust is the seller at Christie’s. The profits made by Mr. Bouvier on this and 37 other artworks bought by Mr. Rybolovlev have become the subject of an ongoing legal dispute between the two men.The picture is also in abraded condition, giving the image a ghostlike quality. Luke Syson, curator of the National Gallery’s 2011 “Leonardo da Vinci: Painter in the Court of Milan” exhibition, said in its catalog that the “Salvator Mundi” had been “aggressively over-cleaned.”Given the condition of the “Salvator Mundi,” and the fact that it was undocumented in the artist’s lifetime, some scholars have reservations about the attribution to Leonardo. Carmen C. Bambach, the curator of the Metropolitan Museum of Art’s current Michelangelo  show, as well as one in 2003 on Leonardo, said in her 2012 review of the National Gallery exhibition that “much of the original painting surface may be by Boltraffio, but with passages done by Leonardo himself.” (Giovanni Antonio Boltraffio worked in the studio of Leonardo.) Ms. Bambach said in an email Friday that she had not revised her view of the painting.But Christie’s said in its catalog that there is currently a “broad consensus” among academics that this is a work by the artist himself.Christie’s has a Leonardo, Sotheby’s has a Ferrari.Sotheby’s has, for the first time, turned to a Formula One racecar to diversify the appeal of its contemporary art sale. On Tuesday, it will be offering a 900 horsepower Ferrari F2001, with the chassis that Michael Schumacher drove to victory in 2001 in both the Monaco and Hungarian Grand Prix. It is guaranteed to sell for at least $4 million and is touted by Sotheby’s as “the most important modern Formula One racecar in existence.”“This is a bold move,” said Simon Kidston, founder of the Geneva-based car dealership Kidston. “It’s a Ferrari, so by extension it’s collectible. But is it one of the greatest Ferraris? No,” he added, pointing out that in 2004 Bonhams sold a Ferrari F1/2000 in which Schumacher won four Grands Prix.Basketball Drawing by David Hammons The latest round of auctions has been boosted by prestigious estates coming to market. Christie’s has four works in its evening sale from the estate of the philanthropist Melva Bucksbaum, a former vice-chairwoman of the Whitney Museum of American Art in New York. They include “Untitled (Basketball Drawing)” by David Hammons, from 2003, made by repeatedly bouncing a graphite-encrusted NBA ball against a sheet of paper.The recent “Soul of a Nation: Art in the Age of Black Power” exhibition at the Tate Modern in London enhanced Mr. Hammons’s reputation as being among the most influential African-American contemporary artists. Ms. Bucksbaum’s 10-foot-high example is relatively early and is estimated to sell for between $1 million and $1.5 million. The current auction high for a Hammons drawing is $1.6 million, according to Artnet.Picasso Crayon DrawingPreviously best known for selling works by younger artists, Phillips is now developing a reputation for auctioning valuable pieces of 20th-century art. Its Thursday evening sale includes the 1946 Picasso colored crayon drawing, “Portrait de Femme Endormie III,” from the estate of Anne Marie Aberbach and Julian J. Aberbach. This serene study of the artist’s muse, Françoise Gilot, sleeping, is estimated at $1 million to $1.5 million but is likely to go higher. “The design is so considered and the color so rich,” said David Norman, an art adviser in New York. “It possesses that transported, sensual quality of the Marie-Thérèse,” he added, referring to earlier works inspired by Picasso’s relationship with Marie-Thérèse Walter.Norman Rockwell PaintingsThe most talked-about exclusion of the week was undoubtedly the seven artworks from the Berkshire Museum in Pittsfield, Mass., due to be sold in Sotheby’s Monday sale of American art.The Massachusetts Appeals Court on Friday blocked the sale of the group, which included two paintings by Norman Rockwell. His 1950 oil on canvas, “Shuffleton’s Barbershop,” showing silver-haired men making music in a lamplit interior, has been described by a biographer of the artist, Deborah Solomon, as “one of his five or six best works” and given an estimated price of $20 million to $30 million by Sotheby’s. The artist donated this painting to the museum in 1959.The Rockwells were among 40 artworks being deaccessioned by the financially-strapped Berkshire Museum to fund a redevelopment program. Though opposed by two groups of plaintiffs, including Rockwell’s sons, as well as the office of the Massachusetts attorney general, Maura Healey, their sale had been approved on Tuesday by a Berkshire Superior Court judge. Ms. Healey’s request for an injunction halting the sale has now been granted on appeal. The injunction will expire on Dec. 11, but may be extended.This abortive sale represents a cautionary moment for auction houses that contract with museums who have not cleared such a sale with local communities and regulators.Sotheby’s, in a statement, said: “We have never doubted that the board of trustees acted in good faith and was well within their legal rights, and we remain confident that they will prevail in their plans to ensure a bright future for the Berkshire Museum.”
Governors Awards Omit Mention (Onstage) of Sex Harassment Scandals LOS ANGELES — The show apparently goes on.On Saturday night, as chauffeured S.U.V.’s carrying the likes of Jennifer Lawrence and Steven Spielberg inched through gridlock traffic en route to the Governors Awards, the first major stop on Hollywood’s long march to the Oscars, a question hung in the air: How would attendees handle self-celebration at a time when sexual harassment scandals are engulfing the entertainment industry?On the presenter list were some of Hollywood’s most outspoken women, including Angelina Jolie, Ava DuVernay and Jessica Chastain. Would the tone be less gleeful than usual? Perhaps the Piper-Heidsieck Brut Champagne would flow a little less freely?The outcome was perhaps summed up best by a moment during the cocktail hour, when a waiter arrived with a tray of hors d’oeuvres. “Deviled eggs for everyone!” he cheerfully pronounced.Indeed, the topic of sexual harassment went unmentioned during the formal ceremony, which lasted more than three hours and covered honorary Oscars for the cinematographer Owen Roizman, the actor Donald Sutherland and three directors — Agnès Varda, Charles Burnett and Alejandro G. Iñárritu. The closest anyone came to the elephant in the room was Ms. Jolie, who introduced Ms. Varda, the filmmaker credited with inspiring the French new wave movement with her 1956 film, “La Pointe Courte.”“We need to draw strength from artists like Agnès,” Ms. Jolie said from the stage. “Those women who went first, who took that first step, showed the way for all of us.”Then Ms. Jolie and the mischievous Ms. Varda did a little dance.It seemed during a few moments as if the Governors Awards were taking place in a parallel dimension where the torrent of sexual harassment allegations against male stars, producers and directors did not exist. Dustin Hoffman, for instance, strode onstage and was greeted with enthusiastic applause. In recent weeks, Mr. Hoffman was accused of sexual harassment by two women. He issued an apology on Nov. 1.Mr. Hoffman was on hand to present an honorary Oscar to Mr. Roizman, whose credits include “The French Connection” and “The Exorcist.” Mr. Hoffman, who worked with him on “Tootsie,” praised Mr. Roizman’s “integrity as a craftsman and as a person.”Despite efforts by the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences to keep the focus of the evening on honorees, the crowd privately chatted almost nonstop about the allegations that — in the span of roughly a month — have toppled Harvey Weinstein, Kevin Spacey, Brett Ratner, Roy Price, James Toback and Louis C.K. Over and over, people grimly speculated about who might be next.At least until the lobster mini-taco tray came around.
Nick Kroll Still Isn’t Over Puberty. Just Ask His Therapist. With its squirm-inducing take on puberty — the bodily changes, mood swings and sexual curiosity — the Netflix series “Big Mouth” can be shockingly dirty.“But beneath that is a show that’s trying to talk about really important lessons,” said Nick Kroll, one of its stars and creators. “Something that adults would enjoy but also that kids could watch and feel like they’re not traversing this incredibly tricky time alone.”“Big Mouth” reimagines the puberty of the real-life besties Andrew Goldberg, an early bloomer, and Mr. Kroll, a very late one, as they’re guided by the demonic Hormone Monster (voiced by Mr. Kroll) and Monstress (Maya Rudolph). No one escapes unscathed: Among the tales of teenage terror are the night that Andrew (John Mulaney) ejaculates while slow-dancing with a girl and the day Jessi (Jessi Klein) gets her period during a class trip to the Statue of Liberty — in white shorts, no less.In a call from Buenos Aires, where he is shooting Chris Weitz’s “Operation Finale,” about the hunt for Adolf Eichmann, Mr. Kroll discussed some of his own coming-of-age embarrassments. Here are edited excerpts from the conversation.What’s your most humiliating puberty story?I got “pantsed” in seventh grade. But my underwear came down as well, and my penis was exposed to the girl that I had my crush on. I hadn’t hit puberty, so it was a bald little cashew. That definitely had a lasting effect.You’ve called this the most autobiographical of all your shows. So many of the feelings and emotions that I was going through at 12 and 13 have become the DNA of the rest of my life. I’ve been in therapy for a long time and found that things I was talking about I would then use in building the character of Nick, and vice versa.When did you start puberty?I got my first pubic hair when I was going into high school, so about 14-ish. I was very small and gregarious and, I think, a likable kid. Then when I hit puberty, I became much more temperamental and explosive, and my parents were taken aback. I also grew probably 10 inches in high school, to a strapping 140 pounds.How did your parents cope?I was the youngest of four, and my mom’s way to handle it was very straightforward, like, “A boy’s nipples will become engorged, and those are all secondary sex characteristics.” Her way of demystifying it weirdly had the effect of me staring at my friends’ nipples and being like, “I guess he’s probably going through puberty.” And it left me more aware of what wasn’t happening to me.A lot of these lessons are quite sensitive. How about the episode in which Andrew wonders if he’s gay because he gets an erection when he looks at the Rock?The impetus was kids figuring out their sexuality. You get sexually excited by different things, and you don’t exactly know what that means or why something is titillating. At that age, people have friends that they’re incredibly close with and they’re trying to parse what that means. And I think we can all agree that, however you want to identify sexually, the Rock is inherently an attractive person.Are you working with a sex-ed expert? Peggy Orenstein wrote “Girls & Sex”; that was a major influence on [our desire] to give equal weight to the experience that girls have. In the fifth episode, Jessi has a conversation with her vagina, voiced by Kristen Wiig. It’s been amazing that Peggy has since reached out to us on Twitter, and we’ve got a little dialogue going.John Mulaney also co-starred in your Broadway hit, “Oh, Hello.” Have we seen the last of Gil and George?If Gil and George have their druthers, we’ll be in Branson, Mo., at Yacov Smirnoff’s theater doing “Oh, Hello 2” soon. [Silence on both ends] I’m joking, of course.Amy Sedaris was a guest on “Oh, Hello.” Then she returned the favor on “At Home With Amy Sedaris,” and gave you an anatomical feature your mother could appreciate.[We shot the episode around] my birthday, and spending the day playing with her was the best birthday present I could ask for. I got there, and they were like, “How would you feel about having pepperoni nipples?” I was ready to say yes to anything.
Taylor Swift Is a 2017 Pop Machine on ‘Reputation,’ but at What Cost? Taylor Swift is known for the kiss-off, the eerily intimate way she dismantles those who have wronged her. She is a songwriter and performer who has long thrived on antagonism (it’s one of her two poles; the other is swooning), and no pop star of the modern era has communicated the contours of her disappointment with such emotional precision and melodic sophistication.“I Did Something Bad,” which comes third on her new album, “Reputation,” has all the hallmarks of a classic Swift assault: lyrics about men who are out of their depth sprinkled with just enough details to imply grave shortcomings.But the chorus is something different: “They say I did something bad/Then why’s it feel so good?” On the surface, it’s an awakening, but really, it’s a takedown. The target is herself — her innocence, her naïveté, the way in which striving to be flawless is perhaps the ultimate flaw.The bombastic, unexpected, sneakily potent “Reputation” is many things: It’s the first album on which Ms. Swift has cursed (“damn” doesn’t count); it’s the first time she has sung about consuming alcohol (and repeatedly at that); and it’s the vehicle for her most overt songs about sexual agency. Ms. Swift is 27 now, and the things she used to deny herself — in song, at least — are no more.But it is also Ms. Swift chasing that good feeling, pushing back against a decade of following her own instincts. And it works. “Reputation” is fundamentally unlike any of her other albums in that it takes into account — prioritizes, actually — the tempo and tone of her competition. “Reputation” is a public renegotiation, engaging pop music on its terms, not hers.And even though what’s au courant in pop — post-Drake lite-soul noir, or gothic but plain dramatists like Halsey and Selena Gomez — doesn’t necessarily play to Ms. Swift’s strengths, she barrels ahead here, finding ways to incorporate it into her arsenal, and herself into it. Some things are lost, to be sure, but it turns out that Ms. Swift is as effective a distiller of everyone else’s pop ideas as she was at charting her own sui generis path.That means a shift away from her signature melodies to an approach that uses her voice as an accent piece, or seasoning — the difference between songs that are 24K Taylor and ones that are merely Taylor-plated. It means a continued de-emphasis — one that began on her last album, “1989” — of the sorts of dense narratives that were so integral to her early career. It means that on a few songs here, Ms. Swift is doing something at least a little bit like rapping. (I’m sorry, the old Taylor can’t come to the studio right now.)Make no mistake: these are jarring propositions. And yet Ms. Swift commits to them and thrives, an act of liberation from her past, and also a calculation about what the marketplace can bear.That’s because after “1989,” all that was left for Ms. Swift to do was make pop songs the way most other superstars do. All the songs on “Reputation” are produced either by Max Martin with his associates, or by Jack Antonoff with Ms. Swift. Both men are longtime collaborators of hers, and both have had an outsized role in shaping the sound of current pop.Where they bring Ms. Swift is into soft-core pop-R&B, with synth-thick production that moves at a sensual gallop. “Delicate,” one of the album’s standouts, could pass for a Drake-Rihanna collaboration. Here, Ms. Swift whisper-sings with a newfound attention to rhythm. (She also sings through a vocoder on part of the song.) Something similar, but even more outré, is happening on “Dress,” which — with Ms. Swift’s blushing exhales — sounds like something the club-soul revivalists AlunaGeorge might make.These songs emphasize the cadence of her singing, not the melody or range. And on a few other songs here, she breaks into a kind of intermittently unconvincing talk-singing. This is a persistent theme on this album: borrowing styles and approaches from black music, then softening them enough to where Ms. Swift can credibly attempt them.The most striking example of this is “End Game,” a smoothly swaggering thumper featuring Future and Ed Sheeran. That Ms. Swift would go sigh for sigh with Future’s warbles would have been unthinkable five years ago, but here, in a twist, the person who sounds least at home is Mr. Sheeran.The ideas that Ms. Swift and her producers are borrowing from have been long simmering in the pop mainstream. (Nothing here has the same jolt as when she imported a dubstep drop into “I Knew You Were Trouble,” in 2012, back when that was still novel.) What’s notable, though, is that she hasn’t gone to the innovators of these ideas, but rather used Mr. Martin and Mr. Antonoff as alchemists and filters.That approach also serves another purpose, which is to protect her from the limitations of her voice. A few songs here — “Don’t Blame Me,” especially, which faintly recalls Madonna’s gospel-choir era — call out for melisma, or a soul-informed vocal approach that blends the tough and the nimble. But those are not Ms. Swift’s gifts. She is as strong a singer as ever (even if this album doesn’t much let her loose), but much of her singing here is done piecemeal.That’s because almost all of these songs are the sum of very different parts; many move in several different directions, one hard turn after the next. Guitars, when they’re present, are generally distant in the mix.This kind of structural maximalism is becoming a hallmark of pop-era Swift. “I Did Something Bad” has the energy of a revving motorcycle, and the first two singles, “ … Ready for It?” and “Look What You Made Me Do,” both use harsh sounds and urgent buildup segments to theatrical, bruising effect.This is the work of both producers: Mr. Martin and his team handle most of the album’s rowdy first half, and Mr. Antonoff is dominant on the more emotionally focused second half. Ms. Swift’s tone changes throughout the album as well — in the beginning, she is indignant and barbed, but by the end she’s practically cooing.She still has adversaries in her sight; there are jabs at Kanye West, and also at an ex-boyfriend or two. But here, too, she turns the magnifying glass around. Some of the most caustic and aware songwriting on this album is about herself. “Getaway Car” is about what happens when you leap blithely from one relationship to another. Ms. Swift is at her imagistic best here: “The ties were black, the lies were white/in shades of gray in candlelight/I wanted to leave him, I needed a reason.”This is familiar Swift stuff — or at least, what was once familiar Swift stuff. On this album, it’s no longer the priority. The album closer, “New Year’s Day,” is the only acoustic song, and also one of the best written (though it feels as indebted to Mr. Sheeran as to Ms. Swift).It is also probably the only song here that, upon first listen, doesn’t prompt the existential question of what, exactly, constitutes a Taylor Swift song in 2017. In making her most modern album — one in which she steadily visits hostile territory and comes out largely unscathed — Ms. Swift has actually delivered a brainteaser: If you’re using other people’s parts, can you ever really recreate your self?
Michelangelo Is the Divine Star of the Must-See Show of the Season “Michelangelo: Divine Draftsman and Designer” at the Metropolitan Museum of Art is a monument to a monument. With more than 200 works, and a core group of 133 drawings by the beyond-famous artist — the largest number ever assembled — on loan from some 50 front-rank collections, it’s a curatorial coup. More important, it’s an art historical tour de force: a panoptic view of a titanic career as recorded in the most fragile of media — paper, chalk, and ink.It’s a show with demands: It requires that you be fully present. Snapping it with smartphones won’t do. Drawing is more than a graphic experience; it’s a textural one, about the pressure of crayon and pen on a page; the subliminal fade and focus of lines; the weave and shadow-creating swells of surfaces. Barely seeable, never mind photographable, these effects are, one way or another, the truest evidence of the artist’s hand.And a final drumroll: The fame of Michelangelo Buonarroti may last long, but this Met-built monument to him, which opens on Monday, Nov. 13, will not. It’s a one-stop event with a non-extendable three-month run, which is the maximum exposure to light, even at dusk-level, that the drawings can safely stand. Once the show’s done, the likelihood of there being another on its scale within the lifetime of anyone reading these words is slim.Giving a full account of anyone’s art means giving a sense of where it came from, and we get that here. Although Michelangelo would have been the last to tell us — he liked to present himself as a parthenogenetic wonder — he did have some art training. Born in 1475 into a line of minor Florentine nobility, he entered the workshop of Domenico Ghirlandaio as a pupil-apprentice at age 13. From that fastidious painter he may have learned the practice, uncommon at the time, of making preparatory drawings for work in more permanent mediums.Yet Michelangelo’s self-starter claims may still stand up to scrutiny. According to dates assigned to drawings by him near the beginning of the show, he could have been sketching figures in frescoes by Giotto and Masaccio in local churches as early as 16. A small oil-and-tempera painting called “The Torment of Saint Anthony,” based on a print by Martin Schongauer, came at about the same time as his Ghirlandaio stint. And it’s impressive: the teenage artist not only skillfully edits Schongauer’s midair tangle of demons-and-saint, but sets it against an invented seascape.By 1490-91, he seems to have come under the tutelage of Bertoldo di Giovanni. A significant older sculptor, Bertoldo was also curator of an antiquities collection that Lorenzo de’ Medici had amassed to enhance the social status of his family. For Michelangelo, this interlude was formative. It confirmed that sculpture was the medium he cared about most deeply; it exposed him to a Classical tradition that he would emulate and transform; and it initiated a lifelong Medici connection that would be a boon and a curse.But questions of what came first arise here too, centered on a marble sculpture called the “Young Archer.” For many years, this figure of a nude youth had stood, barely noticed, in the Cultural Services of the French Embassy on Fifth Avenue, across the street from the Met. Then in 1996, an art historian identified it as a Michelangelo. The call was hotly debated, but the attribution has stood. And the “circa 1496-97” date now attached to the work makes it altogether possible that Michelangelo carved the figure at age 21, making him the prodigy he claimed to be.With this sculpture, he had found what would be his favorite subject, and the one that would make his name: the heroic male body. Approximately a decade after the “Young Archer” came the colossal “David,” and with that Michelangelo was a star, a Medici darling, and on his way to becoming the new kind of public celebrity he aimed to be: not just a highly skilled maker of things, but a multitasking, miracle-working aristocrat of creativity called a genius. If Michelangelo didn’t coin the term, he (with a reluctant nod to Leonardo da Vinci) coined the type.Prestigious commissions, in painting, sculpture and architecture, piled up. In 1504, he was asked to do a fresco for the Council Chamber of the Palazzo della Signoria, the seat of the Florentine government. Leonardo, more than 30 years his senior, and no friend, was assigned the opposite wall. The idea was that they both would paint a historic battle, Michelangelo’s being one in which a troop of 14th-century Florentine soldiers interrupted a swim in the Arno to take an enemy by surprise.He turned the scene into a polyphonic chorale of pumped bodies: abs, pecs, lats, glutes, buns. We know the image well, though the fresco — thanks to the first of what would be endless Medici interventions — never got beyond the full-scale cartoon stage. Ink and chalk sketches on paper of the individual figures exist. So does a drawing of the whole composition, now so smudged it looks like a puff of smoke. The most vivid piece of evidence is a large 1540 oil painting here by Bastiano da Sangallo, who saw the finished cartoon before it was whitewashed out.All of this material, now scattered among museums — the Louvre, the Uffizi, the Albertina in Vienna — has been brought together at the Met. This is how the exhibition, organized by Carmen C. Bambach, a curator in the museum’s department of drawings and prints, works. It ingeniously reconstructs Michelangelo projects by assembling related designs in dense, connect-the-dots clusters.This is, of course, the only way to present architecturally scaled art, or long-vanished things. The show is as close as we can now get to seeing the massive sculptural tomb of Pope Julius II in its many aborted iterations; it was this “urgent” commission (years before Julius’s death) that pulled Michelangelo off the battle fresco. And a selection of plans — scribbled on paper scraps, spread across pasted-together sheets — for the facade of the Medici parish church of San Lorenzo adds up to a beguiling archive of thinking-in-progress. Rarely has architectural design felt more expressively personal, moody, painterly, calligraphic.Part of Ms. Bambach’s goal, and one that she pursues in her labor-of-love catalog, is to revisit the original Renaissance concept of design — disegno — as a theoretical category, an aesthetic and ethical end in itself. A basic idea was that just as the physical world represented, in every shade and contour, divine labor so, on a human level, did (or could) art. Michelangelo benefited mightily from this elevation of the artist from workshop drone to deity (and brand). In his later megastar years, people actually referred to him as God. The Sistine Chapel ceiling is a work of disegno in excelsis: the story of the Creation told through superhuman craft.The exhibition’s long central gallery is given over to the ceiling, a project so complex that Michelangelo gave up organizing a production team and did most of the job himself. You can see him plugging away at it, on scaffolding just under the ceiling, in a self-caricature drawn in the margin of a handwritten sonnet. “I’ve already grown a goiter at this drudgery,” he grouses. “My brush, above me all the time, drips paint, turning my face into a perfect drop cloth.”In the Sistine paintings — the male body — and nearly all the bodies are male — are muscle on top of muscle, Arnold Schwarzenegger circa 1975. The Classical ideal — balance, just-rightness — has been pumped out of existence. Mannerist too-muchness — the 21st century knows a lot about this — rules. Neither the ceiling, nor the later, nightmarish “Last Judgment,” is art you’re invited to love. It aims to overpower you, make you feel small, crushed by cosmic history. Some viewers find the experience a thrill. I’ve always found it off-putting.It’s in drawings that I start to feel close to this art and its maker. One chalk-sketched titan has an oddly lumpy, imperfect, maybe-not-young body; and he’s sleeping. Clearly, he’s a studio assistant who’s been roped into posing at the end of a day. And while the mood of the “Last Judgment” fresco is full-orchestra cataclysmic, ink sketches for it can be light, almost tender. In one, the resurrected dead float in space, speck-like and weightless, like birds lifting off from a foggy lake.And then there are drawings generated by tenderness itself. This is true of a gallery devoted to fanciful “divine heads,” including one of a doleful Cleopatra, that the middle-aged artist made as gifts for young male aristocrats — Gherardo Perini, Andrea Quaratesi, Tommaso de’ Cavalieri — on whom he had developed crushes. His black chalk portrait of Quaratesi, who was 37 years his junior, as a somber dreamboat with plush lips and faraway eyes is here and it’s an eye-stopper. So are several discreetly erotic mythological drawings he gave as Valentines to Cavalieri who, whatever the sexual nature of their bond, became a lifelong friend. He was at the artist’s bedside when he died at 88 in Rome in 1564.And in that city, where Michelangelo spent the last 30 years of his life, he met the poet and intellectual Vittoria Colonna. Their friendship came late (he was 61), lasted until Colonna’s death in 1547, and seems to have seriously changed him. It encouraged his move in a contemplative direction and brought a new soft grace to his work. Michelangelo can be, often is, a visually aggressive artist. But he isn’t that — quite the opposite — in the meltingly sinuous red-and-black chalk “Dead Christ Held by His Mother” from the late 1530s, or in the great black chalk “Pietà” from around 1546 that he dedicated to Colonna, and gave to her.But in other essential ways he didn’t change. In late career, he was still a workaholic, overbooking on commissions, pacifying popes, writing poetry, and cooking up designs for other artists (Sebastiano del Piombo, Daniele da Volterra) to turn into paintings. Hand and mind were never still. They never had been. Nearly every drawing in the Met show is a work sheet. The artist makes a sketch, rotates it to make a second, turns it over and adds yet another. Images on any given sheet might include bodybuilders, saints, architectural elevations, a pornographic doodle, a man screaming, a verse from Petrarch, a beloved face. To a genius, monuments are made of any and all of these.
Krysten Ritter Spins Her Own Mystery in Her Debut Novel, ‘Bonfire’ When Krysten Ritter was writing her first novel, “Bonfire,” about a shady cover-up in small-town America, a plastics company with suspicious motives and a decade-old scandal given new relevance, she understood the genre she was working in.Still, she surprised herself when she finished a first draft of the manuscript and was able to take it all in.“The book is dark, I am aware,” she said in her natural, deadpan mode. “But I don’t think I was aware how dark until I read the whole thing in one sitting.”Ms. Ritter has already shown an affinity for shadowy, suspenseful material in her film and TV work, playing enigmatic characters on shows like “Breaking Bad” and “Don’t Trust the B - - - - in Apartment 23.”And she has embraced the flawed but powerful title character she currently plays on the Netflix superhero drama “Jessica Jones,” a detective fighting to take charge of her life while she tends to some deep psychic wounds.“Bonfire,” which was published by Crown Archetype earlier this month, is Ms. Ritter’s fictionalized dive into her own rural upbringing and a thriller in the style of her favorite genre novels. In a review, Publishers Weekly called it “a triumphant fiction debut” and a “pulse-pounding thriller featuring a sympathetic, broken lead character.”But Ms. Ritter said she also considered the novel “an act of pure defiance”: a narrative she wants to see more of, featuring a female protagonist she relates to, made at a time when she was disappointed with other acting opportunities that were offered to her.“I’m not conventional,” Ms. Ritter said over a recent lunch in Williamsburg, Brooklyn. “I try to be raw and vulnerable and gross.” The novel, she said, “was a way for me to create something for myself — to take the story back and do what I want to do.”The protagonist of “Bonfire” is Abby Williams, an environmental lawyer in Chicago who returns to her modest hometown of fictional Barrens, Ind., to investigate a case against Optimal Plastics, a conglomerate intertwined in seemingly every aspect of the community.There, while Abby is reacquainted with all that she loved and (mostly) hated about living there, she is drawn back into an unsolved mystery from her high-school days, 10 years earlier, when a group of her teenage tormentors were beset by an unexplained sickness and one of her mean-girl rivals went missing.Ms. Ritter, 35, who came of age in the small borough of Shickshinny, Pa., said her ambition was to bring to life a “twisted backwoods” setting where “the party that you go to on Friday night is a bonfire,” and “the district magistrate is putting people in juvie when he’s out smoking weed with kids on the weekends.”Some of the most evocative passages in “Bonfire” are about Abby’s awkward return to Barrens, a town she thought she outran. There, Ms. Ritter writes, beauty works “by sidling up to you when you least expect it” and an unappealing childhood home “seems to rush toward me and not the other way around. Like it’s eager to get me inside. Like it’s been waiting.”Ms. Ritter did not have a high-school experience as brutal as Abby’s but, she said, “I understand the feelings of being the outcast and the loner.”In her early teens, she came to Shickshinny as an only child raised by a divorced mother, traits that she said made her a prominent target for whispers and rumors. “At that time, where I’m from, nobody got divorced yet,” she said, “so everybody was like: ‘Psst, psst, psst.’”By the time she graduated high school, she was modeling extensively in New York, Tokyo and Milan, but craving work as an actor, producer and musician.She has since found those opportunities on shows like “Breaking Bad” and the teenage noir “Veronica Mars,” as well as in projects she has developed with her production company, Silent Machine.Gren Wells, a screenwriter, director and friend of Ms. Ritter’s, described her as “psychotically driven, in the best way.”“In this industry, you have to be a self-starter and make your own career,” Ms. Wells said. “She’s not the type of actor who sits around and waits for a phone call. She will create her own product.”Ms. Ritter said she placed particular value in her experience on “Jessica Jones,” based on that Marvel heroine, a wisecracking private investigator still coping with the trauma of a villain who invaded and took over her life.“It wasn’t until after the show came out,” she said, “ that real women on the street would tell me how ‘Jessica Jones’ changed their lives — how it helped them deal with their own past sexual trauma.”After several of those interactions, Ms. Ritter said, “I started to think in different terms. It made me want to be even better. It made me want to give it all.”Ms. Ritter was already committed to playing the Jessica Jones character in another Netflix series, “The Defenders,” and while she waited for it to start shooting, she was dismayed with the film roles she was being offered in the meantime: sundry strippers and wives of husbands who were “like my dad’s age,” she said.“No, I don’t want to do that,” she said. “That’s not what I want to put into the world.”Instead, Ms. Ritter spent several months writing “Bonfire” at her home in Los Angeles, putting meat on the bones of an idea she originally had for a possible TV series.Her writing process, Ms. Ritter said, “looks like me pacing around in flannel pajamas with a pot of coffee, jotting things down by hand.” On any given day, she said, “if you checked my pedometer on my phone, I probably walked 10 miles, back and forth in my home.”When Ms. Ritter would run into creative roadblocks, Ms. Wells said, “They would last no more than 24 hours, because she didn’t have time. She was trying to finish this before starting on ‘The Defenders,’ so she had a hard deadline.”She might allow herself a few hours to knit or take a walk, Ms. Wells said, “and then she was back off to the races.”Melissa Rosenberg, the creator and show runner of the “Jessica Jones” TV series, said that she saw similarities in how Ms. Ritter approached her acting work and the writing of “Bonfire.”“Krysten really works from the inside out,” Ms. Rosenberg said. “She cares about the internal workings of a character — how does this person move or talk? — and that informs the world they inhabit. As an actress and a writer, how she’s bringing an audience into her experience through the various choices she makes, which are sometimes just incredibly subtle.”What Ms. Ritter and Jessica Jones share, Ms. Rosenberg said, is a sense of humor: “Jessica’s is a bit darker, on an ongoing basis,” she said. “She’s more about a one-liner and a wry look. Krysten laughs loud and she laughs easily.Jennifer Schuster, the executive editor at Crown Archetype, said she saw in “Bonfire” a wealth of storytelling talents that Ms. Ritter has gleaned from her onscreen career.“She had a great eye for developing a complicated, messy female character — the kind of character that you recognize some of yourself in,” Ms. Schuster said. “Some of your own fear, some of your own darkness, some of your own secrets.”Having recently wrapped production on a second season of “Jessica Jones,” Ms. Ritter is now on a promotional tour for “Bonfire” and exulting in the sense of freedom that the project offered her.It’s a feeling that Ms. Ritter said reminded her of an earlier phase of her career, when she started moving away from modeling and appearing in her first TV commercials.Recalling that era, she said, “I finally have control. It’s not all about, like, how pointy is your nose? I mean, I have a pointy nose. But what am I supposed to do? It’s what God gave me.”
Tell Us 5 Things About Your Book: Capturing the Elusive Robert Frank The subject of R J Smith’s 2012 biography “The One: The Life and Music of James Brown” lived a life that was, to say the least, highly visible. For his new book, “American Witness,” Mr. Smith chose a far more reclusive subject — the Swiss-born photographer and filmmaker Robert Frank, best known for “The Americans,” a groundbreaking 1959 book of black-and-white photos that offered an unvarnished look at the country at midcentury. (“I’ve always wished I could write songs the way he takes pictures,” Bruce Springsteen once said.) Mr. Frank, now in his 90s, was an integral part of the cultural churn of New York City in the 1950s and ’60s. Mr. Smith writes of “The Americans” in his biography: “Robert Frank wants to connect with his country,” and “he hunts for a shared identity. But he also wants to be profoundly lost and unknown. He lives in the street and yearns to move silently among people who don’t recognize him.” Below, Mr. Smith talks about first learning of Mr. Frank in a rock magazine in the 1970s, how “American Witness” became darker and more ambiguous as he wrote it, his fascination with one of the Three Stooges, and more.When did you first get the idea to write this book?The first time I heard of Robert Frank was from reading in Creem magazine, in 1973 or 1974, about this film that there was a big argument about with the Rolling Stones, “[expletive] Blues,” and that there was this guy the Stones let go on the road with them, and who they bowed down to and were in awe of, and were now running scared from. I was thinking then: This guy is more extreme and more cool to a teenager than the Rolling Stones. I was 14 or so.About five years ago, I had thought I’d sold a book about Aretha Franklin, and for various reasons it didn’t happen. And my wife said to me, Who do you just want to write about? Not what book do you think you can sell, and how much for? Forget about that. Who would you be interested in thinking about for a number of years and trying to understand? That was a great question. And Robert Frank was the answer.What’s the most surprising thing you learned while writing it?Frank says that he once sued a magazine for calling him bohemian. I love that, and I’m fascinated by that. I hadn’t heard it until I started working on this biography. To many of us, this is someone who seems like an admirable, great bohemian of all time, but that drove him nuts. He needs to feel outside of definition — or at least easy definition — and received labels, and that’s something so important to understanding him; that even in this funny anecdotal way, he doesn’t want to be explained, and certainly not in a cliché. Of course, his not wanting to be explained made it very interesting to work on this book.In what way is the book you wrote different from the book you set out to write?Going in, I thought I was going to be looking at somebody who was fascinated by and obsessed with America. He wanted to throw himself into it and come to terms with it. Along the way it became clear that the book is just as much about what America did to him, and how it transformed him; what America does to all artists, really. The kind of hardship he was willing to live with, and to court and to seek out. He came to think, and I would assume he still does think, that to be an artist, to be creative and to live with yourself, means to pay a big price, in all kinds of ways. That’s something I wasn’t really thinking about, but it’s important to understanding him, and it made it a much darker and more ambiguous kind of book.Who is a creative person (not a writer) who has influenced you and your work?Shemp Howard. There’s a great broken humanity to him and a great gentleness, which is a crazy word to say in regards to the Three Stooges. He’s a stand-in for lots of other people. I see him as somebody who worked within utter conventions — formal restraints, economic restraints — and ended up making art and entertainment that is completely inexplicable and incredibly American. It’s that Manny Farber idea of “termite art” that, on the one hand, hews to formal considerations, works within a genre or a set of rules; but on the other, constantly burns through them and creates chaos.You see work like Shemp at his best or Ernie Bushmiller, the artist who drew the comic strip “Nancy,” or Philip Guston’s paintings, and you could spend your life trying to understand something that’s so simple and direct and yet completely outside the acceptable frame. It’s about getting a feeling of confusion and uncertainty; seeing something that’s beyond understanding and trying to understand it, whether you ever end up doing that or not.Totally coincidentally, Robert Frank’s first job when he came to America was as a photographer for the Three Stooges. They were touring Queens, and he was traveling with them to take publicity photos.Persuade someone to read “American Witness” in 50 words or less.Frank’s connected with so many scenes and moments, from the Beats and Abstract Expressionists to the modern invention of American independent film. He had this knack for being at the right place at the right time, but often just left without a trace. What trace do we have now?This interview has been condensed and edited.
What’s on TV Sunday: Joe Biden and the MTV Europe Awards Oprah Winfrey sits down with Joe Biden for an interview about the loss of his son to cancer. A documentary explores one of America’s first celebrity chefs. SUPERSOUL SUNDAY 11 a.m. on OWN. Oprah Winfrey sits down for an interview with former Vice President Joe Biden to talk about his new book, “Promise Me, Dad: A Year of Hope, Hardship, and Purpose.” In the book and the interview he revisits his struggles during 2015, when he lost his son Beau to brain cancer while still in office.MTV EUROPE MUSIC AWARDS 3 p.m. on MTV. The Europe Music Awards were created in 1994 as counterprogramming to the American V.M.A.s. Somehow, though, all six of those nominated for best artist this year are from North America. But the host is Rita Ora, who grew up in West London and will attempt to imbue the Wembley Arena event with a hometown sensibility as her wanderlust-driven single “Anywhere” climbs the British charts. She’ll be joined onstage by fellow Brits (Liam Payne, Stormzy), a Cuban-American (Camila Cabello), and the éminence grise of Ireland, U2. And Kesha returns after a bitter legal battle to support an uplifting new album, “Rainbow.”JEREMIAH TOWER: THE LAST MAGNIFICENT (2017) 9 p.m. on CNN. Before Emeril, Bobby Flay and Gordon Ramsay, there was Jeremiah Tower, one of America’s first celebrity chefs. Along with the chef Alice Waters, he transformed Chez Panisse in Berkeley into a cultural destination, putting fresh local ingredients at the heart of a new California Cuisine. The result was a “complete re-evaluation of not just American food and ingredients, but food,” said Anthony Bourdain, an executive producer of this documentary. This film chronicles Mr. Tower’s creation of the immensely popular restaurant Stars, his disappearance from the spotlight, and subsequent return to Tavern on the Green.MADAM SECRETARY 10 p.m. on CBS. Secretary of State Elizabeth McCord, played with mettle by Téa Leoni, refuses to negotiate with terrorists for the release of a captured CIA agent. Elizabeth tries to support her daughter Stevie through a difficult time.AMC VISIONARIES: ROBERT KIRKMAN’S SECRET HISTORY OF COMICS 11 p.m. on AMC. Robert Kirkman, the creative mastermind behind “The Walking Dead” comic book series, is moving onto the next apocalypse: He recently announced a new series, “Oblivion Song,” that centers on an alien-related catastrophe in Philadelphia. In this two-part special, he looks back on the transformations and evolutions of the comic book world, with interviews with luminaries like Stan Lee, Patty Jenkins, J.K. Simmons and Michelle Rodriguez.STAR TREK: DISCOVERY on CBS All Access. The latest “Star Trek” reboot is set a decade before the original series; it has taken on a darker tone than previous iterations, and centers on First Officer Michael Burnham (Sonequa Martin-Green). “The series’ most promising innovation has been making the protagonist not the crew’s captain but an outsider,” James Poniewozik wrote in The New York Times. Sunday’s episode is the last of the fall.
Ellen Page Says Brett Ratner Made Comment Outing Her Ellen Page has become one of the latest actors to share her story of sexual harassment, accusing the director and producer Brett Ratner of suggesting crudely that another woman have sex with Ms. Page “to make her realize she’s gay.”Ms. Page, 30, known for films including “Juno,” “Inception” and “To Rome With Love,” said in a Facebook post on Friday that when Mr. Ratner made his comment, she was 18 and had not yet come out as a lesbian. She came out in 2014.Mr. Ratner, whose films include “The Revenant” and “Rush Hour,” is facing several allegations of sexual misconduct. On Nov. 1, The Los Angeles Times reported that six women said Mr. Ratner had sexually harassed or assaulted them.Ms. Page said that when Mr. Ratner made his comment, at a cast event for the 2006 movie “X-Men: The Last Stand,” she looked down at her feet. “I felt violated when this happened,” she said, adding that no one, including herself, spoke up in her defense.Another actor, Anna Paquin, said on Twitter on Friday that she was there when the comment was made. “I stand with you,” she added, tagging Ms. Page.“If you can’t think of the glaringly obvious reason I remained silent,” Ms. Paquin said in a subsequent post, “then perhaps you’ve forgotten that I’ve been in this victim grooming industry since before I hit puberty.”In addition to the allegations against Mr. Ratner that were reported by The Los Angeles Times, another woman, Melanie Kohler, said in a Facebook post on Oct. 18 that Mr. Ratner had raped her. She took down the post after a phone call with Martin Singer, a lawyer for Mr. Ratner.Mr. Ratner went on to file a defamation lawsuit against Ms. Kohler that said her post was “entirely false, fabricated and fictional.”In statement to The New York Times regarding the other allegations, Mr. Singer said he and Mr. Ratner “are confident that his name will be cleared once the current media frenzy dies down and people can objectively evaluate the nature of these claims.” Mr. Singer did not respond immediately to an emailed request for comment on Saturday about Ms. Page’s allegations.Ms. Page’s lengthy post was more than an accusation against Mr. Ratner.“The behavior I’m describing is ubiquitous,” she wrote. “They (abusers), want you to feel small, to make you insecure, to make you feel like you are indebted to them, or that your actions are to blame for their unwelcome advances.”She recalled being touched or assaulted by at least two other men when she was 16, and she said she regretted working with the director Woody Allen, who has also been accused of abuse.Ms. Page, who developed and produced “Gaycation,” a documentary series in which she traveled around the world meeting lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender people, called violence against women an “epidemic,” and her post touched on homophobia, privilege, victimization and white supremacy.“Let’s remember the epidemic of violence against women in our society disproportionately affects low income women, particularly women of color, trans and queer women and indigenous women, who are silenced by their economic circumstances and profound mistrust of a justice system that acquits the guilty in the face of overwhelming evidence and continues to oppress people of color,” she wrote, adding that she had the privilege of wealth and a platform to speak out.A representative for Ms. Page said she was not available for comment.Many of the women and men who have come forward with allegations of sexual misconduct have said they were inspired by others who made similar claims, including celebrities who have made use of their public platforms and people across a range of industries — including technology, fashion and food service — who have been sharing stories of harassment on social media using the hashtag #MeToo.Mr. Ratner is one in a long line of prominent men who have been accused of sexual misconduct, harassment or assault in recent months. Others include the producer Harvey Weinstein, the director James Toback, the NPR president and former New York Times editor Michael Oreskes and the comedian Louis C. K.“I am grateful to anyone and everyone who speaks out against abuse and trauma they have suffered,” Ms. Page wrote on Friday. “You are breaking the silence. You are revolution.”
Lyric Opera of Chicago Offers Very Theatrical ‘Die Walküre’ CHICAGO — Many productions of Wagner’s “Die Walküre” stage the “Ride of the Valkyries” scene as a rowdy reunion. We see eight Valkyrie sisters, who arrive on their flying steeds, assemble at a mountaintop to greet one another giddily.Of course, these warrior maidens have weighty responsibilities. At the command of their father, Wotan, they must bring the bodies of fallen heroes to Valhalla, revive them, and then press them into service defending this fortress of the gods. That’s what the director David Pountney emphasizes in his very theatrical new production of “Die Walküre” for the Lyric Opera of Chicago, the second installment of the company’s complete “Ring” cycle, which began last season with a new “Das Rheingold.” I attended Friday’s performance.In this staging, the bloodied bodies of the fallen are everywhere: hanging like corpses on a huge rope net at the back of the stage; lying limp on surgical tables; stuffed in body bags tethered to the horses of Valkyries, who deposit them with a thud on the ground. This place is a combination sweatshop and emergency ward. The grind has become routine for these boisterous, singing Valkyries, in their crimson-red work dresses, who sponge down the dead bodies, cleanse limbs with water hoses, and try to slap them awake.Their flying steeds here become metal horses on long-armed cranes that rise and fall and roll on wheels — operated by a visible crew of stagehands. The conceit of Mr. Pountney’s “Ring” involves a behind-the-scenes look at a performing troupe presenting a show in an old theater. We see the mechanics of all the stage tricks.There is resonance to this concept. The stories of the old myths and legends, including Wagner’s “Ring” operas, have been told many times before. We are watching these players tell this one again.The production is full of entertaining touches and striking imagery. If Mr. Pountney has any particular interpretive take on Wagner’s work, I didn’t see it; the same was true of his “Rheingold.” But the staging is certainly theatrical, and Mr. Pountney lays out the story clearly.He also excels at drawing compellingly acted performances from a strong cast, starting here with the soprano Christine Goerke, an arresting Brünnhilde. In the time since her first staged Brünnhilde in Toronto in early 2015 Ms. Goerke has made this role her own. (She will sing it when the Metropolitan Opera revives Robert Lepage’s “Ring” next season.) That her singing on Friday was so sumptuous, powerful and exciting was no surprise. Her Valkyrie war cries rang with steely brilliance; her frantic pleas to her sisters to protect her from Wotan’s wrath had tremulous intensity. She brought disarming vulnerability to the moments when this feisty Brünnhilde was caught up in emotional confusion, especially the long scene in Act II when Wotan unburdens himself to his favorite child and tells the whole sorry saga of the mistakes he made trying to gain more power.The bass-baritone Eric Owens is a magnificent Wotan. His first crack at the role came last season here with the Lyric Opera’s “Rheingold.” Though that performance had dignity and vigor, vocally he sounded a little underpowered.That was not a problem during Friday’s “Walküre.” With a stentorian voice and crisp diction, he sent Wotan’s phrases soaring into the house. And this god’s dilemma, the way he has enslaved himself, as he tells Brünnhilde, by finagling with covenants he is supposed to enforce, came through achingly during this heartbreaking scene. As presented here, Wotan and his wife, Fricka (the rich-voiced mezzo-soprano Tanja Ariane Baumgartner), could be a wealthy robber baron in the late 19th century and his entitled-acting spouse.If he appealing tenor Brandon Jovanovich lacked a little vocal heft as Siegmund, he sang with burnished sound and deep feeling, and conveyed the sadness of a rootless young person who does not even know he’s a demigod, the son of Wotan. The impressive soprano Elisabet Strid, as Sieglinde, sang with radiant, focused sound and poignant expressive shadings. She and Mr. Jovanovich were profoundly moving during Act I as these long-separated twins realize their connection and fall helplessly in love.Mr. Pountney made a bad call in his staging by having Sieglinde’s bullying husband Hunding (the bass Ain Anger in a menacing performance) chain her to the tree in his hut when he’s away. No physical restraint keeps miserable Sieglinde in this abusive marriage. She is terrified. But Hunding has also beaten her down, made her feel like a powerless nobody.Andrew Davis conducted an uncommonly warm and flowing performance of Wagner’s score — almost too much so. There were stretches when subdued passages, for all the beauty of the playing, lost suspense and tension. But the episodes of high drama had plenty of vigor and clarity. And perhaps the restraint Mr. Davis brought to bear balanced out the theatricality of the staging to good effect.
BBC Show Starring Ed Westwick Is Postponed Amid Rape Allegations The BBC announced that it was postponing the debut of its new thriller, an Agatha Christie adaptation starring Ed Westwick, and said that production had been disrupted on another series starring the actor, after two women in the past week accused him of rape.“These are serious allegations which Ed Westwick has strenuously denied,” the BBC said in a statement on Friday. The broadcaster added that it “is not making any judgment,” but said that “until these matters are resolved,” the drama “Ordeal by Innocence” would not appear on television.The show had been set to air in Britain as part of the BBC’s Christmas programming and was later expected to become available on Amazon in the United States.Mr. Westwick, best known for portraying Chuck Bass on “Gossip Girl,” was also starring in the series “White Gold,” a BBC comedy that is available on Netflix.“The independent production company making ‘White Gold’ has informed us that Ed Westwick has paused from filming while he deals with these allegations,” the BBC said.Mr. Westwick has vehemently denied each of the accusations on social media. His publicist could not immediately be reached for comment.Kristina Cohen, the first of the two women to come forward, said on Facebook on Monday that Mr. Westwick had raped her three years ago while she was dating a friend of his who was a producer.“It was a nightmare, and the days following weren’t any better,” she wrote. “The producer put the blame on me, telling me I was an active participant. Telling me that I can’t say anything because Ed will have people come after me, destroy me, and that I could forget about an acting career.”The Los Angeles Police Department began investigating the accusation after Ms. Cohen filed a police report on Tuesday that named Mr. Westwick, said Officer Drake Madison, a spokesman for the department.Mr. Westwick said Tuesday in posts on Twitter and Instagram that he did not know Ms. Cohen.“I have never forced myself in any manner, on any woman,” he added. “I certainly have never committed rape.”The second woman, Aurélie Wynn, said on Facebook that Mr. Westwick had raped her in August 2014. She posted her story on Wednesday, then clarified some of the details on Friday.Mr. Westwick denied the allegations on Thursday, and said it was “disheartening and sad” that people would suggest he “had anything to do with such vile and horrific conduct.”He added: “I have absolutely not, and I am cooperating with the authorities so that they can clear my name as soon as possible.”
Taylor Swift’s First Mention in The Times Humbly Hinted at What Was to Come Friday was launch day for “Reputation,” the sixth studio album by the pop singer Taylor Swift.The monthslong rollout — the album’s first single, “Look What You Made Me Do,” was released in August — created such anticipation for the record on social media that a custom emoji was even created for Twitter mentions of the album.It’s an incredibly different world from the one Ms. Swift first encountered during the release of her first record.On Oct. 22, 2006, the New York Times pop music critic Kelefa Sanneh included the song “Tim McGraw” in his  playlist recommendations — it would be Ms. Swift’s first mention in The Times. The 145-word item was wedged between a review of the mid-aught reggae act Da’Ville and Stephen McGregor (complete with a link to their Myspace page) and a mention of the “hummable” work of short-lived Blink-182 spinoff act Plus-44. The full text of Ms. Swift’s first mention in The Times:The blurb caught Ms. Swift’s career as it was taking flight. The single, her first, had just been released four months earlier. Her self-titled first album — which went on to be certified platinum — would be released two days later. She had just been announced as the new opener of that fall’s Rascal Flatts tour.Both everything has changed, and nothing has changed since that brief mention, when she was called “brazen enough” to name her single after a country megastar.But in the past 11 years, with what Mr. Sanneh called her “lightweight ode to seasonal love,” Ms. Swift has become one of the best-selling artists of all time, with 10 Grammy wins and 29 nominations.Now the bold pop star begins again, with yet another clean slate. Reviewing Ms. Swift’s new release, the Times critic Jon Caramanica called it “bombastic, unexpected, sneakily potent” and concluded that “she is as strong a singer as ever.”2006 Taylor would be happy to hear it.
Review: Amazon’s New Pilots, the End of an Era? In recent months Amazon has articulated a new original-content strategy: go “Game of Thrones” or go home. It wants “big shows,” genre dramas with automatic fan appeal, and it’s signed up creators like the film director Wong Kar-wai and the “Walking Dead” impresario Robert Kirkman to provide them.So the three new Amazon comedy pilots may be the last of their breed — mildly eccentric, indie-style half-hours with no tent-pole names attached. It’s also notable that each, in its different way, is centered on a woman who deserves more from life. If Amazon is abandoning the art house (online-streaming division) for the multiplex, we won’t see shows like these any time soon.This alt-zombie story comes with plenty of highbrow cred: It’s written by George Saunders, the recent winner of the Man Booker Prize, and directed by Hiro Murai, Donald Glover’s collaborator on “Atlanta.”Glenn Close stars as Bernie, an aging maiden aunt who in quick succession is demoted from her job as a cashier and killed in her living room by an unseen intruder. But she doesn’t stay dead, and when she comes back, she’s a new, fiercely angry Bernie, awake to the indignities of the monochromatic, subsistence-level life she’s led.Mr. Murai gives “Sea Oak” (the name of the housing complex where Bernie lives with a gaggle of adult nieces and nephews) the slightly anesthetized, Jim Jarmusch vibe he and Mr. Glover bring to “Atlanta,” but Mr. Saunders’s Rust Belt magic realism doesn’t carry the same force onscreen, at least in this initial half-hour.The most jumbled but also most distinctive of the three pilots is this piece about an office drone who dreams of being a social-media star. Set and filmed in Detroit, “The Climb” is like a more profane but also more buttoned-up, and no less cerebral, companion to Issa Rae’s HBO comedy “Insecure.”Nia, played by the show’s creator, Diarra Kilpatrick, appreciates the “genius” of a rival influencer — that she’s “figured out how to be Barbie, how to be sexy for a living” — but what Nia really wants is to be fulfilled. When she’s told that’s a white-girl problem, she replies, “Isn’t that why Martin Luther King died, so that I could someday have white-girl problems?”It’s easy to see how this collaboration of the comedian and cabaret star Bridget Everett and the showrunner Michael Patrick King (“Sex and the City”) could translate into a fairly conventional series, even though some of its elements — like an enthusiastic sex scene with the Amazonian Ms. Everett and a diminutive, chatty, very well-endowed man she picks up in a bar — push boundaries.The bulk of the half-hour, in which Ms. Everett’s character, Karen, works with the young residents of a home for people with Down syndrome, is standard sitcom stuff (even with an A plot that involves a teenager with a propensity for touching Karen’s breasts). It’s the biggest showcase so far for Ms. Everett’s knowing, tough but vulnerable persona, and it gives her occasions to sing, including a production number about buying a bra (which is, once again, focused on her body).Stealing attention from Ms. Everett is a tall order, but Loni Anderson manages it in a supporting role as Karen’s guileless older roommate.
Robby the Robot: From ‘Forbidden Planet’ to Auction Block The only cast member of the 1956 science-fiction space epic “Forbidden Planet” to receive sole billing in the opening credits is being auctioned. In other words, it’s not Walter Pidgeon, Anne Francis or Leslie Nielsen.It’s Robby, the seven-foot-tall robot who towered over his co-stars both literally and, ultimately, in the popular imagination. On Nov. 21, he will be part of Bonhams’ “Out of This World!” sale of movie memorabilia in New York, with an expected sale price in the low- to mid-seven figures.As opposed to the “Maschinenmensch” of “Metropolis” (1927) and Gort in “The Day the Earth Stood Still” (1951), Robby represented a breakthrough in mechanical personality. Though vaguely menacing, he mixed readily with humans. His voice, provided in postproduction by Marvin Miller, was stentorian yet conversational.And his looks were unforgettable. His bowling-ball-shaped legs, whirling and clattering chest and head components (topped off by a clear, bottlenose skullcap), and blue neon tubing that lit up when he spoke made him an instant classic. After “Forbidden Planet,” Robby appeared in “The Twilight Zone,” “The Addams Family,” “Lost in Space,” “Hazel,” “Columbo” and elsewhere. He also inspired a bevy of toys.“He’s so beautifully thought out,” said Robby’s owner, Bill Malone, 70, of Studio City, Calif. “‘Forbidden Planet’ would not have worked had Robby been a boiler-pot robot from the 1940s.”Robby was built mainly of Royalite, an ABS plastic often used for luggage, by a team of Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer designers and technicians for approximately $100,000. His electronics could be activated via an offstage control panel connected by a cable, or by an operator inside the costume who conducted the actual movement.“As a kid,” Mr. Malone said, “I totally believed he was real.”Bonhams is selling Robby along with the control panel, a futuristic land vehicle he piloted on planet Altair IV, and his original M.G.M. packing crates. The studio sold the lot in 1970 to Jim Brucker, who displayed Robby at the now-defunct Movie World/Cars of Stars venue in Orange County, Calif.Mr. Malone bought the works from Mr. Brucker for “pennies on the dollar” in 1979; since then the robot has resided in Mr. Malone’s home. “Every morning I’d have coffee with Robby,” he said.So why unload him now? “I’m of an age where I’m still healthy and doing good,” Mr. Malone said, “but I think it’s time to think about his future. We’re sending Robby to college.”There are also practical considerations. Mr. Malone recalled that someone once telephoned to ask, “‘Is it O.K. if I bring a couple of people over?’”“And he drove up in a Greyhound bus with a bunch of Japanese people, as if I were part of the Universal tour,” he continued. “I think people need to see him in a museum setting.”“It was tough working with a robot who didn’t talk,” said Earl Holliman, 89, the last surviving major player in “Forbidden Planet.” “Whenever I talked to Robby, the lines would be delivered by the script supervisor, who was sitting next to the cameraman. It was kind of awkward.”Still, as the cook of United Planets Cruiser C-57D, Mr. Holliman forged a bond with Robby when the robot distilled 60 gallons of bourbon for him.“He’s been a friend for 62 years,” Mr. Holliman said, “and I hope that whoever gets him keeps him well lubricated.”
